title,date,content,category
The U.S. avoided recession last year. What comes next?,2024-01-04T04:23:00,"Entering 2023, more than 85% of economists expected a U.S. recession before year’s end. They had good reason: The yield curve, usually a harbinger of recession, inverted in July 2022, when rates for two-year Treasury bonds surpassed those for 10-year bonds. Meanwhile, on Main Street, Google searches for the term “recession” hit the highest mark in history.Recession expectations declined rapidly from 2023 to 2024Sources: Capital Group, Financial Times, University of Chicago. Figures for December 2022 and December 2023 are based on survey results from 44 respondents and 39 respondents, respectively. The December 2022 survey did not include a specific option for 2025 as a potential start date for the next recession. Figures may not add up to 100 due to rounding. Latest data available as of December 27, 2023.However, as we enter 2024, that recession has yet to materialize, and many of those same economists now expect a soft landing. With the U.S. economy expanding at a rate of 4.9% in the third quarter, unemployment under 4% and the U.S. Consumer Price Index down to 3.1% in November, it appears the U.S. Federal Reserve was able to tamp down inflation with rapid interest rate hikes while avoiding a recession.If the recession expectations of 2023, and now 2024, come with any lesson, it is that the economy and markets can surprise you. Therefore, investors would be better off not trying to time the market. It has been proven over time to be extremely difficult, according to Steve Watson, a portfolio manager for Capital Group Capital Income BuilderTM(Canada) and Capital Group Monthly Income PortfolioTM(Canada).With US$5.89 trillion in cash sitting in money market funds (according to the Investment Company Institute) as of December 27, 2023, investors who stayed on the sidelines earned yields fluctuating between 4.53% and 5.63% for the year (based on the benchmark 3-month Treasury) as recorded by the St. Louis Federal Reserve, but missed out on gains of 26.29% and 5.53% for the S&P 500 Index and Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, respectively, in U.S. dollar terms. Investors should consider leaning into the discomfort and uncertainty, following the Wall Street adage that time in the market beats timing the market.“If I could count up 23 or 24 downturns over roughly 35 years in the business, that's one every 16 months,” Watson notes. “We recover. It’s easy to say at moments of crisis in the markets that I'm going to wait for clarity before I invest — I’d rather wait to see catalysts for a turnaround. I've come to the conclusion that it's not worth trying.”Not all recessions or economic cycles are the same but looking back on underlying conditions — and focusing specifically on technology, banking and housing — provides a roadmap to how and why the U.S. avoided a recession in 2023, and perhaps how the same can be done in 2024.1. Lofty tech valuations supported by earnings growthThe rise of the “magnificent seven” (Apple, Microsoft, Alphabet, Amazon.com, NVIDIA, Tesla and Meta Platforms) has been compared to the excesses of the dot-com era in the late 1990s. But there are important differences today, says portfolio manager Mark Casey.“In 2000, companies were overvalued to a much greater degree than the market leaders are now,” Casey asserts. “At the top of the internet bubble there was lots of fluff that imploded. This time around, there is less fluff, and most of the mega-cap stocks are legitimate investments.”P/Es ratios today are far lower than during the dot-com bubbleSources: Capital Group, FactSet, Nasdaq, National Bureau of Economic Research, Refinitiv, Standard & Poor's. P/E ratios represent forward 12-month price-to-earnings ratios. Weight reflects the company market capitalization as a percentage of the overall index market capitalization. As of December 29, 2023. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.Looking at one common valuation metric, the average price-to-earnings (P/E) ratio (a measure of share price relative to earnings per share) of the NASDAQ 100 was 32.5 at the end of 2023. At the end of 1999, just preceding the stock market crash in March 2000, that figure was a whopping 79.59.The magnificent seven stocks have captured a majority of returns in a narrow market, making up a combined 59.1% of the Nasdaq 100 at the end of 2023. However, their relatively high valuations are backed up by earnings and cash flows that lend merit to their status as market leaders.Take Microsoft, the largest Nasdaq constituent by market cap at the end of 1999, and second largest behind only Apple as of late 2023. At the end of 2023, Microsoft had a P/E ratio of 29.1. Compare that to the end of 1999, when Microsoft sat at 60.8.Investors may be wary of elevated prices for some of these mega-cap stocks. However, given the growth potential for some of today’s market leaders, they may make sense as holdings within a balanced portfolio, according to Casey.2. Banking contagion was containedThe March 2023 banking crisis was an interest rate issue rather than a credit issue — an outgrowth of one of the fastest hiking cycles in history. As interest rates rose, the market value of the banks’ bond holdings plummeted, triggering customer worries that the banks would not have enough liquid assets to secure their deposits.“Liquidity providers were able to breathe a huge sigh of relief when the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation reminded nervous investors that no losses would be taken by depositors,” explains Will Robbins, a portfolio manager for Capital Group Capital Income BuilderTM(Canada).Additionally, the Federal Reserve provided liquidity through the Bank Term Funding Program. This emergency lending program offered banks up to one-year loans with the use of Treasuries and other qualifying assets at their original price instead of their lower market value.Much as the regulators learned lessons in the 2008 banking crisis that helped in their response in 2023, investors can learn from apprehension in 2023 as they approach 2024 markets.3. Housing supply and demand dynamics have changedInvestors currently worried about the housing market can take some solace from the fact that it is very different than it was in 2008.Today, the Fed’s rate hikes have dampened home sales alongside changes in housing patterns in the wake of the pandemic. All of this has served as a backstop for the volatility that occurred 15 years ago.“Back then we built a ton and had an oversupply of housing inventory. Today we have the opposite,” says Capital Group U.S. economist Darrell Spence. “We underbuilt for many years so that when COVID hit the housing market was pretty tight.”Spence adds that a strong labour market with near full employment and low-rate refinancing over the last decade have been helpful in the current environment.Were the recession indicators a signal or just noise?According to Spence, while economic models haven’t quite broken down, the system has absorbedmany distortions.“People talk about the COVID ‘recession’ and maybe it's because we don't have a better word,” Spence explains. “Output did contract, but not because of ‘normal’ recessionary forces. It was intentional. Governments threw money at the problem, and the economy has needed time to adjust.”If the Fed succeeds in managing a soft landing, it would be useful to look at the ISM Manufacturing PMI, or Purchasing Managers Index, a measure of industrial activity that has dropped in concert with every recession over the last three decades. A number below 50 means a contraction of manufacturing activity, while a number above 50 represents an expansion. The current PMI (as of November 30, 2023) was 46.7. The last time it hit lows around 45 without triggering a recession was in in June of 1995.A recent PMI downturn has not seen a corresponding hike in unemploymentSources: Capital Group, Bureau of Labor Statistics, Institute for Supply Management (ISM), National Bureau of Economic Research. Figures reflect the seasonally adjusted survey results from ISM's Manufacturing Purchasing Manager's Index (PMI); a PMI reading above 50 percent indicates that the manufacturing economy is generally expanding; below 50 percent indicates that it is generally declining. As of November 30, 2023.They say history doesn’t repeat itself, but it rhymes. In 1995, part of the market insecurity was the near doubling of the federal funds rate from 3.25% to 6.00% in just seven increases. Rate cuts in the back half of 1995 and early 1996 kept a recession at bay. The outcome this time around could be similar. The bullish view of the recent slowdown in industrial output is that it is simply an outgrowth of supply imbalances from the pandemic.While economic conditions today appear solid relative to history, the bottom line is that there are sure to be surprises in the year ahead, as there always have been. Rather than waiting for an all-clear signal to get back into stock and bond markets, maintaining well-diversified, balanced portfolios through economic cycles remains a sensible approach for long-term investors.",Economic Indicators
Economic outlook: A mixed picture for global growth in 2024,2023-11-29T10:28:00,"Under the weight of elevated inflation and high interest rates, the world’s major economies are diverging. Surprising resilience in the United States, Japan and India is helping to boost the global economic outlook for 2024, while ongoing signs of weakness in Europe and China are tempering expectations for the new year.International Monetary Fund forecasts call for global growth to average 2.9% in 2024, down slightly from 3% in 2023.U.S. economic strength may boost global growth“The resilience of the U.S. economy, in particular, really has been remarkable when you consider how much consumer prices have gone up and how aggressively the U.S. Federal Reserve has raised interest rates,” says Capital Group U.S. economist Jared Franz.“It’s a testament to the American consumer and labour market durability,” Franz adds. “It has certainly helped alleviate some of the worries about an impending recession. That could still happen, but I think the risk has declined substantially.”Expect mixed results for global economic growth in 2024Source: Capital Group. Country positions within the business cycle are forward-looking estimates by Capital Group economists as of October 2023. The size of the bubbles represents the approximate relative size of each economy and are for illustrative purposes only.The world’s two other largest economies, Europe and China, are expected to weigh on global growth as both struggle with an increasingly difficult environment for trade and rising geopolitical tensions.Germany, the biggest economy in Europe, is already contracting due to a sharp slowdown in manufacturing activity and waning demand from China, its largest trading partner. Meanwhile, the full 20-member eurozone and the U.K. are flatlining and could have a more difficult time if energy prices continue to rise as drastically as they have over the past two years.“The energy shock and higher interest rates are feeding through to weaker industrial activity,” says Robert Lind, Capital Group’s Europe economist. “That’s been made worse by a continuing slowdown in China’s economy. As a result, many European companies are sitting on large inventories.”While Lind expects the European economy to pick up in 2024, he believes it could be a shallow recovery.Interest rate outlook: Back to the “old normal”While high interest rates are impacting economies in different ways, the chances of a sharp decline in rates are diminishing. That means a return to the era of near-zero rates is not likely to happen any time soon, says portfolio manager Pramod Atluri.“I’m optimistic that consumers will continue to carry the economy, even as rates remain higher for an extended period,” Atluri explains. That’s partly because wages and home values remain above pre-pandemic levels, which has helped support consumer spending. A federal spending spree, especially on U.S. infrastructure projects, has also supported economic growth.U.S. interest rates today are within the range of historical normsSources: Federal Reserve, Robert Shiller. Data for 1871–1961 represents average monthly U.S. long-term government bond yields compiled by Robert Shiller. Data for 1962–2022 represents 10-year Treasury yields, as of December 31 each year within the period.Looking to 2024, Atluri believes 10-year U.S. Treasury yields may remain at levels considered normal prior to the global financial crisis and hover in a range of 3.5% to 5.5%. Call it the “old normal.” Going all the way back to 1870 — or roughly 61% of the time — rates have stayed mostly in the range of 3.0% to 6.0%.While the run-up in rates could weigh on financial markets, investors will likely adjust to that environment, Atluri adds. When 10-year rates were 4.0% to 6.0%, the average annual return since 1976 for the S&P 500 Index was 10.38%, while the Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index returned 6.59%. (Data is from December 31, 1976 to October 31, 2023.)Window of opportunity to move cash off the sidelinesAssuming most central banks are done — or nearly done — raising rates, that presents an opportunity for investors to get off the sidelines. The exodus from stock and bond markets into cash over the past few years was understandable, but those who remain uninvested may miss out on an opportunity to position their portfolios for long-term success.Historically speaking, the time between the end of a rate-hiking cycle and the initial rate cut has signaled a crucial opportunity for investors to redeploy cash into stocks and bonds. In the past, that “window” has lasted an average of 10 months.Following the last four Fed tightening cycles, stocks and bonds greatly outpaced U.S. 3-month Treasury-bill returns in the first year after the last Fed hike. Conversely, the 3-month Treasury yield, a benchmark Treasury security with a yield similar to cash-like investments, fell rapidly — declining by an average of 2.5% in the 18 months after the last Fed hike.“I believe we’re on the cusp of a major transition where long-term investors can find attractive investment opportunities in stocks and bonds,” says Mike Gitlin, president and chief executive officer of Capital Group.After Fed hikes ended, stocks and bonds have outpaced cashSources: Capital Group, Morningstar. Chart represents the average returns across respective sector proxies in a forward extending window starting in the month of the last Fed hike in the last four transition cycles from 1995 to 2018 with data through June 30, 2023. Benchmarks represent U.S. 3-month Treasury-bill (cash equivalents), Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Index (core bonds), S&P 500 Index (U.S. stocks) and a blend of the 60% S&P 500 Index and 40% Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Index (60/40 blend). Long-term averages represented by the average five-year annualized rolling returns from 1995. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.History has favoured patient investors in election years2024 will be a pivotal election year, not only in the United States but in many other countries, including India, Russia, South Africa, Taiwan and the U.K. Globally speaking, it could be one of the most impactful election years in history.The U.S. presidential election will take centre stage. And while it is still nearly a year away, investors may be feeling anxious about how markets will react to a potentially volatile campaign season and the possibility of a close vote, not unlike the 2020 election.“Several key issues will certainly be top of mind for voters, including international policy, the impact of inflation and numerous key social issues,"" says Capital Group political economist Matt Miller. “But a lot can change between now and November. That’s a lifetime in politics.”Although markets can be volatile in election years, for long-term investors the political party that wins the White House has had little impact on returns. Since 1936, the 10-year annualized return of U.S. stocks (as measured by the S&P 500 Index) made at the start of an election year was 11.2% when a Democrat won and 10.5% in years when a Republican prevailed.Red, blue and you: Party doesn't matter much for U.S. investorsSources: Capital Group, Standard & Poor’s. Chart reflects four-year presidential terms. Democrat administrations shown in blue, Republican administrations shown in red. Each 10-year period begins on January 1 of the first year shown and ends on December 31 of the tenth year. For example, the first period covers January 1, 1936 through December 31, 1945. Figures shown are past results and are not predictive of results in future periods.Capital Group portfolio manager Rob Lovelace, who has invested through many election cycles in his 37-year career, says the added political uncertainty can provide attractive investment opportunities at times.“When everyone is worried that a new government policy is going to hurt a sector, that concern is usually overblown,” says Lovelace. “High-quality companies often get caught in the political crosshairs, which can create a buying opportunity. But I aim for a long average holding period in my portfolios, so I typically try to look beyond the election cycle.”",Economic Indicators
What I’m reading: American Prometheus,2023-11-09T12:11:00,"In Greek mythology, Prometheus was the god of fire, a troublemaker of sorts who defied the other gods by giving fire to mere mortals. In doing so, he imparted a technology that would forever change the world.In the bookAmerican Prometheus, authors Kai Bird and Martin Sherwin borrow that analogy to describe the life, achievements and regrets of J. Robert Oppenheimer, the iconic physicist who led the effort to invent the atomic bomb. Winner of the 2006 Pulitzer Prize for biography, the book is the basis for the 2023 summer blockbuster movieOppenheimer.It is also portfolio manager Jody Jonsson’s pick for our new book review series. A previous article highlighting book selections by Capital Group’s investment team — which you can readhere— was so popular that we’ve decided to make it a regular column, featuring one book at a time.Jonsson, who also serves as Vice Chair of Capital Group, readAmerican Prometheusafter seeing the movie and becoming fascinated with Oppenheimer’s story. A few years earlier she had visited Los Alamos, where Oppenheimer’s team had worked, and read another book about the Manhattan Project. Her father, who was also a physicist, likely attended lectures by Oppenheimer when he studied at Princeton University, so the movie evoked memories which were revived even more so by the book.“I really couldn’t put it down,” Jonsson says. “It’s very well written, impeccably researched and provides meaningful insight into not only Oppenheimer, but also the characters around him who worked on the Manhattan Project” from 1942 to 1945.Although the goal of the Manhattan Project was starkly different, there are parallels, Jonsson believes, between that endeavour and the cooperative work that happens every day at a large organization such as our own.“What I find so amazing is how Oppenheimer convinced this team of scientists to work together,” she explains. “He had these very temperamental people, some with rather large egos, but they were all brilliant. He brought them to Los Alamos, creating that city out of nothing, and got them to work as one cohesive team. I'm just fascinated by the lessons about leadership and motivation in that story.”",Demographics & Culture
2023 market trends in 5 charts,2023-10-04T10:40:00,"This year has been full of surprises, prompting investors to reset their expectations more than once.In January, the mood was solemn as markets were still recovering from 2022’s sharp decline, and a recession felt inevitable. But then an AI-fueled tech rally lifted the U.S. stock market, while returns in Europe and Japan proved to be stronger than expected. The lesson? Market surprises should not be surprising.What’s next for investors as we grapple with higher-for-longer interest rates and slowing-but-persistent inflation? Here are five of the most important trends to watch as the year unfolds:1. A rolling recession may have already begunMany economists predicted an imminent recession when the U.S. Federal Reserve first increased interest rates more than 18 months ago. Eleven hikes later, a broad economic downturn hasn’t materialized.But what if the recession already happened? Just not all at once.Arolling recessionoccurs when industries rise and fall at different times, creating pain in certain sectors while others flourish. For example, the travel and energy sectors cratered in 2021, but have since rebounded strongly. Likewise, housing and semiconductor stocks slumped in late 2022 before picking up in recent months.In such an environment our portfolio managers seek to take advantage of these “mini-recessions” by looking for potential opportunities in industries on the rebound, rather than focusing too much on the timing or magnitude of a broad recession.Different sectors have experience downturns at different timesSources: Travel: Capital Group, Transportation Security Agency (TSA), U.S. Department of Homeland Security. Data is a 30-day moving average. As of July 26, 2023. Semiconductors: Capital Group, Philadelphia Stock Exchange, Refinitiv Datastream. As of June 30, 2023. Data represents cumulative price return in USD since January 1, 2019. Housing: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's. Latest available monthly data is May 2023, as of July 27, 2023. Manufacturing: Capital Group, Institute for Supply Management (ISM), National Bureau of Economic Research. Refinitiv Datastream. Figures reflect the seasonally adjusted survey results from ISM's Manufacturing Purchasing Managers’ Index (PMI). A PMI reading above 50 percent indicates that the manufacturing economy is generally expanding; below 50 percent indicates that it is generally declining. As of June 30, 2023. Chemicals: Capital Group, U.S. Federal Reserve, Refinitiv Datastream. Data indexed to 100 in 2017. Figures are seasonally adjusted. As of June 30, 2023. Oil: Capital Group, Refinitiv. As of July 26, 2023. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.2. Resilient consumers could lead a strong economic recoveryWhether a rolling recession is already underway or a more traditional one is on the horizon, many investors are wondering what’s next.The good news is that there areseveral reasons an eventual recovery could be relatively strong.For one, the U.S. consumer appears to be in relatively good shape. Household debt was only 9.8% of disposable income as of June 30, 2023 — much lower than during the global financial crisis and other typical recessions. Supported by a strong labour market, resilient consumer spending could boost a range of industries including travel and leisure.Secondly, a number of U.S. companies have cleaned up their inventories and balance sheets. The average interest coverage ratio — a measure of earnings over interest payments — is higher than it was during the past three recessions.These factors combined could paint an optimistic long-term picture for investors during this period of uncertainty.Consumers put their houses in order as companies cleaned up balance sheetsSources: Capital Group, Federal Reserve Bank of St. Louis, Morgan Stanley, National Bureau of Economic Research. As of March 31, 2023.3. Mountain of cash could be a bullish sign for investorsOne of the most notable trends of the year has been investors’ flight to cash and cash equivalents. Money market fund assets in the U.S. ballooned to a record US$5.6 trillion as of September 27, according to the Investment Company Institute.Our analysis reveals that levels of cash have tended to peak around market troughs and shortly before market recoveries. The S&P 500 Index surged after both the global financial crisis and COVID-19 pandemic, returning at least 40% in U.S. dollar terms within three months of each market bottom.Investors who stayed on the sidelines would have missed these market recoveries, potentially impacting their ability to achieve their long-term goals.Investors' flight to cash has been followed by strong returnsSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., Investment Company Institute (ICI), Standard & Poor’s. As of May 26, 2023. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.4. There have been windows of opportunity between a Fed pause and cutWhile many investors may be planning to remain on the sidelines until the Fed starts cutting rates, our research shows that could be a mistake.That’s because there have been windows of opportunity between the Fed’s last rate hike and first cut. We looked at asset class returns in the year after the Fed stopped hiking rates across the last four cycles. Our analysis revealed that cash had the lowest average returns during such periods, soundly outpaced by stocks, bonds and balanced portfolios.In these instances, the first interest rate cut has been, on average, 10 months after the final rate hike. Investors who wait too long risk missing out on potential gains. Although the central bank’s most recent projections signaled one more rate increase before year-end, it appears the Fed is nearing the end of its current hiking cycle.After Fed hikes ended, long-term results outpaced cash, with the first year contributing mostSources: Capital Group, Morningstar. Chart represents the average returns across respective sector proxies in a forward extending window starting in the month of the last Fed hike in the last four transition cycles from 1995 to 2018 with data through 6/30/23. The 60/40 blend represents 60% S&P 500 Index and 40% Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, rebalanced monthly. Long-term averages represented by the average five-year annualized rolling returns from 1995. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.5. Bull markets have dominated bear marketsBulls defeat Bears, 67 to 12. While that might sound like the lopsided score in a sporting event, it highlights an important fundamental truth about the stock market.Our analysis of U.S. market cycles since 1950 revealed that while the average bear market has lasted 12 months, the average bull market has been more than five times longer.The difference in returns has been just as dramatic. Even though the average bull market has had a 265% gain (versus a 33% decline for the average bear market), recoveries are rarely a smooth ride. Investors often face unsettling headlines, significant market volatility and additional equity declines. But those able to move past the noise, take a long view and stay invested through market cycles stand a better chance of scoring long-term gains.Every bull market has been longer than the bear market that preceded itSources: Capital Group, RIMES, Standard & Poor’s. Includes daily returns in the S&P 500 Index from 6/13/49–6/30/23. The bull market that began on 10/12/22 is considered current and is not included in the “average bull market” calculations. Bear markets are peak-to-trough price declines of 20% or more in the S&P 500. Bull markets are all other periods. Returns are in USD and are shown on a logarithmic scale. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.",Asset Allocation
"As rate hikes near end, historic investor opportunity may begin",2023-09-14T12:00:00,"To say this has been an interesting year in financial markets is an understatement. Equities have been stronger than most expected, and the 10-year U.S. Treasury yield is up 37 basis points as of September 13. So where are we now as we head into the homestretch of 2023? I believe we’re on the cusp of a major transition, one where long-term investors can find attractive income opportunities as central banks pivot from restrictive monetary policy to something that looks much more benign.Last year was shocking to many in the investment community: It marked the first time in at least 45 years that both stocks and bonds posted negative returns in a calendar year. Battling high inflation, the U.S. Federal Reserve raised interest rates aggressively. Those hikes hurt absolute results across the board. The usual role of high-quality bonds to provide diversification from stock market volatility — something investors rely on — broke down.Most investors had never faced a year as challenging as 2022Sources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., Standard & Poor's. Each dot represents an annual stock and bond market return from 1977 through 2022. Stock returns represented by the S&P 500 Index. Bond returns represented by the Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Index. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.Turbulent markets in 2022, plus the prospect of relatively high yields in money markets, led investors to flock to cash-like alternatives. Money market funds were at an all-time high of US$5.6 trillion as of September 6, according to the Investment Company Institute. Cash investments still look compelling to many investors today, but the Fed appears to be nearing a turning point. History teaches us that this may be an opportune time to shift back to stocks and bonds.Will the Fed raise interest rates again?Nobody knows exactly when the Fed will stop raising rates. However, both markets and the Fed itself project its key policy rate to peak near current levels and then decline around 100 basis points by the end of 2024.Both the market and Fed project lower rates in 2024Sources: Bloomberg, Federal Reserve. The fed fund target rate shown is the midpoint of the 50 basis-point range that the Federal Reserve aims for in setting its policy interest rate. Market-implied effective rates are a measure of what the fed funds rate could be in the future and are calculated using fed fund rate futures market data.If you believe the Fed is finished or nearly there, what does history tell us? An analysis of the end of the last four Fed hiking cycles shows that cash investments decayed while stocks and bonds flourished.History shows cash has decayed when Fed hikes endSitting in money market funds today may feel comfortable with a roughly 5% yield, based on the benchmark 3-month Treasury, especially after an extended period of experimental zero interest rate policy post-global financial crisis. But the benefit of remaining in cash at current yields is eroded by today’s moderate inflation. Additionally, these cash-like holdings may see little additional upside as the Fed finishes hiking rates.There is where the math matters. History shows that in the 18 months after the Fed ended hikes in the last four cycles, yields on cash-like investments have traditionally decayed rapidly. The 3-month U.S. Treasury yield, a benchmark Treasury security with a yield similar to cash-like investments, fell an average of 2.5%. If history were to repeat itself, money market fund yields would decline, and investors would be better served by being actively invested in stocks and bonds.3-month T-bill yields declined sharply following the Fed’s final hike in the last four cyclesSources: Bloomberg, Federal Reserve. As of 6/30/23. Chart represents the average decline in 3-month Treasury bills starting in the month of the last Fed hike in the last four transition cycles from 1995 to 2018. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.Where to invest cash todayIf you agree that the Fed is nearly finished hiking and that cash yields may decline over time, the question is: Where to invest today? After the Fed’s final hike in the last four cycles, both equity and fixed income returns were strong in the year that followed. Importantly, for long-term investors, these sectors maintained relative strength over a five-year period.After Fed hikes ended, long-term results outpaced cash, with the first year contributing mostSources: Capital Group, Morningstar. Chart represents the average returns across respective sector proxies in a forward extending window starting in the month of the last Fed hike in the last four transition cycles from 1995 to 2018 with data through 6/30/23. The 60/40 blend represents 60% S&P 500 Index and 40% Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, rebalanced monthly. Long-term averages represented by the average five-year annualized rolling returns from 1995. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.Today, fixed income is living up to its name again by providing solid income potential to investors. The Bloomberg U.S. Bond Aggregate Index, a popular benchmark for high-quality core bond funds, had a yield-to-worst (the lowest possible yield that can be received on a bond that fully operates within the terms of its contract without defaulting) of 5.0% at the end of August. That’s roughly double its 10-year average, as highly accommodative policy weighed on yields during the past decade. This income potential today provides a solid starting point for total return.The same exposure to interest rates that hurt bonds in 2022 would benefit bonds if rates begin to fall. Here’s a hypothetical example of how that could work. The index’s duration, a measure of interest rate sensitivity, is 6.25 years. That means if yields decline by nearly 100 basis points in 2024, investors could see upside of 6.25% in positive price return, all else being equal. Together, those income and price return components would equate to a hypothetical one-year return that could venture into double digits, assuming credit doesn’t deteriorate meaningfully. Under that same scenario, money market fund yields would drop below 5%.For stocks, when the Fed stops tightening policy, one risk for the financial system dissipates. And as companies and consumers see their borrowing costs stabilize and eventually begin to decline, it provides a boost to the economy and corporate profits. Historically, equity investors have seen the benefit.At this time, abalanced strategy could also be attractivefor more cautious investors. A balanced portfolio tends to hold more defensive positions in dividend-paying stocks and high-quality bonds. And if the economy slows or falls into recession, it could provide some resilience.It takes courage to take actionInertia can be a very powerful force, especially 5% cash yield-induced inertia. Investor emotions are real. Past losses sting for a long time, and today’s seemingly attractive rates on certificates of deposit in the U.S. and in money markets feel good. But as investors, we know that markets don’t idle for long. Investors could become stuck in cash if they wait too long to get back into the market, as better potential opportunities emerge.At Capital Group, wefocus on helping investors achieve long-term success. I firmly believe that the best path toward that goal is through stock and bond markets. Our analysts and portfolio managers are scouring the world to find new investment ideas, regardless of market ups and downs. We’re optimistic about what the future has in store and committed to improving people’s lives through successful investing.",Asset Allocation
Guide to recessions: 9 things you need to know,2023-09-07T07:35:00,"When is the next recession?That's one of the questions we hear most often, especially following more than a year of aggressive interest rate hikes aimed at reining in inflation. Although a recession has seemed imminent for a while, the economic picture has become muddied as industries have weakened and recovered at different times. If we do see a broad contraction, our expectation is that it will be less severe than the 2008 global financial crisis and other more typical recessions, followed by a strong recovery.To help you prepare for these uncertain times, we researched more than 70 years of data including the last 11 economic downturns to distill our top insights and answer key questions about recessions:1. What is a recession?2. What causes recessions?3. How long do recessions last?4. What happens to the stock market during a recession?5. What economic indicators can warn of a recession?6. Are we in a recession?7. How can you position a stock portfolio for a recession?8. How can you position a bond portfolio for a recession?9. What are ways to prepare for a recession?1. What is a recession?A recession is commonly defined as at least two consecutive quarters of declining GDP (gross domestic product) after a period of growth, although that isn’t enough on its own. The National Bureau of Economic Research (NBER), which is responsible for business cycle dating, defines recessions as a “significant decline in economic activity spread across the economy, lasting more than a few months, normally visible in real GDP, real income, employment, industrial production and wholesale-retail sales.” In this guide, we will useNBER’s official dates.2. What causes recessions?Past recessions have occurred for many reasons, but typically are the result of economic imbalances that ultimately need to be corrected. For example, the 2008 recession was caused by excess debt in the housing market, while the 2001 contraction was caused by an asset bubble in technology stocks. An unexpected shock such as the COVID-19 pandemic, widespread enough to damage corporate profits and trigger job cuts, also can be responsible.When unemployment rises, consumers typically reduce spending, which further pressures economic growth, company earnings and stock prices. These factors can fuel a vicious cycle that topples an economy. Although they can be painful to live through, recessions are a natural and necessary means of clearing out excesses before the next economic expansion. As Capital Group equity portfolio manager Rob Lovelace has noted, “You can’t have such a sustained period of growth without an occasional downturn to balance things out. It’s normal. It’s expected. It’s healthy.”Go deeper:10 investing lessons from 2008 that apply today3. How long do recessions last?The good news is that recessions generally haven’t lasted very long in the U.S. Our analysis of 11 cycles since 1950 shows that recessions in the U.S. have persisted between two and 18 months, with the average spanning about 10 months. For those directly affected by job loss or business closures, that can feel like an eternity. But investors with a long-term investment horizon would be better served looking at the full picture.Recessions are painful, but expansions have been powerfulSources: Capital Group, National Bureau of Economic Research (NBER), Refinitiv Datastream. Chart data is latest available as of 8/31/23 and shown on a logarithmic scale. The expansion that began in 2020 is still considered current as of 8/31/23 and is not included in the average expansion summary statistics. Since NBER announces recession start and end months, rather than exact dates, we have used month-end dates as a proxy for calculations of jobs added. Nearest quarter-end values used for U.S. GDP growth rates. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.Recessions have been relatively small blips in economic history. Over the last 70 years, the U.S. has been in an official recession less than 15% of all months. Moreover, their net economic impact has been relatively small. The average expansion increased economic output by almost 25%, whereas the average recession reduced GDP by 2.5%. Equity returns can even be positive over the full length of a contraction since some of the strongest stock rallies have occurred during the late stages of a recession.Go deeper:Guide to market recoveries4. What happens to the stock market during a recession?The exact timing of a recession is hard to predict, but it’s still wise to think about how one could affect your portfolio. Bear markets (market declines of 20% or more) and recessions have often overlapped — with equities leading the economic cycle by six to seven months on the way down and again on the way up.Equities have typically peaked months before a recession, but can bounce back quicklySources: Capital Group, Federal Reserve Board, Haver Analytics, National Bureau of Economic Research, Standard & Poor's. Data reflects the average change in the S&P 500 Index and economic activity (using industrial production as a proxy) of all completed economic cycles from 1950 to 2022. The “cycle peak” refers to the highest level of economic activity in each cycle before the economy begins to contract. Both lines are indexed to 100 at each economic cycle peak and indexed to 0 “months before/after cycle peak” on the x-axis. A negative number (left of the cycle peak) reflects the average change in each line in the months leading up to the cycle peak. The positive numbers (right of the cycle peak) indicate the average changes after the cycle peak. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.Still, aggressive market-timing moves, such as shifting an entire portfolio into cash, can backfire. Some of the strongest returns may occur during the late stages of an economic cycle or immediately after a market bottom. A dollar cost averaging strategy, in which investors systematically invest equal amounts at regular intervals, may be beneficial in down markets. This approach allows investors to purchase more shares at lower prices while remaining positioned for when the market eventually rebounds.Go deeper:How to handle market declines5. What economic indicators can warn of a recession?Wouldn’t it be great to know ahead of time when a recession is coming? Despite the impossibility of pinpointing the exact start, there are some generally reliable signals worth watching closely in a late-cycle economy.Sources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream. Reflects latest data available as of 8/31/22.Many factors can contribute to a recession, and the main causes often change. Therefore, it’s helpful to look at different aspects of the economy to assess where imbalances may be building. Keep in mind that any indicator should be viewed more as a mile marker than a distance-to-destination sign.Four examples of economic indicators that can warn of a recession include the yield curve, unemployment rate, consumer confidence and housing starts. Aggregated metrics, such as The Conference Board Leading Economic Index (LEI), which combines 10 different economic and financial signals into a single analytic system to predict peaks and troughs, have also been consistently reliable over time.These factors paint a mixed picture. Whereas the yield curve and LEI indicate that a broader recession could still be looming for the U.S., a resilient consumer and robust labour market tell the opposite story. The U.S. housing industry has essentially already fallen into recession and may be on the verge of recovery, which could lift the entire economy. New economic data can quickly change the narrative though.Go deeper:Why macroeconomic predictions can be misleading6. Are we in a recession?While at times it may have felt like we were already in one, we believe an official recession has yet to begin. Our base case remains that we will have a relatively short and mild recession, but the odds have increased that we won’t get one at all. Despite the impact that high inflation and rates have had on consumer sentiment and corporate earnings, the labour market has been surprisingly resilient and continues to support the economy.The likelihood of a U.S. recession rose sharply in recent monthsSources: Federal Reserve Bank of New York, Refnitiv Datastream. As of 7/31/23. Shaded bars represent U.S. recessions as defined by the National Bureau of Economic Research.Instead of an official recession, what we may see is a continuation of a rolling recession, where parts of the economy contract and recover at different times. Housing had a slowdown deeper than many past recessions and has started to bounce back. Likewise, the semiconductor industry has recovered strongly from a sharp contraction in 2022. If certain sectors continue to go up while others go down, it increases the possibility of avoiding a broad recession.Of course, other factors could potentially darken the near-term outlook. A weakening labour market or geopolitical shock — such as an escalation of the war in Ukraine — could quicken the timeline for a U.S. recession.Go deeper:U.S. economy hit by rolling recessionEconomic outlook: Mild recession, strong recovery7. How can you position a stock portfolio for a recession?We’ve already established that equities often do poorly during recessions but trying to time the market by selling stocks is not suggested. So should investors do nothing? Certainly not.To prepare, investors should take the opportunity to review their overall asset allocations, which may have changed significantly during the bull market, to ensure their portfolios are balanced and diversified. Consulting a financial advisor can help immensely since these are often emotional decisions for investors.Through 10 declines, some sectors have finished above the overall market*In September 2018, the telecommunication services sector was renamed communication services, and its company composition was materially changed. The dividend yield shown is for the telecommunication services industry group, a subset of the newly constructed communication services sector. The communication services sector’s dividend yield was 0.8% as of 8/31/23.Sources: Capital Group, FactSet. Includes the last 10 periods that the S&P 500 Index declined by more than 15% on a total return basis. Sector returns for 1987 are equally weighted, using index constituents from 1989, the earliest available data set. The 2022 bear market is still considered current as of 8/31/23 and is included in this analysis. Dividend yields are as of 8/31/23. Based in USD.Not all stocks respond the same during periods of economic stress. In the eight largest equity declines between 1987 and 2022, some sectors held up more consistently than others — usually those with higher dividends such as consumer staples and utilities. Dividends can offer steady return potential when stock prices are broadly declining.Growth-oriented stocks can still have a place in portfolios, but investors may want to consider companies with strong balance sheets, consistent cash flows and long growth runways that can better withstand short-term volatility.Even in a recession, many companies may remain profitable. Focus on companies with products and services that people will continue to use every day such as telecom, utilities and food manufacturers with pricing power.Go deeper:Stock market outlook: Broader opportunities emerge8. How can you position a bond portfolio for a recession?Fixed income is often key to successful investing during a recession or bear market. That’s because bonds can provide a measure of stability and capital preservation, especially when equity markets are volatile.The market selloff in 2022 was unique in that many bonds did not play their typical safe-haven role. But in the seven previous market corrections, bonds — as measured by the Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index — rose four times and never declined more than 1%.High-quality bonds have shown resilience when stock markets are unsettledSources: Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., RIMES, Standard & Poor’s. Dates shown for market corrections are based on price declines of 10% or more (without dividends reinvested) in the S&P 500 with at least 50% recovery persisting for more than one business day between declines. Includes all completed corrections between 1/1/10 and 8/31/23. Returns are based on total returns in USD. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.Achieving the right fixed income allocation is always important. But with the U.S. economy entering a period of uncertainty, it’s especially critical for investors to focus on core bond holdings that can help provide balance to their portfolios. Investors don’t necessarily need to increase their bond allocation ahead of a recession, but they should review their fixed income exposure with a financial professional to ensure it is positioned to provide diversification from equities, income, capital preservation and inflation protection — what we consider the four key roles fixed income can play in a well-diversified portfolio.Go deeper:Bond outlook: Fed pause leaves many paths to income potential4 lessons from 50 years of bond investing9. What are ways to prepare for a recession?Above all else, investors should stay calm when investing ahead of and during a recession. Emotions can be one of the biggest roadblocks to strong investment returns, and this is particularly true during periods of economic and market stress.If you’ve picked up anything from reading this guide, it’s probably that determining the exact start or end date of a recession is not only difficult, but also not that critical. What is more important is to maintain a long-term perspective and make sure portfolios are appropriately balanced to benefit from periods of potential growth, while being resilient enough to minimize losses during periods of volatility.Go deeper:5 investing mistakes to avoid",Market Volatility
Risks of bad breadth: Market concentration in 5 charts,2023-08-16T09:21:00,"Just seven companies have kept the S&P 500 Index afloat this year, with Apple, Meta, Microsoft, NVIDIA, Amazon, Alphabet and Tesla driving the vast majority of gains. Stretched valuations are also a concern for some investors: While not as wide as recent history, current forward price-to-earnings ratio on the top 20 stocks in the S&P 500 Index are roughly 42% higher than the overall market.In terms of index concentration, Apple and Microsoft stand out with weights of 7.7% and 6.8%, respectively, as of June 30 — more than double that of Alphabet, the third-largest holding, at 3.6%. This dynamic is self-reinforcing. Higher stock prices can fuel market capitalization gains and index recalculations, which in turn fuel additional inflows to these stocks as millions of investors in passive funds make their regular contributions under defined contribution plans, perpetuating the cycle.Outsized impact of the “Magnificent Seven” stocks to returnsSource: FactSet. Weighted values for Apple, Microsoft, Alphabet, Amazon, NVIDIA, Tesla and Meta as of June 30, 2023. Contribution to return calculated from January 2, 2023, to June 30, 2023. Based in USD.This “bad breadth” is challenging the industry in a way that hasn’t been seen in roughly 40 years. The Nasdaq 100 Index underwent a “special rebalance” in late July for only the third time in its history to address over-concentration and avoid breaching U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission rules on fund diversification. In a related action tied to regulatory guidelines, some of the largest U.S. investment funds are being blocked from buying more shares of these companies.And it’s challenging for end investors in unexpected ways. For one, there is evidence this situation can increase overall portfolio risk, especially for passive investors. It is made worse by the business similarities of the companies leading the market higher — magnifying concentration risk. But there are few steps investors can take to help mitigate the risk.One doesn’t need to be a professional equity analyst to understand that these seven companies have more in common than not. All are exposed, in various ways, to secular trends like the rapid evolution of artificial intelligence (AI) applications, augmented reality/virtual reality, autonomous vehicles and more. Zooming out, the top 20 stocks in the S&P 500 are dominated by two sectors (communication services and information technology). Sectors excluded entirely include materials, utilities and real estate.This overlap means that despite their unique businesses and idiosyncratic characteristics, a large part of their return potential will be based on common risk factors. In comparing the risks unique to the company (security-specific risks), the top 10 or 20 stocks versus the broader S&P 500 Index are less diversified as they are more concentrated in certain sectors. Thus, the diversification benefit offered by holding these specific stocks — alone or within a passive, indexed strategy — is greatly diminished.Many risk factors overlap and contribute to total riskSource: MSCI BarraOne. Risk decomposition based on the MSCI Multi-Asset Class Long (MAC.L) Factor risk Model Tier 3 as of 6/30/2023, accessed on 7/14/2023; S&P 500 Index holdings as of 6/30/2023. Risk decomposition is the breakdown of various factors to analyze sources of risk in a portfolio or index. This exhibit reflects the sector risk from the information technology sector, risk from volatility measures and specific risk attributed to a hazard applicable to a particular company.When an index loses its lustreAnother useful way to look at the increasing narrowness of the U.S. equity market is through a measure that antitrust regulators use to gauge market concentration within an industry, the Herfindahl-Hirschman Index (HHI). The index allows us to answer the following hypothetical: Let’s say you wanted to create an equally weighted portfolio of stocks that would provide the same level of diversification as the market-cap weighted S&P 500 Index. How many stocks would there be in that hypothetical portfolio? This number is called the “effective number of constituents” (ENC) in an index, an inverse of the HHI. The answer is 60 stocks (as of June 30, 2023). Because the S&P 500 Index is so highly concentrated, it isn’t providing any more diversification than a portfolio of 60 equally weighted stocks, according to the HHI measure.Effective number of securities in the S&P 500 Index has decreased significantlySource: FactSet as of June 30, 2023.Diversification disappointment growsIf it weren’t enough that the diversification power of the equity portion of many investor portfolios had eroded, the diversification typically achieved with a bond allocation is somewhat diminished as well. Since December 2012, over rolling 90-day periods, higher market concentration was associated with higher correlations between stocks and bonds. That is, stocks and bonds tended to move more in unison and, as a result, the overall diversification benefit of a typical mixed asset portfolio was reduced on the margin. As a result, should markets turn lower, investors could be hit with a less diversified equity investment.Narrow markets reduce diversification potentialSource: Factset as of June 30, 2023. Stock-bond trailing 90-day correlation from rolling month end starting from December 2012, as represented by the S&P 500 Index and the Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, respectively. There are 38 values of ”bad breadth” or high concentration, denoted by having less than 84 effective number of securities. The remaining 101 values or ”good breadth” are scattered in a low concentration as denoted with greater than 84 effective number of securities.Narrow market rallies tend to widen over timeTo be clear, the situation is far from dire, and there is some evidence that narrow market rallies have often been followed by steady gains for the broader market. However, investors must consider that should euphoria over AI subside, a pullback in tech stocks could stifle a broader rally. As of June 30, nearly all 11 sectors in the S&P 500 generated positive results in U.S. dollar terms for the quarter to date, but the price-to-earnings ratio for the S&P 500 technology sector was 27.1 times earnings as of June 30, compared with 18.9 times earnings for the broader S&P 500.Average S&P 500 Index returns following significant declines in market breadthSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's. As of July 5, 2023. Significant declines in market breadth are measured as dates upon which the ratio of the equal-weighted S&P 500 Index to the market-cap weighted S&P 500 Index falls below the first quintile of the total range between December 31, 2004, and July 5, 2023. Returns are in USD.What can investors do?There are a few steps investors can consider:In an asset allocation program or in multi-asset portfolios, increase fixed income exposure to targeted goals or policy.Within the fixed income allocation, ensure that a sizable portion is conservative and as uncorrelated with equities as possible.Within the equity allocation, consider allocating to dividend-oriented strategies as an offset to risks in growth-oriented strategies.Allocate to actively-managed U.S. equities strategies that may not be so concentrated, even if they may lag in a momentum-driven market.",Markets & Economy
EMs begin to cut rates as inflation trends lower,2023-08-08T09:21:00,"Brazil’s central bank kicked off a monetary easing cycle on August 2, 2023, more aggressively than expected, reducing its benchmark interest rate by 50 basis points to 13.25% and signaling more of the same in the months ahead due to an improving inflation outlook. It is the fourth central bank in emerging markets (EM) to cut rates in recent months.Chile cut in July, China in June and Hungary, which was the first to lower rates, did so in May of this year. On August 15, 2023, China further lowered the interest rate on a key medium-term lending facility. Analysts believe this is likely a sign that the Peoples Bank of China (PBOC) is preparing to cut its benchmark rate again at its upcoming August 21 meeting.The pace of the monetary easing cycle may not be as rapid and will vary by country. After a significant decline in EM headline inflation in the first half of the year, we expect a more visible reduction in core inflation in the second half. A backdrop of slow and steady rate cuts combined with reasonable growth in many EM countries should be positive for local currency debt. More stable market dynamics could likewise benefit select hard currency (U.S. dollar-denominated) sovereign and EM corporate issuers.EM inflation should continue to slow in the second half of the yearEmerging markets have historically struggled with inflation and last year was no exception. Higher commodity prices resulting from the Russia/Ukraine conflict (EM countries tend to be more sensitive to commodity prices given the generally higher weight of food and energy in inflation baskets), supply chain issues and weak EM currencies fed inflationary pressures.This year, the surge in food and energy prices has abated, supply chain bottlenecks have eased, and the U.S. dollar has plateaued or weakened against many currencies. As a result, inflation has slowed both on a month-on-month and year-on-year basis in most EM economies.Moreover, after surprising to the upside for the past couple of years, inflation surprises have generally now turned negative. This disinflation trend looks set to continue in the second half of the year.That said, there remains a great deal of regional variation. Inflation is relatively contained in Asia. Whereas in Central/Eastern Europe and Latin America, not only has food inflation been persistent, but there has also been a broadening of price pressures to both core goods and services. Part of this has been due to rising inflation expectations, leading to higher wages. This suggests that inflation may remain above central bank targets/comfort zones for longer than previously thought in both regions, even though it has likely peaked and should trend lower.Other EM central banks need a few more catalystsGiven the general improvement in the inflation outlook, we (the EM debt team) expect a number of EM central banks to start cutting interest rates along the lines of Brazil, Chile and Hungary. Many EM central banks are ahead of the developed world in their monetary tightening cycle, having raised interest rates earlier and more aggressively to avoid de-anchoring inflation expectations. Turkey has been the main exception, with its policy of reducing interest rates despite high inflation, although it has now started to reverse this unorthodox policy following recent elections, almost doubling interest rates in June.But while we believe the easing cycle is imminent, many EM central banks will only take this step when there is more certainty that inflation is on the decline, especially core inflation.Many EM central banks aggressively hiked policy ratesSource: Bloomberg. Data as of August 3, 2023.Looking ahead, the actions of the U.S. Federal Reserve and the real interest rate differential between EM countries and the U.S. will be important factors. While it’s not yet clear whether the Fed is at the end of its hiking cycle or still has further to go, we’re unlikely to see the sharp upward pricing in U.S. rates that we have seen over the past year.Countries across Latin America have been more aggressive in tackling inflationSource: Bloomberg. Inflation rate as of April 2023 for Romania and Malaysia and as of May 2023 for other regions. Policy rate as of August 3, 2023.Finally, the U.S. dollar will be important to watch as it will be difficult for EM central banks to cut rates in a strong dollar/weak EM currency environment. A strong dollar has often forced EM central banks to raise rates in the past, while a weaker dollar has allowed them to cut rates. U.S. dollar cycles (since the abolition of the Bretton Woods system in the early 1970s) have generally moved in clear bull and bear phases, with the average cycle lasting around nine years. If the most recent cycle ended in the fourth quarter of 2022, then it lasted 11 years from the low in June 2011. Aside from the fact that the U.S. dollar is overvalued on almost all valuation metrics, several factors support the case for a weaker dollar, including the Fed coming to the end of its rate hiking cycle. Although it is not clear that the bull market for the U.S. dollar has turned, the bulk of the broad dollar strengthening is likely behind us.EM exchange rates could start to contribute to returnsEM exchange rates have been a drag on local currency asset returns over the past decade, but today most EM currencies look significantly undervalued based on our in-house fundamental-based valuation model, along with various other real exchange rate models.While cheap valuations are never enough of a catalyst in and of themselves, the fundamental outlook of many emerging markets looks constructive, which could help support a turnaround in EM currencies versus the dollar. Inflation and cost of living concerns have put pressure on fiscal deficits, which have steadily risen over the last few years. That said, public debt levels are still below those of developed markets and remain manageable. There has been some erosion of foreign exchange reserves, but external balances have generally improved across many EM countries thanks to undervalued exchange rates.We see the most value in Latin America, but Europe is looking increasingly attractiveA downward trend in policy rates, combined with decent overall fundamentals and relatively attractive nominal rates and positive real rates across much of the EM universe, indicate a reasonably constructive view of EM debt overall. This explains why, after over a decade of relatively muted returns, stronger performance of the asset class (as represented by the J.P. Morgan Emerging Market Bond Index (EMBI) Global Diversified and the J.P. Morgan Government Bond Index – Emerging Markets Global Diversified) so far this year could turn into a longer term trend.That said, selectivity will be key given the divergence in policy and inflation dynamics across countries, as well as varying relative and absolute valuations across issuers. We see potential value in Latin American local currency bonds given the combination of attractive nominal and positive real rates, moderating inflation and proactive behaviour on the part of central banks. Macroeconomic conditions are looking better now than late last year and the tilt towards more positive fundamentals is likely to override political risks in those countries for now. Central and Eastern European countries are still struggling to curb inflation — and real rates remain negative — but the region is beginning to look more attractive.Opportunities in U.S. dollar-denominated debt are more select and idiosyncraticOpportunities within the U.S. dollar-denominated sovereign universe tend to be more idiosyncratic. In the higher yielding, lower quality credits, we find the debt of distressed and quasi-distressed issuers to be attractive in cases where many of the challenges they face have already been priced in. Debt restructurings across this segment of the market tend to be more frequent but are likely to be limited to the most vulnerable economies.Across the investment-grade (BBB/Baa and above) sovereign bonds space, valuations are less attractive. Nevertheless, the EM debt team sees value in select lower beta credits as a counterbalance to the high-yield positions held in certain portfolios.Several EM corporate bonds appear reasonably cheap. We favour investing in a variety of these credits across eligible portfolios for both their relative value compared to similarly rated sovereign bonds and the potential diversification benefits they provide.Real yields look attractive across some countries in Latin AmericaSource: Bloomberg. Data as of June 20, 2023. Real yields are represented by 5-year yields minus core inflation. *Real yield for Hungary is -12.1%.Bottom lineAs inflation slows across a number of emerging markets, central banks are likely to pivot toward rate cuts in the coming months and quarters. With fiscal and current account profiles looking largely benign or manageable for many of these economies, this anticipated shift in monetary policy alongside reasonably attractive valuations and fundamentals could lead to longer term gains for many credits across the asset class.",Emerging Markets
U.S. economy hit by rolling recession,2023-08-03T02:21:00,"What happened to the widely predicted recession that was supposed to wreak havoc on the U.S. economy this year? It happened. Just not all at once.Different sectors of the economy have experienced downturns at different times. Thanks to this rare case of a “rolling” recession, the U.S. may not experience a traditional recession at all this year, or next, even with the dual pressures of elevated inflation and high interest rates.“I am increasingly seeing signs that we may not get a broad-based recession,” says Capital Group economist Jared Franz. “Instead, what we are getting are mini-recessions in various industries at various times without much synchronization.”Different sectors have experienced downturns at different timesSources: Travel: Capital Group, Transportation Security Agency (TSA), U.S. Department of Homeland Security. Data is a 30-day moving average. As of July 26, 2023. Semiconductors: Capital Group, Philadelphia Stock Exchange, Refinitiv Datastream. As of June 30, 2023. Data represents cumulative price return since January 1, 2019. Housing: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's. Latest available monthly data is May 2023, as of July 27, 2023. Manufacturing: Capital Group, Institute for Supply Management (ISM), National Bureau of Economic Research. Refinitiv Datastream. Figures reflect the seasonally adjusted survey results from ISM's Manufacturing Purchasing Managers’ Index (PMI). A PMI reading above 50 percent indicates that the manufacturing economy is generally expanding; below 50 percent indicates that it is generally declining. As of June 30, 2023. Chemicals: Capital Group, U.S. Federal Reserve, Refinitiv Datastream. Data indexed to 100 in 2017. Figures are seasonally adjusted. As of June 30, 2023. Oil: Capital Group, Refinitiv. As of July 26,2023. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.Residential housing, for instance, contracted sharply last year after the U.S. Federal Reserve started aggressively raising interest rates. At one point in 2022, existing home sales tumbled nearly 40%.“Now it looks like the housing market is starting to recover while other areas of the economy, such as commercial real estate, are beginning to spiral down,” Franz explains. “As more people work from home, the outlook for office real estate is particularly troublesome.”Likewise, the semiconductor industry was plagued by broken supply chains and lower demand for computer chips in 2022. That sent semiconductor stocks plummeting. This year, the business has stabilized, demand has returned, and semiconductor stocks are driving a rally in the global equity markets.Can a full-blown recession be avoided?If these contractions and recoveries continue, Franz explains, we could wind up in an environment where U.S. gross domestic product does not turn negative at any point in 2023 or 2024, thus averting one of the most widely predicted recessions in history.“I still think a short, mild downturn is possible,” Franz says. “But if consumer spending doesn’t crack, then this widely expected recession could be like the boogey man who frightened everyone but never showed up.”Indeed, the U.S. federal government reported last week that the U.S. economy grew at an annual rate of 2.4% in the second quarter. That was well above consensus estimates and faster than the 2% rate in the first quarter. The surprisingly strong growth was driven by stable consumer spending and dramatically higher business investment, up 7.7% on an annual basis.Consumer and business strength has also contributed to a red-hot labor market, with healthy job creation and an unemployment rate of 3.6%, near a 50-year low. “Recessions are nearly always associated with broad-based job losses,” Franz notes, “and we just aren’t seeing that right now.”U.S. economy is bolstered by historically strong job marketSources: Capital Group, Bureau of Labor Statistics, Refinitiv Datastream, U.S. Department of Labor. Figures are seasonally adjusted. As of June 30, 2023.What about the inverted yield curve?On the other side of the recession debate, many economists have argued that an inverted yield curve is the most reliable recession predictor that we have. Right now, the inverted yield curve — which happens when the yield on short-term bonds is higher than the yield on long-term bonds — appears to be screaming for a recession. And it has been for more than a year.An inverted yield curve has preceded every U.S. recession over the past 50 years. The current yield environment is more inverted than it has been since the early 1980s. This powerful signal has convinced many economists and bond market investors that a recession is inevitable in the next year or two.Could that view be wrong? Or at least a misreading of the bond market? Yes, says fixed income portfolio manager Pramod Atluri.High inflation, which we also haven’t seen since the 1980s, is the key determining factor today, Atluri believes. Fed officials have made it clear that fighting inflation is their priority, and they appear to be achieving their goal of bringing prices back down to earth. Inflation fell to 3% in June from 9.1% a year ago, a remarkable decline in just 12 months.That means Fed officials may be able to cut interest rates in the months ahead, not because they expect a recession, but because they are close to achieving their stated goal of 2% inflation.Is an inverted yield curve no longer a reliable predictor of recessions?Sources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., National Bureau of Economic Research, Refinitiv Datastream. As of July 26, 2023.“An inverted yield curve means the market is predicting that the U.S. federal funds rate will be higher today and lower tomorrow. That’s it,” Atluri adds. “The yield curve is not predicting an impending recession. It is predicting that inflation will be lower in the future and, therefore, the U.S. Fed will be able to end its rate-hiking cycle.”“As a corollary, if inflation gets back to 2%, then an inverted yield curve will once again be a good predictor of declining economic growth and rising recession risk,” Atluri concludes.What are the investment implications of a soft landing?Many investors have clearly been positioning their portfolios for a recession, as evidenced by a massive rotation into cash and cash equivalents over the past two years. As of June 30, assets held in such conservative investments surpassed US$5.4 trillion, according to the Investment Company Institute.But what if a recession is replaced by a soft landing? What opportunities does that present to investors who are willing to venture out a bit on the risk spectrum?“Earlier this year, I was very concerned about a recession,” says portfolio manager Chris Buchbinder, “But I have eased off that expectation and, in my view, I’d say the probability now is below 50%.”That view has led Buchbinder to consider investing in companies that are traditionally impacted by recession worries but have proven to be resilient — particularly in the post-pandemic recovery period. Pent-up demand has benefited many companies in the travel and leisure industry, for instance, as well as aerospace and aviation, as Buchbinder noted in a 2021 article highlighting these types of investment opportunities.Semiconductors, chemicals and oil are also interesting, he says, given their recent difficulties and growing signs of a turnaround.“This has been Godot’s recession; we’ve all been waiting for it,” Buchbinder says. “But because of that fear, many companies started pulling back in anticipation of a downturn. The U.S. Fed started raising rates. And now there are fewer imbalances in the economy. So there are fewer things that can go wrong from here.”Travel & leisure activities rise while U.S. commercial real estate sinksSources: Capital Group, Standard & Poor's, Refinitiv Datastream. A real estate investment trust (REIT) is a company that owns, operates, or finances income-generating real estate. As of July 25, 2023. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.“In this environment,” he added, “I am increasingly focused on industries that are discounting some additional economic weakness that may never show up.”",Market Volatility
Guide to stock market recoveries,2023-07-19T01:42:00,"If market declines make you nervous, you’re not alone. But while bear markets can be extraordinarily difficult, they also can be moments of opportunity. Investors who find the courage and conviction to stick to their long-term plans have often been rewarded as markets bounce back.We hope this article can help you regain confidence by providing:3 facts about market recoveries3 mistakes investors should avoid3 actions to consider for portfolios3 facts about market recoveriesFact #1: Recoveries have been much longer and stronger than downturnsThe good news is bear markets have been relatively short compared to recoveries. They can feel like they last forever when we’re in them, but in reality they have been much less impactful compared to the long-term power of bull markets.Although every market decline is unique, the average bear market in the U.S. since 1950 has lasted 12 months. The average bull market has been more than five times longer.The difference in returns has been just as dramatic. Even though the average bull market has averaged a 265% gain, recoveries are rarely a smooth ride. Investors often face scary headlines, significant market volatility and additional equity declines along the way. But investors able to move past the noise and stick to their plans have been better positioned when the recovery eventually occurs.Every bull market has been longer than the bear market that preceded itSources: Capital Group, RIMES, Standard & Poor’s. Includes daily returns in the S&P 500 Index from 6/13/49–6/30/23. The bull market that began on 10/12/22 is considered current and is not included in the “average bull market” calculations. Bear markets are peak-to-trough price declines of 20% or more in the S&P 500. Bull markets are all other periods. Returns are in USD and are shown on a logarithmic scale. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.Fact #2: After large declines, markets have recovered relatively quicklyWe don’t know exactly what the next recovery will look like, but historically stocks have often recovered sharply following steep downturns. We tracked the 18 biggest U.S. market declines since the Great Depression, and in each case the S&P 500 Index was higher five years later. Annual returns over those five-year periods averaged more than 18%.Returns have often been strongest after the sharpest declines, bouncing back quickly from market bottoms. The first year following the five biggest bear markets since 1929 averaged 70.9%, underscoring the importance of staying invested and avoiding the urge to abandon stocks during market volatility. While these have been the average returns during these recoveries, each one has differed, and it‘s quite possible any future recovery could be more muted.The worst bear markets were all followed by strong recoveriesSources: Capital Group, RIMES, Standard & Poor’s. As of 6/30/23. Market declines are based on the five largest price return declines in the S&P 500’s value (excluding dividends and/or distributions) with 100% recovery after each decline. The return for each of the five years after a low is a 12-month return based on the date of the low and is shown in total returns (includes reinvested dividends and/or distributions). Investors cannot invest directly in an index. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.Fact #3: Some of the world’s leading companies were born during market recoveriesMany companies got their start during tough economic periods and have gone on to become household names.To highlight just a few: McDonald’s emerged in 1948 following a downturn caused by the U.S. government’s demobilization from a wartime economy. Walmart came along 14 years later, around the time of the “Flash Crash of 1962” — a period when the S&P 500 Index declined 27%. Airbus, Microsoft and Starbucks were founded during the stagflation era of the 1970s — a decade marked by two recessions and one of the worst bear markets in U.S. history. Not long after, Steve Jobs walked into his garage and started a small computer company called Apple.History has shown that strong businesses find a way to survive and even thrive when times are tough. Those that can adapt to difficult conditions and become stronger have often made attractive long-term investments.Bottom-up, fundamental research is key to separating companies that may lead a market recovery, and those more likely to be left behind.Many businesses got their start amid volatile marketsSource: Capital Group. As of 6/30/23. Bear markets are peak-to-trough price declines of 20% or more in the S&P 500. Bull markets are all other periods.3 mistakes investors should avoidMistake #1: Trying to time marketsIt’s time, not timing, that matters in investing. Taking your money out of the market on the way down means that if you don’t get back in at exactly the right time, you can’t capture the full benefit of any recovery.Consider this example of a hypothetical US$10,000 investment in the S&P 500 Index made on July 1, 2013, and held for 10 years. Staying invested through the two bear markets during that period may have been tough, but this patient investor’s portfolio would have nearly tripled. If that investor had instead tried to time the market and missed even some of the best days, it would have significantly hurt their long-term results — and the more missed “good” days, the more missed opportunities.Investors who are more hesitant to put all their excess capital to work at once may want to consider dollar cost averaging in volatile markets. Dollar cost averaging during a decline allows you to purchase more shares at a lower average cost, and when markets eventually rise, those extra shares can enhance your portfolio's value.Missing just a few of the market’s best days can hurt investment returnsSources: RIMES, Standard & Poor’s. As of 6/30/23. Values in USD and excludes the impact of dividends. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.Mistake #2: Assuming today’s negative headlines make it a bad time to investToday’s economic and geopolitical challenges may seem unprecedented, but a look through history shows that there have always been reasons not to invest. Despite negative headlines, the market’s long-term trend has always been positive. In fact, great investment opportunities often emerge when investors are feeling most pessimistic.Consider a hypothetical investment in the S&P 500 on the day Pearl Harbor was bombed on December 7, 1941. Someone who stayed invested for the next 10 years would have averaged a 16% annual return. Likewise, a hypothetical US$10,000 investment in the S&P 500 on the dayLehman Brothers declared bankruptcyon September 15, 2008, would have grown to over US$30,000 10 years later. History has provided numerous examples of this.Mistake #3: Focusing too much on the short termMarket volatility is especially uncomfortable when you focus on short-term ups and downs. Instead, extend your time horizon to focus on the long-term growth of your investments and the progress you’ve made toward your goals.Consider the chart below that shows contrasting perspectives of the same hypothetical investment. The short-term view is one that many investors have of their portfolios — tracing returns over short periods of time. The long-term view plots the same exact investment over the same period but shows annual change in the portfolio value invested instead. With this perspective, the short-term fluctuations of the first chart have smoothed out over time, and the picture of a growing portfolio becomes clearer.3 actions to consider in portfoliosTwo views of the same investment tell a very different storySources: Standard & Poor’s. Short-term view represents the S&P 500 Index and reflects monthly total returns from 6/30/13 through 6/30/23. Long-term view represented by a hypothetical $10,000 initial investment in the same index from 6/30/13 through 6/30/23. Based in USD.Action 1: Run a portfolio checkupWhen markets are choppy, investors often shift assets from stocks and bonds into the perceived safe haven of cash and cash alternatives. With money market assets reaching a record level of US$5.4 trillion (as represented by Investment Company Institute Money Market Fund Assets as of June 30, 2023), many investors’ portfolios may have become misaligned with their long-term goals. To get back on track, investors may want to examine their portfolios to ensure they are well-diversified and in line with their investment objectives.Capital Group can help. We offer financial professionals the opportunity to conduct an in-depth analysis with our team of portfolio consultants. And if you’re an investor, now may be a good time to talk to your financial professional about having a portfolio checkup.Action 2: Upgrade your core bondsA fixed income allocation may help to soften short-term market noise during periods of volatility and help investors remain focused on longer term goals. When evaluating your bond portfolio, consider these three steps:Upgrade your core:A core bond allocation can provide resilience amid equity uncertainty, while active, research-driven investing seeks to add potential upside when equities recover.Selectively pursue enhanced income:When stocks thrive, credit often does too. But consider a flexible, income-driven bond fund that can adjust based on shifting market conditions.Consider short-term bonds:Following a deep market correction, pivoting from the ultra-safe nature of cash may be daunting. Short-term bonds offer anxious investors an allocation which seeks to keep capital preservation in mind with stronger income potential than cash alternatives.Action 3: Expand your horizonsIn uncertain times, it can be natural to narrow your perspective and focus where you’re most comfortable. But if you can broaden your horizons, you may be able to benefit from the growth potential of companies in a variety of industries and markets.And even if you think markets have bottomed and are poised for a strong recovery, don’t assume all the best stocks will come from either the United States or Canada. Over the last prolonged bull market, the S&P 500 Index soundly outpaced many of its international peer indicies, but three quarters of the top-returning stocks each year were from companies based abroad.Investors seeking additional global or international exposure may want to consider funds with flexible mandates that allow their managers to choose from the best companies, no matter where they are located.Most of the top stocks each year have come from outside the U.S.Sources: MSCI, RIMES. 2023 data as of 6/30/23. Returns in USD. Top 50 stocks are the companies with the highest total returns in the MSCI ACWI each year. “Other developed” includes Canada (of the top 50 stocks in the ACWI, one company was based in Canada).",Market Volatility
6 books for summer reading,2023-07-06T03:17:00,"We asked a group of our portfolio managers for their latest book selections. So here you have it — just in time for vacation — six books for summer reading.1.Deep Work: Rules for Focused Success in a Distracted WorldWho doesn’t feel distracted in a world dominated by email, text messages, laptops and smart phones? When she needs to concentrate, equity portfolio manager Jody Jonsson likes tore-readDeep Work, the 2016 book by Georgetown University professor Cal Newport.“It’s not a new book, but it’s something I enjoy revisiting when I really need to focus on my work, both creatively and thoughtfully,” she says. “So often we are lost in emails and texts and other interruptions. We can’t get our minds to focus. This book includes a lot of excellent advice for changing your work habits, including how to efficiently interact with your phone. It has really helped me to perform at a higher level.”2.Superforecasting: The Art and Science of PredictionWouldn’t it be nice to know the future? With that in mind, portfolio manager Jeff Lager choseSuperforecastingby Philip Tetlock, a professor at the University of Pennsylvania’s Wharton School. In this 2015 book, Tetlock and coauthor Dan Gardner take a deep dive into the skills required to make accurate predictions, following a group of so-called “superforecasters.”Telling the future, it turns out, has less to do with a crystal ball than it does with the critical skills of gathering evidence from diverse sources, thinking in terms of probabilities, admitting errors and changing course when necessary.“We were fortunate enough to have Phil come speak to us at a recent Capital Group investment retreat,” Lager recalls. “I think his insights can help us all do a better job of trying to predict an uncertain future just a little bit better.”With less time to read in a post-pandemic world, book selection is keySources: Capital Group, U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics (BLS.) Figures reflect the average daily time spent reading in the United States (ages 15 and older). *Figures for 2020 are missing due to data collection issues, and the number above reflects the blended average from a separate BLS series that breaks out time spent reading on weekends/holidays and time spent reading on weekdays. Data is the latest available as of June 30, 2023.3.The Art of ExecutionEven the best investors make mistakes, and this 2015 book is proof of that. The key to overcoming those mistakes is how you deal with losing positions in a high-conviction investment portfolio, says Martin Jacobs, a portfolio manager with Capital Group U.S. Equity Fund™ (Canada). The book, written by fund-of-funds manager Lee Freeman-Shor, follows a group of very successful money managers. It turns out that nearly half of the group’s ideas didn’t do so well. The author reaches some interesting conclusions about that.“It’s not whether you’re right or wrong that’s important,” Jacobs summarizes from the book. “It’s about how much money you make when you’re right, and how much money you lose when you’re wrong. Your decisions around weighting and conviction are paramount.”The book argues for an aggressive sell discipline — or ruthlessly cutting your losses when an investment is failing. Freeman-Shor refers to these investors as “assassins” and, based on his findings, they produce some of the best results.“One of the hardest things to do is walk away from an investment that is no longer working,” Jacobs says. “You must be able to pivot when the long-term thesis is broken.”4.Outlive: The Science and Art of LongevityChris Buchbinder, also a portfolio manager with Capital Group U.S. Equity Fund™ (Canada), went outside the investment box to chooseOutliveby Canadian physician Peter Attia. The book, published in March, challenges conventional medical thinking on aging and outlines a new approach to preventing chronic diseases. Dr. Attia’s advice includes nutritional changes, techniques for achieving better sleep, and effective ways to address emotional and mental health.“He provides a framework for thinking about your health with a risk management mindset,” Buchbinder explains. “I find it fascinating, and I'm probably going to change a few aspects of my own lifestyle in ways that are consistent with the book.”5.Playing Big: Practical Wisdom for Women Who Want to Speak Up, Create, and LeadEquity portfolio manager Cheryl Frank is such a fan ofPlaying Bigthat she has given many copies as gifts, even to her male colleagues. The 2014 book, written by columnist and personal coach Tara Mohr, advises women on how to play a bigger role at work and in their personal lives by taking bold action and overcoming self-doubt.“It’s a terrific book about understanding how to recognize the opportunities in this world and leaning into them in an authentic way,” states Frank. “It’s written for women, but even some of my male colleagues who have read it said it changed the way they think about their own families.”6.The Brain That Changes Itself: Stories of Personal Triumph from the Frontiers of Brain ScienceMartin Romo’s selection almost sounds like a science fiction novel, butThe Brain That Changes Itselfis actually a ground-breaking 2007 book about the science of neuroplasticity by psychiatrist Norman Doidge. The author disputes the conventional view that the human brain is immutable and, instead, argues that the brain can and does transform over time.“The central premise is that your brain is a muscle and that you can build in patterns, imbalances and biases,” says Romo, who is also with Capital Group U.S. Equity Fund™ (Canada). “It’s much more plastic than you would think.”The book includes amazing stories about people who have overcome paralysis, recovered from strokes, and even one woman who was born with half a brain that rewired itself to work as a fully intact brain.“The message I take away from this book is to stay flexible and remain open to new paradigms,” Romo adds. “I think it’s a really important book, and I have incorporated some of the lessons into my own life.”",Demographics & Culture
"Economic outlook: Mild recession, strong recovery",2023-06-01T09:58:00,"The global economy has managed to avoid a recession in recent months, thanks to resilient consumers, a surge in travel and leisure activities, and the reopening of China’s economy following pandemic-related lockdowns.That’s likely to change in the second half of the year, says Capital Group economist Jared Franz, as the impact of high interest rates, inflation and a banking sector crisis combine to tip the world into a mild recession.“Global economic growth is on track to decline by roughly 1% for the full year, in my view,” Franz explains. “That should be followed by fairly robust growth in 2024, driven by strong consumer spending and potentially lower interest rates in the U.S. and Europe.”An inverted yield curve has often preceded recessionsSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., National Bureau of Economic Research, Refinitiv Datastream.As of May 25, 2023.Many economic indicators are pointing to a recession in the United States, not the least of which is an inverted yield curve. That happens when yields on short-term U.S. Treasury bonds are higher than yields on long-term bonds, indicating that investors expect tough economic times ahead.“The U.S. yield curve is more inverted now than it has been since the 1980s,” Franz notes. “Of all the recession indicators, it has been the most accurate one.”The yield curve is also inverted in Canada with the averages of one- to three-year and three-to five-year short-term bonds markedly higher than the average long-term bond over ten years. And it’s been that way since the summer of 2022.Looking at the major economies around the world, the U.S. may decline by 1%, Europe should remain flat to slightly negative, and China could grow 2% to 3%, according to estimates from Capital Strategy Research (CSR), Capital Group’s macroeconomic research team. CSR estimates are slightly below consensus estimates, largely due to the view that inflation could remain at higher-than-expected levels.Inflation is less onerous today, but remains elevatedSources: Capital Group, FactSet, Bureau of Labor Statistics, Eurostat, UK Office for National Statistics, Japanese Statistics Bureau & Statistics Center, International Monetary Fund. Data as of May 25, 2023.It may not feel like it at the grocery store, but inflation is on a downward trajectory in the U.S., Europe and across many other markets, including Canada where the annual rate fell to 4.4% in April from a high of 8.1% last June. That’s largely due to lower energy prices, fewer supply chain disruptions and aggressive interest rate hikes by central banks, including the Bank of Canada (BoC). Interest rate-sensitive industries, such as housing, are already feeling the effects, with home prices falling in some formerly hot markets, although housing activity has picked up in Canada in 2023 after slumping last year.U.S. rate hikes meant to fight inflation have also triggered a crisis in the banking sector south of the border. A sharp selloff in the bond market last year hammered the portfolios of numerous regional banks, contributing to the collapses of Silicon Valley Bank and Signature Bank. In Europe, contagion spread to Credit Suisse, which nearly collapsed before UBS agreed to buy it for more than US$3 billion.The next shoe to drop could be commercial real estate. Office vacancy rates are on the rise as more companies embrace work-from-home business models. At the same time, it’s become more difficult to refinance commercial real estate (CRE) loans that were taken out when interest rates were much lower. That could be a growing threat to banks with a large exposure to CRE loans.“Office and retail properties look like the biggest concern,” says Ben Zhou, a Capital Group analyst who covers real estate investment trusts.Although Canadian bank’s exposures to CRE are significantly smaller than their U.S. counterparts, the big banks did announce loan provision increases to cover potential defaults during their last earnings announcements at the end of May.Interest rate outlookGiven these mounting risks, the U.S. interest rate outlook has changed dramatically since early March, when the banking crisis first hit. As shown in the chart below, investors no longer think the U.S. Federal Reserve will raise rates as far or as fast as previously expected, largely due to a tighter lending environment stemming from the banking turmoil.“We knew there would be consequences to one of the most aggressive tightening campaigns in history,” says fixed income portfolio manager Pramod Atluri. “The dislocations we are seeing in the financial markets signal a painful new phase for the Fed. It has clearly exposed some vulnerabilities and, as a result, I believe we are nearing the end of this rate-hiking cycle.”Investors expect interest rates to decline in the months aheadSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., Refinitiv Datastream, U.S. Federal Reserve. Fed funds target rate reflects the upper bound of the Federal Open Markets Committee’s (FOMC) target range for overnight lending among U.S. banks. The market-implied rate is based on price activity in the fed funds futures market, where investors can speculate on where they think rates will be at a future point in time. As of May 26, 2023.The European Central Bank has also slowed its rate-hiking campaign — from 50 basis-point increases previously to 25 basis points at its May 4 policy meeting. So far, ECB officials have not indicated a willingness to pause, given that inflation is running significantly higher in Europe than it is in the United States.Even in the U.S., consumer price increases are well above the Fed’s 2% target. And there are growing signs that inflation in the range of 4% to 5% could be stickier than central bankers had thought it would be. On May 26, the U.S. government reported that core inflation rose 4.7% on a year-over-year basis in April, up from 4.6% the month before.Canada also witnessed a rise after its most recent read as annual inflation ticked up to 4.4% in April from 4.3% in March. Stubborn inflation was one of the key reasons the BoC raised its benchmark interest rate by a quarter point to 4.75% on June 7, restarting its tightening campaign after pausing since January.A key question going forward is: Will the Fed and other central banks be willing to let inflation run hot for a while? Or will they decide — as the BoC did — that it’s more important to bring prices under control by keeping rates higher than market expectations?“Central bankers find themselves in a tough spot and I don’t envy them at all,” Franz says. “In my view, the Fed is going to pause its rate-hiking campaign in order to assess the damage from the banking crisis, and they may even begin cutting rates by the end of the year.”",Economic Indicators
Why the next economic recovery may be stronger than expected,2023-04-27T10:03:00,"Three questions have weighed on investors’ minds for months: Will there be a recession? How bad will it be? And what comes next?The U.S. Federal Reserve’s aggressive campaign of interest rate hikes to combat persistent inflation has amplified the risk of recession. Recent banking sector turmoil, which will likely result in tighter credit conditions, could further that risk.“One reliable indicator of a recession is an inverted yield curve, where the yield on short-term U.S. Treasury bonds is higher than the yield on longer dated bonds,“ says U.S. economist Jared Franz. “Recent activity in bond markets suggests a recession is widely expected. In fact, this may be the most widely anticipated recession in decades.”The inverted yield curve warns of recession riskSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., National Bureau of Economic Research, Refinitiv Datastream. As of March 31, 2023.While many investors are focused on the timing and severity of the next recession, Franz has turned his focus to longer term questions: What could be the catalysts for a subsequent recovery? And what are some of the implications of that recovery for investor portfolios?“When an insight is widely held, it can be challenging to benefit from that insight, as it may already be priced into the market,” Franz says. “Instead, investors may be better served by preparing for what I believe will be a stronger than usual recovery, fueled by a healthy consumer sector.”Here, Franz shares his expectations for recession and his perspective on a potential subsequent recovery.Has the U.S. already entered a recession?I believe we are on the edge of a recession. And with inflation still above the Fed’s 2% target and labour markets tight, the central bank still has work to do. Given the recent banking upheaval, I believe the Fed may temper its approach to rate increases, but I do believe it will be prepared to hike rates until inflation slows further.I now expect a 1.0% decline in gross domestic product (GDP), or what would be considered a “mild” recession. That would be considerably milder than the 4.5% decline investors experienced during the global financial crisis (GFC) from 2007 to 2009, and closer to a more conventional recession. This is not to diminish the impact of recession on individuals. Recessions, no matter how mild, can be painful.A weakening housing market is another risk factor. Sales fell in March, resulting in home price declines for a second straight month. But from here, I expect that prices may have a further 10% downside followed by a reacceleration. This will help limit any deterioration in household balance sheets, which may provide a boost to consumer confidence.Canada’s recession watchThe consensus view among many Canadian economists is that Canada will enter recession in 2023. There’s also consensus that a Canadian recession will be similar to what is projected for the U.S.: short-lived with growth quickly resuming. According to the Conference Board of Canada (CBoC), an economic slowdown is on the horizon, but the country’s largest private economic analysis forecasting group stops short of declaring Canada will enter recession.This despite the CBoC’s recession tracker reaching 95.0% in March and an inverted yield curve that indicates a dampening in investor sentiment and an intensified recession risk. But, as the board points out, just because the risk is high, it doesn’t mean that a recession will happen. The risk assessment, says the CBoC, gives them an idea of what the markets are saying but their results are driven by financial data and the Canadian business cycle — which could be approaching a trough over the next several months.“A negative term spread usually precedes recessions, but this is not the golden rule,” says the CBoC, ”there have been instances where the yield curve inverted, but no recession occurred. Since the 10-year bond yield and 3-month treasury yield differential continued to decline, the recession risk tracker produced a higher probability of recession in March.”Will the next recovery be stronger or weaker than prior ones?If there is one, I believe there are two reasons a recovery will be stronger than prior cycles. First, there may not be a need for large-scale deleveraging like there was during the GFC. Because so many companies have been expecting economic weakness, businesses have taken action, delaying orders to work excesses out of the economy. So, while a recession is likely this year, I expect it to be somewhat shallow.Second, the U.S. consumer sector is strong relative to past cycles. Healthy job markets, wage growth and household wealth should be key catalysts for a more robust recovery.Certainly, the U.S. labour market has been softening recently, and a recession of any magnitude will likely drive unemployment higher as companies announce layoffs. But the labour market has shown continued strength, with 236,000 jobs added in March. Why is that? Structural changes in labour markets have shifted labour supply and demand dynamics.At the end of March, the U.S. unemployment rate stood at 3.5%, near multidecade lows. As the economy slows, unemployment will rise from here, but I believe it will peak around 5.0% and fall more quickly than we have seen in prior business cycles. And, since the start of the pandemic, work-from-home trends, along with the reshoring of supply chains back to the U.S. and the development of sustainable energy, have bolstered real wages, particularly for middle- and low-income workers.What’s more, at this point in the cycle, consumers have low debt relative to levels coming out of the GFC or even other more typical recessions. At the end of 2022, household debt service as a percentage of income stood at 9.7%.Consumers are in better shape than they have been ahead of past recessionsSources: Capital Group, Board of Governors of the U.S. Federal Reserve System, Bureau of Labor Statistics, National Bureau of Economic Research. Unemployment rate reflects the seasonally adjusted total unemployment rate. Household debt service payments as a percentage of total disposable income are seasonally adjusted, and the debt service component includes both mortgage payments and scheduled consumer debt payments. Data is quarterly, as of 12/31/2022.What other factors could support a consumer-led recovery in the U.S.?I expect moderating inflation to further support consumer strength. While it will take some time for the Fed to get inflation down to its 2.0% target, I believe it will be contained near 3.0%. Academic studies have shown that consumer spending has tended not to be significantly impacted by inflation around 3.0%. Contained inflation will likely boost consumer confidence.And, if wages hold up, it can feel like a real wage boost. I also expect inflation to edge toward 2.0% to 2.5% by 2025.I believe we’ll also see productivity gains from automation and the increased adoption of artificial intelligence. This may provide an economic tailwind by helping to manage rising labour costs. That said, I do not expect such productivity gains to offset hiring needs in the near- to mid-term.I also expect we will see stronger housing demand coming out of the recession. Changing demographics and rising household formation (a group of individuals who intend to live together), suggest a likely rebound in housing demand. I expect the popularity of working remotely to drive demand for housing development in suburbs, areas beyond the suburbs and second-tier cities, as well.What does it mean for investors?Solid labour market fundamentals, household balance sheets and moderating inflation could in my estimation lead to 3.0% growth in the U.S. consumer sector going forward. This is important because consumers account for about 67% of the U.S. economy. It is important to emphasize that a recession will cause some contraction in the labour market, but I expect the labour market to rebound.After large declines, markets have rebounded relatively quicklySources: Capital Group, RIMES, Standard & Poor's. As of 12/31/2022. Market downturns are based on the five largest declines in the value of the S&P 500 Index (excluding dividends and/or distributions) with 100% recovery after each decline. The return of each of the five years after a low is a 12-month return based on the date of the low. The percentage decline is based on the index value of the unmanaged S&P 500, excluding dividends and/or distributions. The average annual total returns include reinvested dividends and/or distributions but do not reflect the effect of sales charges, commissions, account fees, expenses, or taxes. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.Strong wages and consumer confidence could boost consumer spending, providing an uptick in a range of industries, including travel and leisure. What’s more, a housing market recovery could provide a tailwind not only to construction spending, but also spending for other durable goods, like household appliances.Historically, the stock market has tended to anticipate recoveries, rebounding ahead of any turn in the economy.",Economic Indicators
Debt ceiling showdown: Should investors worry?,2023-04-20T09:27:00,"Stop us if you’ve heard this one before: U.S. lawmakers are clashing over a legislative action to raise the federal debt ceiling. The issue has been percolating for months but could come to a head this summer as the U.S. Treasury starts running out of money to pay its bills.The decision to increase the nation’s debt limit is often a routine one — except in years when Congress is divided, like it is now. With Republicans controlling the House of Representatives and Democrats in command of the Senate, the scene is set for what could be one of the most contentious debt ceiling showdowns in recent history.So far, Democrats have said they won’t negotiate on the issue, while many Republicans have said they won’t vote to lift the debt limit without some additional agreements to curb federal spending.“This could be the worst standoff we’ve ever witnessed,” says Capital Group political economist Matt Miller. “It certainly has the potential to be at least as bad as 2011.”That’s the year Standard & Poor’s cut the United States’ prized AAA credit rating to AA-plus (where it remains) amid concerns about the government’s budget deficit, a growing long-term debt burden and political conflicts over raising the debt limit. The move unnerved U.S. financial markets for a time, but they quickly recovered.A U.S. debt ceiling standoff could get ugly, but markets have historically powered throughSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's, U.S. Department of the Treasury, U.S. Office of Management and Budget. Periods in which the statutory limit has been suspended are reflected by the dotted lines. These periods include February 4, 2013, through May 18, 2013; October 17, 2014, through March 31, 2017; September 30, 2017, through March 1, 2019; and August 2, 2019, through July 31, 2021. Data as of March 31, 2023. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Based in USD.In fact, not long after the 2011 credit rating action, U.S. stocks embarked on one of the longest bull markets in history — a virtually uninterrupted run from 2011 until the start of the COVID-19 pandemic.“I think the lesson from 2011, and a subsequent debt ceiling impasse in 2013, is that these events can disrupt markets for a while — sometimes even weeks or months — but if we look at history, they don’t tend to have a lasting impact on investors,” Miller says. “That’s assuming we get a reasonable resolution.”In mid-April House Speaker Kevin McCarthy unveiled legislation that would raise the debt limit by US$1.5 trillion. The bill also includes several other provisions to curtail federal spending. It remained unclear whether there were enough votes to pass the bill in its current form.What happens if the U.S. defaults on its debt?Of course, the worry is that the U.S. could — in the middle of a particularly nasty debt ceiling impasse — wind up in technical default on its many debt obligations, including payments to bond holders. It’s hard to predict what might happen next, but there are many who say it would roil the financial markets and jeopardize the U.S. dollar’s status as the world’s reserve currency.The chances of a technical default — which would occur should a bond payment be missed or even delayed — are very low but not zero, according to Tom Hollenberg, a Capital Group fixed income portfolio manager.“It's important to make a distinction between the situation we are facing in the U.S. and something much worse, like an Argentina-style default, where investors lose their savings. Nobody seriously believes that will happen here,” Hollenberg says. “In the U.S., the probability of even a technical default, or a delayed payment, is between 5% and 10%, in my view. It’s certainly not my base case, but it’s something I can’t ignore either.”When will the U.S. Treasury run out of money?Sources: Capital Group, Congressional Budget Office (CBO), Office of Management and Budget (OMB), Piper Sandler. Cash balance figures reflect estimates from Piper Sandler based on debt forecasts from the CBO and OMB, respectively. Estimates assume extraordinary measures are fully deployed and that the Treasury will not allow cash balances below US$25 billion. ""X-dates"" refer to the date on which the U.S. government will be unable to pay all its obligations. Cash balance path is smoothed. As of April 12, 2023.If the U.S. missed a payment on a short-term note due in June, for example, it would spark an outcry in the markets, accompanied by extreme volatility for a day or two, Hollenberg explains, and then the debt ceiling impasse would likely come to an end.“When you reach a crisis, that tends to put the political gears in motion,” he adds. “If that happened, I think Congress would very quickly come together and raise the debt limit, and investors would be made whole.”The law of unintended consequencesThat doesn’t mean there would be no consequences for a technical default. The rating agencies could slash the U.S. credit rating again. Investors could drive up the cost of future U.S. debt issuances. And, perhaps worst of all, some investors may no longer regard U.S. Treasuries as the safest investment in the world.“We don’t really know what the downstream implications would be,” Hollenberg says. “For example, there are banks whose ratings are somewhat linked to U.S. sovereign ratings. There are insurance companies in the same situation, as well as agencies like Fannie and Freddie. It’s difficult to know what would happen to them if one or more of the rating agencies were to downgrade the U.S. again.“We could wind up with cascading downgrades, and that would be a real problem for some financial institutions,” he warns. “It’s not something we can just gloss over, and it’s why we need a timely resolution. I do think we will get one, I just hope it comes before we encounter any unintended consequences.”U.S. long-term debt has risen steadily over the past half centurySources: Capital Group, National Bureau of Economic Research, U.S. Treasury Department. As of December 31, 2022.How much debt is too much?From the point of view of an equity investor, the U.S. debt ceiling debate makes for interesting political theater, but it’s not something that weighs too heavily on investment decisions, says Steve Watson, portfolio manager for Capital Group Capital Income BuilderTM(Canada) and Capital Group Monthly Income PortfolioTM(Canada).“At the same time, I don’t think it’s necessarily a bad idea to have an occasional reminder that the United States is more than US$30 trillion in debt,” Watson notes. “Maybe it’s time to engage in a serious discussion about long-term fiscal responsibility.”",Politics
Will the U.S. dollar continue to weaken?,2023-04-10T11:41:00,"Is the U.S. dollar at a turning point? A sharp decline late last year has left many wondering if the greenback’s decade-long bull run is coming to an end.A continuing downward trend would be welcome news for investors in international bonds and equities, whose total returns have been eroded by currency translation effects. And, in many ways, a correction is overdue. From its trough in 2011 to the recent peak in late 2022, the U.S. dollar rose 45% against J.P. Morgan‘s inflation-adjusted broad-based basket of developed and emerging market currencies. This has left it overvalued against most major and emerging markets (EM) currencies on a purchasing power parity (PPP) basis.But these metrics suggest the dollar has been overvalued for quite some time, and valuation alone has not been enough to bring it back down. For a longer term decline to set in, there must be one or more catalysts. These are a few we are watching that could influence the direction of the dollar.1. Interest rate differential between the U.S. and Europe is narrowingIn the pre-COVID era, interest rates were low in all the major economies. Nevertheless, rates in the U.S. were higher than those in Europe, Japan and other developed markets. That was the primary factor propelling the U.S. dollar higher against most currencies. Investors around the world could earn higher interest rates while enjoying safe haven status. High forward interest rates also meant investors could buy bonds denominated in the euro and the yen, hedge them into U.S. dollars and earn a higher interest rate (carry).The U.S. dollar is significantly above long-term averageSources: Capital Group, J.P. Morgan. Data as of March 31, 2023. The real broad effective exchange rate measures the value of the U.S. dollar against a group of developed and emerging market currencies and adjusts for inflation using the U.S. Consumer Price Index (CPI). CPI is a commonly used measure of inflation that measures the average change over time in the prices paid by consumers for a basket of goods and services.Several factors supported comparatively higher U.S. nominal and real interest rates: a hawkish Federal Reserve more determined to raise interest rates than the European Central Bank (ECB), the Bank of England (BOE) or the Bank of Japan (BOJ), plus a strong and productive U.S. economy and higher inflation.Now this picture is changing, especially relative to the euro. The swift collapse of three U.S. regional banks — Silicon Valley Bank, Signature Bank and Silvergate Bank — has led bond markets to lower expectations for both the terminal federal funds rate and U.S. Treasuries across the yield curve. Meanwhile, European bond yields could still move higher as the ECB stays on its rate-hiking path should inflation pressures persist.It’s also been interesting to see that in the most recent episode of market volatility attributable to the banking sector, the dollar has hovered in a range of 92 to 94 cents to the euro. Swift action by the Federal Reserve to provide dollar liquidity via swap lines with other central banks provided support to the U.S. currency. (Swap lines are agreements between two central banks to exchange currencies. They allow a central bank to obtain foreign currency from the central bank that issues it and distribute it to commercial banks in their country.)Overall we expect the differential between U.S. interest rates and those in Europe to narrow. This could remove some support for the dollar, which was trading around 92 cents to the euro as of March 31.One reason for a potential narrowing: The ECB started hiking later than the Fed. After raising rates by 250 basis points (bps) last year, the ECB probably has further to go if it wants to bring inflation closer to its 2% target. Meanwhile, the Fed may be closer to pausing, or potentially cutting rates, than it had anticipated before the U.S. bank failures. Markets expect the rate gap to decrease by about 90 bps (from around 1.8% to 0.9%) by the end of the year.Meanwhile, the BOE increased its policy rate by nearly 425 bps, putting U.K. nominal and real interest rates closer to the U.S. than either the ECB or the BOJ. Its actions helped lift the pound 15% against the U.S. dollar after U.K. government turmoil forced it to an all-time low in September 2022. What happens next to the pound sterling will likely depend more on potential further rate hikes than any other variable. At this point, the BOE seems less aggressive than the ECB or the Fed.The dollar follows real ratesSources: Capital Group, Macrobond, J.P. Morgan. Data as of March 29, 2023. The 10-year real rate differential measures the difference in inflation-adjusted interest rates between the U.S. and a developed market group consisting of Germany, Japan and the U.K. The broad U.S. dollar index is an effective exchange rate that measures the value of the U.S. dollar against a group of developed and emerging market currencies.2. Economic outlook across various markets and countries is improvingGrowth prospects for China, Europe, Japan and emerging markets are looking brighter. Just a few months ago, China’s economy was hampered by the government’s zero-COVID policy, Europe was facing a potential winter energy crisis, Japan’s economy unexpectedly contracted in the third quarter and the risk of a global recession loomed over emerging markets.China’s sooner-than-expected economic reopening improves 2023 growth prospects for the country as well as the rest of the global economy. After years of being trapped at home, many Chinese consumers have the savings and demand to fuel spending. Measures of consumer activity and manufacturing already show signs of improvement. China’s government has been providing billions of dollars to shore up its ailing property market and also appears closer to wrapping up reforms for private sector technology companies.2023 global growth outlook improvesSource: International Monetary Fund. Data as of January 2023.European economic data show reduced risks of a deep recession, as forward-looking manufacturing and service sector Purchasing Managers’ Index (PMI) data point to better conditions. The sharp reversal in energy prices due to a warm winter is helping manufacturers and consumers.Japan’s economy is also proving to be resilient. Consumer demand is holding up despite higher inflation. The service sector shows signs of improving, the labour market remains tight and manufacturing should get support from China’s recovery. Corporate investment may also be improving.3. Portfolio flows may begin to support the euroIn recent years the ECB’s negative interest rate policy and quantitative easing measures kept foreign investors away, but those policies look set to change. If policy rates between the ECB and the Fed narrow as expected, another driver of euro weakness and dollar support is likely to dissipate.Europeans have been buying far more foreign bonds than international investors have been buying into Europe. As a result, the five-year moving average for net bond flows in Europe has been negative since 2014. While it’s hard to pinpoint, a majority of outflows likely went to the U.S., given the market’s liquidity and size.Sources: Capital Group, Haver Analytics. Data as of December 31, 2022. Outflows = eurozone bond purchases abroad. Inflows = foreign purchases of eurozone bonds. Data start date is December 2008.Meanwhile, the carry advantage between the U.S. and the eurozone is becoming less compelling. When the Fed aggressively hiked rates before the ECB, an attractive carry opportunity arose. Even after the cost of hedging currency risk, using euro-denominated assets to buy dollar assets was attractive. However, that hedged trade is becoming less profitable, which should reduce euro selling and flows into the dollar.4. A rising Japanese yen: possible but fragileThe Bank of Japan’s extreme monetary policies have long kept the yen from appreciating against the dollar. The BOJ has implemented yield curve control (YCC) — pegging 10-year government bond yields near zero rate — as well as negative interest rates and massive quantitative easing to pump inflation closer to its 2% target.Signs of stronger inflation may finally be here. Japan’s core consumer price index, which excludes fresh food, rose 4.2% year over year in January. And some companies appear to be complying with BOJ Governor Haruhiko Kuroda’s call for wage increases above the rate of inflation.If the BOJ believes inflation can stay around 2%, it will have cover to gradually unwind some of its policies. In a surprise move last December, the central bank loosened its YCC policy slightly, and we expect it to make a similar announcement this year.Allowing 10-year yields to rise should support the yen. Trading around ¥133 to the dollar, it is among the most undervalued currencies, according to our currency analyst Jens Søndergaard’s valuation model. Even slightly higher domestic rates would incrementally reduce Japanese dollar demand.In addition, an increase in Japanese interest rates and potential volatility from BOJ policy uncertainty could make carry trades more expensive. However, the interest rate differential between the yen and the dollar also depends on Fed action. If stubborn inflation pressures force the Fed to raise rates beyond current expectations, the yen could remain depressed.5. Emerging markets are further along the curve on monetary policyWhen inflation picked up in 2021, emerging market (EM) central banks responded quickly and aggressively. Latin American central banks led the charge. Brazil’s central bank started hiking rates in March 2021 and took its policy rate from 2.00% to the current 13.75%. Eastern European central banks picked up their pace after Russia’s invasion of Ukraine. And the spike in energy prices last year led some Asian central banks to increase rates.EM central banks raised rates aggressivelySource: Bloomberg. Data as of March 31, 2023.High interest rates in nominal and real terms have been supportive of EM currencies, which have attracted investors looking for income. The Brazilian real and Mexican peso were among the few currencies that strengthened against the U.S. dollar last year. In addition to attractive nominal and real yields, macroeconomic conditions have improved. The tilt toward more positive fundamentals is likely to continue overriding political risk concerns in those countries for now.In many Asian economies, a combination of attractive interest rates, improving growth prospects and strong macroeconomic fundamentals are supportive of currencies.China’s economic reopening should broadly boost Asian growth. In Southeast Asia, we believe the Thai baht is becoming more compelling as increased tourism drives up economic growth rates and foreign flows. A rebound in commodity exports from Indonesia to China may benefit the Indonesian rupiah.The Korean won also appears to be undervalued. Exports to China will likely rebound, and Korea’s financial position could get stronger. As a large energy importer, Korea faced a severe headwind from last year’s jump in prices — hurting businesses and consumers — but the drag should lessen significantly this year.Further support to EM currencies could come when the Fed stops raising rates. In that case, EM central banks may find it easier to lower their policy rates, especially if inflation keeps easing or growth softens. That said, the rate differential between many emerging markets and the U.S. will likely remain attractive, providing a potential tailwind to EM currencies.What are the risks to this view?If the global economy weakens more than expected as the full impact of monetary tightening makes its way through the system, the U.S. dollar could find support given its status as a safe haven currency. This would likely delay a repricing of the dollar to its fair value.A long-term U.S. dollar decline also requires Europe, Japan, China and other emerging markets to show substantial improvement in economic fundamentals, including gains in productivity and economic reforms favoring free enterprise and capital investments. Over the past decade, the U.S. economy has gained its edge from technology and health care innovations as well as an economic incentive system that supports entrepreneurship.While it is early, we do see modest signs of change. In Europe, Italy has laid out a post-pandemic recovery and resilience plan. If properly executed, it would be meaningful, as Italy has been a European growth headwind for many years. Germany is breaking from its long-held stance of fiscal conservatism and is willing to provide a boost to consumers and industries even if it means running larger deficits along with other EU members. And while increased fiscal spending in Europe should stimulate growth, it’s unclear how it will affect inflation and the ECB’s efforts.Other conditions in Europe are also looking more favourable. Fears of a peripheral debt crisis or a eurozone breakup have decreased. The eurozone’s responses to Brexit, the pandemic and Russia’s invasion of Ukraine appear to have helped reassure investors that the region is a safer place to invest than it was a decade ago.Japan is starting on a slow path of normalizing its monetary policy while providing some support to the economy. Meanwhile, many of the large emerging markets have shown monetary discipline by keeping rates high in the face of inflation and tempering fiscal stimulus. But a structural and sustained uplift in financial assets, including currencies, will depend on economic reforms varying from labour and land acquisition laws to intellectual property protection and joint venture policies.",Currencies
10 investing lessons from 2008 that apply today,2023-03-29T09:06:00,"We have been here before.The failure of Silicon Valley Bank on March 10 reminds me of what I experienced firsthand as a bank analyst during the global financial crisis in 2007 and 2008.As a professional investor for 30 years, I rely on my own experiences to help guide my investment approach. When I was a bank analyst then, I captured the 10 lessons below to serve as a guide for myself and colleagues to help get us to the other side of the valley.Every crisis is different, but they often have things in common. Today’s turmoil shares some striking similarities, though, in my view, this current episode is much smaller in scale and far less damaging.Last summer, with rates rising, inflation high and the prospect of recession looming, I unearthed these lessons from 15 years ago and shared them again. And when Silicon Valley Bank failed a few weeks ago, I circulated them once more to offer perspective and help colleagues manage the uncertainty. Here are those lessons, which I believe bear repeating.Wisdom earned in crisisWhen the weathermen pack umbrellas, the forecast is for rain.Bank treasurers started hoarding liquidity — assets that can easily be converted to cash — in mid-2007 when liquidity was not on anyone’s radar screen. It should have been a clear warning sign.Liquidity is a coward.Regardless of balance sheet strength or franchise value, if liquidity evaporates, which it has tended to do at the first sign of trouble, perception of weakness becomes reality.The long-term outlook only matters if you can make it to the long term.The 2007–2008 cycle progressed from one of concern about earnings to concern about capital to concern about liquidity. Not until we reverse the cycle and return to a focus on earnings do I expect this cycle to end, and by then many institutions may no longer be with us.There is no silver bullet.Selling into every rally on government fixes would have been the right call during the early stages of the global financial crisis. Drastic events require drastic measures; anything less would be a disappointment.Avoid the most aggressive companies.When you hear the wordsgrowthandinnovationas they relate to lending businesses, proceed with caution. Making cross-industry comparisons can help provide guard rails for assessing where the dangers might be. Variations in outcomes between the least and most aggressive companies can be huge.Bad news is bad news.If a company needs capital and/or has to cut its dividend, consider getting out of the way, even if it looks like it’s priced into the stock.Don’t try to navigate uncharted waters.When circumstances change so drastically that even an experienced investment analyst has a hard time digesting events, I think it’s best to walk away. This was true in the technology boom-bust cycle in the late-1990s as well as the global financial crisis. The break with the past was so significant in both cases that history no longer served as a guide.Good loans are made in bad times and bad loans are made in good times.The winners in a credit cycle will usually be those with the capital and liquidity to capitalize on the distress.Trust your instincts and act.The discontinuity of a crisis can be paralyzing, but it’s important to remain flexible and continue to take action with a forward-thinking mindset.Take care of yourself.Sleep, exercise and healthy diet are important to maintaining a constructive attitude. We owe it to ourselves, our families and our clients to stay healthy.Putting investing lessons into actionIt is difficult to predict when the current crisis will end, but experience has taught me that it will and that we will get through this. Time and time again, markets have demonstrated a remarkable ability to endure and recover from crisis and thrive.Today, as a portfolio manager, I spend much of my time focused on preservation of capital and draw from my personal experiences in past crises in that effort.I also rely on the wisdom of colleagues. At Capital Group we have many veteran investors with deep experience. Some 37% of our portfolio managers have more than 30 years of investment experience while 89% have 20 or more.The importance of experienceSource: Capital Group (as of 12/31/22). Reflects the global organization.Moving beyond the banking turmoilMoving beyond financial crises takes time and can be messy. Regulators have taken swift action to try to contain the damage and restore confidence, and they have been coming up with some very creative solutions. But those remedies will need time to be tested by the market. So, patience is crucial.Going forward, I expect to see a dramatic tightening in lending standards. Small- to mid-sized banks are likely to be subject to stricter regulations — along the lines of the requirements for the largest financial institutions. Those likely include higher capital and liquidity requirements, periodic stress testing and restrictions on the types of investments banks can employ in their bond portfolios.As in any cycle there will be winners. My view is that the strong will get stronger. That includes banks as well as companies in other industries that generate strong cash flow and can fund their own growth. For example, select technology giants are cash-flow positive today. Some of them made massive investments in their businesses when rates were near zero. It would be much more expensive for competitors to challenge those incumbents today.Across industries, I believe opportunities will surface. The key for investors is to remain calm, look past the turbulence and be ready to act when opportunity does arise.",Market Volatility
What the SVB collapse means for investors,2023-03-22T10:31:00,"For more than a year, investors have wondered what might prompt the U.S. Federal Reserve to alter its aggressive rate-hiking path. The collapse of SVB Financial, parent company of Silicon Valley Bank, may have provided the answer.The demise of the 16th largest bank in the United States has dramatically changed the interest rate outlook for the balance of 2023 — and beyond — as the market ponders how the Fed and other central banks will react to growing turmoil in the sector. With fear of contagion spreading, European banks also have come under pressure, forcing regulators to step in and shore up unsteady financial institutions.Over the weekend, Swiss banking giant UBS agreed to acquire its longtime rival Credit Suisse for more than US$3 billion in a deal encouraged by regulators to help restore confidence in the global banking system.These rapidly unfolding events have led to an environment where the Fed — unquestionably planning to hike rates just two weeks ago — is now tempering its hawkish tone and may even start cutting rates before the end of the year.On Wednesday, the Fed increased its key policy rate by 25 basis points, but central bank officials omitted language from previous policy statements referring to the need for “ongoing” rate increases. Moreover, a rapid decline in bond yields over the past two weeks means investors expect the Fed to cut rates as expectations for economic growth and inflation fall, says fixed income portfolio manager Pramod Atluri.The dislocations we are seeing in the financial markets signal a painful new phase for the Fed,” Atluri says. “We knew there would be consequences to one of the most aggressive tightening campaigns in history. It has clearly exposed some vulnerabilities in the banking system and, as a result, we may be nearing the end of the rate hikes.SVB collapse has drastically altered interest rate expectationsSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., Refinitiv Datastream, U.S. Federal Reserve. Fed funds target rate reflects the upper bound of the Federal Open Markets Committee's (FOMC) target range for overnight lending among U.S. banks. As of intraday, March 15, 2023.In contrast, the Bank of Canada (BoC) has already paused interest rate hikes and held the target rate at 4.50% during its last monetary policy meeting March 8. Although that decision came in advance of Silicon Valley Bank’s demise and the subsequent U.S. and European banking sector turmoil, the BoC can take comfort from knowing the country’s domestic banking sector is well-capitalized and stable. There hasn’t been, in fact, a major bank failure in Canada since the collapse of Home Bank of Canada in 1923, and the country’s banking sector relatively breezed through the Great Financial Crisis in 2007-2008.Recession risk on the riseIf investors were expecting a recession this year — and many were— adding a banking crisis into the mix considerably darkens the outlook, says Capital Group economist Jared Franz.One reason bond yields are falling so quickly is that market participants are now predicting a recession more vociferously than before SVB’s troubles emerged. One strong indicator of that is an inverted yield curve — where the yield on short-term U.S. Treasury bonds is higher than the yield on longer dated bonds.“That’s the most reliable recession indicator we have,” Franz explains.Inverted yield curve warns of recession riskSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd. As of intraday, March 15, 2023.Recessions with a banking sector component are generally worse, on average, than more typical downturns, Franz says. That’s because banks will generally tighten lending standards, which then has a knock-on effect for the rest of the economy as it becomes harder for companies and individuals to get financing. Consumer spending and hiring are also likely to be impacted, he adds, as people save more money and companies announce layoffs.Franz expects U.S. gross domestic product to decline by roughly 1.5% to 2.0% for the full year, compared to a previously expected decline of 1.0%. “That would still be well below the recessionary pain felt during the global financial crisis from 2007 to 2009, when GDP fell 4.3%, which this is clearly not,” Franz stresses.What about inflation?The challenge for the Fed is that inflation remains high. On a year-over-year basis, the U.S. Consumer Price Index stood at 6% in February, far above the Fed’s 2% target. That could put pressure on Fed officials to avoid cutting rates too soon. Instead, they may wait to see how much financial conditions tighten in the months ahead should additional turmoil unfold in the banking sector or elsewhere.“The Fed still has a battle against inflation they need to wage,” Franz explains. “Ironically, the failure of SVB may help Fed officials accomplish their goal of contracting financial conditions so demand falls alongside inflationary pressures.“We’re only two weeks into this situation, so it’s tough to say how it will ultimately play out. A lot depends on the regulatory response and whether the contagion spreads to other banks. It’s a fluid situation, and I don’t think anybody has all the answers, but hopefully we are asking the right questions.”In Canada, the headline annual inflation rate fell to 5.2% in February from 5.9% in January. A similar, but smaller downward move was also evident in core inflation which eased to 4.9% in February from 5.0% the previous month. Canadian inflation numbers have fallen faster and lower due to the Canadian economy’s greater sensitivity to interest rate increases. This is due, in part, to higher levels of household debt in Canada as well as higher numbers of homeowners with short-duration mortgages which have to be renewed at what are now higher interest rates. An ongoing BoC pause is not a foregone conclusion, however, and the bank reiterated its commitment to price stability March 8, noting that its Governing Council “is prepared to increase the policy rate further if needed to return inflation to the 2% target.”Troubled banks? We’ve been here beforeWill Robbins, a Capital Group portfolio manager and former banking analyst, remains confident that the overall health of the U.S. banking system is strong. He believes it will simply take time for the turbulence to subside. Regulators have acted swiftly to contain the panic among regional bank investors, he notes, and larger banks have stepped in to help fund the rescue efforts.“We’ve been here before,” says Robbins, who has covered the banking industry for more than 30 years. “This is an old-fashioned bank run. It’s going to be messy, and it’s going to take a while to sort things out. But I think we are well positioned to get through it.”Going forward, Robbins expects to see several actions following SVB’s collapse, including a dramatic tightening of lending standards, stricter regulations for small- and mid-sized banks, and a resulting pressure on their ability to generate healthy profits.“Longer term, I do think the earnings power of smaller banks will be impaired as a result of falling under the same regulatory regime that large banks were subjected to following the financial crisis,” Robbins says. Those included higher capital and liquidity requirements, periodic stress testing and restrictions on the types of investments banks can employ in their bond portfolios. In general, banks with less than $250 billion in assets have been exempt from such regulations.Troubled banks have not, in contrast, been a problem in Canada since the previously mentioned collapse of Home Bank in 1923. After the bank failed, the country’s modern banking system was created including deposit insurance, federal regulatory oversight and a concentrated, virtual oligopoly of a handful of banks. One potential, noteworthy change that may come from Silicon Valley Bank’s demise is a possible increase in deposit insurance. It currently stands at $100,000 and the federal government has indicated it may raise the limit if troubles persist or worsen.Regional banks are under the microscope following SVB collapseSources: Capital Group, FactSet. Deposit values as of 12/31/2022.Events are rapidly unfolding, Robbins cautions, so it will be important for investors to continue monitoring the situation.“Central banks have moved swiftly to try and contain the spread of contagion across the financial system,” Robbins says. “We are still in the thick of it, so we cannot predict the path this will ultimately take.”Is ‘Too Big to Fail’ now a positive?As with any crisis, this one also presents potential investment opportunities, especially for investors with a long-term horizon.Large U.S. banks, for instance, are already seeing a massive inflow of deposits as customers switch from regional institutions to the perceived safety of the big four: JPMorgan Chase, Bank of America, Citigroup and Wells Fargo.Likewise, other large companies with strong balance sheets and the ability to fund their own growth should benefit, relatively speaking, from an environment in which it becomes tougher to access capital markets. Big technology and consumer tech companies from Apple to Amazon could once again find themselves the centre of attention if interest rates move significantly lower.“These are the same companies that did poorly when rates were going up,” Robbins explains. “Now there’s an argument to be made that they are still growing in a low-growth environment. They don’t need access to capital to grow. And in many cases they already funded their major capital investments at a time when the cost of capital was much lower.“So if there’s an expectation that rates are going down, or at least they aren’t going as high as previously thought,” he continues, “growth-oriented companies could be seen as more valuable, particularly the incumbents that funded their growth years ago.”",Market Volatility
Views on the collapse of SVB Financial,2023-03-13T10:25:00,"The sudden collapse of SVB Financial, a California-based bank focused on technology startups, has raised important questions about the health of the U.S. banking system and the government’s response to yet another crisis in the financial sector. Will additional small and regional banks face a similar fate? Are larger banks at risk? And will the U.S. Federal Reserve alter its expected rate-hiking path in response?As these events are rapidly evolving, here are the current views of Capital Group analysts:Will it lead to more regional banks failing in the U.S.?Aleks Ivanova, U.S. banking analystOver the weekend, U.S. regulators took action to protect all insured and uninsured depositors affected by the collapse of SVB (parent of Silicon Valley Bank) and Signature Bank (SBNY), a New York-based bank. Meanwhile, First Republic Bank (FRC) announced that that it has obtained additional liquidity from the U.S. Federal Reserve and JP Morgan.Fed officials said they would also increase available liquidity to banks through a new facility — the Bank Term Funding Program. This facility will offer loans of up to one year to banks that pledge U.S. Treasury securities, mortgage-backed securities and other collateral at par. This means that banks can obtain liquidity without incurring the losses that come from selling Treasuries and agency mortgage-backed securities, which have declined in value as a result of rising interest rates. These actions were designed to limit the risk of further bank runs on small- and mid-sized banks.That said, these actions essentially give affected banks a year to get their balance sheets in order. They do not remove the underlying loss created from rising interest rates; they just buy time for bank executives and regulators to manage it. The expectation is that the combination of deposit guarantees and the provision of liquidity will be enough to stem the contagion and avoid additional deposit runs.As a consequence of these actions, the U.S. regulatory environment will likely tighten from here for small- and mid-tier banks. Regulators may require these banks to hold more capital, which in turn will structurally lower their profitability. Regulatory changes can be phased in over multiple years, similar to what we saw after the global financial crisis.The regional small- and mid-tier banks have generally traded at a premium to large money centre banks as they generated higher growth rates and are subject to lower capital requirements and less regulation. In addition to regulation, the events of the past week will likely lead corporate treasurers to rethink or possibly diversify their banking relationships. This dynamic could make it more challenging even for the best small banks to attract and retain deposits.What is the risk to the big money centre banks?Tracy Li, U.S. banking analystBig money centre banks are better diversified, well-capitalized, generally more liquid and subject to much more stringent regulations than small banks. The differences include much higher capital requirements, liquidity requirements, leverage limitations, frequency of stress testing and treatment of the mark-to-market securities portfolios — avoiding the kind of asset liability mismatch that brought down SVB.The big banks, designated as Global Systemically Important Banks (GSIBs), do not present compelling valuation, in my view, and do not appear to be fully reflecting neither the risk of a recession in the U.S. nor the financial risks of a late cycle economy.Will the Fed postpone raising rates?Jared Franz, U.S. economistU.S. Treasury Secretary Janet Yellen, who is well-versed in crisis management, mobilized regulators over the weekend and on Sunday announced the Bank Term Funding Program (BTFP) as a backstop facility for depository institutions. This is consistent with the central bank playbook in times of emergency to err on the side of caution and go big.In addition, the Fed statement said: ""The Board is closely monitoring conditions across the financial system and is prepared to use its full range of tools to support households and businesses, and will take additional steps as appropriate.""The failure of these sizable regional banks combined with the shock to the banking sector will likely accelerate the tightening of financial conditions, thus making an economic slowdown or an outright recession more likely.In the near term, the Fed may take a 50-basis-point rate hike off the table. But if financial markets stabilize, I think the Fed will pivot back to inflation fighting. The central bank will want to separate liquidity operations from inflation progress. The recent strength in employment nonfarm payrolls shows that elevated inflation remains a significant risk.How have fixed income markets responded?Pramod Atluri, fixed income portfolio managerThe collapse of Silicon Valley Bank powered a rally in government bonds. The yield curve has steepened significantly with yields on shorter dated Treasuries falling more than those that are longer dated. The sharp decline in yields signals investors believe that financial stability concerns as well as the associated tightening of financial conditions may give the Fed the ability to end its aggressive hiking campaign to stem inflationary pressures.The market, which had last week priced in a peak federal funds rate of 5.50%, has now priced in 4.75% as the peak — effectively saying we’ll have one more hike and then done. Credit spreads have widened as investors digest the potential impact of tighter financial conditions ahead and the greater chance of slower economic growth leading to a potential recession.I agree that the Fed will likely delay rate hikes next week in the wake of these developments. When you’re looking at the prospect of more bank regulations resulting from this and other banks raising deposit rates to compete, it essentially translates to greater tightening of financial conditions.This is a fluid situation, and credit spreads are widening given expectations of a weaker economy. We will closely watch developments over the coming weeks.Is there contagion risk to the European banks?Matteo Merlo, European banking analystI don’t expect European banks to face the same crisis of confidence. Europe has a higher level of regulation that applies equally to small banks. Similar to the large U.S. banks, European banks generally have a more diversified deposit base and ample liquidity buffers.From an operating standpoint the European banking sector is arguably in its strongest position since the global financial crisis. Capital ratios and profitability are at all-time highs. BNP, Barclays and UniCredit, for example, have all built up excess capital and have 15%-20% of their balance sheets in liquidity reserves.In addition, most banks remain deposit-rich. The European Central Bank (ECB) regularly stress-tests banks to measure potential risk from higher rates on bank portfolios. European regulators have also signed off on dividend and share buyback plans. This suggests the ECB sees no major risks on the horizon.SVB had a unique banking model, mainly serving customers in the venture capital community. Venture capital is less developed in Europe, and European banks generally have a well-diversified customer base. That said, in an environment of rising rates and quantitative tightening, unforeseen issues can emerge.What is the potential impact of SVB failure on technology companies?David Penner, technology analystSVB’s failure will likely have a negative impact, at least in the near term, on startups and their venture capital sponsors. But I don’t see it as particularly disruptive to most public software firms and, broadly speaking, the large technology companies.These companies do not bank primarily or at all with SVB, so there is limited or little direct exposure. Most graduate to bigger banks with scale and through relationships forged during capital markets events, including initial public offerings.They sell primarily to large enterprise customers with startups being a small minority of their clients. As such, the indirect exposure through stretched receivables and reduced spending is minimal.Most of the large tech companies are free cash flow positive and not reliant on potentially tied-up deposits, better enabling them to handle stretched out receivables from a minority of customers.",Market Volatility
10 investment themes for 2023,2023-03-08T11:25:00,"There’s a new reality taking shape that could define global markets over the next decade.Although many investors are expecting a return to normal after inflation subsides and central banks stop raising interest rates, we believe markets are undergoing significant changes. Investors may need to reset expectations in this new environment.One change that’s already underway is the shift from narrow to broad market leadership. A handful of tech stocks dominated markets for years, but we expect a much wider range of investments to drive portfolio returns going forward. That’s why we asked our investment team to highlight the trends they are most closely following today.Here are 10 investment themes for 2023:1. Dividend stocks could power portfolios for the next decade2. Growth investing will require a new approach3. Nimble multinational companies are becoming global champions4. Innovation is leading to a golden age of health care5. Industrial renaissance could benefit pick-and-shovel companies6. Reshoring supply chains will create new opportunities across industries7. Core bonds can provide strength when equities are weak8. Credit fundamentals are making a comeback9. High-yield bonds are earning their name again10. 60/40 portfolios are alive and well1. Dividend stocks could power portfolios for the next decadeCaroline Randall, equity portfolio manager, Capital Group Capital Income Builder™ (Canada)Dividend investing may have seemed downright dull over the last decade as tech titans dominated market returns, but today, boring is beautiful.With growth slowing and the cost of capital rising, I expect dividends to be a more significant and stable contributor to total return going forward. Dividends accounted for only 16% of total return in the 2010s, but historically the average has hovered around 38%, peaking at 72% during the inflationary 1970s.Expect dividends to account for a larger portion of total returnSource: S&P Dow Jones Indices LLC. 2020s data is from 1/1/20 through 12/31/22. *Total return for the S&P 500 Index was negative for the 2000s. Dividends provided a 1.8% annualized return over the decade. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.I’m finding many dividend opportunities across sectors, including industrials, utilities and health care. Pharmaceutical companies can be attractive in an inflationary environment, as many tend to have strong balance sheets and cash flows and are often able to raise prices even in a highly competitive marketplace. Several leading companies also have a dividend yield above 3%, including AbbVie (3.7% yield, as of December 31, 2022) and Gilead Sciences (3.4%).Go deeper:Dividends: Building resilience in a new market realityU.S. market outlook for 20232. Growth investing will require a new approachMartin Romo, equity portfolio manager, Capital Group U.S. Equity Fund™ (Canada)Growth stocks have come under intense pressure, but for some companies I think the market is throwing the baby out with the bathwater.As a growth investor, it’s essential to differentiate between companies that have reached the end of their runway or are facing stiffer competition with those that are simply in a cyclical slowdown. If you can find companies set to re-accelerate when the economy improves, you may find promising buying opportunities.The pace of innovation around the world is picking up again. Several colleagues and I recently spent a few weeks in Silicon Valley meeting with public companies and venture capital firms, and I came away believing we are at an inflection point with artificial intelligence. Microsoft’s  US$10 billion investment in ChatGPT creator OpenAI is a recent example, but the push to develop innovative uses of AI is happening all around.The pace of adoption of new technologies is acceleratingSource: Statista. As of 12/31/22. Kickstarter refers to number of backers. Airbnb refers to number of nights booked. Foursquare and Instagram refer to number of downloads.This feels like the early days of mobile and cloud as they entered an era of hyper-charged growth. It’s an open-ended opportunity for companies that can leverage the technology to genuinely differentiate their product offerings and deliver enhanced productivity to customers. Despite the challenging environment, I remain excited about the long-term investment opportunities on the horizon.Go deeper:New reality for investors: 5 big trends changing markets3. Nimble multinational companies are becoming global championsJody Jonsson, equity portfolio managerIt may seem like a challenging time to be a global investor, but I think this is when the best companies shine.Investors are concerned about de-globalization and assume it is negative for portfolios. It can be, but changes in trade patterns generally favour global champions — what I call industry-leading multinationals that can adjust to the changing landscape. The COVID-19 crisis shed light on the importance of resilience over efficiency, and companies are responding by establishing redundancies in supply chains. That’s creating opportunities for companies that help build factories and expand supply lines.For example, Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company, the largest pure-play semiconductor maker, plans to build factories in Arizona and Japan and anticipates nearly half of its leading-edge chip production will happen outside of Taiwan in the years ahead. As new facilities are built, Caterpillar, the world’s largest manufacturer of construction equipment, could see increased demand for its products.A new breed of multinational companies has arrivedSources: Capital Group, FactSet, RIMES. Includes all companies within the MSCI ACWI IMI as of 1/31/03 and 12/31/22. Top eight countries as of 12/31/22 are shown.Global stocks should also benefit as two notable headwinds dissipate. It appears that the strong U.S. dollar may have peaked, which would support dollar-based returns of U.S. and international stocks alike. Also, the reopening of China’s economy should boost global economic growth, especially in emerging markets.In the portfolios that I manage, I focus primarily on “supertankers” — dominant companies that generate solid cash flow, enjoy strong competitive moats and have the ability to fund their own growth — in industries such as health care, semiconductors and insurance.Go deeper:International markets outlook for 20235 keys to investing in 20234. Innovation is leading to a golden age of health careDiana Wagner, equity portfolio managerInnovation is at an all-time high in health care. The macro environment may have topped investor concerns over the last year, but innovation is what has ultimately driven long-term value creation.Pharmaceutical companies have invested heavily in drug discovery in recent years and, as a result, deep pipelines of pioneering treatments are being developed to tackle some of the world’s biggest health issues. Eli Lilly and Novo Nordisk, for example, have developed obesity treatments with the potential to reduce body weight by as much as 25%. AstraZeneca has become an oncology leader with advanced therapies for lung, bladder and breast cancer.Gene sequencing is another key innovation with major health and investment implications. In the future, we may be able to pair genetic sequencing with gene-based interventions to deliver personalized, precision medicine. Imagine replacing defective or missing genes with normal, healthy ones. That future is not far off, in my view.I find opportunities in health care services equally exciting. Most doctors in the U.S. operate in a traditional fee-for-service model, getting paid based on volume. But companies like UnitedHealth and Humana are instead rewarding doctors for keeping patients heathy through new payment models. These models seek to achieve the so-called “quadruple aim” in health care — better outcomes, higher patient satisfaction and higher physician satisfaction at a lower cost per capita. Achieving all four is now a real possibility.Go deeper:4 reasons health care could lead the next bull market5. Industrial renaissance could benefit pick-and-shovel companiesCheryl Frank, equity portfolio managerCapEx is on the rise, and it could be setting the stage for an industrial renaissance.I’m paying close attention to how increased capital expenditures will benefit suppliers across industries — what I call pick-and-shovel companies. Investors sometimes overlook these businesses, but they often have more stable cash flows and lower risk profiles compared to the companies they service.Record-breaking cash flow over the last 12 months has left oil producers with some of the strongest balance sheets in history. When energy companies profit, they typically expand exploration and production, which requires more machinery and services. This could be a source of growth for companies that provide technology, products and services to the energy industry.Four trends could contribute to an industrial renaissanceSources: Capital Group, MSCI. Company examples reflect some of the largest constituents (ranked by descending market value) within the MSCI ACWI that fall into GICS sub-industries that supply products and/or services aligned with the factors expected to contribute to capital expenditures listed above. As of 1/17/23.Another interesting trend is how much money has flowed into health care research and development (R&D). Pharmaceutical companies that successfully developed vaccines and anti-viral treatments like Pfizer piled up cash. Much of this capital will likely be funneled into more R&D for companies that support the biopharma industry, such as Danaher and Thermo Fisher Scientific.Go deeper:4 trends could power an industrial renaissanceIs the spike in commodity prices sustainable?6. Reshoring supply chains will create new opportunities across industriesWinnie Kwan, equity portfolio manager, Capital Group Capital Income Builder™ (Canada)Supply chain disruptions during the pandemic and mounting geopolitical tensions prompted many companies to rethink their global sourcing capabilities. The strategy now focuses on balancing efficiency, reliability and security — with the intention to diversify by reshoring and onshoring manufacturing.There’s a common misconception that this trend will displace China as the world’s largest manufacturing base. Rather, many companies are shifting to a “China +1 strategy” by maintaining operations in the country while adding facilities elsewhere. Incremental investments in China will focus primarily on the domestic market, while additional investments in other locations will serve the rest of the world.Southeast Asia, Mexico, India and the United States are some of the top relocation destinations. Companies that facilitate this transition — like Japanese automation enablers or REITs in India — may be well-positioned to take advantage of this trend.Southeast Asia is well-positioned for the rewiring of global supply chainsSource: AmCham Shanghai 2021 China Business Report, published September 22, 2021. Based on a survey of 338 foreign companies doing business in China. Of those companies, 63 said they were redirecting investments from China to other locations, including Southeast Asia, Mexico, India and the United States, among others. Survey respondents could provide multiple responses, so total does not add up to 100%.It could take a decade for companies to fully transition, but the process is certainly underway. I believe it will be one of the more important investment themes of the 2020s.Go deeper:Reshoring supply chains: What it means for investorsChina: What could drive its markets in 2023Supply chain shifts signal reglobalization7. Core bonds can provide strength when equities are weakPramod Atluri, fixed income portfolio managerStrong income opportunities and a potential economic slowdown could make core bonds the star of a well-diversified portfolio.You can’t read the news these days without seeing the word recession. While slowing growth may be a headwind for many asset classes, for core bonds, it’s nirvana. Slowing growth, declining inflation, higher yields and a U.S. Federal Reserve nearing the end of its hiking cycle all add up to a fantastic opportunity for core bond funds to generate mid-single-digit total returns and, once again, provide ballast to a portfolio.The starting yield of core bonds hovers around 4.7% (as measured by the Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, as of December 31, 2022), which is a good indicator of long-term return expectations. As an active manager, I seek to add excess return by managing interest rate sensitivity, sector allocation, security selection and other levers.And if a recession does hit, bringing inflation down faster than expected, further upside is possible. Interest rates would likely decline, leading to meaningful bond price appreciation. For example, a 50-basis-point decline in rates would translate to a roughly 3% gain for core bonds (as described above).Go deeper:Bond market outlook: Prospects brighten as Fed slows hikes8. Credit fundamentals are making a comebackDamien McCann, fixed income portfolio manager, Capital Group Multi-Sector Income Fund™ (Canada)Credit fundamentals may soon be back in the driver’s seat as inflation cools and rate hikes slow.While consistent cash flows and strong balance sheets are always important, they become essential during periods of falling growth when corporate bonds are often impacted unevenly across industries and asset classes. Our analysts are focused on identifying companies that can deftly navigate such an environment.For bond investors, finding companies that are inventing the next big thing is less important than determining if they can meet their debt obligations. For example, established social media companies may be facing stiff competition for younger users, but they are also very creditworthy when measured by profitability, free cash flow and relatively low debt levels.Credit fundamentals vary greatly across individual industries and issuersSource: Bloomberg Index Services Ltd. As of 12/31/22. Represents the top nine industries by market value within the Bloomberg U.S. Corporate Investment Grade Index. Based in USD.Today’s starting yields for higher income bond sectors such as investment grade (BBB/Baa and above), high yield, emerging markets and securitized debt offer attractive entry points for long-term investors. The total return opportunity is also more appealing compared to recent years, as these higher yields may help buffer bond market volatility.Spreads for investment-grade and high-yield corporate bonds may not scream “buy,” but our analysts are finding attractive valuations in select issuers and industries.Go deeper:Securitized credit can be important diversifier9. High-yield bonds are earning their name againShannon Ward, fixed income portfolio manager, Capital Group Multi-Sector Income Fund™ (Canada)At today’s yields, high-yield bonds can provide attractive income to an investor’s portfolio.Yields in the neighbourhood of 8% help provide a buffer against bond market volatility, so the likelihood of earning a positive return is higher. History shows that when high-yield bonds yielded in the 7% to 8% range, the average two-year annualized forward return was 9.2%, and the average three-year annualized forward return was 7.9%.Strong returns typically followed periods of elevated yieldsSource: Bloomberg Index Services Ltd. As of 12/31/22. Yield to worst is the lowest yield that can be realized by either calling or putting on one of the available call/put dates, or holding a bond to maturity. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.While we are aware of the possibility of a contraction, I don’t expect the same level of price volatility in the high-yield market that followed the global financial crisis or the onset of the pandemic. The U.S. high-yield bond market is higher quality now (as defined by credit ratings) with just 11% of bonds rated CCC-or-below (as of December 31, 2022) versus 20% in December 2007.Go deeper:5 reasons to invest in high yield10. 60/40 portfolios are alive and wellHilda Applbaum, equity portfolio manager, Capital Group Global Balanced Fund™ (Canada)Ask your favourite search engine, “Is the 60/40 portfolio dead?” and it will generate about half a million results. Such skepticism is understandable following a year in which stocks and bonds both declined for the first time in decades. Despite the poor year, I believe the concept of a well-balanced portfolio — whether a 60/40 or 65/35 equity/fixed income split — is indeed alive and well.For the first time in years, it’s possible to seek total returns in the high single digits by investing in core bonds and proven dividend-paying stocks without taking undue risk or reaching for yield. With the yield on the Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index currently above 4%, many core bonds can provide a consistent return in the mid-single digits. That’s something we haven’t seen since 2008. Investors who are comfortable taking a little more risk by including investment-grade and high-yield corporate bonds can look for their bond portfolios to potentially contribute even more.Companies that pay a dividend can contribute to an attractive return picture with yields north of 3% and the potential for capital appreciation. For example, Broadcom has raised its dividend 12 consecutive years and had a 3.3% yield (as of December 31, 2022).A balanced portfolio would have outpaced other strategies over the past 15 yearsSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., FTSE Russell, ICE Benchmark Administration Ltd., MSCI, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor’s. As of 12/31/22. “Buy the dip” strategy represents buying the prior year’s worst performing asset class every year. “Ride the wave” strategy represents buying the prior year’s best performing asset class every year. ""Balanced portfolio"" strategy represents maintaining a 60/40 split between U.S. large cap stocks and U.S. aggregate bonds. Asset classes included in the analysis: cash (Bloomberg 1–3 Months U.S. Treasury Bill Index), developed international stocks (MSCI EAFE Index), emerging markets stocks (MSCI Emerging Markets Index), foreign bonds (Bloomberg Global Aggregate Index), global commodities (S&P GSCI), gold (LBMA Gold), U.S. equity REITs (FTSE USA REIT), U.S. high-yield bonds (Bloomberg U.S. Corporate High Yield Index), U.S. aggregate bonds (Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Index), U.S. large cap stocks (S&P 500 Index), U.S. small cap stocks (Russell 2000), U.S. taxable municipal bonds (Bloomberg Taxable Municipal Bond Index). This assumes the portfolios are rebalanced annually. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Based in USD.Traditional asset allocation is not a broken or failed strategy. It will always make sense to think about balance, diversification and risk. A one-size-fits-all approach doesn’t work for every investor. It’s about building portfolios from the bottom up that align with investor goals.Go deeper:3 reasons why 60/40 portfolios may make a comebackWhat’s not changing? The importance of long-term investingAndrew Suzman, equity portfolio managerMy colleagues may be able to look at the future and imagine new products and emerging trends, but the investment theme closest to my heart is one that doesn’t change. Despite all the transformations in the world, I believe the nature of my job and focus as a portfolio manager will continue to be exactly the same.In 2023, just as we did in 2013 and 2003, we will come upon individual companies that do interesting things. We’ll try to buy them at reasonable prices and hold them so that any returns we see may be better than if we were to buy every company. That is my true north.Some companies will get it right, and some will get it wrong. Our job is to find those most likely to get it right and create wealth over time so that our investors may benefit. Not that we’ll be perfect, but I’m optimistic that we can get more companies right than wrong and continue to add value for our clients.",Long-Term Investing
Reshoring supply chains: What does it mean for investors?,2023-02-09T01:06:00,"Of all the lessons learned during the pandemic — wash your hands thoroughly, avoid crowded elevators, working from home can be productive — perhaps the most consequential lesson for companies is now obvious in hindsight: Relying on single links in the global supply chain was a mistake.Major components of the supply chain fractured during the COVID-19 crisis, resulting in shortages of everything from medical supplies and equipment to furniture and auto parts. Geopolitical events also entered the fray as U.S.-China tensions and Russia’s invasion of Ukraine underscored the risks of relying too much on one place for critical supplies, including energy, food and computer chips.“With the rapid spread of globalization over the past few decades, companies moved their manufacturing operations to the cheapest and most efficient countries,” says equity portfolio manager Julian Abdey.“That was great for company profits and consumer prices,” he continues. “But what we found out more recently is that when supply chains get disrupted it can cause real problems. For example, Europe has realized it was too dependent on Russia for natural gas. And I think the same is true for other products like computer chips. The world is too dependent on Asia, and Taiwan in particular, for semiconductors.”Reshoring replaces offshoringFast forward to 2023, and many companies — in some cases spurred by massive government subsidies — are taking big steps to diversify their supply chains, focusing on reliability and robustness over cost and efficiency. That means bringing some manufacturing back home, or “reshoring” and moving some of it to other countries.The trend has raised questions about whether the world is moving into a period of de-globalization. However, based on trade activity in recent years, the new path looks more like a measured adjustment to global supply chains, partially interrupted by the pandemic and the 2007–2009 financial crisis.Globalization marches on — at a different paceSources: Capital Group, Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD), World Bank. World trade is calculated as the sum of exports and imports of goods and services, and is represented above as a share of global gross domestic product. Trade data as of 2021.“When we talk to companies and look at the data, we are not seeing what I would call de-globalization,” says equity portfolio manager Rob Lovelace. “I think it would be more accurate to call it a rewiring of global supply chains. And I don’t think it’s really all that dramatic when you consider the rapid growth of digital trade, which is harder to track using traditional metrics, as opposed to physical trade.”In fact, there is ample evidence that many companies are becoming more global as they seek to create redundant supply chains. The poster child for this development is Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company, or TSMC, the world’s largest semiconductor foundry. To expand its global reach, TSMC is building new manufacturing plants in Arizona and Japan. Semiconductors have become such a sensitive issue, given their use in the defence industry, that the U.S. government has placed aggressive restrictions on where and how they can be exported.Other examples abound in the tech sector and elsewhere. Apple announced in September that it would start producing the iPhone 14 in India, adding to its manufacturing capabilities in China, the Czech Republic and South Korea among others. In the auto sector, Tesla added to its U.S. and China manufacturing hubs last year by opening its first European outpost in Gruenheide, Germany.In the energy sector, Texas-based ECV Holdings has announced plans to build a power plant for industrial parks near Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam, supplied primarily by U.S. liquified natural gas. Meanwhile, the list of U.S. companies establishing new manufacturing plants at home has grown dramatically in recent years to include General Motors, Intel and U.S. Steel — fueling hopes of an American industrial renaissance.The China+1 strategyAmid this drive to diversify supply chains, a common misconception is that China may be displaced as the world’s largest manufacturing base. Rather, many companies are shifting to a “China+1 strategy” by maintaining operations in China while adding new facilities elsewhere, says Winnie Kwan, a portfolio manager with Capital Group Capital Income Builder™ (Canada). Incremental investments in China are likely to focus on serving mainly the domestic market, she notes, while additional investments in other locations cater to the rest of the world.“A key question is whether the China+1 strategy will be scalable or not,” Kwan says. “Can you add a new plant in India or Mexico, for example, and scale up production as needed? Is the labour and power supply sufficient? Is logistics infrastructure in place? Can management handle the added complexity? Those are the questions I am focusing on as we research these developments and look for investment opportunities. Not every company is going to get it right.”Indeed, the flow of incremental investments is an important metric for investors to track. According to a 2021 survey of foreign companies doing business in China conducted by AmCham Shanghai, the top destinations for redirected investments were Southeast Asia, Mexico, India and the United States. However, only 63 of the 338 companies surveyed said they had such plans, which suggests the process of reshoring may be slower and more deliberate than some market participants are expecting.“It could take a decade for companies to fully transition,” she adds. “But the process has certainly started, and I think it will be one of the more important investment themes of the 2020s.”Southeast Asia is well-positioned for the rewiring of global supply chainsSource: AmCham Shanghai 2021 China Business Report, published September 22, 2021. Based on a survey of 338 foreign companies doing business in China. Of those companies, 63 said they were redirecting investments from China to other locations, including Southeast Asia, Mexico, India and the United States, among others.Who benefits from reshoring?With such a large undertaking, the investment implications are widespread across a number of sectors and geographies. Here are four areas expected to benefit from reshoring in the years ahead.1. IndiaThanks to its proximity to China, a well-educated labour force, and a fast-growing, business-friendly economy, India may be the best-positioned country to capitalize on supply chain diversification. India’s government has taken bold steps to encourage the expansion of manufacturing operations, particularly in the smartphone space, where Apple works with contractors such as Foxconn to build the latest iPhones. The manufacturing sector is expected to accelerate over the next decade, driving growth in the Indian economy and boosting other industries such as banking, energy and telecommunications.“India is arguably better positioned today than China was 20 years ago,” says Capital Group equity analyst Johnny Chan.2. MexicoSimilar to India, Mexico’s proximity to one of the world’s largest economies makes it an attractive base for expanded manufacturing and logistics operations. Many U.S. companies flocked there in the 1990s after the adoption of the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA). That process has only accelerated under a revamped trade deal, the U.S./Mexico/Canada Agreement (USMCA), ratified in 2020.Mexico’s annual exports to the U.S. have increased sharply in recent years. Although much of that is due to the influence of American companies, China is also ramping up in Mexico. For example, Hisense Group, one of China’s largest appliance makers, is currently building a US$260 million industrial park in Monterrey, aiming to produce refrigerators, washing machines and air conditioners for the U.S. market. In the auto sector, BMW and Nissan have also recently expanded their capabilities south of the border.3. Automation providersOne of the biggest hurdles to diversifying the world’s manufacturing capabilities is a chronic labour shortage, especially in developed economies. Automation powered by artificial intelligence (AI) is likely to provide an answer to this problem, says equity portfolio manager Mark Casey. Many Asian countries are setting the trend with high rates of industrial automation, with the U.S. and Europe expected to follow. Both regions have room to grow, proving a bright outlook for top companies in the global robotics industry, including Japan’s Keyence, France’s Schneider Electric and Switzerland’s ABB Ltd. Amazon is also developing its own impressive AI-driven technology, Casey notes.“Amazon has a new robotic picking-and-packing device called Sparrow that can grab more than 60 million different products and pack them into shipping boxes — completing each pick in a matter of seconds,” Casey says. “Just seven years ago Amazon’s experimental robots could handle only a small number of items, and each pick would take a couple minutes. I think this sort of technology is coming along sooner than we think, and I don’t see it accounted for in the stock prices of any major American or European company.”Automation, powered by smart robots, is ready for takeoffSources: Capital Group, International Federation of Robotics. As of 20224. MultinationalsAlthough it may seem counterintuitive, the same multinational companies that benefited most from the rapid pace of globalization in the past may be best equipped to navigate the brave new world of re-globalization, says equity portfolio manager Jody Jonsson. The world’s largest and most dominant companies rose to that position for a reason— they often have the experience and resources to adapt to changing trade patterns better than smaller companies operating in single markets.“In my view, well-managed multinational companies will remain global in their production facilities and customer bases, but they will increasingly build more local redundancy into their operations,” Jonsson says. “I call it ‘multilocalization.’ That includes bringing some parts of the supply chain back to the U.S., continuing to outsource other parts and establishing new production facilities in key areas throughout the world.“If there is one lesson we’ve learned from the COVID crisis, it’s that companies must have diverse supply chains,” she adds. “We aren’t there yet, but the process is well underway.”",Trade
5 keys to investing in 2023,2023-01-05T11:07:00,"Investors are more than ready to turn the page on a turbulent 2022 — an unprecedented year in most of our lives. Inflation soared. Central banks aggressively increased interest rates, reversing a 40-year cycle of falling rates. Asset prices tumbled, and war broke out in Ukraine.What’s next for 2023? Heading into the new year, inflation remains elevated, the war in Ukraine drags on, and with recession looming in the U.S. and abroad, investors will likely see additional market volatility. Some of these developments are seismic shifts that will likely reshape the investment landscape for years to come.The new year no doubt will bring its own unique set of opportunities. Whichever way the wind blows, here are five key actions investors can take to help them stay on track and navigate the challenges that lie ahead.1. Make dividends a bigger part of your portfolioDuring the recent bull market, investors had to get one thing right: Recognize that leading U.S. internet companies with strong growth potential could generate the greatest returns.In today’s more volatile markets, with the cost of capital rising and investors less eager to pay up for high-multiple growth stocks, dividends are getting more attention. “We are at the start of what I expect will be a renewed and durable appreciation of the role dividends can play in investor portfolios,” says Caroline Randall, a portfolio manager with Capital Group Capital Income BuilderTM(Canada). “Going forward, dividends should be a more significant and stable contributor to total returns.”While dividends accounted for a slim 16% of total return for the S&P 500 Index in the 2010s, historically they have contributed 38% on average, in U.S. dollar terms. In the inflationary 1970s they climbed to more than 70%. “When you expect growth in the single digits, dividends can give you a head start,” Randall adds. “They may also offer a measure of downside protection when volatility rises.”Dividends have historically been a larger percentage of total returnSource: S&P Dow Jones Indices LLC. 2020s data is from 1/1/20 through 11/30/22. *Total return for the S&P 500 Index was negative for the 2000s. Dividends provided a 1.8% annualized return over the decade. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.Of course, not all dividends are created equal. During the pandemic, for example, many companies reduced or eliminated dividend payments. That is why it is essential to understand the sustainability of dividends and invest selectively, Randall notes. “I closely scrutinize company management actions to gauge how committed they are to maintaining and growing dividends over time.”Companies that have paid steady and above-market dividends can be found across the financial, energy, materials and health care sectors, among others. For example, UnitedHealth Group, the largest private provider of managed health care in the U.S., has grown its dividend and likely will continue to do so even in a tougher economy, Randall says.In many markets outside the U.S., dividends have historically made up an even bigger part of the investment landscape. As of October 31, 2022, about 600 companies headquartered in international and emerging markets, as measured by the MSCI All Country World ex USA Index offered hefty dividend yields between 3% and 6%, compared to only 121 in the United States.Go deeper:U.S. market outlook for 2023Dividends: Building resilience in a new market reality2. Seek more from your international stocksFor years, maintaining sizable investments in international stocks has required patience and a strong stomach. After all, returns for non-U.S. markets have persistently lagged the U.S. amid waves of disappointing economic and geopolitical developments.A look at news headlines suggests more of the same in 2023. A strong U.S. dollar, the war in Ukraine, and weak economies in Europe, Japan and emerging markets have created a cloudy near-term outlook.That said, in many cases much of this news is priced into markets, explains equity portfolio manager Andrew Suzman. “Strong global businesses in Europe and Asia are trading at what I believe are compelling valuations. If the news simply gets less bad, shares for many of them could rebound.”Investors would also do well to remember that there’s a difference between top-down macroeconomic conditions and the fundamental, bottom-up prospects for individual companies. Now more than ever, company-specific developments are driving returns outside the U.S., placing added importance on rigorous investment research and individual stock picking.Company-specific factors have had a large and growing impact on returnsSource: Empirical Research Partners. As of 9/30/22. Analysis provided by Empirical Research Partners using their developed market and emerging market stock universes that approximate the MSCI World Index and MSCI Emerging Markets Index, respectively. Data shows the percentage of market returns that can be attributed to various factors over time, using a two-year smoothed average. A smoothed moving average is a method of reducing short-term fluctuations in data and is calculated by using a weighted average of values (based on the entire period) applied over a specified period of time (in this case two years) on a rolling basis. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.For many multinational companies headquartered in struggling economic areas, national conditions often have little or no impact on revenues, except perhaps when it comes to regulation and taxes.Consider, for example, Italian luxury eyewear maker EssilorLuxottica. “This is an Italian company, but it sells eyewear in the U.S., Asia and across Europe,” Suzman says. “Its prospects have little to do with the Italian economy and a lot to do with global demand for luxury goods.” Similarly, interest in European aircraft maker Airbus has more to do with travel demand in the U.S. and China.Likewise in emerging markets, interest in Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company reflects the universal demand for computer chips, according to Gerald Du Manoir, portfolio manager for Capital Group International Equity FundTM(Canada). “Granted, the outlook for some economies doesn’t look too compelling, but I feel confident that we can still find promising companies in Europe, Japan and emerging markets.”Go deeper:International markets outlook for 2023Can international equities overcome a strong dollar?3. Strengthen your core bond portfolioIn 2022, core bond portfolios failed to do what was expected: fulfill their traditional role as a ballast against market volatility. In a year when global stocks slid 14.5% in U.S. dollar terms, investment-grade bonds (BBB/Baa and above) declined 12.8%.It is understandable if investors are disappointed, but outcomes like this have been rare. In fact, last year was the only time in the past 45 years that stocks and bonds fell in tandem. The conditions that led to this outcome also have been rare. At a time when rates were near or below zero, the U.S. Federal Reserve and other major central banks initiated a series of aggressive rate hikes to tamp down inflation.Stocks and bonds have rarely declined in tandemSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., MSCI. Returns above reflect annual total returns in USD for all years except 2022, which reflect the year-to-date total return for both indices. As of 11/30/2022. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.That should change in 2023. Inflation has already shown signs of slowing. At its December meeting, the Fed moderated its approach and lifted rates by just a half percentage point to a range of 4.25% to 4.50%. But officials underscored that they will continue to raise rates, with the potential to go above 5% next year. Further evidence of slower inflation or slowing growth could allow the Fed to further slow or pause its rate hikes.“I believe we are close to that point,” says Pramod Atluri, fixed income portfolio manager. “Once the Fed eases, high-quality bonds should again offer relative stability and greater income.”Core bond allocations should generally have a place in diversified portfolios, but they become more important as recession concerns take centre stage. “I am seeing more opportunities now that bonds have repriced lower,” Atluri says. “Valuations are attractive, so I am selectively adding corporate credit. Bonds now offer a much healthier income stream, which should help offset any price declines.”Go deeper:Bond market outlook: Prospects brighten as Fed slows hikes4. Tap into credit markets for higher incomeThere is an upside to the painful bond market losses of 2022. Declining bond prices set the stage for higher income going forward.The yield on the benchmark 10-year U.S. Treasury was 3.88% on December 30, 2022, versus a yield of 1.51% on December 31, 2021. Yields, which rise when bond prices fall, have soared across sectors. Over time, income should increase since the total return of a bond fund consists of price changes and interest paid, and the interest component is higher.Yields have soared across asset classesSources: Bloomberg, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., JPMorgan, Bank of Canada. As of 11/30/22. Sector yields above include Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, Bloomberg U.S. Corporate Investment Grade Index, Bloomberg U.S. Corporate High Yield Index, 50% J.P. Morgan EMBI Global Diversified Index/50% J.P. Morgan GBI-EM Global Diversified Index blend. Period of time considered from 2020 to present. Dates for recent lows from top to bottom in chart shown are: 8/4/20, 12/31/20, 7/6/21, 1/4/21 and 8/4/20. Yields shown are yield to worst. Yield to worst is the lowest yield that can be realized by either calling or putting on one of the available call/put dates or holding a bond to maturity. ""Change"" figures may not reconcile due to rounding.With investors better compensated for holding relatively stable bonds, the question of whether to invest in riskier corporate or high-yield bonds ahead of a potential recession is an important one.One surprising element has been the resilience of consumers. Despite gloomy headlines, consumers continue to open their wallets. Consumer spending accounts for roughly 70% of the economy, and spending has been relatively resilient despite high inflation.“This has helped keep corporate balance sheets in pretty good shape,” says Damien McCann, portfolio manager for Capital Group Multi-Sector Income FundTM(Canada).The reward potential for corporate investment-grade bonds at current levels is enticing, but many are vulnerable in a downturn. “I expect credit quality to weaken as the economy slows. In that environment, I prefer defensive sectors such as health care over homebuilders and retail,” McCann adds.Go deeper:Rising yields put bond market back on a road to normal5. Don’t sit on the sidelinesA steady drumbeat of bad news can be discouraging to even the most seasoned investors.But well-managed companies adjust to shifting conditions, and ultimately the best companies have learned to thrive in the new reality. Markets themselves have a history of adjusting to setbacks. Indeed, stock markets historically have recovered before a recession ends, anticipating a better future ahead. If history is a guide, they could rebound about six months before the economy does.What is important for investors is to stick with their long-term investment plans. Abrupt and dramatic change often triggers powerful emotions that can lead to impulsive action, like moving cash to the sidelines. From May 2022 through the end of the year, investors shifted about US$160 billion into U.S. money market funds, according to the Office of Financial Research. But taking your money out of the market on the way down means that if you don’t get back in at exactly the right time, you can’t capture the full benefit of a recovery.Missing just a few of the market’s best days can hurt investment returnsSources:Capital Group, MSCI, RIMES. As of 12/31/21. MSCI returns above reflect total returns, including the impact of reinvested dividends. Returns are in USD.Even missing a few trading days can take a toll. Consider an example of a hypothetical US$1,000 investment in the MSCI ACWI from January 1, 2012, to December 31, 2021. An investment for the full period would have grown to US$3,065. But missing even the 10 best days of the subsequent 10 years would have significantly hurt long-term results — and the more missed “good” days, the more missed opportunities.The strongest gains have often occurred immediately after a bottom. Therefore, waiting on the sidelines for an economic turnaround is not a recommended strategy.“No one will blow a bugle to give the all-clear signal,” Suzman adds. “So I am looking beyond the near-term challenges and seeking companies that I believe represent good value over the next few years. After major moves in the stock market, it could be time to review your portfolio to ensure it is well-diversified, reflects the right level of risk and is aligned with your investment objectives.Go deeper:New reality for investors: 5 big trends changing marketsGuide to current markets and client concerns",Markets & Economy
The economy in 2023: Where we differ from market consensus,2022-12-28T10:45:00,"The wisdom of crowds can be powerful. But in times of heightened uncertainty, it can be helpful to understand potential risks.At the moment, markets appear to be crystallizing around a hopeful outlook for 2023. Asset prices suggest inflation will begin to subside quickly, the U.S. Federal Reserve will become less hawkish and global growth won’t be much weaker than it is this year.However, monetary policy is fluid, geopolitical uncertainty is high and strong labour markets are being offset by weakness in housing and other areas. Together, this allows for a range of possible outcomes.There are four contrarian scenarios in which our economists think current market consensus, as reflected in asset prices, may not be the most probable outcome. Jared Franz says the Fed will keep rates higher for longer, yet when the economy recovers, it will be stronger than prior rebounds. Meanwhile, Robert Lind argues that European policymakers will likely run looser fiscal policies and tolerate higher inflation. Stephen Green says the Chinese consumer will take time to rebound, and currency analyst Jens Søndergaard warns it’s too early to call for the end of the U.S. dollar’s bull run.The views are those of the economist stated, and the views of individual portfolio managers and analysts may differ.1. The Fed will keep rates higher for longerJared Franz,U.S. economistCurrent inflation dynamics are going to keep the heat on the U.S. Federal Reserve to raise rates more if it’s really serious about not repeating the mistakes of the 1960s and 1970s. Beyond the expected 50 basis point rate hike at the Fed’s December policy meeting, the market doesn’t think the central bank will ultimately go beyond 5%. Plus, the consensus view on U.S. gross domestic product (GDP), although more tempered of late, still calls for something close to a soft landing next year. In contrast, I believe the U.S. economy is likely to slip into a mild recession, contracting by about 2%.While the U.S. consumer price index — the main inflation gauge in the United States — has probably peaked, it’s not falling back to 2% anytime soon. Price pressures have migrated from the goods sector to services, where inflation tends to be structurally stickier. This means it will take time and effort to get those prices to cool down.In addition, the labour market keeps chugging along with solid job and wage growth. It looks to me like wages could stay higher even through a recession. The U.S. labour force is getting older, and the labour participation rate decline seen during the pandemic shows few signs of rebounding.U.S. market expects the Fed to stop hiking at 5%Sources: Capital Group, U.S. Federal Reserve, FactSet. Data as of December 7, 2022.Given these pressures, there is a real risk the Fed raises rates beyond 5%. I also don’t see a Fed pivot (rate cuts back down to 3% or 2%) unless the recession turns severe or financial markets show signs of breaking.The Fed could stop raising rates at or below 5% in response to economic weakness. However, I see a decision to stop hiking sooner resulting in elevated rates for an even longer period.Adding to my view that the Fed will stay higher for longer, I believe this recovery could be stronger than the past two recessions. The U.S. could be at the start of a strong capital spending cycle as manufacturing is reshored and supply chains are realigned over the next decade. Energy security and greater defence spending will also require greater investment in the years ahead.Thanks to the tight labour market, consumers could find themselves in better shape than they normally are at the end of a recession. As a result, consumer spending could pick up more quickly than typical.2. European inflation pressures will persistRobert Lind,Europe economistAccording to the Bloomberg consensus, European economists are expecting consumer-price inflation to slow from the recent year-over-year pace of 10% to 3.5% by the end of 2023, and close to 2% in 2024. But I’m skeptical inflation will fall quickly back to target for three reasons.First, I anticipate more persistent upward pressure on energy prices as Europe diversifies away from Russian oil and gas over the next few years. This move will likely result in a significant negative supply shock, effectively raising costs throughout the economy over a sustained period. This is likely to worsen the tradeoff between inflation and economic growth.Second, I believe economic policymakers will tolerate higher inflation as the economy adjusts to a sharp decline in real incomes. The alternative for governments and central banks would be to drive economies into an even deeper recession next year. Given the sociopolitical pressures this would create, I think it’s more likely European governments will run looser fiscal policy to support their economies, which central banks will accommodate, effectively accepting higher inflation so long as inflation dynamics don’t become unstable, as they did in the 1970s.Third, I believe workers and companies have become more willing to accept price and wage increases, which will sustain inflationary pressures. Unions are pushing to grow wages in line with inflation in an environment of persistent labour shortages. Companies seem willing to concede some ground on wages, but they are looking to raise prices to address higher wages and other costs. This is a profound shift in behaviour.Headline inflation should peak over the next three to six months in the major European economies, but I expect only a gradual drop in inflation rates in 2023 and 2024. The European Central Bank and the Bank of England will continue to tighten policy in the short term, but they will face an increasingly challenging task of balancing above-target inflation against signs of more economic weakness.3. China’s economy won’t see a strong reboundStephen Green,Asia economistI’ve penciled in between 3% and 4% real GDP growth for China in 2023 compared with the International Monetary Fund’s 2023 4.4% forecast. Even so, I expect the drag from zero-COVID restrictions will lessen, the housing market will bottom and China’s economy will get a modest lift from infrastructure spending.It’s worth considering nominal GDP as well. Recent history shows China’s nominal GDP and earnings growth move together closely. The economic slowdown this year will contribute to weaker earnings growth. In 2023, I’m expecting 2.5% inflation, which puts my 2023 nominal growth expectation closer to 6%. This implies a modest improvement in year-over-year earnings, although some of this may be discounted in equity prices already. China’s economy and earnings could fall short next year and may not be able to spark a strong equity market recovery.China’s growth and corporate earnings could disappointSources: Capital Group, National Bureau of Statistics of China. Data as of December 7, 2022. ma = moving average. China A-shares are listed mainland China companies that trade on the Shanghai Stock Exchange and Shenzhen Stock Exchange.China will be challenged by a potential contraction in exports as well as the slump in the housing sector. In recent years, the property market has accounted both directly and indirectly for approximately 25% of the country’s GDP.The earlier-than-expected U-turn in Beijing’s zero-COVID policy could stimulate at least a moderate rebound in consumer spending next year. However, the scale will depend on falling unemployment, which I expect to be slow. Household income, wage growth and borrowing have been weak, while consumer confidence is still low, and unemployment numbers are elevated. Obviously zero-COVID policies weigh heavily on consumer confidence, but wage growth is an important driver of consumption.The question is now how bad the winter COVID wave gets. Local governments will likely reintroduce some restrictions to help flatten the curve. Barring a health crisis with significant loss of life, I believe day-to-day activity in China can get close to normal by next spring. Even so, I don’t see economic growth reaching market expectations.4. The U.S. dollar’s imminent demise is unlikelyJens Søndergaard,currency analystThe recent U.S. dollar (USD) weakness looks more like a bear market rally or head fake to me. So far in the fourth quarter, the dollar has weakened 7% against the euro and 6% against the yen, even though real rates in the bond market have not changed significantly. This tells me the bond market is not buying the more hopeful story (a Fed policy pivot, more China stimulus, better news from the Russia-Ukraine war) reflected in equity and currency markets.U.S. interest rates don’t support the U.S. dollar’s recent retreatSources: Capital Group, J.P. Morgan, Bloomberg. Data as of December 6, 2022. Real interest rate difference is 10-year real interest rates of the U.S. minus the real rates of a developed market basket comprising Germany, Japan and the U.K.I think the bond market stays rightfully focused on what’s been driving dollar movement in recent years: interest rate differentials. For me to believe the dollar’s persistent strength is nearing an end, I need to see a substantial change in both U.S. and non-U.S. real rates. The spread needs to compress. This is not happening yet.It’s possible that U.S. Treasury 10-year real yields have peaked already. If so, it could remove an important USD support to the extent that a change in yields, rather than the absolute yield level, drives currency moves.As and when the dollar starts to lose some of its relative value, it could be especially pronounced against emerging markets (EM) currencies. Many EM central banks got a head start on hiking interest rates and have been more aggressive than their major developed market counterparts. As a result, EM real interest rates look more attractive relative to developed markets. But I think that is at least a year away. Despite the stronger fundamentals, a period of higher inflation and slower global economic growth is unlikely to be supportive of EM currencies.",Markets & Economy
"""Courage! We have been here before""",2022-11-16T11:12:00,"It’s déjà vu all over again. With inflation higher than it has been since the 1970s, interest rates rising and the economy slowing, many have grown fearful of investing.The last time it felt this way was the start of the COVID-19 pandemic. I remember sharing with my colleagues a classic speech from former Capital Group chairman Jim Fullerton. This speech, delivered in November 1974 amid a prolonged bear market, provided us with much-needed historical perspective and a dose of optimism when it was in short supply.The “Fullerton letter” as it has come to be known, has been recirculated among Capital Group’s investment team at least five times in my career. My former colleague, retired equity portfolio manager Claudia Huntington, shared it in 1987, saying, “I have been saving this speech, one of my favorites, for a time like today.”I think it’s been shared so often because Jim captured so well what we all know: It is always darkest before the dawn. Over time, and in time, the financial markets have demonstrated a remarkable ability to anticipate a better tomorrow even when today’s news feels so bad.The stock market has overcome past bear markets and unsettling newsSources: RIMES, Standard & Poor’s. As of October 31, 2022. Chart shown on a logarithmic scale. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.We are once again in uncertain territory. It feels scary and terrible. It is exactly those feelings that make this speech so timeless. It’s precisely when the backdrop has looked so difficult that the markets have begun to recover. It’s hard to know when that turn will happen this cycle. But, based on prior experiences the market will turn eventually — and that should provide some solace.In November 1974, few people thought it was a good time to invest. The Dow had lost more than 40% from its high in January 1973. In his letter, Fullerton recalled an even darker period in our nation’s history — April 1942. His remarks follow, andyou can download a copy of the letter“We have been here before”One significant reason why there is such an extreme degree of bearishness, pessimism, bewildering confusion, and sheer terror in the minds of brokers and investors alike right now, is that most people today have nothing in their own experience that they can relate to that is similar to this market decline.My message to you, therefore, is: “Courage! We have been here before. Bear markets have lasted this long before. Well-managed mutual funds have gone down this much before. And shareholders in those funds and we the industry survived and prospered.”I don’t know if we have seen the absolute bottom of this prolonged bear market, (although I think we’ve seen the lows for a lot of individual stocks).Each economic, market and financial crisis is different from previous ones. But in their very difference, there is commonality. Namely, each crisis is characterized by its own new set of nonrecurring factors, its own set of apparently insoluble problems and its own set of apparently logical reasons for well-founded pessimism about the future.Today there are thoughtful, experienced, respected economists, bankers, investors and businessmen who can give you well-reasoned, logical, documented arguments why this bear market is different; why this time the economic problems are different; why this time things are going to get worse — and hence, why this is not a good time to invest in common stocks, even though they may appear low.Today people are saying: “There are so many bewildering uncertainties, and so many enormous problems still facing us — both long and short term — that there is no hope for more than an occasional rally until some of these uncertainties are cleared up. This is a whole new ballgame.”A whole new ballgameIn 1942 everybody knew it was a whole new ballgame. And it sure as hell was. Uncertainties? We were all in a war that we were losing. The Germans had overrun France. The British had been thrown out of Dunkirk. The Pacific Fleet had been disastrously crippled at Pearl Harbor. We had surrendered Bataan, and the British had surrendered Singapore. The U.S. was so ill-prepared for a war that the cavalry school at Fort Riley was still teaching equitation, and I would guess that probably 75% of our field artillery was equipped with horse-drawn, French 75mm guns, Model 1897 (including the battalion in which I was then serving).In April 1942, inflation was rampant. A Federal Reserve bulletin stated: “General price increases have become a grave threat to the efficient production of war materials and to the stability of the national economy.”Today there is concern about the slump in housing construction. On April 8, 1942, the lead article in the Journal was: “Home construction. Total far behind last year’s; new curbs this week to cut further … Private builders hard hit.”Today almost every financial journal or investment letter carries a list of reasons why investors are standing on the sidelines. They usually include (1) continued inflation; (2) illiquidity in the banking system; (3) shortage of energy; (4) possibility of further outbreak of hostilities in the Middle East; and (5) high interest rates. These are serious problems.But on Saturday, April 11, 1942 (remember when the exchanges were open on Saturday?), The Wall Street Journal stated: “Brokers are certain that among the factors that are depressing potential investors are, (1) widening defeats of the United Nations; (2) a new German drive on Libya; (3) doubts concerning Russia’s ability to hold when the Germans get ready for a full-dress attack; (4) the ocean transport situation with the United Nations, which has become more critical; and (5) Washington is again considering either more drastic rationing with price fixing or still higher taxes as a means of filling the ‘inflationary gap’ between increased public buying power and the diminishing supply of consumer goods.” (Virtually all of these concerns were realized and got worse.)On the same day, discussing the slow price erosion of many groups of stocks, a leading stock market commentator said: “The market remains in the dark as to just what it has to discount. And as yet, signs are still lacking that the market has reached permanently solid ground for a sustained reversal.”Yet on April 28, 1942, in that gloomy environment, in the midst of a war we were losing, faced with excess profits taxes and wage and price controls, shortages of gasoline and rubber and other crucial materials, and with the virtual certainty in the minds of everyone that once the war was over we’d face a post-war depression in that environment, the market turned around.A return to realityWhat turned the market around in April of 1942?Simply a return to reality. Simply a slow but growing recognition that despite all the bad news, despite all the gloomy outlook, the United States was going to survive, that strongly financed, well-managed U.S. corporations were going to survive also. The reality was that those companies were far more valuable than the prices of their stocks indicated. So, on Wednesday, April 29, 1942, for no apparent visible reason, investors again began to recognize reality.The Dow Jones Industrial Average is not reality. Reality is not price-to-earnings ratios and technical market studies. Symbols on the tape are not the real world. In the real world, companies create wealth. Stock certificates don’t. Stock certificates are simply proxies for reality.Now I’d like to close with this:“Some people say they want to wait for a clearer view of the future. But when the future is again clear, the present bargains will have vanished. In fact, does anyone think that today’s prices will prevail once full confidence has been restored?”That comment was made 42 years ago by Dean Witter in May of 1932 — only a few weeks before the end of the worst bear market in history.Have courage! We have been here before — and we’ve survived and prospered.",Market Volatility
New reality for investors: 5 big trends changing markets,2022-11-02T04:28:00,"There’s a new reality taking shape in global markets.Commentators have in the last few months mostly focused on a rotation from growth to value, but I think that view is too simplistic. I see many shifts happening simultaneously that could likely define the next decade in markets around the world.Many investors are expecting a return to normal after inflation subsides and central banks stop raising rates. But I believe the world is undergoing significant changes and that investors will need to reset their expectations about how a typical investing environment will look. Here are five seismic shifts happening in economies and markets right now, as well as the long-term investment implications of each:1. From falling rates to rising rates and higher inflationThe market is grappling with a macro environment it hasn’t seen in a long time. Inflation is its highest since the early 1980s. And until recently we've had 40 years of declining interest rates. That’s longer than most investment managers’ careers, if not lifetimes. That’s part of the reason we see a market struggling to adjust to this new reality.Is this the end of a 40-year disinflation cycle?Sources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream. As of 10/26/22.It’s easy to assume these are market dislocations that will quickly reverse — bond markets are currently pricing a return to 2% inflation within two years, for example. But these cycles often last much longer than people anticipate, and there is reason to believe higher inflation is structural and likely to persist.In this new environment I’m especially cautious of highly levered companies, or those raising new debt. Money isn’t “free” anymore, so a larger slice of earnings will go to service debt. Companies with the ability to fund their own growth as well as those with strong pricing power and dependable cash flows will remain attractive in a high-inflation, higher-cost-of-capital world.2. From narrow to broader market leadershipI think we're going to be in a much less narrowly concentrated market going forward. The last decade was dominated by a handful of tech stocks that you basically had to own to keep up with the market. I don't think that's going to be the case anymore.I expect opportunities to arise from a variety of companies, industries and geographies. Well-managed companies beyond the tech sector may have their chance to shine again.For example, e-commerce companies have gone from being the disruptors to being challenged themselves. They’re often very low margin and expensive to scale with difficult delivery logistics to manage. Very few have done it well. Some traditional retailers that have combined the benefits of brick-and-mortar stores with a compelling online shopping experience are starting to take share from pure e-commerce companies.Market leaders are becoming less concentratedSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's. As of September 30, 2022. Indexed to 100 as of 1/1/05.After the market’s dive in 2020, I expected leadership to broaden, and it has done so. In my view, this is a healthy development and supports why I have been trying to de-concentrate my own portfolios. In theory, it should be a positive backdrop for stock pickers over indexers.3. From digital to physical assetsThe last bull market was dominated by tech companies that made their fortunes on digital assets, such as online marketplaces, streaming platforms, search engines and social media. This overshadowed the fact that you can’t build a new economy without older industries. Not that digital-first companies are going away, but I think investors will start to place greater emphasis on commodities and producers of physical assets.Capital spending super cycle could power a new industrial renaissanceSources: Capital Group, FactSet, MSCI. In current U.S. dollars. As of December 31, 2021.Some might assume that trends like the shift to renewable energy will squeeze out incumbents in traditional sectors like industrials, materials or energy. On the contrary, there may be winners among businesses that are helping other companies be more energy efficient — whether that's smart buildings, power management or HVAC systems that reduce gas emissions. Other global trends such as grid modernization, reshoring and energy security may cause a boom in capital investment across industries. These are areas where smartly managed industrial companies might have a real renaissance.4. From multiple expansion to earnings growthMany newer investors got comfortable with stocks being very expensive over the last five to 10 years and now assume stocks will return to those levels during the next bull market. When rates were near zero the market could support loftier multiples, but I think those days are over.An exercise I’m trying to apply when evaluating my portfolio is to ask: “What if stocks don’t return to 25x earnings in 2027? What if they only trade at 15x earnings?” If I can make a stock work at that level, then I can probably limit my downside. Using that lens, I'm trying to find emerging and growth-oriented companies that are not valued as such. I like those that may also offer potential upside to the valuation, but where the investment thesis doesn’t depend on it.If multiple expansion is limited in the next bull market, stock returns will have to be powered by earnings growth. That means markets aren’t likely to be as patient with unprofitable companies. Stocks whose business models depend on cheap money are going away. Companies that funded losses while trying to scale rapidly even where the economics didn’t work are going away. Markets once paid up heavily for future growth, but now with higher interest rates they are less willing to do so. The market is calling time on business models that don’t work when money is no longer free.5. From global supply chains to regional supply chainsThe globalization of supply chains is another multi-decade trend that is shifting. For a generation, companies have moved manufacturing abroad to cut costs and boost margins. But the limitations of placing efficiency over resilience are now clear. Rising geopolitical tension and pandemic-induced disruptions have led companies to consider bringing supply chains closer to home.While bottlenecks caused by COVID shutdowns have improved, many companies are still being impacted. The auto industry is a prime example. Major automakers have tens of thousands of unfinished cars waiting for final parts, and that missing component is often as minor as an inexpensive semiconductor chip. Now companies are creating supply chain redundancies so that a single disruption doesn’t derail their entire operation.Even as pandemic-related issues ease, I believe increased geopolitical conflicts are here to stay and will continue to fuel this change. The current environment reminds me of the 1970s, with tension between Russia and the West, more aggressive confrontations with China, the rise of authoritarian leaders around the world and less global cooperation. Since the fall of the Berlin Wall, we’ve had more than 30 generally peaceful and prosperous years. But there are more risks now, and this backdrop suggests lower valuations are warranted and “surprises” should feel less surprising.Higher global tensions have increased risk of relying on international supply chainsSources: Capital Group; Caldara, Dario and Matteo Iacoviello (2022), “Measuring Geopolitical Risk,” American Economic Review, April, 112(4), pp.1194-1225. The Geopolitical Risk Index is a measure of adverse geopolitical events and associated risks based upon the tally of newspaper articles covering geopolitical tensions, using a sample of 10 newspapers going back to 1985. Index level values reflect a 12-month smoothed average of monthly data. As of September 2022.Consider Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC), the world’s dominant manufacturer of cutting-edge semiconductors. After having concentrated the bulk of its capacity in Taiwan — a focal point of geopolitical concerns — the company is building its first manufacturing hub in the United States. It’s also constructing a new plant in Japan. That regionalization should create a more efficient supply chain for some of its top U.S.-based clients, including automakers and technology companies like Apple, Qualcomm and Broadcom.A flexible investment approach can help weather the stormThe combination of low rates and rising markets made the last 10 years feel like one long sunny day at the beach. While some rain showers have now driven beachgoers indoors, they’re still looking out the window waiting for the storm to pass. They don’t realize that there’s a new weather system upon us with more clouds, colder temperatures and much stronger winds. The world’s not ending, but it may be a wetter, cloudier and colder place — and life won’t be a day at the beach.That may sound like a dark outlook, but I actually see this as a really exciting time to be an investor. My fellow managers and I are able to adjust to this new reality of investing in a variety of ways.Although we haven’t gotten everything right, we have been shifting from higher growth sectors like consumer discretionary and information technology to health care and industrials over the past few years in anticipation of this new reality. New market environments present new opportunities, and that’s where experience and flexibility can be essential.",Global Equities
Is high inflation the ultimate pandemic distortion?,2022-09-22T03:00:00,"The last time U.S. and Canadian inflation was in the high single digits, Ronald Reagan was president, Pierre Trudeau was prime minister and stainless-steel DeLorean sports cars were rolling off the production line.Perhaps that’s why 2022, in some ways, feels like taking a trip back in time. High inflation, rising interest rates, a bruising bear market and a proxy war with Russia seem all too familiar to anyone who lived through the early 1980s.Today’s market environment, however, has been shaped by an entirely different event. The COVID-19 pandemic and, crucially, the response to the pandemic have created large distortions in the economy and markets — from sky-high inflation to chronic labour shortages to broken supply chains.Which of these COVID distortions will fade over time and which will remain long term? That is a key question for investors.“There are some aspects of the pandemic that are fleeting and some that will persist,” says portfolio manager Alan Wilson. “That’s the issue we are grappling with today. We need to get the answer right because it will likely determine which companies thrive in a post-COVID world and which fall behind.”Why is inflation so high?With elevated inflation representing the most impactful distortion, a team of Capital Group portfolio managers, analysts and economists decided to study consumer price levels in 22 countries in relation to the growth of the money supply, or M2. (M2 is a broad measure of money that includes currency, coins, checking and savings deposits, as well as shares in money market funds.)The team looked at many other COVID-related distortions, as well, some of which are covered in more detail below. But since inflation touches virtually all parts of the economy, it makes sense to start there.Growth in the money supply has contributed to high inflationSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream. Money supply growth above is represented by the annual change in M2 (encompassing currency and coins held by the non-bank public, checkable deposits and travelers' checks, plus savings deposits, including money market deposit accounts, small time deposits and shares in retail money market mutual funds). Inflation figures above refer to the change in the consumer price index across selected countries. The original Capital Group analysis of this data included 22 countries or regions; some were removed from the chart for ease of reading. Inflation figures are current as of August or July of 2022, reflecting the latest available data as of September 14, 2022.As it turns out, the basic laws of economics proved correct.A rapidly growing money supply — boosted by pandemic-era government stimulus measures, aggressive bank lending and ultra-low interest rates — coincided with drastically higher inflation. In other words, the countries that stimulated the most during the pandemic generally wound up with the highest rates of inflation.In fact, one could argue that today’s high inflation is not the biggest distortion, but rather it was the unprecedented monetary and fiscal stimulus undertaken by the United States, Canada and Europe, among others, says portfolio manager Julian Abdey.“I am reminded of the famous Milton Friedman quote: ‘Inflation is always and everywhere a monetary phenomenon,’” Abdey notes. “In other words, inflation is caused by too much money chasing after too few goods, and that is exactly what we are seeing today.”Has inflation peaked?In June, Canada’s headline annual inflation rate was 8.1%, a 39-year high while U.S. inflation hit 9.1% in June on an annual basis — the highest level since 1981. That may be near the peak for the U.S., Abdey explains, and while there could be lags, what’s important is that the U.S. Federal Reserve, the Bank of Canada (BoC) and many other central banks are now moving fast to tighten monetary policy. That should eventually bring inflation down. In addition, most governments are no longer sending pandemic support payments to businesses and individuals.Does this mean inflation could return to the 2% level that has long been the Fed’s and other central bankers’ target?“That is highly dependent on the Fed’s response going forward,” Abdey adds. “I can see different scenarios, including a more inflationary one, as well as the possibility of a return to deflation. If the Fed remains hawkish and tightens too much, that could result in a nasty recession. On the other hand, if it reverses course, then high inflationary expectations could become embedded into the real economy.”Embedded high inflation expectations is a primary worry for the BoC, as it may lead firms to set prices even higher. Similarly, in response to higher expected inflation, workers may bargain for persistently higher wage growth to protect against anticipated losses in purchasing power. The resulting stronger wage growth feeds into production costs and prompts firms to raise prices even further. This boosts inflation expectations, perpetuating the spiral. In its Monetary Policy Report released in July, the Bank of Canada detailed the risks of de-anchored inflation expectations, stating it may require interest rates to rise higher and longer than currently projected, which significantly elevates the risk of recession in 2023.The hawkish stance is evident in recent central bank actions north and south of the border. In September, the Fed and BoC announced interest rate hikes of 75 basis points, bringing the U.S. federal funds rate to a target range of 3.00% to 3.25% and the BoC’s policy rate to 3.25%.There are signs inflation is starting to retreat. In the U.S., the August inflation reading declined to 8.3% – still a high number historically speaking, but significantly below the 9.1% reading in June. Inflation has also come down over the summer in Canada. Canada’s headline consumer price index fell from 8.1% in June to 7.6% in July and 7.0% in August.Volatile energy prices, a main contributor to inflation in both countries, appear to have peaked over the summer and have moved lower. U.S. and Canadian gasoline prices, for example, have declined by roughly 25% over the past three months. Food prices, however, continue to rise sharply.Energy price increases are moderating, easing inflationary pressuresSources: Capital Group, The Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD). Inflation above reflects the OECD's consumer price index for G-7 countries, including Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the United Kingdom and the United States. Inflation is measured in terms of the annual growth rate in the index, using 2015 as the base year with a breakdown for food, energy and total excluding food and energy. As of July 2022.The great resignationAnother COVID distortion that remains entrenched is the severe labour shortage. In 2021, a popular media narrative developed around the idea of “the great resignation,” inspired by U.S. government data showing that roughly 47 million people voluntarily quit their jobs that year and seemed to disappear from the workforce.Further data and myriad surveys helped shed light on the reasons. Many quit to ultimately take better paying jobs. Some older workers opted for early retirement. And roughly 600,000 Americans decided to start their own small businesses, a trend which is hard to track through monthly employment data.So why is the labour market still extremely tight, with the unemployment rate near a record low of 3.7% in the U.S. and 5.4% in Canada? That’s because the U.S. economy — and many other developed economies around the world — have not kept up with pre-pandemic growth trends, says Capital Group economist Jared Franz.“Given the average annual growth in the labour force pre-COVID, we should have four to five million more workers than we have today,” Franz estimates.Labour crunch: Where did the employees go?Sources: Capital Group, U.S.  Bureau of Labor Statistics, Refinitiv Datastream, U.S. Department of Labor. Labour force participation rate above reflects the monthly total U.S. civilian labour force participation rate; the five-year average includes the average monthly participation rate between February 2015–February 2020; the post-Covid average reflects the average monthly participation rate between March 2020–August 2022.This imbalance in the labour force hit some industries harder than others, particularly those most affected by the pandemic-era lockdowns. Those include travel, hospitality, manufacturing and education. The labour imbalance also has significant implications for the Fed and BoC’s rate-hiking path, given the central banks’ desire to cool down the red-hot job market, which adds to inflation through wage increases.“If these shifts in the labour force persist,” Franz notes, “it would require more rate hikes than the market has priced in today — and for a longer period of time — to realign labour supply and demand.”Over the long term, Franz believes the labour crunch will ease, especially if the U.S. and Canadian economies falls into recession over the next year or two. But that’s a painful way to solve the problem, he concedes.“Unfortunately, it does sometimes take a significant downturn to resolve imbalances in the economy,” Franz says.Stocks and bonds fallingAmong all the major distortions in the economy and markets today, this one strikes at the heart of portfolio diversification.Simply put, when stocks zig, bonds are supposed to zag. Yet that has yet to happen in 2022. Both major asset classes are coming under pressure as high inflation and rising interest rates hurt growth-oriented stocks as well as many types of corporate and government bonds.As of August 31, the S&P 500 Index has lost about 16% on a year-to-date basis, while the Bloomberg U.S. Bond Aggregate Index, which represents the U.S. investment-grade (rated BBB/Baa and above) bond market, has declined more than 11%. On a total return basis, that hasn’t happened in more than 45 years — a period that includes the 1994 bond market meltdown, the early 2000s dot-com implosion and the 2007–09 global financial crisis.U.S. stocks and bonds rarely decline in tandemSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., Standard & Poor's. Returns above reflect annual total returns for all years except 2022, which reflects the year-to-date total return for both indices. As of August 31, 2022. Returns are in USD.The entire relationship hinges on inflation.If the Fed can get consumer prices under control, the historically negative correlation between stocks and bonds should return, explains fixed income portfolio manager Pramod Atluri.“That is the trillion-dollar question,” Atluri says. “Are we in a new higher inflation regime or not? I don’t think we are. In my view, we are likely to see inflation come down as the Fed and other central banks continue to raise interest rates and reduce their balance sheets.”This painful experience, however, could have a long-term impact on the markets by affecting the willingness of governments and central banks to intervene during future times of crisis, Atluri adds.“In my view, there will be less monetary and fiscal support over the next decade as policymakers assess what went wrong,” he adds. “That would be a big shift from what we’ve experienced over the past decade, which was largely defined by government intervention. Less intervention will likely result in more volatile markets than investors have been accustomed to.”Silver-lining distortionsNot all COVID distortions necessarily carry a negative connotation. In the equity markets, post-pandemic opportunities are emerging in a number of areas, says portfolio manager Nick Grace.Those areas include what Grace likes to call “structural changes,” including the transition from traditional energy sources to more sustainable sources; years of underinvestment in commodities, which could lead to a new commodities super cycle; and big industrial shifts, such as the increasing adoption of automation, resulting in greater demand for semiconductors.He is also watching certain badly bruised tech and consumer-tech companies, including some of the darlings of the COVID lockdowns that have since sharply sold off. The remarkable pull-forward in demand that we saw during the lockdowns has proven to be a fleeting moment in time, rather than a new paradigm, and share prices are starting to reflect that reality.“A lot of the price distortions we saw in 2020 and 2021 are being unwound,” Grace says, “which doesn’t mean they can’t fall further. But there’s already been a great deal of price destruction, and I think a lot of the excesses have been wrung out of the market.”Over the next few years, Grace stresses, this is where traditional stock-picking skills will make all the difference.“Many of these companies won’t survive,” he explains, “but a handful will come out of this downturn stronger and more profitable. It’s our job to identify them through fundamental bottom-up research, and I feel confident about our ability to do it.”",Inflation
Can U.S. midterm elections move markets? 5 charts to watch,2022-09-08T12:09:00,"In a year when soaring inflation, the war in Ukraine and a bear market have commanded headlines, the U.S. midterm elections risked becoming an afterthought. But now the election is coming back into focus. And with good reason. Capital Group political economist Matt Miller believes 2022 could be one of the more consequential midterm elections in U.S. history.“Make no mistake, every move in Washington this year has been carefully calculated with the midterms in mind,” Miller says.But while control of the U.S. Congress may be at stake, do midterm elections have any effect on equity markets?To find out, we examined more than 90 years of data and found that the answer is yes, markets have behaved differently during midterm election years. Here are five things you need to know about investing in this political cycle.1. The president’s party typically loses seats in CongressSource: The American Presidency Project, ""Seats in Congress Gained/Lost by the President's Party in Mid-Term Elections.”Midterm elections occur at the midpoint of a presidential term and usually result in the president’s party losing ground in Congress. Over the past 22 midterm elections, the president’s party has lost an average 28 seats in the House of Representatives and four in the Senate. Only twice has the president’s party gained seats in both chambers.Why is this usually the case? First, supporters of the party not in power usually are more motivated to boost voter turnout. Also, the president’s approval rating typically dips during the first two years in office, which can influence swing voters and frustrated constituents.“The Senate remains a toss-up, but history suggests we will see a backlash against the party in power that will result in Republicans taking back control of the House,” Miller says. “As far as investors are concerned that would end any chance for ambitious Democratic legislation the next two years.""Since losing seats is so common, it’s usually priced into the markets early in the year. But the extent of a political power shift — and the resulting policy impacts — remain unclear until later in the year, which can explain other trends we’ve uncovered.2. U.S. market returns tend to be muted until later in midterm yearsSources: Capital Group, RIMES, Standard & Poor’s. The chart shows the average trajectory of equity returns throughout U.S. midterm election years compared to non-midterm election years. Each point on the lines represents the average year-to-date return in USD as of that particular month and day and is calculated using daily price returns from 1/1/31–12/31/21.Our analysis of returns for the S&P 500 Index since 1931 revealed that the path of stocks throughout midterm election years differs noticeably compared to all other years.Since markets typically rise over long periods of time, the average stock movement during an average year should steadily increase. But we found that in the first several months of years with a midterm election, stocks have tended to have lower average returns and often gained little ground until shortly before the election.Markets don’t like uncertainty — and that adage seems to apply here. Earlier in the year there is less certainty about the election’s outcome and impact. But markets have tended to rally in the weeks before an election, and they have continued to rise after the polls close. So far, 2022 has been another example of a midterm election year with lacklustre returns, although the impact of politics has been minimal compared to that of inflation and rising rates.Despite the uncertainty, investors shouldn’t sit on the sidelines or try to time the market. The path of stocks varies greatly each election cycle, and the overall long-term trend of markets has been positive.3. Midterm election years have had higher volatilitySources: Capital Group, RIMES, Standard & Poor's. As of 12/31/21. Volatility is calculated using the standard deviation of daily returns in USD for each individual month. Standard deviation is a measure of how returns over time have varied from the average. A lower number signifies lower volatility. Median volatility for each month is displayed on an annualized basis. Based in USD.Elections can be tough on the nerves. Candidates often draw attention to the country’s problems, and campaigns regularly amplify negative messages. Policy proposals may be unclear and often target specific industries or companies.It may come as no surprise then that U.S. market volatility is higher in midterm election years, especially in the weeks leading up to Election Day. Since 1970, midterm years have a median standard deviation of returns of nearly 16%, compared with 13% in all other years.“I don’t think this election will be any different,” says Chris Buchbinder, a portfolio manager on Capital Group U.S. Equity FundTM(Canada) “There may be bumps in the road, and investors should brace for short-term volatility, but I don’t expect the election results to be a huge driver of investment outcomes one way or the other.”4. Market returns after midterm elections have been strongSources: Capital Group, RIMES, Standard & Poor's. Calculations use Election Day as the starting date in all election years and November 5th as a proxy for the starting date in other years. Only midterm election years are shown in the chart. As of 12/31/21. Returns are in USD.The silver lining for investors is that markets have tended to rebound strongly in subsequent months, and the rally that has often started shortly before Election Day hasn’t been just a short-term blip. Above-average returns have been typical for the full year following the election cycle. Since 1950, the average one-year return following a midterm election was 15% in U.S. dollar terms. That’s more than twice the return of all other years during a similar period.Of course every cycle is different, and elections are just one of many factors influencing market returns. For example, over the next year investors will need to weigh the impacts of a potential U.S. recession and global economic and geopolitical concerns.5. Stocks have done well regardless of the makeup of WashingtonSources: Capital Group, Strategas. As of December 31, 2021. Unified government indicates control of the White House, House and Senate by the same political party. Unified Congress indicates control of the House and Senate by the same party, but control of the White House by a different party. Split Congress indicates control of the House and Senate by different parties, regardless of White House control.There’s nothing wrong with wanting your preferred candidate to win, but investors can run into trouble if they place too much importance on election results. That’s because, historically, elections have had little impact on long-term investment returns.In 2020, many investors feared the “blue wave” scenario, or Democratic sweep. But despite these concerns, the S&P 500 rose 42% in the 14 months following the 2020 election (from November 4, 2020, through January 3, 2022) in U.S. dollar terms.Going back to 1933, markets have averaged double-digit returns in all years that a single party controlled the White House and both chambers of Congress. This is just below the average gains in years with a split Congress, a scenario which many believe is a strong possibility this year. Even the “least good” outcome — when the president’s opposing party controls Congress — notched a solid 7.4% average price return.What’s the bottom line for investors?Midterm elections — and politics as a whole — generate a lot of noise and uncertainty.Even if elections spur higher volatility there is no need to fear them. The reality is that long-term equity returns come from the value of individual companies over time. Smart investors would be wise to look past the short-term highs and lows and maintain a long-term focus.",Election
What’s ahead for Canadian bonds,2022-08-15T02:23:00,"For advisor use only. Not for use with investors.Fixed income portfolio manager Tom Reithinger of Capital Group Canadian Core Plus Fixed Income FundTM(Canada) shares his thoughts on the macroeconomic environment and opportunities in fixed income investing. Topics covered include:Canadian economic, housing and dollar outlooksPotential path of inflation/interest ratesInvestment opportunities in Canadian and global bond markets",Fixed Income
Is the U.S. already in a recession?,2022-08-04T09:48:00,"Is the U.S. economy in recession or not? That’s the question on the minds of many investors as U.S. gross domestic product (GDP) declined for two consecutive quarters in the first half of the year, a commonly cited definition of recession.However, with consistently strong job growth, historically low unemployment and solid growth in consumer spending, that doesn’t sound like a recession most people would remember. So what’s the conclusion?“It depends on who you ask,” says Capital Group economist Jared Franz. “With food, energy and shelter prices all rising faster than wages, the average American consumer would probably say yes. In my view, we are either on the edge of a recession or we are already tipping into it.”To put things in perspective, over the past 70 years the average U.S. recession has lasted about 10 months and resulted in a GDP decline of 2.5%. In Franz’s estimation, the next one may be worse than average, if current trends persist, but still less severe than the Great Recession from December 2007 to June 2009.Key economic indicators point to a potential recessionSources: Capital Group, Bureau of Economic Analysis, National Bureau of Economic Research, U.S. Department of Commerce. Y-axis is limited to a range of –10% to +10% to represent a normalized range, but Q2:20 and Q3:20 exceed this range (at –35.7% and +30.2%) largely due to the pandemic. As of June 30, 2022.When will we know for sure?The official arbiter of U.S. recessions, the National Bureau of Economic Research (NBER), takes a while to share its view. The nonprofit group considers many factors beyond GDP, including employment levels, household income and industrial production. Since NBER usually doesn’t reveal its findings until six to nine months after a recession has started, we may not get an official announcement until next year.“It’s fair to say that most consumers probably don’t care what NBER thinks,” Franz adds. “They see inflation above 9%, sharply higher energy prices and declining home sales. They feel the impact of those data points. The labour market is one of the only data points that isn’t signaling a recession right now.”The U.S. added 372,000 jobs in June, higher than most economists expected. The unemployment rate remained steady at 3.6%, close to a record low. However, as Franz explains, that number reflects a supply-demand mismatch in an economy that hasn’t fully recovered from the pandemic. In the months ahead, he expects greater numbers of jobseekers to return. That should increase the unemployment rate as companies reduce hiring.One bright spot: A strong U.S. job marketSources: Capital Group, Bureau of Labor Statistics, National Bureau of Economic Research, U.S. Department of Labor. As of June 2022.Consumer spending, meanwhile, rose 1.1% in June. That’s a strong number on the surface, Franz says, but after adjusting for inflation, it’s essentially flat. It also reflects higher spending on necessities such as health care and housing while masking declines in discretionary categories such as clothing and recreation. That spending shift was underscored recently when Walmart and Best Buy issued profit warnings, noting that higher prices for food and energy were hurting sales of discretionary items.“We haven’t seen overall consumer spending or employment levels decline yet,” Franz says, “but I think it’s just a matter of time.”Housing comes under pressureAnother troubling sign is the rapid decline in new home sales. With the U.S. Federal Reserve aggressively raising interest rates to fight inflation, mortgage rates have soared in recent months, triggering a sharp reaction in the housing market.New single-family home purchases fell last month by 8.1%, the biggest drop in more than two years. Sales of previously owned homes tumbled 5.4%, the fifth consecutive month of declines. Additionally, a dramatic rise in home prices during the pandemic raises concerns about the potential for a painful correction.Rising home inventories suggest this recession could be more difficultSources: Capital Group, National Bureau of Economic Research, U.S. Census Bureau. As of June 2022.“When it comes to the impact on the economy, the housing market punches far above its weight,” Franz explains. “I'm mulling the risk that a larger correction in this sector could increase the depth and duration of the next recession.”Why inflation should subsideIf we are heading into a recessionary period, the silver lining could be a reversal of the extreme inflation pressures witnessed over the past year. In fact, some argue that inflation has spiraled so far out of control it could take a substantial recession to bring it down to the Fed’s 2% target. In June, U.S. inflation hit a 40-year high of 9.1%.“The pivotal question is: Are we in a new inflationary regime or not? I don’t think we are,” says fixed income portfolio manager Pramod Atluri. “Consumer prices are likely coming down over the next few months as the recession kicks in and demand wanes.”What does that mean for the bond market — which, so far this year, has experienced the biggest decline in four decades? It means much of the pain may be over, Atluri says, as the Fed considers whether it can continue raising interest rates in the face of an economic downturn. In fact, the bond market is already pricing in expectations that the Fed will cut rates multiple times in 2023.“There are a lot of signs that inflation has peaked,” Atluri adds, citing falling prices for gasoline since mid-June, as well as wheat, corn and other commodities since mid-May. “That may give the Fed the cover it needs to support economic growth while still taking inflation seriously.”In the meantime, Atluri expects more volatility as the market adjusts to tighter monetary policy. In his portfolios, that means shifting toward higher quality investments, including U.S. Treasuries and agency mortgage-backed securities while also looking for opportunistic investments in corporate and emerging markets bonds where investors are being compensated for the rising recession risk.Consider all-weather investingSimilarly in the equity markets, identifying high-quality companies with steady cash flows and reliable profit margins is key to surviving recessions, says equity portfolio manager Diana Wagner. Companies with solid and growing dividends are particularly attractive.“In this environment, you want to invest in companies whose fundamentals will hold up relatively better. Pricing power and steady demand are big components of that,” Wagner said during a recent Capital Group webinar. “I prefer a relatively concentrated, all-weather portfolio that can thrive in a variety of market environments,” she adds. “My top holdings are health care, software and insurance companies. I also like consumer staples, but you have to be very selective in that sector because some valuations have become quite high.”Recessions have been painful but less impactful than expansionsSources: Capital Group, National Bureau of Economic Research, Refinitiv Datastream. Chart reflects latest U.S. GDP data available as of 6/30/22 and shown on a logarithmic scale. The expansion that began in 2020 is still considered current as of 6/30/22 and not included in the average expansion summary statistics. Since NBER announces recession start and end months, rather than exact dates, we have used month-end dates as a proxy for calculations of jobs added. Nearest quarter-end values used for U.S. GDP growth rates.What type of recession is Wagner preparing for?“There are a lot of mixed signals, but clearly the economy is slowing and I think the risk of stagflation is real,” she says, referring to a period of stagnant growth and high inflation in the 1970s. “Every recession is miserable in its own way, but I expect the next one to be less damaging than in 2008. The important thing for investors to remember is that recessions usually have been short-lived and expansions have been far more powerful.”",United States
"Pandemic, war and climate change sharpen focus on ESG",2022-07-27T12:32:00,"While COVID-19 helped accelerate the ESG agenda, the tragic invasion of Ukraine is likely to further speed up its evolution.The pandemic shone a spotlight on the “S” — or social issues — of ESG. The conflict in Ukraine has brought the “G” (the governance component) to investors’ attention. At the same time, a growing understanding of the implications and importance of climate change has meant that “E” (the environmental piece) continues to dominate investors’ ESG focus.These insights and many more surfaced in Capital Group’s annual ESG global study published in May 2022. Collecting views from more than 1,100 institutional and wholesale investment professionals across Europe, North America and Asia-Pacific, the study showed ESG trends continue to gain traction.ESG momentum buildsMomentum behind ESG and sustainability continues to build, fueled by investor demand and a desire to make an impact. Compared with the previous year, a higher proportion of global investors describe their ESG stance as one of conviction, acceptance or compliance. This global cohort of ESG adopters rose to almost 90%, up from 84% in 2021. Over the same period, the number who are either on the sidelines or non-adopters has fallen to 11%, down from 16% the previous year.ESG adoption by global investors continues to growSource: Capital Group, ESG Global Study 2022Conviction in ESG is further underscored in the finding that just 13% of global investors agree ESG is a passing fad and will go out of fashion. This demonstrates how most investors view ESG as a permanent and pre-eminent part of the investment landscape.ESG poised to become a permanent part of the investment landscapeSource: Capital Group, ESG Global Study 2022The “E” of ESG continues to dominate, but greater recognition of “S”The structural and societal pressures arising from climate change have been key in driving environmental issues — the “E” in ESG — to the top of investors’ sustainability concerns. The study showed that the environment continued to dominate allocation decisions, with investors increasing their focus on “E,” which rose from the year before (47% vs. 44%).The “E” in ESG still dominatesSource: Capital Group, ESG Global Study 2022Although investors indicated an even greater focus on environmental issues in 2022, there are signs that this may change in the future as people recognize an imbalance. When asked whether social issues are being overlooked by this environmental focus, 41% of investors agreed.Qualitative research we carried out as part of the study suggests some reasons behind these views. It is possible that the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic raised greater awareness on the importance of safe working conditions, access to health care and education.The “S” in ESG is rising in prominenceSource: Capital Group, ESG Global Study 2022As strict lockdowns were imposed across the world, companies operating in the retail and health care sectors came under particular pressure to ensure the safety and well-being of their workers. Many responded by providing protective equipment or extending paid sick leave to temporary staff and contractors. Other companies provided their goods and services free of charge — such as internet access, video conferences and remote learning to schools and universities — as a way of supporting their broader communities.With an increased understanding that social issues can have material and far-reaching consequences for companies and the communities they serve, the impact of the pandemic may have prompted investors to look across a wider range of ESG issues.“G” increases its profileRussia’s invasion of Ukraine also brought several ESG issues into the spotlight, with concerns around governance flagged by respondents in the survey.The global response to Russian aggression was not just political, as the corporate sector was quick to take a stance. Many companies made statements regarding their business exposure to Russia.At Capital Group, we followed company actions closely. While much of the media focus was on actions announced publicly, we paid particular attention to companies that had not made public statements. Digging behind the public pronouncements helped us to gain a better understanding of the impacts and how companies’ licence to operate may be affected.Sentiments on governance concerns were echoed by a number of investors surveyed.“I think the crisis should, and probably will, bring governance into sharper focus,” says the CIO of an independent advisory firm. “But that should have always been the case — it’s sad that we need a tragedy and war to highlight the importance of the ‘G’.”A portfolio manager at a wealth management firm agreed: “I think the crisis has strengthened the ESG argument because it really is making people focus on what’s important  — and that’s social governance, which is right up there in my view.”The impacts of major world events have always been felt in investment markets. Building an understanding of the first-, second- and third-order effects of events and how these might impact investment decisions is not new. Viewing the consequences of these events through an ESG lens can provide a richer perspective and help frame events for investors.However, there are still challenges to overcome, which the survey also highlighted.Access to reliable and consistent ESG data remains a key challengeA theme that came through loud and clear in last year’s study, and was reinforced in this year’s results, is the difficulties experienced in accessing and interpreting ESG data. Specific issues raised by respondents included access to ESG data, consistency between ESG data providers and transparency of benchmark and index data.Difficulties with the robustness of data and inconsistent scores are hampering the ability of investors to incorporate ESG considerations into their investment process.ESG ratings and accessing data remain the largest challengesSource: Capital Group, ESG Global Study 2022The No. 1 challenge global investors cited in implementing ESG investments is a lack of consistency between different ESG rating providers (25%). This was closely followed by difficulties accessing ESG information and data.Inconsistent and inaccurate ESG scores result from a multitude of factors. These include backward-looking data that fails to adequately assess the future value of companies transitioning to address sustainability issues. The companies could play an important role in driving change and may become tomorrow’s ESG leaders. The subjective nature of scoring systems also means there are varying views on the relative importance and material impact of different ESG factors in different sectors and countries.Consistency in regulation was also raised as a significant roadblock. Investors are looking to regulators to provide common standards and definitions. When asked what the ESG regulatory framework should prioritize in their respective countries, the highest proportion of respondents cite the need to harmonize global standards, taxonomies and metrics (45%). This indicates investors are struggling to untangle an increasingly complex and disjointed web of global regulations issued by different entities.Overcoming data challenges will help ESG to broaden its reach. Results from our global study show that momentum behind ESG and sustainability continues to build. Despite challenges around data, it appears that investors’ awareness of ESG topics is not just increasing, it is also broadening to cover a wider range of social and governance issues.For a more detailed look at the latest findings, check out thefull survey.",ESG
Rob Lovelace on all-weather investing,2022-06-29T11:48:00,"The world has changed.We are living through a pivotal time in history, marked by geopolitical realignment, high inflation, volatile financial markets and the end of a 40-year period of declining U.S. interest rates. The title of this new era could be Brave New World or Back to the Future. But I think the title I would select is Revenge of the Boomers, because a lot of these events rhyme with the past, particularly the early 1960s. That’s when we saw interest rates bottom out after decades of decline, as well as the rise of the Cold War era, which is unfortunately rearing its head again in some respects.Despite these challenges, I remain optimistic about the investing environment for several reasons. First, there are still signs of growth as the global economy recovers from the pandemic. Second, I believe corporate earnings will be the driving force of equity markets going forward, as opposed to multiple expansion, and that signifies a welcome return to fundamentals. Multiples needed to contract, and that is what we’ve seen over the past few months.Third, I think we will experience a healthy recession in the next year or two. That’s right, a healthy recession. Despite all the worry about it, I see a moderate recession as necessary to clean out the excesses of the past decade. You can’t have such a sustained period of growth without an occasional downturn to balance things out. It’s normal. It’s expected. It’s healthy.We’ve seen market leadership change in the U.S. in recent monthsSources: Capital Group, FactSet, MSCI, Standard & Poor’s. MT FAANG represents the collective price performance of shares of Microsoft, Tesla, Meta (Facebook), Amazon, Apple, Netflix and Alphabet (Google). Defensive stocks typically generate relatively stable returns regardless of the state of the economy or the overall markets. Cyclical stocks tend to move up or down roughly in line with economic growth or contraction cycles. or values do not reflect the impact of dividends. Data shown as of 4/30/22. Based in USD.What this means for stock marketsIn my view, we are heading into a period of real change, a fundamentally different marketplace where different leadership will emerge. That’s in sharp contrast to the 2020 COVID-19 downturn, which was really just a temporary blip in a decade-plus bull market. We know this because the same stocks that led the bull market — a relatively small group of tech-related companies — did so on the way back up.In a true market shift, the leadership coming out of a bear market is usually a new sector or a new group of companies. And it’s not necessarily the same group that led on the way down. For instance, in the current environment, energy stocks have staged a remarkable rally. Do I think the energy sector is going to drive the next bull market? I do not.Market leaders before and after a bear market are rarely the sameSources: Capital Group, MSCI, Refinitiv Datastream. Returns are absolute total returns in U.S. dollars. The periods covered are: the tech bubble, December 31, 1996 to May 31, 2000 (before bear market) and September 30, 2002 to December 30, 2005 (after bear market); the global financial crisis, December 31, 2003 to September 28, 2007 (before) and May 31, 2009 to December 31, 2013 (after); and the current market, December 31, 2021 to May 31, 2022.That said, I wouldn’t count out the FAANG (Facebook, Amazon, Apple, Netflix, Google) stocks, but I think it’s going to be a very different market going forward. It won’t be driven by a small set of stocks anymore. It won’t be characterized by growth vs. value, or U.S. vs. international. Those binary concepts don’t make sense in this environment. I think the market will be less one dimensional, and I expect a broader mix of stocks to lead us out of this downturn.What this means for bond marketsWe are also seeing a profound shift in bond markets in the U.S. as we reach the end of a 40-year path of falling interest rates. Sharply higher inflation levels, not seen since the 1980s, are forcing the Federal Reserve and other central banks to aggressively tighten monetary policy. The Fed is behind the curve, which means rates are probably going to move higher from here.However, that doesn't mean we are going back to exceedingly high inflation and interest rates. It just means that, for decades, we have lived in a declining rate environment that has been highly supportive of markets. That’s all changed. Things are likely to be more difficult going forward. But even amid these headwinds, opportunities will emerge.Is this the end of a 40-year declining rate period in the U.S.?Sources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream. Data shown as of 6/23/2022.That’s one reason I like to call this era “Revenge of the Boomers,” because it’s so reminiscent of the 1960s. Interest rates moved higher, but they didn’t spike to 16% overnight. It took decades for that to happen, and there were many policy mistakes along the way. Throughout the 1960s, rates stayed in the 3% to 6% range. It was a volatile period, but overall it was still a good environment for investing. The real trouble came later. Hopefully we’ve learned some lessons from the past and we won’t repeat the 1970s.In the meantime, it’s important to remember that higher nominal interest rates are good for savers. This is a novel concept for younger folks, but boomers grew up in a world where interest rates were sufficient to earn a decent return on savings accounts and money market funds. That’s a positive change. It makes people feel better about saving, and I see it as a solid underpinning for the market.Over time, higher rates will also bring income back to the fixed income markets — something that has been sorely missed in the era of easy money. The importance of that shift cannot be overstated. It should eventually restore bonds to their rightful role providing diversification from equity risk.Along those same lines, some inflation is actually a good thing. It allows well-positioned companies to raise prices, and it results in generally higher wages. That makes people feel better about their jobs and progress. It is hard to predict what will happen to real purchasing power, but we have seen in the past decade that without a little inflation, people feel like they’re not getting ahead.What this means for investorsMaintaining a balanced, “all-weather” portfolio makes sense in any environment, but particularly this one. Earlier this year I reminded investors to keep an eye on valuations and prepare for a market correction. I remarked that I was buying a raincoat, but not putting it on yet. Turns out, it’s nice to have that raincoat handy. Market volatility has returned, but that’s no reason to be discouraged.At Capital Group, our fundamental, bottom-up investment approach leaves us well-positioned to identify specific companies that can generate strong earnings growth. We remain confident that we have the right people in place making decisions based on deep, company-specific research, which has always formed the basis of our long-term investment philosophy.Indeed, the world has changed dramatically. But, for selective investors, change creates opportunity.",Markets & Economy
Fed’s  aggressive path could mean more market turmoil,2022-06-16T02:07:00,"With a 75-basis point (bps) rate hike, the biggest single move in nearly three decades, the U.S. Federal Reserve has signaled that bringing down inflation is its primary focus. The Fed moved to a more aggressive policy stance following a firmer-than-expected May U.S. consumer price index (CPI) report, which showed an 8.6% increase, driven by broad-based price pressures.With little indication that these pressures have peaked, and a greater risk that inflation will spiral out of control, the Fed is likely to maintain an aggressive posture unless financial conditions tighten sharply.“Clearly today’s 75 bps increase is an unusually large one, and I do not expect moves of this size to be common. From the perspective of today, either a 50 bps or a 75 bps increase seems most likely at our next meeting,” Fed Chair Jerome Powell said following the June 15 decision. The Fed’s new “dot plot,” which shows the Fed governors’ individual inflation projections, is now signaling that the federal funds rate could be 3.4% by the end of the year. The U.S. market appeared to pare back expectations on the pace of rate hikes as a result, and stocks rose immediately after the Fed’s announcement.Notwithstanding the 75 bps rise, which brings the federal funds rate target to a range of 1.50%-1.75%, the May CPI report left little doubt that inflation is moving higher and remains the Fed’s main concern. The Fed’s latest policy statement said the committee “is strongly committed to returning inflation to its 2% objective,” while Powell said they were “acutely” attuned to inflation risks.We’re seeing strong contributions to monthly core CPI from both goods and services, although retail spending declined in May, which could suggest demand is starting to cool. Approximately 20% of the sectors in the core CPI basket are experiencing inflation at or below the Fed’s target of 2%, compared to around 55% before the COVID-19 pandemic. Meanwhile, owners’ equivalent rent (24% of the CPI basket) is moving decisively higher, a trend that will likely persist in the coming months.U.S. inflationary pressures are broad-basedChart Source: U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics. CPI = U.S. consumer price index. Core CPI refers to all items in the consumer price index excluding food and energy. “Other” comprises all categories in the core CPI excluding transportation services, shelter and transportation commodities. Data as of June 10, 2022. Based in USD.The central bank’s job is made that much more difficult because the labour market is extremely tight. Recent academic and private-sector research shows that it may be even tighter than the official data suggests because of the decline in the labour force participation rate. Below, we provide perspectives from U.S. economist Darrell Spence, fixed income portfolio managers Tim Ng and Damien McCann, and solutions portfolio manager Wesley Phoa.Stocks remain vulnerable amid rising rates and recession riskDarrell Spence, U.S. economistWe are starting to see a moderate wage-price spiral developing in the United States, and as I look at the landscape, it is hard to see a clear path to bring inflation back to the Fed’s 2% target without putting the economy into a recession. Given its inability to fix supply side bottlenecks, lower growth and rising unemployment is what the Fed has to achieve if it wants to actually get inflation down.The only way to really break the wage-price spiral, in my view, is to create a lot of slack in the labour market, which is done by pushing the unemployment rate up. As such, the unemployment rate may need to rise by 2 percentage points, or even more, before wage growth starts to moderate. Despite the current strength we are seeing in consumer and corporate balance sheets, I believe this will make a recession very difficult to avoid in 2023.The S&P 500 Index entered bear market territory on June 13 (closing 20% below its most recent high), but I see little reason to believe market turmoil will cause the Fed to back off its plan. I think it will take a clear and significant deceleration of inflation for the Fed to stop hiking.Core CPI is currently around 6%, and the Fed’s target is 2%, suggesting a 4-percentage-point decline in core CPI is needed.  This is nearly as large as the 5-percentage-point decline that occurred in the early 1980s (once one adjusts the historical CPI data for methodological changes that have occurred since then). Achieving that amount of disinflation ultimately required a real federal funds rate in excess of 5%.Currently, the market expects the federal funds rate to peak around 4% in mid-2023, which would most likely still leave the real federal funds rate in negative territory.  No tightening cycle has ended with the real federal funds rate still in negative territory. Granted, many things about the economy are different from what they were during earlier tightening cycles, but this does suggest the Fed may have to raise rates by more than the market currently expects.What does this mean for markets and earnings?A more challenging economic environment will likely pressure corporate earnings as we head into 2023.  While the silver lining to inflation is that it can provide a boost to earnings growth, that is usually a short-lived phenomenon and eventually outweighed by the decline in activity that inflation — and the associated policy response — can generate.  I still expect earnings per share (EPS) for companies in the S&P 500 to grow around 7% in 2022.  However, I now expect a nearly 10% decline in 2023. This puts the market price-earnings multiple at 18.7x for 2023.  This is still a bit high for the interest rate environment I envision, and there is also a chance that the earnings forecast gets revised down even further.The bottom line is that bear markets associated with a recession have tended to be deeper and longer. History shows that such bear markets (in this case defined by a 15% market decline threshold) experienced a median percentage decline of 33.9% over a median duration of 17 months.  Thus, we may continue to experience market volatility, and could potentially see another leg down before we reach a market bottom.Fed likely to stick with tightening pathTim Ng, portfolio manager, Capital Group Canadian Core Plus Fixed Income FundTM(Canada)We are seeing a significant inversion in the front end of the yield curve with interest rate futures showing the fed funds rate peaking at 4% by the middle of 2023 but approximately 50 basis points of cuts thereafter. This makes sense as the market continues to pull rate hikes forward.While I continue to think inflationary pressures will stay elevated and the Fed will need to tighten further, I also think the central bank will be mindful of the potential impact on markets and the tightening of financial conditions. Even though the Fed is laser-focused on inflation and has demonstrated a high tolerance for declining asset prices, it will not ignore the need for market stability.With the market already pricing 4% peak funds and 200 bps of hikes over the next three meetings, the risk/reward of staying short duration is becoming less attractive. Duration is a measure of a bond’s price to interest rate changes.  Keeping duration and curve exposures closer to neutral makes sense as we approach what I think will likely be a volatile period in markets for the remainder of the year.Stay selective in credit marketsDamien McCann, portfolio manager, Capital Group Multi-Sector Income FundTM(Canada)The next few quarters will likely continue to be bumpy for fixed income spread assets. While valuations have cheapened across fixed income sectors, I think it still may be early to go overweight in the riskier areas of the market, such as high yield. Now is a time to think about protecting a portfolio by investing in parts of the market that are more attractively valued, and relying on research and active management to help get through this period with as little damage as possible. Within credit, on a relative basis, we are finding greater value in securitized credit and select areas of emerging markets debt. These markets have priced a lot of the geopolitical risk from the Russia-Ukraine war.  And in many cases, emerging markets central banks are ahead of their developed-market counterparts in the fight on inflation.Favouring a defensive posture in riskier asset classesWesley Phoa, portfolio manager, Capital Group Monthly Income PortfolioTM(Canada)With its more aggressive stance, the Fed continues to regain credibility. But markets will remain volatile and risk assets will stay under pressure. We’ve had a long period of very low rates when so-called long-duration stocks did really well. If these growth stocks had good long-term prospects, it did not matter that they were burning cash. That dynamic has reversed as the discount rate on stocks has gone up with the spike in yields.At the same time, there is a lot less liquidity in the markets as quantitative easing shifts to quantitative tightening. With lower liquidity, investors are not as willing to fund companies burning cash today for growth tomorrow. As a result, in addition to equities, many riskier asset classes have come under selling pressure, including private credit, private equity, crypto currencies and financing for mergers-and-acquisitions (M&A) activity.Many Capital Group portfolio managers have sought to reduce their risk exposure by moving investments to areas of growth that traditionally have stronger cash flows, to less cyclical industries and, where appropriate by mandate, to dividend-oriented stocks.Stock valuations have also ratcheted down as profit margins are compressed by higher input costs. Improved labour bargaining power results in higher labour costs for companies. And heightened supply chain risk is forcing companies to move away from just-in-time inventories and build redundancies.That said, the negative factors today are easier to see. The trends are more apparent and, hence, getting priced in quickly by markets. But for the longer term, I view it as a positive development that labour has structurally more bargaining power. It’s better for households, and what’s good for consumers is good for the economy in the long term. I expect solid, long-term innovation-driven investment themes, and companies will survive and thrive as investors distinguish the wheat from the chaff.",Fed
4 charts that explain U.S. labour dynamics,2022-05-25T12:38:00,"The latest U.S. consumer price index (CPI) report released Wednesday, May 11, has confirmed that the U.S. Federal Reserve has a long way yet to go in its fight against inflation. Core inflation — all items except food and energy — rose 6.2% year over year in April, keeping it at a level not seen in nearly 40 years.Much of this is, no doubt, created by supply shocks, which fall outside the central bank’s area of control, as Fed Chair Jerome Powell pointed out in his press conference earlier this month. The Fed can, however, affect demand in the historically tight labour market. Its plan to continue implementing  50 basis point (bps) rate hikes should introduce some slack — but the question is, how far will it have to go to achieve its goal on inflation?We are starting to see a moderate wage-price spiral developing in the United States, and as I've looked at the landscape, I don’t see a clear path to bring inflation back to the Fed’s 2% target in USD without putting the economy into a recession.Here are four charts about labour dynamics that explain why I believe this is the case.1. Workers expect bigger salaries to make up for higher pricesWorkers are asking for higher compensation because the prices of the products that impact their inflation expectations have surged. As the chart below shows, people’s view of inflation is very closely linked to the prices of gasoline and food. U.S. gasoline prices are already sitting at record highs, even before the peak summer driving season kicks off. And a number of factors, such as the war in Ukraine and a looming fertilizer shortage, are pushing food prices higher.Inflation expectations largely track food and fuel pricesSources: University of Michigan, U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics. Data as of April 30, 2022. Shaded areas represent recessions.2. Employers are raising wages given tight marketU.S. workers are getting the higher compensation they are asking for because the labour market is extremely tight. Many workers who went missing during the pandemic have not come back. Today’s U.S. unemployment rate is similar to before the pandemic, but the labour force participation rate still lags. It was 62.2% in April 2022, compared to 63.4% in February 2020, according to the Bureau of Labor Statistics (BLS). Employers also reported a record 11.5 million open jobs in March 2022, according to BLS data.The natural unemployment rate, which represents unemployment not linked to cyclical demand, has declined over time, but is still likely a full percent above the current unemployment rate, and perhaps higher.Compensation soars as unemployment returns to pre-pandemic lows in the U.S.Sources: Bureau of Labor Statistics, Congressional Budget Office. ECI = employment cost index. Data as of April 30, 2022. Shaded areas represent recessions.3. Productivity growth is not offsetting compensation costsProductivity has not been keeping up with wage growth, so unit U.S. labour costs have been rising sharply. In fact, over the past four quarters, productivity fell 0.6%, resulting in a 7.2% increase in unit labour costs, the largest since an 8.2% increase in 1982.Less for more: Productivity declines as wages riseSource: Bureau of Labor Statistics. CPI = consumer price index. Data as of April 30, 2022. Shaded areas represent recessions.4. Relieving this pressure could require growth to slow well below potentialThe U.S. unemployment rate may need to rise as much as 2.0% or more before wage growth starts to moderate. Okun’s law, which describes the relationship between employment and production, suggests if that were to occur in one year, it would require gross domestic product (GDP) growth to be 4% lower than potential, or the level where it would be if all of the economy’s resources were fully employed.Okun’s law indicates growth must slow to bring U.S. inflation downSources: Capital Group calculations, Bureau of Labor Statistics, U.S. Congressional Budget Office, U.S. Bureau of Economic Analysis. Data as of April 30, 2022. GDP = gross domestic product. Potential GDP is the theoretical level of where a country’s GDP should be if all its resources are fully employed. Y-axis on the right-hand side of the chart is inverted to illustrate the correlation between GDP and unemployment. Shaded areas represent recessions.The bottom lineU.S. Inflation appears to be increasingly entrenched and persistent. Interest rates, both short- and long-term, could go up  more than the market expects. The only way to really break the wage-price spiral, in my view, is to create a lot of slack in the labour market, which is done by pushing the unemployment rate up, which in turn could lead us into a recession.There are, of course, alternative scenarios that could come to pass, including: 1) inflation falls of its own volition, 2) the Fed capitulates and lets inflation run unchecked, or 3) the Fed achieves a “soft landing” (a moderate economic slowdown). However, none of these appear to me to be high-probability outcomes, and a soft landing may not free up much slack anyway.Given the Fed’s focus on taming inflation, which is being exacerbated by recent developments that include rolling COVID-19 shutdowns of cities in China and a prolonged Russia-Ukraine conflict, there is now a higher probability that we may be in a recession by the end of 2022 or early 2023.",Markets & Economy
Is the era of easy money coming to an end?,2022-04-20T09:07:00,"With interest rates trending downward for more than 40 years, investors enjoyed a powerful tailwind driving one of the greatest bull markets in history. But what happens when rates suddenly start moving up as inflation soars to levels not seen since the 1980s? We’re about to find out.Now that the U.S. Federal Reserve, the Bank of Canada and many other central banks around the world have committed to hiking rates and cutting stimulus measures, investors face an important question: Is the era of easy money coming to an end? As usual in the financial markets, the answer isn’t a simple yes or no.“It's probably the end of free money, but I don't think it's the end of easy money,” says David Hoag, a keen Fed watcher and a portfolio manager for Capital Group Capital Income BuilderTM(Canada).“Central banks will do what they need to do to get inflation under control, but I don’t think they will be able to go too far before the real economy starts hurting.”Free fall: U.S. interest rates have plummeted in the era of easy moneySources: Federal Reserve, Refinitiv Datastream. As of 4/11/22.The Fed, for instance, isn’t likely to raise the federal funds target rate anywhere near the long-term historical average of just under 5.0%, Hoag notes. The Fed’s key policy rate — which guides overnight lending among U.S. banks and influences many other forms of borrowing — currently sits in a range between 0.25% and 0.50% following last month’s rate hike.Hoag thinks the Fed will stop hiking somewhere around 2.0%. “That’s a significant increase from where we are today,” he acknowledges, “but it’s still very low on a historical basis. Anything higher than that, in my view, risks pushing the U.S. into a recession.”At the moment, market expectations are higher, thanks to hawkish comments from Fed officials over the past few weeks. The futures market is pricing in a rate of 3.0% by March 2023, including a 50 basis point hike at the Fed’s next two-day meeting beginning May 3.Fed rate hike expectations have risen dramaticallySources: Capital Group, Chicago Mercantile Exchange. Federal funds target path based on probability analysis of fed fund futures contract prices as calculated by the Chicago Mercantile Exchange. As of April 14, 2022.Over the past 14 years, the Fed has taken the previously unprecedented step of slashing its key policy rate to near zero — first as a reaction to the 2007–2009 global financial crisis and then to help support the U.S. economy during the COVID-19 crisis. Massive bond-buying stimulus programs also served to keep longer term interest rates artificially low.“You can’t keep money at zero interest rates forever,” says Capital Group economist Darrell Spence. “We are seeing the end of this current period of zero rates and balance sheet expansion, but I’m not convinced that we won’t be back here again.”Pushing the “easy button”The Fed, European Central Bank and other central banks have found the “easy button” when it comes to addressing periods of severe financial crisis, Spence explains, and it would be naïve to think they won’t use it when the next crisis comes along.“I’m sure history will look back at this period and find many reasons to argue that it was a bad idea,” he adds. “But, in the moment, it’s difficult to say what else we could have done or what we might do differently in the future. When you let the genie out of the bottle on this type of monetary policy, it’s hard to put it back in.”In the meantime, investors should brace for further volatility as high inflation, tighter monetary policy and the war in Ukraine continue to disrupt markets. Recession risk is higher in Europe, Spence says, because of its closer proximity to the war and dependence on Russian energy, but the U.S. economy is also slowing under the weight of broken supply chains and higher consumer prices.Spence doesn’t think a U.S. recession is imminent, but he puts the chance of an economic downturn at 25% to 30% by 2023, particularly if the Fed follows through with a full complement of rate hikes between now and then.What does an environment of low growth and rising rates mean for investing?Consider building an “all weather” portfolioDespite investor fears of tighter monetary policy, U.S. stocks and bonds have powered through previous periods of rising interest rates. During 10 such periods since 1964, the S&P 500 has posted an average return of 7.7% in U.S. dollars. Bonds have also held up well, with the Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index returning an average of 3.9% during seven rate hiking cycles dating back to 1983.The initial adjustment period can be tough, as we saw in the first quarter of this year, with the S&P 500 down 4.6%. Bonds suffered their worst quarter in 20 years, with a 5.9% decline. But over longer time periods, markets have tended to adjust, and bond investors in particular have benefited from the opportunity to reinvest at higher yields.U.S. stocks generally have done well during past rising rate periodsSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's, U.S. Federal Reserve. S&P 500 returns represent annualized total returns. Returns are in USD.Of course, this data comes with the usual caveat that past results are not predictive of future returns. And, in fact, we’ve never experienced a period where central banks are unwinding massive balance sheets — much larger than they were following the global financial crisis — while raising interest rates from zero (or even negative territory in the case of the ECB). A lot can go wrong.Such uncertainty makes building an “all weather” portfolio all the more important, says equity portfolio manager Diana Wagner.For active investors, the key to navigating difficult periods is finding attractively valued companies that can generate earnings and profit growth regardless of the economic environment, Wagner explains.“In this environment, there's going to be less tolerance for business models that can’t demonstrate a path to profitability in some reasonable time frame,” she says. That’s in contrast to last year when unprofitable tech companies rallied.That doesn’t mean tech stocks can’t do well. In fact, the information technology sector has generated solid returns during the last four periods of rising rates. But it’s important to be selective.Which sectors have performed best when interest rates rise?Sources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, S&P 500. Rate hike reference periods include February 1994–February 1995, June 1999–May 2000, June 2004–June 2006, and December 2015–December 2018. Average return calculations are based on annualized total returns. Returns are in USD.Wagner cites Microsoft, UnitedHealth and Marsh & McLennan as examples that have exhibited “all weather” capabilities in the past.“In a market where growth may be scarce,” she adds, “I prefer companies that have a demonstrated track record of making their own growth happen — companies with high return on equity, low commodity input costs and strong pricing power.”Moreover, valuations are paramount.“I think the era of not paying attention to valuations is gone,” Wagner says.",Interest Rates
10 investment themes for 2022,2022-03-31T10:30:00,"Investors are facing new risks and a market in transition. From the conflict in Ukraine to high inflation and rising interest rates, the future seems as uncertain as ever. And as central banks reduce stimulus, we are likely to see a shift in market leadership, along with sustained volatility.In these uncertain times, we believe it’s important to step back and consider the long-term trends that are driving companies and markets. That’s why we asked our investment team to highlight 10 themes they are closely following today.Some of these are within industries under pressure or facing near-term headwinds. But we invest in companies, not industries. It’s our job to analyze individual businesses, meet with management and invest in a select group of companies we believe are most likely to prosper in the years ahead.Here are 10 investment themes for 2022:1. Pricing power2. Tech trifecta3. Dividend comeback4. Health care innovation5. Transportation transformation6. China challenges and opportunities7. Media disruption8. Future of financials9. ESG everywhere10. Flexible fixed income1. Pricing powerDiana Wagner, equity portfolio managerI believe inflation will linger in the months ahead, making it one of the biggest risk investors face in 2022. That’s why I am focused on uncovering companies with pricing power that can protect their profit margins by passing those costs along to customers.Companies with pricing power potential include consumer businesses with strong brand recognition, like beverage makers Keurig Dr Pepper and Coca-Cola; companies in the fast-growing video games segment, like Microsoft and Tencent; and companies providing essential services, like Pfizer and UnitedHealth.Semiconductor companies with proprietary chip designs, like Broadcom, or Dutch chip-equipment maker ASML, could also raise their prices in an inflationary environment.Some industries have a greater potential for pricing powerSources: Capital Group, FactSet, MSCI. Reflects select industries within the MSCI World Index. Average and standard deviation of gross margins are calculated for the five-year period ending 12/31/21. Average gross margin is net sales less the cost of goods sold and is shown as a percentage of net sales. Standard deviation is a common measure of variation that tells how a statistic has varied from the mean over time. A lower number signifies lower volatility.With slowing growth, rising inflation and conflicts overseas, 2022 is off to a rough start. But I’m optimistic that an active portfolio of select companies with strong pricing power may help investors thrive in the year ahead.Go deeper:Pricing power can help companies fight inflation5 keys to investing in 20222. Tech trifectaMark Casey, equity portfolio managerSemiconductors, cloud computing and software — what I call the tech trifecta — are three industries I’m following closely this year.If pricing power is a key to fighting inflation, then the semiconductor industry is in a strong position. Supply chain disruptions have chip prices skyrocketing, pressuring manufacturers that increasingly depend on them. Anyone who tried to find a PlayStation 5 last Christmas knows what I mean.Even in the wake of supply chain issues, I see no end to the world’s appetite for semiconductors. Today a new car uses as many as 3,000 chips, and that number is growing with each new model.Semiconductors are the backbone cloud technology companies use to power their business. I believe we are still in the early innings of the cloud transition. For example, makers of CPUs, like Advanced Micro Devices; DRAM chipmaker Samsung; and ST Microelectronics, which develops microcontrollers, could all see demand multiply for years.Demand for semiconductors is soaring, along with pricesSources: Capital Group, Applied Materials. All figures are in USD. As of June 16, 2021.If chips are the backbone of the cloud, then software is the brains. Today, software is driving advancements not only in e-commerce and finance but also health care, education, transportation, construction and agriculture. It’s been a tough year in the market for many software-as-a-service (SaaS) companies. But my job is to look past today’s volatility to understand fundamental growth dynamics that can drive long-term returns.Go deeper:Storm cloud: Look past turbulence in software stocksSemiconductors could be the new oil: Here’s why5 technology trends to watch3. Dividend comebackCaroline Randall, equity portfolio manager for Capital Group Capital Income BuilderTM(Canada)Companies are shifting from dividend zeros to dividend heroes.Particularly in Europe, companies suspended dividends during the pandemic primarily due to political or regulatory pressure, but now many of them have surplus capital to redeploy as regular and catch-up dividends.You might think the search for dividend income starts with companies that pay the highest yields. While these companies can be sound investments, a high dividend yield can also be a warning sign and potentially unsustainable.Our research shows that since 2007, the highest yielding quintile of stocks had the lowest overall returns. We found the sweet spot to be the next bucket of dividend payers, those that yielded closer to 3%. This group included companies with more stable balance sheets and attractive dividend growth prospects.Businesses across sectors and borders are raising their dividendsSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream. Represents examples of companies that have raised their dividends during the two-year period from 12/31/19 - 12/31/21.This year, I’m focused on companies with strong underlying earnings growth that have demonstrated a commitment to raising their dividends over time. Increasing dividend payouts can be a signal of management’s confidence in future earnings growth. Dividend growers historically have tended to generate greater returns than other dividend strategies, while also keeping up with the broader market. Dividend growth can also offer a measure of resilience against inflation and interest rate hikes.Go deeper:Dividend growth: The secret sauce of long-term investing4. Health care innovationRich Wolf, equity portfolio managerLife-changing drugs are being developed and approved faster than ever. The COVID-19 mRNA vaccines from Pfizer and Moderna provide a powerful affirmation of the global nature of innovation.Will that breakneck speed continue in 2022? With recent advancements in genomic and proteomic analysis and the launch of many new modalities of drugs, I believe it will. Today we have new therapies designed to engineer how the body recognizes and treats disease itself that have the potential to extend lives and generate billions of dollars in revenue for companies able to develop them successfully.New drugs are coming to market faster than everSource: U.S. Food and Drug Administration. As of 12/31/21.But it’s not just drug discovery that excites me. A massive wave of innovation from health technology companies has led to improved diagnostics — both in the lab and at home. For example, Dexcom’s continuous glucose monitors allow diabetics to continuously check their glucose levels and integrate that information directly to an insulin pump.Companies like Exact Sciences and Illumina have developed liquid biopsy blood tests and genomic technologies that enable early detection of cancer and help in the research of complex diseases. In addition, as the technology improves, remote patient monitoring and home diagnostics are becoming part of the continuum of care.Go deeper:Medical miracle: Health care innovation saves the worldHealth care innovation reaches warp speed5. Transportation transformationKaitlyn Murphy, equity investment analyst covering automobile & components manufacturersLadies and gentlemen, start your batteries.The adoption curve of electric vehicles (EVs) has steepened thanks in large part to government incentives and tighter emissions standards for gas-burning cars, particularly in China and Europe. The price of batteries, which can account for a third of a vehicle’s cost, has also plunged. EV makers are now appealing to more consumers by introducing models with lower prices, better performance and longer range.Tesla has raced ahead of global competition in EV salesSources: CleanTechnica, EV-Volumes.com, Statista. Estimates as of January 2022. SAIC-GM-Wuling is a joint venture based in China.Although EVs are on the threshold of profitability, some will likely get there sooner than others. Tesla has been a clear leader, having briefly surpassed a market cap of US$1 trillion in 2021. Companies quick to embrace structural change and rapidly adapt have a better chance of success over the long term, whether they are industry titans or startups. Innovative manufacturers can also differentiate themselves with their use of software, which allows for vehicles that can learn and improve, become safer and introduce more services over time.Many believe the level of disruption in transportation will make it difficult for incumbents to survive, but don’t count them out. At General Motors, CEO Mary Bara is disrupting the company from within. In addition to its pledge to go all-electric by 2035, the company has invested heavily in Cruise, its self-driving unit. I believe it could be one of the future leaders.Go deeper:Beyond Tesla: Electric cars shift into the fast laneThese 3 laws drive innovation and investment opportunity6. China challenges and opportunitiesWinnie Kwan, equity portfolio manager for Capital Group Capital Income BuilderTM(Canada)Risks to investing in China have risen due to macro and regulatory issues. Investors need to tread carefully with sectors such as property, education and gaming. However, I believe there are still compelling long-term, secular growth trends that make the country an attractive market on a stock-by-stock basis.For example, China is positioned to dominate the global manufacturing supply chain for EVs and decarbonization solutions such as solar. Chinese manufacturers are producing high value-add parts at scale, including servo motors, electric drive trains and thermo management systems. A fast-growing home market for EVs is supportive of the supply chain development. China is already a dominating force in solar panel manufacturing, and it is increasingly leading in specific components such as inverters.Automation is another growth area, driven by manufacturing upgrades and an aging population. Japanese and European companies have historically dominated production of precision parts and components in automation, but Chinese manufacturers are rapidly taking share.Localization and import substitution continue to be big trends, not only in capital goods but in health care and medical technology equipment. At the same time, contract development and manufacturing organizations have become a sweet spot. These companies are partnering with multinationals on drug development, testing and manufacturing, often at lower prices and higher efficiency.Go deeper:What I learned on a trip through ChinaWhat does heightened China risk mean for investors?China's economy risks a sharp slowdown in growth7. Media disruptionMartin Romo, equity portfolio manager for Capital Group U.S. Equity FundTM(Canada)This January, three blockbuster deals announced over a matter of days highlighted the swift change of pace in the industry.If all three are finalized — Microsoft’s bid for gaming giant Activision Blizzard among them — it would amount to more than US$90 billion in M&A activity centered on video games, the fastest growing segment of the media sector.Driven in part by a pandemic-era gaming boom, the media landscape is fundamentally transforming the way people interact and entertain themselves. That makes interactive games all the more valuable to the likes of Microsoft, Sony and many others.It’s a testament to how powerful and alluring video games have become. The US$200 billion gaming industry provides compelling entertainment at a reasonable cost, and it’s already surpassed the movie industry in terms of annual gross revenue. Fundamentally, I think that growth is likely to continue and even accelerate in the years ahead.The disruption also extends to other segments of the media and entertainment world. Netflix, the clear leader in streaming video with over 200 million subscribers worldwide, is encountering fierce competition from Amazon and Apple, as well as old guard companies like Disney. The biggest threat to Netflix’s dominance may be Disney+, whose deep library of intellectual property-driven content has helped it attract 130 million subscribers in just three years.Go deeper:5 predictions for the future of media8. Future of financialsEmme Kozloff, equity investment analyst covering global capital market infrastructure providers and U.S. and European discount brokersToday the financials sector encompasses a broader set of opportunities than traditional banks and insurers. Among these are exchanges, data providers and asset managers. Financial exchanges that focus on equity trading may even benefit from increased volume during volatile markets.Financial exchanges have outpaced the broader marketSources: MSCI, RIMES. Returns rebased to 100 on 12/31/05. As of 12/31/21. Returns are in USD.I believe several trends will drive growth in financial exchanges. One is the modernization of fixed income trading, which is moving out of the horse-and-buggy era. As fixed income — by far the largest asset class in the world with over US$100 trillion in assets — moves to digital trading, exchanges like Tradeweb could see their sales volumes soar.Another driver of growth is the voracious appetite for data analytics. London Stock Exchange, known primarily for its equity exchanges, and Standard & Poor’s, known largely as a ratings agency and index creator, have built robust analytics offerings. Likewise, only a third of NASDAQ’s revenue comes from trading with much of the rest coming from its data services segment. I don’t think the market fully appreciates just how diversified many of these companies are.To invest successfully in financials, it can help to look really closely at each of these companies to understand what assets they own and where those offerings fit into the business cycle.Go deeper:In the money: Financial exchanges hit the sweet spot9. ESG everywhereRob Lovelace, vice chair and president of Capital Group and portfolio manager for Capital Group Canadian Focused Equity FundTM(Canada)Environmental, social and governance investing, or ESG, is everywhere, and it's only going to get more important.At Capital Group, we have fully integrated ESG principles into our investment process, and it’s a part of every investment decision we make. We don’t think of ESG as just an exclusion process. We think of it as identifying companies that are doing the right thing and supporting those in transition, such as oil companies shifting toward clean energy.This effort extends far beyond the energy sector. For example, buildings pump more carbon dioxide into the atmosphere than the entire transport industry. One of the most effective ways to reduce greenhouse gas emissions is to improve air conditioning and heating efficiency. Regulations that require the replacement of older systems with more energy-efficient products in Europe and elsewhere could underpin a long-term tailwind for HVAC companies like Daikin and Carrier.I understand there is some trepidation about how our industry will implement ESG concepts. People are worried about new government regulations, additional rules or expanded disclosure requirements. But I would say: This is important. While there’ a lot to learn, I believe we should approach it with a sense of optimism and enthusiasm.Go deeper:The future of ESG investing depends on deep analysisRob Lovelace on the year ahead10. Flexible fixed incomeDamien McCann, fixed income portfolio managerInflation is running hot — and that’s cooling bond returns. Speculation about the U.S. Federal Reserve’s path and pace of interest rate hikes has pressured bond prices.The good news? High inflation is partially a response to extraordinary consumer demand. The economy is doing well. People have jobs and cash — and they want to spend it. What’s more, many companies have strong balance sheets and are positioned for growth.In my mind, this means there are solid investment opportunities in corporate bonds. The post-pandemic economy may benefit casinos and cruise lines as demand returns. Energy prices have jumped, which could help both midstream and exploration and production companies. On the other hand, I think that rising labour costs and shortages could crimp growth for consumer-oriented retail companies. Restaurants may also feel the pinch.The relative value between higher income bond sectors such as investment grade(rated BBB/Baa and above), high yield, emerging markets and securitized debt is always changing. I’m focused on identifying which of these offer the most attractive investment opportunities for income-seeking investors. Recently, the underlying strength in the economy and the shorter interest duration in high yield and securitized debt have made those sectors more attractive.I take a flexible, diversified approach to allocating among these different sectors based on market conditions and investment insights. This could help create a more resilient income and return stream for investors.Go deeper:2022 fixed income outlookThe long unwinding road: Our take on Fed tapering and inflationKeeping 2022 volatility in perspectiveToday’s challenging environment is causing more market volatility than we’ve seen since the onset of the pandemic. Against a backdrop of slowing growth and high inflation, the tragic war in Ukraine adds a new series of risks and unknowns.However, history has shown that markets have powered through past periods of geopolitical market shocks. It’s important to remember that investors can still find opportunity in the midst of chaos — be it war, inflation, or recession. There are still many companies that are thriving and innovating, so that’s where we focus most of our time and energy.Equity markets have historically powered through geopolitical eventsSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor’s. Index levels reflect price returns in USD, and do not include the impact of dividends. Chart shown on logarithmic scale. As of 2/28/22. Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index is a market capitalization-weighted index based on the results of approximately 500 widely held common stocks.Our primary message for investors is to stay committed to your long-term investment goals. Don’t be disoriented by moments of crisis. Remember that markets over the long term have been resilient and have powered through many challenges. Now is the time to evaluate your portfolio, stay focused on your path and try not to let external events derail your objectives.",Global Equities
Is the spike in commodity prices sustainable?,2022-03-24T01:26:00,"For a glimpse of just how volatile commodities currently are, look at nickel markets. Prices doubled in early March. Then they fell sharply. Then the London Metals Exchange halted trading. This week, the market for nickel — a key component in electric vehicle batteries and stainless steel products — reopened but with strict trading limits.It’s just one example of how the global economy is being disrupted by Russia’s invasion of Ukraine. Russia provides about 20% of the world’s nickel supply. The threat of losing it roiled trading markets and sent buyers scrambling for other sources.Commodity prices skyrocket amid the Russia-Ukraine conflictSources: Capital Group, London Metal Exchange, Refinitiv Datastream, U.S. Department of Agriculture. As of March 16, 2022.Commodity prices have climbed sharply since the February 24 invasion, especially for materials produced in Russia and Ukraine. That includes wheat, oil and natural gas, as well as other key metals such as aluminum, palladium and copper.But prices were rising long before the start of the conflict, contributing to inflationary pressures not seen since the early 1980s. So, the crucial question for investors is: Are these price spikes sustainable?“In the short term, the answer is no,” says equity portfolio manager Lisa Thompson. “The market has overreacted, and we’re already seeing prices come back down a bit. But, compared to where we were a year ago, commodity prices are significantly higher — and I do think that’s a durable trend.”“Over the long term,” Thompson adds, “prices are likely to remain elevated due to a number of factors, including rising demand, supply shortages and deglobalization forces symbolized by the war in Ukraine and strained U.S.-China relations. Higher prices should be expected in a world where free and open trade is in retreat.”Metals industry poised to shineFrom an investment perspective, this has clear implications for the metals & mining sector. It has been a neglected area of the market for more than a decade — even longer if you exclude the last major price spike during the 2008 global financial crisis.The sector has been undervalued for years and remains so today despite a recent rally in mining company stocks, says Douglas Upton, a Capital Group equity analyst who has covered commodity markets for more than 30 years. Upton thinks many commodity prices will remain high for years due to chronic underinvestment by the industry since 2015. The problem is exacerbated by the fact that it takes more time than it did in the past to launch new mining projects.“It’s a multiyear process,” Upton explains. “Discovery, permitting and funding all take much longer. In price terms, that points to higher highs and higher lows until new investments start to produce results.” This dynamic doesn’t apply to food and other crops, Upton notes, because production in those areas can be ramped up much faster.Historically speaking, commodities are cheap relative to U.S. stocksSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's. The price ratio, between the S&P GSCI Total Return Index and the Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index is scaled to 100. Data shown from 2/27/70 to 2/28/22. In USD.“All of the big mining companies are undervalued in my view,” he says. “The market is not thinking enough about the consequences of the underinvestment theme. Valuations, and consensus earnings estimates, assume that commodity prices will decline over the next few years, closer to historical averages. I think that is quite wrong.”Case in point: Look at the market capitalization of the world’s seven largest mining companies. Even combined, they do not come close to the market value of a beloved new-economy company such as Tesla. The automaker needs certain refined metals, including nickel, to produce its lithium-ion batteries. So much so that Tesla CEO Elon Musk cited access to nickel as one of his biggest production concerns long before Russia invaded Ukraine.Mining companies toil in obscurity despite key role in global economySource: RIMES. As of 3/16/22. Mining companies represented (from largest to smallest) include BHP, Rio Tinto, Vale, Glencore, Freeport, Anglo American and Newmont.In addition to underinvestment, another factor that could lead to higher commodity prices over the long term is the worldwide push for sustainable energy sources, Upton adds. Electricity, in particular, has become a favoured resource. The expansion of the power grid — along with the rapid adoption of electric vehicles — will require lots of copper, nickel and other key metals.China: A counterbalance to rising prices?On the flip side, China’s slowing economy could act as a counterbalance to keep commodity prices in check. As the largest importer of raw materials, China consumes more than half the world’s iron ore, coal and copper supplies. When China’s economy slumps, the global commodities complex tends to sputter.China’s close trading relationship with the European Union could also expose it to a wartime recession in Europe if the war in Ukraine drags on. Moreover, China is dealing with a COVID-19 resurgence that could further hamper the economy as the government renews restrictions on travel and entertainment.“Even before the latest COVID outbreak, China’s economy was decelerating or at least stabilizing at a very low rate of growth,” says Stephen Green, a Capital Group economist who covers Asia. “Things are likely to get worse before they get better, and a sufficiently bad recession could cause commodity prices to fall.”China’s central bank will probably cut interest rates soon, Green notes, while most other central banks around the world are moving in the opposite direction.Investment implications: Inflation hedgeRegardless of where markets go from here, the current price surge confirms, once again, that commodities are an effective hedge against inflation. That’s not surprising since those very commodities — oil and gas, for instance — feed into many aspects of the global economy and can help to fuel inflation, which is currently running at a 40-year high.Historically speaking, energy — especially oil — has moved closely in line with inflation, as measured by the U.S. Consumer Price Index. Since oil is usually a major component of commodity-related indices, the long-term correlation between commodity prices and inflation is high.No surprise: Commodities are an excellent hedge against inflationSources: Capital Group, U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's, U.S. Department of Labor. Data shown from 1/31/89 to 2/28/22. Returns are in USD. U.S. CIP based in USD.However, it’s also important to note that there are big differences between major categories of commodities. Oil and gas, metals, food and agricultural products often follow their own cycles.Investors seeking an inflation hedge should keep that in mind, says Capital Group economist Jared Franz. “It all depends on the source of the inflation,” he notes.“Unsurprisingly, the energy sector tends to do well when inflation is rising because energy price increases, especially for gasoline, can be quickly passed on to consumers,” Franz says. “That’s not always the case with other commodities, where price increases can be absorbed as they move through the production chain.”",Inflation
Why we think the Fed is still behind the curve,2022-03-16T10:36:00,"The U.S. Federal Reserve raised the federal funds target rate by 25 basis points to a range of 0.25% to 0.50%, marking the start of what is expected to be a forceful path of monetary tightening. The central bank faces the challenge of taming inflation even as a commodities shock in the wake of Russia’s invasion of Ukraine dampens the outlook for global growth.Fed chairman Jerome Powell reinforced in his comments that the central bank’s primary goal is to tamp down inflation – which is running at a 40-year high – and that it will do what it takes to bring it closer to target. The central bank chief also talked positively about growth and the labour market. “All signs are that this is a strong economy,” Powell said. “Indeed, one that will be able to flourish … in the face of less accommodative monetary policy.”We maintain our view that inflation will remain elevated and that monetary policy is behind the curve. Markets are pricing in about seven 25-basis-point rate increases in 2022. Powell seems confident that the U.S. economy can withstand higher rates, and so barring a major fundamental shock, we expect the Fed will continue on its tightening path for the rest of 2022. He left open the possibility of a 50-basis-point hike but did not specify what might trigger such a move.Powell emphasized that he wants to see the month-over-month inflation numbers come down. The Fed is increasingly concerned about inflation becoming unmanageable, and its latest projections indicate it may move rates above its estimated long-term neutral rate of 2.4% by next year. The neutral rate is a theoretical federal funds rate at which monetary policy is considered neither accommodative nor restrictive.Consistent with this view, we favour positioning bond portfolios for tighter financial conditions by maintaining a short duration focused on two-year maturities. We expect the Treasury yield curve to flatten further, led by a rise in shorter maturities while long-term interest rates remain in a range.We also anticipate quantitative tightening (QT) plans could be unveiled in May and begin in June following another rate increase at the Fed’s May meeting. The central bank will likely shrink its balance sheet by not replacing maturing bonds. While actively selling securities is a possibility, it is not its preferred path.Peak fed funds rate has declined with each successive hiking cycleSources: Capital Group, Federal Reserve Bank of St. Louis, National Bureau of Economic Research. As of January 31, 2022.Tight labour markets complicate inflation pictureThe Fed remains focused on fighting inflation despite a dampened growth outlook given the war in Ukraine. Inflation rose sharply in February with headline and core metrics accelerating to 7.9% and 6.4% year-over-year, respectively. We continue to see broadening price pressures across major categories, and we see a 50% chance that the U.S. CPI will accelerate in the coming months. In shelter, the largest component of the Consumer Price Index, prices have increased 4.8% year-over-year, the fastest pace since the early 1990s. Even if you strip out shelter and other high-inflation categories, the CPI remains elevated and on an upward trend.Inflation is being driven higher by several componentsSources: Capital Group, U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics. As of February 28, 2022. Based in USD.The surge in commodity prices — spanning energy, metals, raw materials and agricultural products — will also feed into inflation. The Bloomberg Commodity Index doubled in the past two years, an increase not seen since the early 1980s. The greatest impact is likely to be felt by lower income consumers as food and gas make up a large percentage of their spending.With supply chain issues likely to remain troublesome and the war creating upside risks to food and energy prices, market participants are pricing rising inflation risk premia (a measure of the premium investors require for the possibility that inflation may rise or fall more than expected over the period in which a bond is held) into bonds. Breakeven inflation on five-year U.S. Treasury Inflation-Protected Securities (TIPS) has risen from 3.0% to around 3.5% this year, the highest reading since the launch of the asset class.Wage growth and a variety of other indicators point to ongoing pressure in the labour market, which Powell said Wednesday had reached an “unhealthy level” of tightness. In February, the U.S. added 678,000 jobs, bringing unemployment down to 3.8%. The labour force participation rate rebounded to 62.3% in February, its highest level since March 2020, indicating there are going to be fewer workers on the sidelines. We are also seeing historically elevated quit rates, signaling that workers have confidence in their ability to find other employment — often with better pay. Average hourly earnings stagnated between January and February but remain up 5.1% over the past 12 months.We believe the Fed’s most likely plan will be to move steadily toward restrictive policy with consecutive 25-basis-point hikes until policy rates are at or slightly above neutral. However, we are not ruling out the possibility that the central bank will move in a more forceful, Paul Volcker-esque manner. (In 1981, then-Fed Chairman Volcker sharply raised rates to contain runaway inflation.)In terms of societal impact, the Fed faces tough choices. If the Fed remains dovish, allowing inflation to run unchecked, food and energy prices would be among the most likely to accelerate. If it tightens aggressively and stymies growth, unemployment would likely move up and wage increases would be curtailed.Global overviewThe Fed is not alone in its path. Major central banks in Europe and the Bank of Canada have signaled a more hawkish stance in recent weeks as inflation continues to outpace their targets.The European Central Bank delivered a hawkish message at its March meeting, laying out plans to end its asset purchase program by the third quarter of this year and, in the process, paving the way for a potential rate hike.Despite the downside risks to growth stemming from the war in Ukraine, ECB President Christine Lagarde focused her remarks on the upside risks to inflation and stressed “optionality and flexibility” in the governing council’s policy stance. The front-end of the euro curve is pricing in roughly 30 basis points of hikes by year-end.Meanwhile, the Bank of England raised interest rates by 25 basis points March 17, bringing the cost of borrowing to 0.75%. This follows the 25-basis-points hike and initiation of passive QT announced in February. In Canada, the central bank raised its policy rate 25 basis points at its March 2 meeting bringing it to 0.50%. Canada’s headline inflation rate hit 5.7% in February from a year earlier, the highest since 1991, and well above its target range of 1% to 3%.  All in all, these actions should lead to tighter financial conditions in most of the major developed economies.Against this backdrop, we maintain a defensive posture in our fixed income portfolios. In U.S. core bond portfolios, in addition to a short duration and positioning for a flattening of the yield curve, we also favour a slight relative underweight to credit. Meanwhile, TIPS prices largely reflect inflationary expectations, so managers are more opportunistic based on where they see value along the maturity spectrum.In many equity portfolios, depending on investment objectives and mandate, we are starting to see managers selectively add to investments in energy, materials, mining companies, consumer staples and other consumer-related companies with a degree of pricing power.",Inflation
The war in Ukraine and its impact on energy,2022-03-10T01:19:00,"From a financial perspective, the February 24 Russian invasion took markets utterly by surprise. The global economy — already reeling from high inflation — suddenly faced dire new threats, including a severe energy shortage, a growing refugee crisis and the potential for a protracted war in eastern Europe. The following takes a closer look at the impact of the war on energy with perspectives from two Capital Group investment professionals.Sanctions pose a dilemma for EU policymakersRobert Lind,European economistThis week, the U.S. announced expanded economic sanctions against Russia, banning imports of oil and gas, and the U.K. quickly followed suit, banning Russian oil. But the European Union, which counts on Russia for a significantly larger portion of its energy supply, has not moved as forcefully, vowing only to cut its gas imports by two thirds within a year.A full energy embargo on Russia would be extremely painful for the major European economies, especially Germany and Italy and smaller countries in central and eastern Europe that depend on Russian gas imports. In the short term, the EU should be able to cope with offsetting imports of liquified natural gas. But the bigger challenge will come during the summer when gas is being stockpiled for winter. Higher prices will make it even harder.Analysis by the European Central Bank (ECB) and others show that a significant reduction in gas supply would have substantial negative effects on the euro zone’s GDP. For instance, the ECB estimates a 10% reduction would reduce euro zone GDP by around three quarters of a percentage point. Given that Russian imports account for around 40% of EU gas supply, an energy embargo could depress GDP by 3% to 4% relative to the pre-war baseline.International sanctions are mounting against RussiaSources: Capital Group, Council of the European Union, U.K. Foreign, Commonwealth and Development Office, U.S. Department of the Treasury, U.S. State Department. As of March 7, 2022. Note: SWIFT is the Society for Worldwide Interbank Financial Telecommunication, which runs a messaging and payment system used by more than 11,000 financial institutions. “Golden passports"" refer to residence permits that can be made available to foreign nationals and their immediate family via certain citizenship-by-investment programs.Unsurprisingly, the EU is wary of implementing sanctions that could have such a damaging impact on its economy. But if the recent spike in oil and gas prices continues or is protracted, the European economy will suffer a negative supply shock even if there is no embargo. Alongside steep energy prices, we are seeing higher prices for other commodities related to the global food supply chain. Prices are also rising sharply for fertilizer and building materials. At the same time, in the absence of an embargo, higher energy prices will boost Russia’s export earnings, mitigating the effects of the economic and financial sanctions.In the light of extreme uncertainty, I expect the ECB to avoid giving a clear signal that it will end its asset purchases. It will also have to closely monitor the inflationary shock this conflict brings. There is a growing risk of stagflation in Europe, which is a bigger challenge. Central banks would want to monitor any signs of inflation expectations so they don’t fall behind. I think they will continue to signal a removal of monetary accommodation, but at a much more cautious pace.Gas is more challenging than oil for Europe’s economyCraig Beacock, equity investment analystThere’s an important distinction between oil and gas that seems likely to impact Europe and could ripple through the global economy, given the region’s standing as a major manufacturing and industrial base for automobiles, airplanes and chemicals. Oil is easier to supply and ship around the world when regions experience supply disruptions. Natural gas, on the other hand, is much less fungible. It is far more difficult to transport, whether through pipelines or LNG liquefaction infrastructure. So, if Russian supply is curtailed and Europe faces major shortages, it would be challenging to secure replacement supplies. This would certainly be a blow to Germany, which is a large user of gas for power generation.In the commodities market, oil and gas prices have reacted very differently. While oil prices usually dominate headlines, the spike in gas prices has been more staggering. For example, European natural gas prices recently skyrocketed, trading at the equivalent of about US$100 per million cubic feet of gas. That’s roughly equivalent to US$600 for a barrel of oil. This underscores the disparity in how these commodities are transported around the world.Energy prices spike amid Russia-Ukraine conflictSource: Refinitiv Datastream. As of 3/4/22.I expect CEOs of oil companies and others in the industry to play a role in alleviating this crisis. In the U.S., I anticipate production to grow to 500,000 to one million barrels a day. Trading prices have recently climbed to nearly US$140 a barrel. I don’t think oil producers want prices at this level because it creates volatility and destroys demand. In my view, most oil stocks are priced for the commodity to trade in the range of US$60 to US$70 a barrel.I do not expect this to significantly derail the world’s shift to green energy, but I do think it shows how the policy lines around energy security and sustainability could change, especially in Europe. Going forward, I expect policymakers will put a much greater emphasis on balancing the environmental side of things with the social ramifications of what could happen if they do not shore up energy security and insure they have the right supplies from the right partners.Prior to the invasion of Ukraine, equity markets had been signaling to oil companies a preference for dividends and buybacks and less investment in pumping oil — partly because many such projects over the past decade had poor returns on capital. Oil companies have ample cash flow, and if capital expenditures are increased, they should have sufficient funds to provide both dividends and share buybacks.",Energy
Investment implications of the war in Ukraine,2022-03-10T11:18:00,"Russia’s military aggression against Ukraine, Europe’s largest ground war in generations, has impacted millions of people and triggered a large-scale humanitarian crisis.The conflict also carries wide-ranging geopolitical implications for the future of European cooperation, the changing posture of U.S. foreign policy toward Russia and China, and the reversal of globalization trends that have transformed the world since the end of the Cold War. What follows are a range of views from across Capital Group’s investment team including those of a political economist and equity and fixed income portfolio managers.Conflict highlights need for fiscal pragmatism EuropeTalha KahnEuropean economistThe world has changed in a matter of weeks, with geopolitical and economic consequences that will reverberate for years to come. Russia’s invasion of Ukraine marks the end of an era of relative stability and peace since the fall of the Berlin Wall and opens a period of geopolitical peril.Putin crossed the Rubicon once he decided to invade, but he seems to have badly misjudged both the resistance the Russian forces would face as well as the manner in which the Transatlantic Alliance has come together in pushing back.He has managed to do in just over a week and a half what Western leaders have failed to do in over three decades of painstaking progress on European cohesion. However, we need to be careful in assessing how this conflict ends. In my mind, Ukraine is not going to retain the territorial borders it had before the invasion, and the world will not return to the status quo. Even if Putin backs down, we're likely to see lasting structural changes.On fiscal policy, I expect greater flexibility for the foreseeable future. It appears the European Union’s fiscal rules will be suspended for another year at least. And I believe the debate over revising the fiscal framework will take greater urgency. The threat from Putin’s Russia has also highlighted the need to shore up military and energy security. Years of underspending on defence means that European countries are far behind where they should be and need to invest a lot more. So far, Germany is the most prominent example of this shift in thinking.Pandemic, inflation, war: It’s been a tough start to the yearSources: MSCI, RIMES, Standard & Poor’s. As of 3/4/22. Returns are in USD.Calibrating fixed income investments in this new worldRob Neithart,fixed income portfolio managerRussia’s invasion of Ukraine is a geopolitical and economic shock, no doubt. Rising commodity prices will feed into inflation and act as a dampener on global growth. That said, we have entered this period with an upswing towards growth in many economies.The United States was leading the growth recovery mainly because its fiscal and monetary policy actions have been so supportive. On the other hand, China has been working hard to slow things down and tighten financial conditions. Europe was somewhere in between — recovering but not as strongly. And finally, there is a wide dispersion across emerging markets, with many economies just beginning to see a post-COVID recovery.Given this backdrop, our fixed income team is of the view that in the U.S., the U.S. Federal Reserve will largely stay on its path of lifting interest rates to contain inflationary pressures as labour markets remain strong and economic growth prospects are modest but positive. Our fixed income portfolios generally favour a short duration stance, especially in the three- to five-year part of the yield curve. Longer term interest rates are likely to remain anchored by investors seeking the safety of U.S. government debt. The Fed has signaled that inflation momentum is fairly entrenched in the U.S., and with these shocks, it could become even more so. The central bank still has a way to go before financial conditions are considered tight. So, in absolute terms, we're still looking at sharply negative real interest rates.In Europe, the European Central Bank may take a more cautious approach given Europe’s greater exposure to Russia’s economy and its dependence on Russia for gas.In emerging markets debt, risk premiums have adjusted, and we are seeing very high yields across the universe — somewhere in the 7% to 8% range in U.S. dollar terms. Despite the extremely severe situation in Russia and Ukraine, most emerging markets have continued to function well, maintaining continued liquidity. Investors that have a longer time frame will probably see very good returns, even though short-term volatility may be significant.Our fixed income team still favours local currency emerging markets debt given valuations and where many of these credits are in the economic cycle. Many emerging markets have continued to function in a way that resembles developed markets.Russian and Ukrainian debt markets are a different story. Before the invasion, Russia had one of the strongest credit profiles in emerging markets. It is not financially dependent on external debt markets and was a net creditor — meaning its hard currency assets vastly exceeded its liabilities. Russia had issues with its slow-growing economy, but the financial strength of its balance sheet had always been a positive. Ukraine, on the other hand, was moving to an improving credit and taking policy actions that looked positive for the credit profile over the long term. It had moderate levels of debt, and it did not appear to be in a situation where financial sustainability was in question.Now, obviously, everything has completely changed. Russian debt markets are priced for certain default. Ukrainian bonds are priced higher, but they’re still at a default level. There is no market making in these investments, partly due to sanctions.There are scenarios where markets might begin to function, even in the midst of sanctions. There might be peer-to-peer trading that gets set up, as happened after the invasion of Crimea in 2014. It is unlikely this would facilitate any significant change in liquidity, but it would help with price discovery.China is likely to accelerate development of import substitutionVictor Kohn,equity portfolio managerWe are looking at the potential impact of these developments across emerging markets and broader capital markets. Clearly, the fallout related to oil and gas and commodities more broadly is significant. Net commodity-exporting countries like Indonesia will be beneficiaries, while countries with a large oil import bill such as India will face challenges. Russia and Ukraine have been major exporters of agricultural commodities such as wheat and precious metals such as titanium. For example, by some rough estimates, about a third of the world’s titanium comes from Russia.Beyond commodities, I think this will accelerate the trend towards lesser dependence on cross-border sourcing for critical supply chain components. I believe countries will look to increase domestic production where they have capabilities. This will be particularly true for China.Exposure to Russia looms large for Europe, less so for the worldSources: Capital Group, IMF World Economic Outlook, MSCI, RIMES. As of December 31, 2021. GDP figures are annual. “Emerging and developing Europe” includes Albania, Belarus, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Bulgaria, Croatia, Hungary, Kosovo, Moldova, Montenegro, North Macedonia, Poland, Romania, Russia, Serbia, Turkey and Ukraine. Exposure to equity indices reflects the percentage of indices market value represented by Russian companies within listed indices.The invasion of Ukraine and subsequent sanctions by Western nations will potentially be a further catalyst for China’s party leadership to accelerate the country’s domestic capabilities in areas such as technology, pharmaceuticals and consumer-related products. They could also seek to secure energy and metal sources.China is likely to increase financial support for its leading domestic companies to develop a more localized supply chain that relies less on foreign multinationals. It had already been making this transition in its dual circulation strategy. It took on greater urgency after the U.S. banned telecommunications giant Huawei in 2019 and pressed other countries to do the same.Across markets, I will be looking to see which companies could benefit from import substitution and which could be challenged — and accordingly adjust portfolios.",Market Volatility
3 views on the Russia-Ukraine conflict,2022-03-03T01:10:00,"Russian attack brings long-sought European unityTalha Khan, political economistThere is no shortage of tragic events unfolding in Ukraine — from the loss of life to the shattering of international peace accords to the economic damage suffered on all sides of the conflict. But if there is a silver lining to this catastrophe, it may be found among the growing chorus of nations joining to oppose Vladimir Putin’s military aggression.Russia’s invasion of Ukraine has managed to do in one week what many observers of Europe have agonized over for decades: It has singularly united the European Union. Along with the United States and NATO, Western democracies haven’t been this closely aligned in purpose since the aftermath of the September 11 terrorist attacks.The most profound shift happened over the weekend with new German Chancellor Olaf Scholz signaling radical changes in nearly every sacred pillar of German foreign policy. Among other extraordinary measures, Scholz announced a one-time increase of €100 billion in defence spending and committed to allocate more than 2% of Germany’s gross domestic product to annual defence spending.Other European nations have signaled their resolve in various ways, including shipping weapons to Ukraine, accepting Ukrainian refugees and looking for alternatives to Russian oil and gas supplies. Russia is a major trading partner for Europe, and it remains to be seen whether the continent can forgo key Russian commodities given there are no easy substitutes.Russia remains one of the world’s largest energy producersSources: Capital Group, BP Statistical Review of World Energy 2021.Will this new-found European unity persevere once the Russian threat has passed? I believe it will. It must endure if the EU expects to thrive in a brave new world that has shifted from 30 years of relative peace and cooperation to populist politics, heightened trade tensions and outright military conflict.Geopolitics has returned as a major driver of world events. Political leaders and investors alike have no choice but to confront that reality.The U.S. economy, Fed rate hikes and the “R” wordDarrell Spence, U.S. economistWhile the threat to Europe’s economy is far greater, the U.S. economy probably won’t emerge from this conflict unscathed. Rising energy prices were a problem prior to the invasion of Ukraine and now are moving higher as global markets contemplate a world without Russia’s vast oil and gas supplies.That could very well lead to higher U.S. inflation, which is already running hot. Price increases among food, energy, and other goods and services essentially rob U.S. consumers of their purchasing power. That can put a damper on consumer spending, which accounts for about 70% of U.S. economic activity.Could it be bad enough to push the U.S. into recession?I’d put the chances at 25% to 30% by late 2022 or early 2023. The R word is a much bigger issue for Europe, of course, because of its proximity to the crisis and dependence on Russian trade, particularly in the energy sector. Europe is more exposed than the U.S., but both economies could falter if the conflict isn’t resolved soon.Trade with Russia is a key component of the European economySources: Capital Group, World Bank, World Integrated Trade Solution (WITS). U.S. dollar values indexed to 2000. Total trade volume is calculated as the combined valued of imports and exports.With the U.S. Federal Reserve poised to raise interest rates later this month, some market participants are wondering if the Ukraine crisis might give Fed officials a reason to keep rates near zero. Stocks rallied late last week partly on this sentiment, but I don’t see it happening.The Fed is in a tough spot. With U.S. inflation hitting a 40-year high of 7.5% in January — and a war-related energy shock potentially pushing it even higher — Fed officials have no choice in my view but to raise rates at their March 15-16 meeting. In an ideal world, they could pause. But at this level of inflation, I don’t believe they have the luxury. That said, the conflict probably means a hike of 50 basis points is off the table. Rather, a more moderate 25 basis point increase is likely.Fed officials have clearly telegraphed their intention to tighten monetary policy. Investors should expect them to do so.Stay focused on long-term investment goalsJody Jonsson, portfolio managerThe invasion of Ukraine is a shock to the system. It represents an overthrow of the world order we have known for the last 30 years. Markets had a hard time anticipating how this would play out and couldn’t imagine what actually happened. These events further add to the negative investor sentiment present due to rising energy prices, higher inflation and signs of slowing global economic growth.Since the beginning of the year, we’ve been in an environment where price-to-earnings multiples are experiencing a significant correction, especially at the frothiest ends of the market. If the crisis in Ukraine eventually causes central banks to refrain from raising interest rates, that could be positive for some companies with solid earnings growth that are reasonably valued, especially if oil is not an input for them. With oil prices above US$100 a barrel now, that will be a major headwind for energy-dependent companies.I’m also growing more concerned about the banking sector, particularly European banks. The economic outlook for Europe has deteriorated significantly in recent days. I think that creates more credit risk and raises the question of whether we are heading toward a recession later this year or next.Market shocks have often been followed by market gainsSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's. Values for 3M, 1Y and 2Y reflect the three-month, one-year and two-year price returns for the Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index, respectively, following the closest trading day to the listed event. Returns are in USD.It’s important to remember, however, that long-term investors can still find opportunity in the midst of chaos — be it war, inflation, or recession. There are still many companies that are growing and thriving and innovating, so that’s where I focus most of my time and energy.My primary message for investors is to stay committed to your long-term investment goals. Don’t be disoriented by moments of crisis. Remember that markets are resilient and have powered through many challenges. Now is the time to evaluate your portfolio, stay focused on your path and try not to let external events derail your objectives.",Market Volatility
Quick takes on the evolving Russia-Ukraine conflict,2022-03-03T12:05:00,"The following is a roundup of insights from our investment team on the Russia-Ukraine conflict, featuring views from our U.S. and European economists and analysts on implications for energy, cybersecurity, defence-related industries, financial services and more.The West is unitedJohn Emerson, political economist and former U.S. ambassador to GermanyThe transatlantic alliance has not been this united since the aftermath of 9/11. It’s quite remarkable how, after years of skepticism and finger-pointing — whether it was over NATO funding, the imposition of sanctions after Russia began the Ukraine war back in 2014, Brexit or the Trump administration’s America First agenda — Europe and the United States have quickly come together in response to Russian President Vladimir Putin’s unprovoked war in Europe.For more than two decades, the U.S. has unsuccessfully urged Germany to ramp up its defence budget, halt the Nord Stream 2 pipeline and reduce its energy dependence on Russian gas. Yet, within 72 hours of Russia commencing its invasion of Ukraine, German Chancellor Olaf Scholz signaled a radical shift in multiple sacred pillars of German foreign policy: defence spending will quickly exceed 2% of German GDP, including an immediate €100 billion infusion; German-made weapons can now be sent to Ukraine; and Nord Stream 2 has been halted.Historically neutral Switzerland has stunningly agreed to adopt all European Union (EU) sanctions against Russia, including freezing Russian funds in Swiss banks. Even traditional supporters of Russia, such as Miloš Zeman, president of the Czech Republic, have condemned the attack on Ukraine and called for harsh sanctions.We should anticipate significant Russian retaliation for these unprecedented sanctions. This could include severely reducing or even cutting off oil and gas exports to sanctioning nations, as well as restricting exports of titanium and other critical metals. While curtailing oil and gas sales to sanctioning nations would deprive Russia of needed revenue, China would presumably fill some of that gap — at fire sale prices. Moreover, Putin has used the time since the imposition of Western sanctions in response to his annexation of Crimea in 2014 to build up Russian cash reserves and enhance Russian resilience.Furthermore, we should prepare for the possibility of major cyberattacks on European and U.S. communications, energy and financial systems.The Germans are preparing for a reduction of Russian gas exports, making plans to backfill with imports of liquid natural gas (LNG). This will be complicated by Germany’s failure over the past several years to complete construction of regasification facilities at its North Sea ports. There is little doubt that energy costs in Europe are likely to skyrocket, which are expected to be inflationary and dampen growth.All that being said, Putin clearly miscalculated on two fronts: First, the fact that the West would come together as quickly as it did, despite European reliance on Russian energy, the newly elected government in Germany, and potentially distracting domestic challenges faced by U.S. President Joe Biden, U.K. Prime Minister Boris Johnson and French President Emmanuel Macron. Second, Putin miscalculated the intensity of Ukrainian resistance from both the military and civilians.Notwithstanding all that, sadly, in the end, I think we could end up with an ugly “peace,” with Russia expanding its control over eastern Ukraine after having severely damaged the country’s national infrastructure. It is hard to see how Putin backs down at this point, absent massive domestic opposition within Russia. I expect this war will get worse before it gets better.Biden and Europe walk energy tightropeTalha Khan,political economistMarkets have typically ignored major geopolitical events, or the impact has been more localized. The exception is when conflicts lead to energy supply shocks. A notable situation was the Yom Kippur War of 1973. After that war ended, OPEC, which was very much led by Saudi Arabia, announced a shipping embargo against the U.S. and Israel’s European allies. Oil prices skyrocketed, and the U.S. was particularly vulnerable, especially since it did not have the domestic production capabilities it has today.Biden is walking a tightrope of trying to punish Russia while protecting American consumers. The energy market is very tight, and with inflationary pressures and mid-term elections in the fall, I think this could push the Biden administration to renegotiate the Iran nuclear deal. If you have more Iranian oil coming back into the market, it relieves some of the pressure. But this is still not a long-term solution.It’s a messy policy debate within Europe and the U.S. on what to do about imports of Russian oil and gas. Western politicians are under enormous pressure from high inflation and its effects on real wages and purchasing power. So, while that has played a major role in policymakers providing sanction carve-outs for Russia’s energy supplies, public opinion could very well force a rethink on this. We can no longer rule out either Europe putting an embargo on Russian gas imports or Russia weaponizing its gas supply.That appears to be the logical next step, and one that Western countries have so far avoided in this rising escalation. Ultimately, the events that are unfolding now will hasten Europe’s energy transition agenda and, in the interim, lead to structurally higher energy prices. These factors (or uncertainties) are being closely monitored by the European Central Bank (ECB) and the U.S. Federal Reserve, who will be keeping an eye on whether these feed into medium-term inflation expectations drifting higher.EU policymakers may look to mitigate economic shockRobert Lind, Europe economistFiscal response: I expect European governments to use fiscal policy to support their economies in the face of the shock. We could see other governments adopting similar approaches to France, which has effectively pegged the price of gas for domestic consumers. While this is expensive, it would mitigate the impact of higher energy prices on inflation and damp the squeeze on real incomes. Governments might also consider compensation for businesses that are big users of gas.As in the pandemic, national governments are likely to lead the fiscal response. Both Germany’s Scholz and Italian Prime Minister Mario Draghi spoke about the need for European solidarity. Given the potential scale of the shock, the EU will likely suspend its fiscal rules again this year, and there might well be discussions about extending or enlarging the size of the Recovery Fund (the EU’s collective fiscal response to the pandemic). As the EU considers its energy security and energy transition, it could conclude that such spending requires more fiscal integration across the bloc.Central bank policy: The ECB and the Bank of England must decide whether to press on with their intended monetary policy tightening. A substantial energy-induced inflation shock creates an acute policy dilemma. While central banks would typically look through such a terms-of-trade shock, they will be aware of the lessons of the oil shocks of the 1970s. I expect both central banks to proceed cautiously given the extreme uncertainty around the scale and duration of the current shock.Gas supplies: A further escalation of tensions could encourage Russia to restrict the supply of gas to the EU, or the EU could impose restrictions on gas imports. The EU has stored gas and could increase imports of LNG to see it through to the spring. Even so, in a worst-case scenario, the big users (Germany and Italy) might be forced to ration gas to heavy industry, inflicting a further economic shock. The United Kingdom has relatively low supplies of gas and imports primarily from Norway. But the U.K. is exposed to higher prices and could suffer if Norway diverts supply to the EU.U.S. economy faces heightened inflation riskDarrell Spence,U.S. economistWhile the threat to Europe’s economy is far greater, the U.S. economy probably won’t emerge from this conflict unscathed. Rising energy prices were a problem prior to the invasion of Ukraine, and now are moving higher as global markets contemplate a world without Russia’s vast oil and gas supplies.That could very well lead to higher U.S. inflation, which is already running hot. Price increases for food, energy, and other goods and services essentially rob U.S. consumers of their purchasing power. That can put a damper on consumer spending, which accounts for about 70% of U.S. economic activity.Could it be bad enough to push the U.S. into recession? I’d put the chances at 25%–30% by late 2022 or early 2023. The R word is a much bigger issue for Europe, of course, because of its proximity to the crisis and dependence on Russian trade, particularly in the energy sector. Europe is more exposed than the U.S., but both economies could falter if the conflict isn’t resolved soon.With the Fed poised to raise interest rates later this month, some market participants are wondering if the Ukraine crisis might give Fed officials a reason to keep rates near zero. I don’t see it happening.The Fed is in a tough spot. With U.S. inflation hitting a 40-year high of 7.5% in January — and a war-related energy shock potentially pushing it even higher — Fed officials have no choice in my view but to raise rates at their March 15–16 meeting. In an ideal world, they could pause. But at this level of inflation, I don’t believe they have the luxury. That said, the conflict probably means a hike of 50 basis points is off the table. Rather, a more moderate increase of 25 basis points is likely.Fed officials have clearly telegraphed their intention to tighten monetary policy. Investors should expect them to do so.Impact on European banksMatteo Merlo,equity investment analyst covering European banksDirect exposure of European banks to Russia is limited, and that too is spread among a few banks. According to Bank for International Settlement (BIS) data as of September 30, 2021, overall exposure of European banks amounted to €70 billion and foreign bank exposure in aggregate was roughly US$104 billion. I’m focused on potential secondary impacts, which are difficult to quantify at this stage and will depend on how long the conflict lasts and how it evolves.The impact of exclusion from the SWIFT system seems to have been limited so far. Only seven Russian banks will be disconnected from the global messaging system for financial transactions, excluding both Sberbank and Gazprombank.There might be some impact on dividends, however. So far, only Raiffeisen Bank has canceled the 2021 dividend, and it is likely an outlier. No other bank has signaled any change in the dividend policy. I do see some downside risk to return of capital, and in particular to buybacks, but not a broad policy ban on dividends.There’s no doubt that European banks need higher interest rates in Europe to improve their net interest margins, and the rise in rates has been put in question with this geopolitical shock. That said, the valuation of European banks is not yet discounting a higher rate regime.Energy price stabilization largely depends on sanctionsPrzemek Nowak, equity investment analyst covering energyThe current conflict has been boosting global energy prices, but I would not go as far as arguing that they can now only keep going higher. Having said this, where we go on energy prices depends on the extent of U.S. and European sanctions against Russia. Importantly for the global energy complex, Russian oil and gas have been excluded from the sanctions for now. If this holds, it means we should expect some stabilization in oil and gas prices, although at higher levels.Clearly, this is a very dynamic situation, and I would look for the following signposts as far as energy prices are concerned: One, further sanctions from the U.S. and Europe on Russian exports would imply higher prices in the short and medium term; and two, if we see Russia attain its strategic goals in the Ukraine, however those goals are defined, the sooner oil prices could decline to a more reasonable range of around US$80–US$90 per barrel. This assumes some “permanent” political risk premium.Invasion of Ukraine could mark turning point for cybersecurityJulien Gaertner,equity investment analyst covering cybersecurityAs the war in Ukraine unfolds, cyberwarfare is likely to play a role. I suspect we will be confronted with some incredibly ugly realities that need addressing. My initial assessment is that this will support increased cybersecurity spending in the near term, but it will be more likely a meaningful inflection point for the industry. The Overton window (the range of policies politically acceptable to the mainstream population at a given time) around cyberwarfare as a tool in international relations could open wide and expose incredible weakness in U.S. and EU security.Most U.S. critical infrastructure assets fail even basic cybersecurity protocols and penetration testing. I feel reasonably good about the U.S.’s large financial institutions’ security and the tech companies, but that’s about it. Energy and utility companies in both the U.S. and Europe have substantially underinvested in cybersecurity, and many companies remain vulnerable.Against this backdrop I think cybersecurity investments have strong potential. I have been positive on the cybersecurity industry for two reasons: 1) the spending outlook and 2) the fundamental change in industry structure that allows for platform formation and hence more sustainable growth.In the short term, I think accelerating cybersecurity budgets among corporations, and U.S. federal and state governments is a near certainty. And if the situation in Ukraine escalates, I think there is a chance for much more pronounced long-term changes.The single biggest change could be a substantially different regulatory environment. Federal and state laws could become extremely prescriptive about minimum cybersecurity standards, especially in industries that are relevant to national security or impact the public. We could see an enormous investment cycle, specifically in the energy and utility sectors. In Europe as well, we could see a massive cybersecurity investment cycle and possibly an acceleration in cloud migrations.U.S. defence scenario analysisShane Fogarty,investment analyst covering defence and other industriesGiven the inherent difficulty of predicting geopolitical events, one has to plan for a range of outcomes for the U.S. defence complex. Assuming Putin stays in power after this war ends, I believe U.S. defence spending will accelerate from 2% to 3% year-over-year growth to 4% to 5% year-over-year growth over the next three years.The U.S. defence budget growth drives U.S. defence stock prices. In addition to better fundamentals ahead, defence stocks are still cheap and consensus estimates could be too low. My belief is that these events will be significantly more impactful for European defence than for the U.S., but I can still pencil out double-digit base case returns for the entire defence group from current levels.The setup today is supportive of this sector given the full-scale invasion of Ukraine coupled with the reaction from Germany, which announced it is substantially increasing defence spending. EU countries are taking Russia’s actions seriously. It is not clear how the U.S. government will react as it relates to defence spending, but I think it’s reasonable that we could see 4%–5% growth from current levels, given the need to modernize the force and compete with Russia and China. U.S. defence spending as a percentage of GDP is near all-time lows of 3.2% versus a level of 4%–5% that we have seen during periods of heightened threat levels or war, leaving a lot of headroom for budget growth in the U.S.",Markets & Economy
Russia-Ukraine conflict threatens global economy,2022-02-24T08:13:00,"Russia’s invasion of Ukraine has triggered a swift response from U.S., European and Canadian governments. The imposition of economic sanctions is dominating the financial pages, but there are two other aspects of this crisis that I believe will have a more profound impact on the world economy. The first is the rising price of oil, which is now above US$100 a barrel. We know from previous instances of geopolitical uncertainty, such as when Russia invaded Crimea in 2014, higher oil prices can have a significant drag on global economic activity.From a European perspective, the more serious concern is what's happened to natural gas prices, which are already elevated. This reflects the concern that we will see a significant disruption of Russian gas supplies to the European Union. Ongoing geopolitical instability will likely push gas prices even higher. This will be especially problematic for countries such as Germany and Italy, two of Europe’s largest economies.The major European economies have already experienced a steep rise in energy prices. Oil prices tend to feed through quickly to consumer prices. But the pass-through of gas prices from wholesale to retail varies, especially given support from governments seeking to protect consumers. Recent increases likely will continue to feed into consumer prices over the next few months.Equity markets have historically powered through geopolitical eventsSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor’s. Chart shown on a logarithmic scale. Index levels reflect price returns, and do not include the impact of dividends. As of January 31, 2022Germany’s announcement that it would not certify Nord Stream 2, a new gas pipeline from Russia to Germany, does not have any direct impact on supply as it’s not yet operational. Still, it’s possible we could see more significant disruption to Europe’s supply if Russia retaliates by restricting exports to the EU. This would hurt the Russian economy as well, of course, but Russia has built up its currency reserves to protect against such an eventuality.Volatility hubFind resources to help clients navigate unsteady markets.GOAnother pressing issue is what elevated commodity prices could mean for central bank policy.We may be in for another negative supply shock, which effectively raises inflation and depresses economic growth. I believe the U.S. Federal Reserve and the European Central Bank will proceed more cautiously in terms of tightening monetary policy. Both will likely wait to see how financial markets and commodity prices react. Ultimately, I think the Fed will raise interest rates but perhaps do so more gradually than markets anticipated a week ago.I also expect European governments to step up support for households and companies to protect them from higher energy prices, reinforcing measures taken over the past few months. In a worst-case scenario of severe supply disruptions and elevated prices, governments might have to curtail energy demand and compensate affected companies and industries.While the major European economies can cope with short-term supply disruptions and price volatility, there are growing concerns about the security of Europe’s energy supply in the medium term. It will be challenging for the EU to rebuild its gas storage in the spring and summer if there are continuing supply disruptions and demand remains strong.As countries phase out coal the need for gas has increased. The German government has also confirmed the closure of its remaining nuclear plants by the end of 2022. There will be mounting pressure on European governments to continue their build-out of other energy sources. But this will take time, leaving Europe vulnerable to any further deterioration in relations with Russia.",Market Volatility
How to handle market declines,2022-02-11T09:43:00,"You wouldn’t be human if you didn’t fear loss.Nobel Prize-winning psychologist Daniel Kahneman demonstrated this with his loss aversion theory, showing that people feel the pain of losing money more than they enjoy gains. The natural instinct is to flee the market when it starts to plummet, just as greed prompts people to jump back in when stocks are skyrocketing. Both can have negative impacts.But smart investing can overcome the power of emotion by focusing on relevant research, solid data and proven strategies. Here are seven principles that can help fight the urge to make emotional decisions in times of market turmoil.1. Market declines are part of investingOver long periods of time, stocks tend to move steadily higher, but history tells us that stock market declines are an inevitable part of investing. The good news is that corrections (defined as a 10% or more decline), bear markets (an extended 20% or more decline) and other challenging patches haven’t lasted forever.Market downturns happen frequently but don't last foreverSources: Capital Group, Standard & Poor’s. As of 12/31/21.The Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index has typically dipped at least 10% about once a year, and 20% or more about every six years, according to data from 1952 to 2021. While past results are not predictive of future results, each downturn has been followed by a recovery and a new market high.2. Time in the market matters, not market timingNo one can accurately predict short-term market moves, and investors who sit on the sidelines risk losing out on periods of meaningful price appreciation that follow downturns.Every S&P 500 decline of 15% or more, from 1929 through 2020, has been followed by a recovery. The average return in the first year after each of these declines was 55%.Even missing out on just a few trading days can take a toll. A hypothetical investment of US$1,000 in the S&P 500 made in 2012 would have grown to more than US$3,790 by the end of 2021. But if an investor missed just the 10 best trading days during that period, he or she would have ended up with 44% less.Missing just a few of the market's best days can hurt investment returnsSources: RIMES, Standard & Poor’s. As of 12/31/21. Values in USD.3. Emotional investing can be hazardousKahneman won his Nobel Prize in 2002 for his work in behavioural economics, a field that investigates how individuals make financial decisions. A key finding of behavioural economists is that people often act irrationally when making such choices.Emotional reactions to market events are perfectly normal. Investors should expect to feel nervous when markets decline, but it’s the actions taken during such periods that can mean the difference between investment success and shortfall.One way to encourage rational investment decision-making is to understand the fundamentals of behavioural economics. Recognizing behaviours like anchoring, confirmation bias and availability bias may help investors identify potential mistakes before they make them.4. Make a plan and stick to itCreating and adhering to a thoughtfully constructed investment plan is another way to avoid making short-sighted investment decisions — particularly when markets move lower. The plan should take into account a number of factors, including risk tolerance and short- and long-term goals.One way to avoid futile attempts to time the market is with dollar cost averaging, where a fixed amount of money is invested at regular intervals, regardless of market ups and downs. This approach creates a strategy in which more shares are purchased at lower prices and fewer shares are purchased at higher prices. Over time investors pay less, on average, per share. Regular investing does not ensure a profit or protect against loss. Investors should consider their willingness to keep investing when share prices are declining.When stock prices fall, you can get more shares for the same amount of money and lower your average cost per shareSource: Capital Group. Over the 12-month period, the total amount invested was $6,000, and the total number of shares purchased was 439.94. The average price at which the shares traded was $15, and the average cost of the shares was $13.64 ($6,000/439.94). Hypothetical results are for illustrative purposes only and in no way represent the actual results of a specific investment. Regular investing does not ensure a profit or protect against loss. Investors should consider their willingness to keep investing when share prices are declining.Retirement plans, to which investors make automatic contributions with each paycheque, are a prime example of dollar cost averaging.5. Diversification mattersA diversified portfolio doesn’t guarantee profits or provide assurances that investments won’t decrease in value, but it does help lower risk. By spreading investments across a variety of asset classes, investors can buffer the effects of volatility on their portfolios. Overall returns won’t reach the highest highs of any single investment — but they won’t hit the lowest lows either.For investors who want to avoid some of the stress of downturns, diversification may help lower volatility.No asset class has consistently offered the best returns year in and year outSources: Refinitiv Datastream, RIMES. U.S. large-cap stocks — Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index; Global small-cap stocks — MSCI All Country World Small Cap Index; International stocks — MSCI All Country World ex USA Index; Emerging markets stocks — MSCI Emerging Markets Index; U.S. bonds — Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index; International bonds — Bloomberg Global Aggregate Bond Index; Cash — Bloomberg U.S. Treasury Bills Index: 1-3 Months.6. Fixed income can help bring balanceStocks are important building blocks of a diversified portfolio, but bonds can provide an essential counterbalance. That’s because bonds typically have low correlation to the stock market, meaning that they have tended to zig when the stock market zagged.High-quality bonds have shown resilence when stock markets are unsettledSources: Capital Group, Morningstar. Dates shown are based on price declines of 12% or more (without dividends reinvested) in the unmanaged S&P 500 with at least 50% recovery persisting for more than one business day between declines. The returns are based on total returns in USD. As of 6/30/21.What’s more, bonds with a low equity correlation can potentially help soften the impact of stock market losses on your overall portfolio. Funds providing this diversification can help create durable portfolios, and investors should seek bond funds with strong track records of positive returns through a variety of markets.Though bonds may not be able to match the growth potential of stocks, they have often shown resilience in past equity declines. For example, U.S. core bonds were positive in four of the last five corrections of 12% or more.7. The market tends to reward long-term investorsIs it reasonable to expect 30% returns every year? Of course not. And if stocks have moved lower in recent weeks, you shouldn’t expect that to be the start of a long-term trend, either. Behavioural economics tells us recent events carry an outsized influence on our perceptions and decisions.It’s always important to maintain a long-term perspective, but especially when markets are declining. Although stocks rise and fall in the short term, they’ve tended to reward investors over longer periods of time. Even including downturns, the S&P 500’s average annual return over all 10-year periods from 1937 to 2021 was 10.57%.Sources: Capital Group, Morningstar, Standard & Poor’s. As of 12/31/21. Returns are in USD.It’s natural for emotions to bubble up during periods of volatility. Those investors who can tune out the news and focus on their long-term goals are better positioned to plot out a wise investment strategy.",Market Volatility
Is there opportunity in this stock market volatility?,2022-01-26T04:45:00,"Fears of persistent inflation and tightening monetary policy have rocked markets since the start of the year. More richly valued sectors like technology suffered the initial brunt of the sell-off as their valuations came under close scrutiny with the expectation of higher interest rates. The volatility spread to blue chip stocks with the Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index briefly entering correction territory on Monday before whipsawing back. On Wednesday, markets gyrated again before closing nearly flat as the U.S. Federal Reserve hinted it may move more quickly than previously expected to hike rates and shrink its balance sheet.Renewed geopolitical tensions, ranging from the Russia/Ukraine border crisis to U.S.-China relations, are also fueling market uncertainty and are likely to keep some pressure on asset prices in the months ahead. While volatility is likely to persist, several of our investment professionals believe markets are healthier than many people realize.Below are some of their views on how the market correction and Fed policy changes may provide an opportunity to adjust portfolios, taking selective action where they have long-term convictions to position portfolios for the next three to five years.Growth sectors still present opportunitiesThe severity of the market correction reflects an increasingly risk-off investor sentiment, hitting expensively valued growth stocks and speculative assets like cryptocurrencies particularly hard. Meanwhile, more value-oriented stocks in areas of energy, financials and consumer staples have fared better, suggesting that a longer term market rotation may be taking root.The NASDAQ Composite fell 7.6% in U.S. dollar terms last week, suffering its biggest decline since the start of the pandemic. As of January 26, 44% of stocks in the NASDAQ Composite were down 50% or more from their 52-week highs.How returns have differedSources: Capital Group, MSCI, NASDAQ, Refinitiv Datastream. Year-to-date return performance in USD is based on total returns relative to December 31, 2021. Returns are as of market close January 21, 2022.Netflix was among the hardest hit last week when its share price fell 22% on January 21 after reporting lower-than-expected subscriber growth. This triggered deeper concerns that even industry giants would not be spared from eroding demand, tougher competition and potentially deteriorating earnings. Within the technology sector, recent price action indicates investor preference for high-quality, low price-to-earnings (P/E) companies over the higher valued companies which tend to be more sensitive to rising rates.But volatility in the share prices of emergent companies is to be expected. Over the past 15 years, some fast-growing companies have experienced multiple corrections in share price. Those investors who weathered the market turbulence and remained invested would have realized attractive returns, however.Corrections and results from select big tech companies from 2007 to 2021Sources: Capital Group, Morningstar Direct. As of December 31, 2021. Corrections defined by share price decline of 10% or greater. Based on daily returns in USD from 2007 to 2021.In short, earnings matter. History has shown that certain high multiple companies can continue to appreciate should fundamentals exceed expectations over time. This is especially true for select growth companies with large and expanding total addressable markets with potentially long revenue and earnings growth runways.The U.S. Fed may accelerate tightening despite volatility spikes— Tom Hollenberg, Fixed Income Portfolio Manager, and Margaret Steinbach, Fixed Income Investment DirectorWednesday’s news from the Fed was a bit more hawkish than the market anticipated but it doesn’t change our outlook for the year. We continue to expect at least four (25 basis point) rate hikes and think inflation is likely to persist well above the Fed’s target this year. We have been thinking that a faster pace of rate hikes can’t be ruled out, and Powell’s comments at the press conference confirmed this.The last time the Fed hiked, it did so in 25 basis point increments each quarter. That is still probably its most likely course of action this time, but given how far above target inflation is, there's no reason why the Fed would want to limit its ability to hike faster if it needs to. In his comments to the press, Powell did not dismiss the possibility that the Fed would speed up tightening or rule out the possibility of raising rates in 50 basis point increments.Investors could be in for a turbulent ride over the next few quarters. It may not take many rate hikes or much quantitative tightening to spur more equity market volatility. But the view of Capital Group’s rates team is that the Federal Reserve is not likely to let the stock market throw it off the path of tightening, like it did in the last hiking cycle. If you go back to 2017 and 2018, when the Fed hiked 175 basis points, it had space to reverse course when asset prices plunged because inflation was below target. Today that is not the case.This would present a tricky dilemma for the central bank. It would be hard for the Fed to claim to be credible about achieving its dual mandate (of promoting price stability and full employment) if it backs off of its tightening schedule before inflation comes down.We are positioning to help protect against the impact of higher interest rates through duration and yield curve positioning, as well as owning Treasury Inflation Protected Securities (TIPS) as valuations still offer upside potential.A market correction may not be lasting— Darrell Spence, EconomistAlthough any period of monetary tightening can generate higher market volatility, U.S. equities could remain supported by earnings growth. And while valuations are high relative to history, they are not exorbitant considering current and projected levels of interest rates.I believe that S&P 500 earnings can grow 8% to 10% in USD terms in 2022, which is still a respectable rate considering the strong rebound in corporate earnings last year. In addition, while inflation is certainly a concern for overall economic conditions, it can be beneficial for earnings growth.Recent data would seem to indicate that inflation may persist for longer than expected and the Fed could be forced into a more aggressive tightening cycle than previously anticipated. While history suggests that tighter monetary policy and higher rates almost always put downward pressure on equity valuations, what this means for market levels depends on earnings growth and how much it can offset a contraction in price-to-earnings (P/E) multiples.In fact, perhaps contrary to conventional wisdom, the market has tended to rise in periods following initial increases in the U.S. federal funds rate. The exceptions to this are the inflationary periods of the 1970s and early 1980s, in addition to periods when the S&P 500 P/E ratio was more than 20 times earnings at the time of the initial tightening — periods which, of course, have some similarity to today.However, inflation then was significantly worse and accompanied by a deep recession. In addition, interest rates in prior periods of high valuation were substantially higher. While this is no guarantee that the equity market won’t decline when the Fed tightens, it does provide a bit more support than was evident during some of those historical episodes.S&P 500 has mostly powered through initial Fed tightening cyclesSource: Capital Group. Data as of December 31, 2021. The nominal rate of return is the amount of money generated by an investment before factoring in expenses such as taxes and inflation. Real return is what is earned on an investment after accounting for taxes and inflation. Returns are in USD.My base case scenario is for U.S. GDP to grow 2% to 3% in 2022 as fiscal stimulus wanes and monetary policy tightens. This slower — but still positive — economic growth should support an increase in corporate profits.While we are not likely to see the outsized gains of 2021, single-digit equity returns still seem attainable as the market rises in line with, or slightly less than, earnings growth this year. They are likely to be accompanied by more volatility, and we are starting to see that in markets. And while a correction is never out of the realm of possibility in any given year or economic environment, we do not expect a systemic market decline given current economic conditions, earnings strength and level of interest rates.",Market Volatility
"What the Fed pivot could mean for rates, inflation and the economy",2021-12-16T06:00:00,"The U.S. Federal Reserve announced on December 15 that it will move more quickly to end its stimulus, doubling the rate at which it winds down (or tapers) its asset purchase program. This puts the Fed on track to stop buying bonds by March, and clears a path for it to raise interest rates shortly thereafter. Fed officials’ latest median projections indicate they may raise rates three times next year, and three more times in 2023.Here are some top takeaways on the news and thoughts on the year ahead from Capital Group economist Darrell Spence and fixed income portfolio managers Ritchie Tuazon and Tim Ng.1. Getting ready for rate hikes in 2022Ritchie Tuazon and Tim NgThe most important signal from speeding up the taper is that it opens the door to more 2022 rate hikes. But, while Fed policy changes are an inflection point that can rattle markets, it is important to keep this news in perspective.The Fed’s latest “dot plot” chart shows that most of its governors now anticipate three rate increases for 2022. This is a big pivot from September, when only half of the members of the U.S. Federal Open Market Committee predicted rates would rise at all in 2022. It is also above market consensus of two hikes in 2022. Fed Chair Jerome Powell also indicated that the committee will start discussions on reducing the size of its balance sheet.Now our base case is that the Fed will raise rates three times next year. Despite the hawkish tone of the announcement, U.S. stocks and U.S. Treasury Inflation-Protected Securities (TIPS) did well after the announcement, and the yield curve steepened. If risk assets hold up and financial conditions remain loose, the Fed will have the green light to move even more aggressively to address inflation.Near-term U.S. interest rate hike expectations have risen due to high inflationSource: Federal Reserve. As of December 15, 2021.The December 15 announcement also represents a hawkish shift from Powell, who was renominated by President Joe Biden in November for a second term. Powell had previously defended the view that the inflation we see today was “transitory” and would resolve itself, but he abandoned the term altogether in his statement this week.In his press conference, Powell stated that the November’s jobs report, which included upward revisions to prior jobs reports, coupled with November’s consumer price index (CPI) update, which showed a substantial increase to inflation, convinced him it was time to speed up the taper.Powell noted that U.S. labour force participation numbers are still “disappointing” but said that he believes the economy is still making rapid progress toward maximum employment. “We have to make policy now,” he said. “And inflation is well above target. So, this is something we need to take into account.”The Fed appears to be interpreting the Omicron COVID-19 variant as an inflationary impulse but does not appear to be too concerned about its risks. Powell said that people are learning to live with the virus despite recurring waves, suggesting the economic implications may be limited.In addition to renominating Powell, Biden has also named new Fed Board appointees in recent weeks who are likely to tilt dovish, but we do not expect that they will rock the status quo and impede the new accelerated tapering schedule. San Francisco Fed President Mary Daly, who has been among the most dovish members of the Federal Open Market Committee, was among the first to come out and say the taper should be sped up.Others who are considered doves — such as Lael Brainard, who has been nominated to be the Fed’s new vice chair, and John Williams, president of the New York Fed — have also been making speeches indicating that, if inflation is above mandate, they will do what is necessary to keep it under control. This concern over inflation is bipartisan, so there is likely to be little political resistance to moving rates up to fight inflation.At the end of the day, however, we are still going to have low rates and low yields for the foreseeable future. The Fed’s longer run dot plot projections did not move, and calculations from the Atlanta Fed show the market expects the federal funds rate to be around 1.5% at the end of 2024, which is still a highly accommodative stance.2. U.S. growth likely to slow down but stay solidDarrell SpenceWe see tempered growth for the United States in 2022 as fiscal stimulus wanes and the Fed begins to remove accommodation. Our base case is 2.5% to 3% GDP growth, which is still a respectable rate. And although any period of monetary tightening can generate higher market volatility, we on the Capital Strategy Research (CSR) team expect risk assets to remain supported by strong earnings. Valuations are high relative to history, but they are not exorbitant considering the current, and projected, level of interest rates. A mild correction is not out of the realm of possibility, but we do not expect a systemic market decline.That said, there are likely to be more headwinds — in particular, inflation — hitting the economy in 2022 than there were in 2021. While this is not a complete surprise, given where we are in the post-COVID rebound, we will be watching closely for signs that they are exerting more of a drag on economic activity than currently expected as we move toward the end of the year.Rushing to the exits: The Fed has companyAs if responding to a cry of “fire” in a crowded theatre, the world’s major central bankers are now running to the exits when it comes to winding down emergency pandemic stimulus due to overheating inflation. Here’s a rundown of the world’s major central banks and where they stand on their way to the exits:Bank of Canada ended its bond-buying program — tapering — on November 1, signaling its intent to raise rates by mid-2022Bank of England raised interest rates (0.1% to 0.25%) on December 15 but maintained its bond-buying programEuropean Central Bank announced December 15 it would scale back its crisis bond buying in response to inflation but would not raise interest rates until 2023On December 16, the Bank of Japan said it would wrap up its corporate bond and commercial paper purchases by March 22, 2022 but made no changes to its ultra-loose monetary policies3. Supply chain issues are set to persistDarrell SpenceCurrently, stimulus-induced demand in the U.S. is meeting COVID-restricted supply, and this is creating imbalances that are keeping inflation elevated.With no more stimulus checks, federal Paycheck Protection Program (PPP) grants, emergency unemployment benefits, or debt and eviction moratoriums, it seems likely that demand will soften. Where supply goes is more uncertain. If COVID-induced bottlenecks clear up and supply increases, a new equilibrium could occur with inflation around pre-pandemic levels. This is the “transitory” scenario the Fed had been assuming.While much is still unknown about Omicron, its arrival does suggest that COVID will be with us for a while longer. As such, the “transitory” period — i.e., the period where COVID is impacting supply and generating inflationary pressures — has likely been extended another six to 12 months, and there is a risk that inflation begins to have a more negative impact on economic activity during that period.Unfortunately, there is very little the Fed can do to increase supply. Rather, to reduce inflation, it would need to suppress demand, which essentially means putting the economy into a slowdown or recession. However, we still do not know how willing it will be to push down an economy, particularly one that may not be at their definition of full employment, just to break the back of inflation.All that said, if one has a multiyear timeframe, “transitory” still looks like a strong possibility. Many of the factors that caused inflation to remain low in recent decades — in particular, globalization and advances in technology — are still in play. These factors should help moderate inflation in the long term, but in the near term, COVID and its related issues are likely to dominate the inflation outlook.U.S. employment is labouring toward full recoverySource: Capital Group, Haver. Data as of September 2021. Shaded areas represent recession periods as determined by the U.S. National Bureau of Economic Research.4. Equity markets are likely to stay resilientDarrell SpenceWe currently expect that equity markets will be able to ride this out next year, as slow but positive economic growth should support an increase in corporate profits. Understandably, there is a lot of concern about valuations, as the market price-to-earnings ratio does look high relative to history. However, it has been that way for years, yet the market has continued to march higher. Had one stayed out of the market due to concerns about valuations, they would have missed a lot of opportunity.One cannot look at valuations in a vacuum. They need to be looked at in the context of the interest rate environment. The fact is that low rates can support higher valuations (assuming the economy is not in distress, and we do not think it is). Looking ahead to 2022, it is possible that tighter monetary policy, and higher rates, could put some downward pressure on valuations, but we also expect that an ongoing recovery in earnings could offset much, if not all, of that contraction.What level of interest rates might be problematic?Sources: Capital Group, FactSet, Federal Reserve, Standard & Poor's. Dots represent monthly data from January 31, 1950, to August 31, 2021.As an aside, there is a school of thought that suggests rising yields will not start to exert significant downward pressure on the equity market until the 10-year U.S. Treasury yield reaches 5.0%, because that is the level at which the correlation between bond yields and equity prices has reversed, twice, over time. This flip-flop in correlation could be total coincidence, but it could also have occurred because yields above 5.0% indicate that inflation has become a dominant factor driving valuations. If there is anything to the 5.0% threshold, then the current 10-year yield, at 1.4%, appears to be a long way away from a level that has, at least historically, created a headwind for the equity market.While we will likely not see the gains that we have seen over the past year or so, we on the Capital Strategy Research team believe single-digit equity returns to be attainable as the market rises in line with, or slightly less than, earnings growth in 2022.",Fed
The pros and cons of Bitcoin,2021-12-12T12:52:00,"For advisor use only. Not for use with investors.Rarely has an emerging technological development captured as much attention as Bitcoin in such a short period of time.The debate over Bitcoin — and the cryptocurrency craze it has spawned — runs the gamut from advocates who see it as the future of finance to skeptics who compare it to a classic pyramid scheme. As the arguments intensify, so have the stakes: The market capitalization of the crypto universe has increased from roughly US$200 billion in 2019 to more than US$2.2 trillion at the end of 2021.The rapid growth of the crypto industry has inspired a lively debate among Capital Group’s investment professionals, as well. To provide a glimpse into these discussions, we are sharing thoughts from two of Capital’s brightest minds on the advantages and disadvantages of Bitcoin.Mark Casey, an equity portfolio manager, provides the “pro” argument, while Douglas Upton, an equity analyst covering the metals and mining industry, provides the “con” rebuttal.We start with perhaps the toughest question of all:Given Bitcoin’s volatility, how can investors determine a reasonable price for it?Mark Casey:Bitcoin's valuation is a real paradox. On the one hand, it’s an asset that can never produce earnings and, like all assets that can never produce earnings, it has an intrinsic value of zero. You can't do a discounted cash flow analysis of Bitcoin just as you can’t do a discounted cash flow analysis of gold, or a Stradivarius violin, or fine art, or any other form of collectible. Anything that can't produce earnings is only worth what other people will pay for it. And so, in a sense, the valuation is completely arbitrary.On the other hand, I think Bitcoin might become one of the most valuable assets in the world. And the reason is, the unique properties of Bitcoin are almost universally interesting to everybody who interacts with money.1. No one can create any more of it.There will always be a supply cap of 21 million bitcoins, so no person or government can dilute your position by printing more.2. Bitcoin is the only form of money that can’t be censored.It’s available for use by anyone with an internet connection, and no one can stop you from sending or receiving a transaction.3. It’s hard to confiscate.Your bitcoin is really just a password. You can carry it around in your head, or write it down, and take it with you across any border in the world. Unlike the money in your chequing account, it can’t be confiscated by the government or creditors.Half the people in the world live under authoritarian regimes that can block them from using the money system or remove money directly from their bank accounts, so I think there's tremendous appeal to this type of asset. There’s roughly US$600 trillion of wealth in the world. If Bitcoin gains a larger share of that, the price can go up a lot.Douglas Upton:I’m kind of jealous, actually. I wish I had thought of creating something that’s divisible, with rules that can’t be changed and a limited supply — and then convince people to buy it from me. I honestly feel like I would have been laughed out of the room. Mark puts Bitcoin in the same category as fine art and fancy violins. You can always question the valuation, but the scarcity of those items is genuine. Whereas the scarcity of Bitcoin is artificial; someone just made it up.When I look at the history of Bitcoin, it was originally established as a way of sending money over the internet, and it's bad at that. It’s very inefficient. Over time, somehow the thesis changed to: “It’s a store of value.” As an analyst who has followed gold for many decades, I feel like I've seen this movie before.“The financial markets don’t need Bitcoin, but Bitcoin needs the financial markets.”In my first job I worked on the biggest bullion desk in the world. We would say, ""Well, if everybody put 5% of their assets in gold, the gold price would be a lot higher."" And now here we are with Bitcoin. It’s the same argument.What’s driving Bitcoin’s price surge?Sources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Eikon. As of 12/19/2021.The price of Bitcoin is set by the financial markets — by people who are buying it solely because they think other people will pay more for it in the future. That sounds a lot like a pyramid scheme to me. The financial markets don’t need Bitcoin, but Bitcoin needs the financial markets. People can make a lot of money and they can lose a lot of money, but putting an intellectual framework around Bitcoin’s valuation is near impossible.Is Bitcoin an effective hedge against inflation?Casey:I think Bitcoin will prove to be an excellent inflation hedge. If you look around the world, there are about US$100 trillion of assets held in various forms of cash. All of it is essentially losing purchasing power over time because governments tend to print fiat currency faster than the economy grows.There's also about US$125 trillion of bonds and about US$20 trillion of them have negative yields, so investors know they will lose money. There are many more bonds where inflation is probably going to be larger than the coupon. So investors think they're going to earn 3%, but they will actually lose 3% if inflation turns out to be 6%.“Bitcoin is the only form of money in human history where you can't change the monetary policy and you can't print more.”Some of those people are going to look at their portfolios and say, “It would be nice to own something that can actually hold its value or goes up over time.” They are going to look at their cash holdings and wonder why they are losing purchasing power in fiat currency. (The answer is money printing.) And some percentage of them will come to Bitcoin, because it is the only form of money in human history where you can't change the monetary policy and you can't print more.Upton:First, throughout most of history, negative interest rates have been rare. Holding fiat currency normally earns you interest over time. Mark’s argument only makes sense in a world with negative real interest rates. That may be the specific circumstance we are in right now, but throughout history, real interest rates have been positive the vast majority of the time.Second, if you’re looking to avoid currency risk, then the key decision is to get your money out of that currency. If you’re in Lebanon, for instance, and the Lebanese pound has just collapsed, you would have been fine whether you moved into gold, Bitcoin, the U.S. dollar, or New York real estate.Third, there are lots of tangible assets that can work well as a hedge against inflation, including nearly every commodity you can think of. Commodities have been an effective inflation hedge over many cycles. The point is, you have choices and many of them have a much longer track record than Bitcoin.Is Bitcoin mining bad for the environment?Upton:Bitcoin mining uses more electricity than some countries, and most countries around the world are working hard to reduce their carbon footprint. Any use of energy that doesn't go toward the sustenance of people I think is questionable and should be examined closely.Bitcoin mining consumes more power than some nationsSources: Capital Group, Cambridge Centre for Alternative Finance, U.S. Energy Information Association (EIA). ""TWh"" refers to terawatt-hours. Latest available country figures are from 2019, while Bitcoin's estimated energy consumption is based upon trailing 12-month energy consumption, as of November 2021.According to various estimates, Bitcoin mining uses over 100 terawatt hours of electricity per year. If you purchase that energy even in a low-cost electricity system, it’s going to run US$3 billion to US$4 billion a year. We should think of this amount, as well as the other costs associated with Bitcoin mining, as a negative carry, similar to currency depreciation. It’s material and it’s meaningful.Society has to ask: What value is Bitcoin adding that justifies such a high cost and such a large carbon footprint? In my view, Bitcoin only creates value for a small number of people. It’s an easy win for the planet to say we don’t really need this.Casey:On the contrary, I think Bitcoin has a great energy consumption story. The software that drives the system is designed to thrive regardless of the number of miners, the price of computer chips, the price of energy, or the price of Bitcoin. The system is adaptable, and it flexes up and down based on these variables.Compared to other industrial activities, Bitcoin is one of the greenest industries on the planet. And it’s getting greener all the time because Bitcoin miners are uniquely positioned to take advantage of intermittent forms of energy, such as a temporary oversupply of hydropower during the rainy season.Today, Bitcoin miners purchase one tenth of 1% of all the energy in the world. So that means 99.9% of the world’s energy is going to other things. Even in a very bullish case where Bitcoin rises to US$1.5 million per coin over the next 10 years, miners will still be purchasing less than 1% of the world’s energy. Bitcoin’s energy use is negligible. It will always be nothing more than a rounding error.What’s the risk that governments will ban Bitcoin?Upton:I think there is a very real risk that governments will eventually decide to ban Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies or severely restrict their use. We’ve already seen it happen in China, and it could happen elsewhere if governments feel like they are losing control of the financial system.There is an interesting precedent, of which Mark reminded me. In 1933, the U.S. government banned private ownership of gold. That was during the Great Depression when the government was looking for every lever it could to control the supply and cost of money. For governments and central banks around the world, I think losing control is unacceptable.Bitcoin’s rapid growth could lead to its own unwinding.Bitcoin’s rapid growth has spawned many crypto competitorsSources: Capital Group, CoinMarketCap.com. As of 12/17/21. All figures are estimates and subject to change based on volatility in coin prices, circulating supply and foreign exchange rates. ""Market cap"" refers to market capitalization and is calculated based on current price multiplied by circulating supply as quoted on CoinMarketCap.com.Casey:I agree that some governments might try to ban Bitcoin. I view this as the biggest potential headwind to adoption and the best multi-year bear case, but it’s not a decisive bear case. I don’t think governments can extinguish Bitcoin — and attempts to ban it might actually accelerate adoption by people who are already skeptical of heavy-handed government intervention.Bitcoin was designed with a decentralized architecture precisely to prevent anyone from being able to control the future of the system — and that includes governments. Bitcoin operates outside government boundaries, and I don’t think it could be banned, although such a move by the U.S. or the European Union would certainly hurt prices in the short term. Over the long term, however, it could cause demand for Bitcoin to skyrocket.Will Bitcoin eventually fall prey to competition from other digital currencies?Casey:Bitcoin is built on open-source software, so anyone can make a copy of it, change a few variables and launch a new type of coin. That experiment has taken place literally thousands of times. So every person who holds Bitcoin has had thousands of opportunities to sell it and buy some other cryptocurrency — perhaps one that has a higher supply cap than 21 million or a faster method to process new transactions.What I find interesting is that so far, Bitcoin owners have considered these options to diversify and yet an overwhelming majority have said no. So I think Bitcoin is likely to survive in the same fundamental form that it exists today. It has seen plenty of competition over the past decade and it remains the king of the cryptocurrency realm.",Currencies
BoC going where no central bankers have gone before,2021-12-02T03:12:00,"Will the Bank of Canada (BoC) succeed or fail?That’s the question being asked by economists, analysts and investors as the BoC prepares to break from its G7 peers and embark on a real-time economic experiment to engineer a smooth exit from emergency levels of pandemic monetary stimulus.“All eyes are on the BoC,” says Tom Reithinger, fixed income portfolio manager on Capital Group Canadian Core Plus Fixed Income FundTM(Canada).Canada was the first G7 nation to start scaling back government weekly debt purchases — tapering — in April 2021. The BoC then announced at its October meeting that starting November 1 it will only purchase government bonds to replace maturing ones. The bank also jumped forward the timing of an interest rate increase, as it expects a full economic recovery sooner than previously expected. The bank had forecast a full recovery for the second half of 2022 and said it would keep rates at current levels until then. Now, the bank expects a full recovery and excess economic slack to be absorbed by mid-year.“The Bank of Canada was undoubtably hawkish in their October statement,” says Reithinger, adding that he expects the bank to lift its benchmark interest rate from 0.25% in the first quarter of 2022, just ahead of hitting a full mid-year recovery. If the rate hike comes to pass in advance of another G7 country doing so, Canada would set an example for other central bankers who will have to journey down this path sooner or later.Inflation upside riskAccording to Reithinger, the bank is now worried about inflation upside risk as the Canadian Consumer Price Index (CPI) hit a near-20-year high in October. This explains their willingness to be more aggressive in this rate-hiking cycle than through years 2017 to 2018.Consumer Price Index: Up, up and away?Source: Bank of Canada. The chart shows the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index (CPI) over the past 12 months from 1995 through October 2021. That’s when the CPI reached 4.7%, the highest since February 2003.“There’s no doubt in my mind the bank will be nimble and respond to the next few months of inflation outcomes, which the Governor reinforced in the press conference,” he says.Among the data outcomes the bank will be watching will be CPI core measures, which strip out the most volatile components in the index, and not just the headline all-in total CPI number.Running hot:CPI-trim, CPI-median, CPI-commonSource: Bank of Canada. The chart shows three “core” inflation measures — CPI-trim, median and common — the bank uses to look through transitory movements in total CPI inflation which better reflect underlying inflation trends. As shown, two of the three inflation measures have reached 20-plus year highs.Core measures have spiked with CPI-trim at 3.3%, CPI-median at 2.9% and CPI-common at 1.8% year-over-year. The last time total CPI inflation rose above the bank’s 1%-3% target range — May 2011 — all three core measures were at or below 2%. Within 10 months, total CPI, or so-called headline inflation, retreated and fell below target. But unlike 10 years ago, core inflation indicators are now telegraphing inflation.Inflationary signalsCore inflation measures aside, Reithinger is studying data points in the bank’s quarterly Business Outlook Survey, released the same day as the October monetary policy meeting. The survey polls a cross-section of business leaders across Canada, from about 100 firms.One of the key dimensions Reithinger is watching is a gauge of investment spending plans among firms on machinery and equipment and whether companies anticipate spending more, less or about the same as they did over the last 12 months.Open walletsIn response to this question, business leaders overwhelmingly said they plan to invest more. What’s eye-catching is the number of companies with higher spending plans —an all-time high over the past 20-plus years.“The third-quarter BoC Business Outlook Survey showed the highest capital expenditure plans since the beginning of the survey,” says Reithinger, who continues, “Higher capital expenditure signals that businesses are confident in future growth, which tends to be inflationary.”Long shopping lists: Plans to invest to meet demand are widespreadSource: Bank of Canada, Business Outlook Survey Q3, 2021, chart 8. The chart shows the percentage balance of opinion among firms expecting to spend more on machinery and equipment minus the percentage expecting to spend less compared to the prior 12 months.Another key survey gauge for Reithinger is expectations for wage growth. Again, firms anticipate the biggest jump in wage growth since the survey began more than two decades ago.More per hour: Expectations of faster wage growth are widespreadSource: Bank of Canada, Business Outlook Survey Q3, 2021, chart 10. The chart shows the percentage of firms expecting higher labour cost increases minus the percentage expecting lower labour cost increases. At an all-time high, firms reported their compensation plans are fuelled by the need to attract and retain workers amid strong labour demand.“Faster wage growth tends to feed into overall inflation with a lag during steady periods of economic growth. Hence, I expect the wage effects to be felt in Canadian inflation during 2022 and 2023. Again, this signals that higher inflation is more persistent rather than transitory in the next few years,” he says.Investment implicationsBefore making portfolio adjustments, investors should remember that sustained periods of elevated inflation are rare in Canadian history. People of a certain age will remember the ultra-high inflation of the 1970s and early 1980s. But in hindsight, it’s clear that was a unique period. In fact, deflationary pressures have often been more difficult to tame, as students of the Great Depression will attest.More recently, in the aftermath of the 2007–2009 global financial crisis, inflation has struggled to hit 2% on a sustained basis. And that’s despite unprecedented stimulus measures engineered by a wide range of central bankers in North America, the eurozone and Japan.Inflation extremesAnother important point: It’s mostly at the extremes — when inflation is 6% or above — that financial assets tend to struggle. Stocks have also come under pressure when inflation goes negative, as one would expect.For investors, some inflation can be a good thing as evidenced by the performance of U.S. stocks and bonds. Even during times of higher inflation, both asset classes have generally provided solid returns as shown in the chart below.Stocks and bonds have done well in various inflation environmentsSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., Morningstar, Standard & Poor's. All returns are inflation-adjusted real returns. U.S. equity returns represented by the Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index. U.S. fixed income represented by Ibbotson Associates SBBI U.S. Intermediate-Term Government Bond Index from 1/1/1970–12/12/1975 and Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index from 1/1/1976–12/31/2020. Inflation rates are defined by the rolling 12-month returns of the Ibbotson Associates SBBI U.S. Inflation Index. Returns are in USD.An active approachAn active approach to fixed income investing is key, says Reithinger, as is the flexibility of the mandate to invest in a range of debt in Canada and around the world. Most recently, the Canadian Core Plus Fixed Income mandate reduced exposure to developed-market bonds while increasing exposure to emerging markets and inflation-linked debt. Portfolio duration stood at 7.5 years as of September 30, 2021 — lower than the mandate’s FTSE Canada Universe Bond Index benchmark of 8.1 years. Higher duration is typically associated with higher interest rate risk.All of which brings us back to the question at hand: will the BoC succeed or fail to engineer a smooth exit out of pandemic emergency monetary stimulus?“The BoC is treading a thin line between reigning in higher inflation and stopping the economic recovery, the outcome of which is still very much uncertain,” says Reithinger.And after a potential first-half 2022 rate hike?“My view is that the bank will be cautious over the next two years to allow the economic recovery to continue but it all depends on how successful the BoC was at engineering a smooth exit in the first place.”",Interest Rates
Help wanted: How a distorted U.S. job market may foil the U.S. Federal Reserve,2021-11-18T12:00:00,"Much has been said and written about rising inflation and how it might influence the U.S. Federal Reserve’s monetary policy. A 30-year high in the U.S. consumer price index in October is only fueling expectations that the Fed will raise interest rates in earnest beginning next year.But what about the labour market? Given the U.S. central bank’s dual mandate to promote “maximum employment” along with “stable prices and moderate long-term interest rates,” it would be hard to gauge the pace of monetary policy tightening without a clear picture of the many disruptions affecting U.S. workers and employers.It’s striking how much has changed in the U.S. labour market. Prior to the pandemic, the unemployment rate sat at a 50-year low of 3.5% and wage growth was stable. Now the market is rife with mismatches between labour supply and demand. The unemployment rate has declined considerably from double-digit levels in the early months of the pandemic, but job openings have soared to a record high, above 10 million. The so-called Great Resignation has seen millions of people leave their jobs, and the labour force participation rate sits at 1970s levels. Also, wages are marching higher. This is not the labour market the Fed expected to see 18 months after the COVID-19 recession ended in April 2020.The key question is whether these are temporary dislocations that will subside as the pandemic wanes, or evidence of a lasting shift in the U.S. labour market.In my view, COVID-19's impact on labour markets is more structural than cyclical. Many companies that have survived the pandemic on reduced staff are likely leaner, meaner and more efficient. They are unlikely to need the same employment levels they had in February 2020. Likewise, from a labour point of view, many workers do not want the jobs they had before the pandemic. They are taking this opportunity to reassess careers, work-life balance and the need for flexibility. These changes, both cyclical and structural, will weigh on Fed policymakers’ decisions in the months ahead and present a difficult policy choice: raise interest rates to reduce inflation or keep rates low to support full employment.Temporary mismatches could be resolved soonTo be sure, there are cyclical aspects to the labour market. So, as the pandemic wanes, I expect employment to return to more typical levels in the sectors that were hardest hit by pandemic-related disruptions. Similarly, people who are out of work due to a lack of dependable child care, or who are pursuing education or retraining, could return relatively soon.Most U.S. job openings are in four COVID-19–impacted sectorsSources: Capital Group, Haver. Data as of August 2021. Figures may not add up to 100% due to rounding.As employers in these sectors find it easier to fill jobs, we’re likely to see a slowdown in wage gains and the one-time bonuses they have been offering to attract workers. We may even see a temporary rise in the unemployment rate, which would be a good sign if it meant that more people were coming off the sidelines and actively seeking jobs. It may turn out that the sharp drop in continuing unemployment insurance claims, which followed the expiration of federal emergency unemployment benefits in early September, will mark a turning point in the labour market recovery.U.S. unemployment insurance claims plunged in September after peaking near 33 millionSources: Capital Group, U.S. Department of Labor, Haver. Data as of October 9, 2021.Structural disruption extends beyond the COVID-19–impacted sectorsHowever, even as some parts of the labour market normalize, a large group of workers is unlikely to respond to these cyclical improvements. The path to normalization is likely to be bumpy as millions of businesses and households reassess their demand for workers and desire for jobs, respectively. I’ve reached this conclusion after our research revealed a surprising amount of labour market disruption across multiple economic sectors, a pattern that extends well beyond pandemic-centric sectors and into areas that are more insulated from COVID-19.A good example is the information sector, which includes publishing, broadcasting and telecommunications, among others. It has probably been least impacted — and arguably has been supported — by the pandemic because so many people have been working from home. Yet changes in the sector’s unemployment rate are consistent with the 2001 recession that followed the bursting of the dot-com bubble. And, although job openings are elevated, it is surprising that we have not seen stronger wage gains. Another sector with similar dynamics is construction, where wage gains have been strong in absolute terms. However, when measured against prior recoveries, they are less striking. The reasons for this are still unclear, and this is an area that needs more research.Change in the information sector’s unemployment rate near dot-com crash levelSource: U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics. COVID-19 pandemic data as of September 2021.Note: Chart displays changes in the U.S. unemployment rate for the information sector during three periods. All three periods shown are indexed to 1, which represents the unemployment rate in the month prior to the start of the respective recessions as determined by the National Bureau of Economic Research. The recessions began in November 2001 (dot-com crash), June 2009 (global financial crisis) and April 2020 (COVID-19 pandemic).More broadly, it’s worth noting that the recovery in the U.S. labour force participation rate, which includes people actively entering the workforce, has been much slower than the recovery of the unemployment rate, which can move up and down a lot depending on near-term factors. This appears to support the idea that structural forces are making a full normalization of the labour market more challenging.Fed Chair Jerome Powell acknowledged this challenge in his remarks following the Fed’s November meeting: “We thought that schools reopening and elapsing unemployment benefits would produce some sort of additional labour supply. That doesn't seem to have been the case, interestingly.” He said it was a trend the central bank would watch closely.Structural factors could keep many out of work past 2022What we've seen historically is that the labour market often bears the brunt of big disruptions, such as the global financial crisis. Just as some construction workers may have become baristas during the U.S. housing crisis, now it may be baristas transitioning into construction work as the hospitality sectors remain soft. These shifts take time, however, which makes me skeptical of the Fed’s base case of getting back to full employment in 2022.Furthermore, some of the millions of job openings could be automated away rather than filled by returning workers. Think QR code menus replacing restaurant servers or machines making french fries. This is already happening to some extent, as companies adapt to the new normal and learn to function without hiring extra staff.But automation isn’t the only thing that could keep the unemployed out of work longer. Consider those whose prospects have dimmed because they are now competing against a global workforce that is even more tightly interconnected by technology, or who now have a skill or geographic mismatch with available jobs. At the extreme are those who have reassessed their careers or accelerated retirement and are less likely to ever return to the workforce. Although many of those affected by cyclical factors are likely to return to work by early next year — barring a resurgence of COVID-19 cases — people whose reasons are more structural may not return until 2023, if at all.Employment grinding toward a full recovery in the U.S.Sources: Capital Group, Haver. Data as of September 2021. Shaded areas represent recession periods as determined by the National Bureau of Economic Research.Implications for the FedToday, the Federal Reserve faces a knotty challenge: Surging inflation is driving pressure for higher interest rates, which could stymie growth and weaken the labour market recovery. Unless the economy is able to absorb the large supply of labour that is currently sidelined and the labour force participation rate recovers to pre-pandemic levels, it seems unlikely that the U.S. unemployment rate will regain its pre-pandemic low of 3.5% by 2023. I think it will take until 2024.At its November 3 meeting, the Fed confirmed that it will begin scaling back its US$120 billion-per-month asset purchase program, starting in late November. Meanwhile, the U.S. Treasury market is pricing in rate hikes by mid-2022. While the persistence of high inflation in recent data could push the Fed down that path, the challenges in labour markets could temper its pace.Compounding the Fed’s dilemma is that a large part of the inflationary pressure is coming from supply constraints rather than demand. This pandemic shock is turning the “divine coincidence” — the idea that most negative shocks to the economy come from the demand side — on its head. In a traditional scenario, as the economy is gaining steam, the central bank can combat rising prices by lifting interest rates, which cools the economy and the labour market, in turn dampening demand. But in the current situation, lifting rates would dampen inflation but also further set back the labour market. This could create the risk of more structural dislocation in the labour market, confounding the Fed’s dual mandate of price stability and full employment.That said, if the factors weighing on the labour market turn out to be more cyclical, the unemployment rate could be back to 3.5% more quickly than I expect and interest rates would need to be higher. In that case, the Fed may need to accelerate tightening. If it’s more structural, then the unemployment rate could remain elevated and be slow to fall. Here the Fed would be slower to raise rates.",Monetary Policy
Inflation: Transitory or troublesome?,2021-11-05T05:14:00,"Of all the fears investors have faced over the past 30 years, high inflation wasn’t among them. In 2021, that’s changed.Today, the biggest questions for investors revolve around inflation: How high will it go and how long will it last? Is it “transitory” as the U.S. Federal Reserve claims? Or is elevated inflation the new normal amid labour shortages, supply chain bottlenecks and a severe energy crunch?The uncertain path of the pandemic makes near-term conditions difficult to predict but, over the long term, the picture comes into better focus, says Pramod Atluri, fixed income portfolio manager.“While we are facing a cyclical rise in inflation and interest rates today, when I look out five years, I think U.S. economic growth will be slower and inflation may be lower,” Atluri says. Economic growth should slow due to high debt levels and fading stimulus, resulting in a return to GDP gains of 1.5% to 2.5% a year. Consequently, interest rates should stay relatively low as well.“In the meantime, we are laser focused on inflation because that’s the biggest risk to investors’ portfolios over the near term,” Atluri explains. “If we are wrong about inflation, we will be wrong on the upside, so it makes sense to protect against that outcome.”A tale of two inflations: Sticky versus flexibleSources: U.S. Federal Reserve Bank of Atlanta; Refinitive Datastream. Sticky and flexible prices reflect the Atlanta Federal Reserve sticky and flexible consumer price indexes (CPI). If price changes for a particular CPI component occur less than every 4.3 months, that component is a “sticky-price” good. Goods that change prices more frequently are “flexible-price” goods. As of August 2021.Two flavors of inflation: Sticky and flexibleA source of uncertainty today is that there are two different types of inflation: sticky and flexible. Sticky inflation, currently around 2.6% annualized in the U.S., tends to exhibit longer staying power. Sticky categories include rent, owners’ equivalent rent, insurance costs and medical expenses.Flexible inflation in the U.S. has climbed this year to nearly 14% — the highest since the 1970s. However, this level of inflation likely won’t last. The flexible category contains products such as food, energy and cars, where prices can move a lot higher or lower over time. For instance, that’s already happened with lumber, copper and soybeans. Prices for those products skyrocketed this summer and have since come down.Price flare-ups in key commodities are starting to level outSources: Capital Group, U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics, Refinitiv Datastream. Inflation is measured by the U.S. Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as of 8/31/21. Commodity prices are as of 9/30/21.Beware of sticky inflationAs anyone who has tried to buy a used car knows, flexible inflation categories have spiked due to pandemic-related shortages, a lack of available labour and supply chain disruptions. A quick resolution to these challenges is unlikely, but more normal conditions should return by mid to late 2022 in the U.S., says Ritchie Tuazon, fixed income portfolio manager.“What that means is, the upside risk is in the sticky components,” Tuazon explains. “Many of the flexible price categories moved higher for transitory reasons, but inflation in those areas may come back down to zero or even go negative. The sticky components will drive inflation in 2022 in the U.S. so that’s what investors need to keep an eye on.”In short, flexible inflation is transitory, but sticky inflation could be troublesome.In Tuazon’s estimation, overall inflation as measured by the U.S. Consumer Price Index should gradually decline in the months ahead, eventually falling into a range of 2.50% to 2.75% by the end of 2022 in the U.S.If that prediction holds, there’s a good chance the Federal Reserve will not raise interest rates in 2022. Tuazon expects the Fed to officially announce in November that it will begin reducing its bond-buying stimulus program. That process will take several quarters. And the Fed’s first rate hike will come in 2023, which is later than market expectations.“I don’t think the Fed will be in a hurry to raise rates and potentially derail the COVID recovery if inflation remains in check,” Tuazon reasons.What if this benign inflation outlook is wrong and consumer prices move sharply higher?“That is by no means our base case, but I think it is a big enough risk that it should factor into portfolio construction,” Tuazon adds. He favours U.S. Treasury Inflation-Protected Securities, or TIPS, as an effective hedge against higher inflation.Investment implicationsHolding some TIPS in your bond portfolio is a smart move to consider heading into 2022, say both Tuazon and Atluri. As for stocks, there are a few rules of thumb to consider. Historically, higher prices have boosted commodities, as well as sectors that benefit from higher interest rates (such as banks) and companies with pricing power in must-have categories like semiconductors and popular consumer brands.Before making portfolio adjustments, it’s important to remember that sustained periods of elevated inflation are rare in U.S. history. People of a certain age will remember the ultra-high inflation of the 1970s and early 1980s. But in hindsight, it’s clear that was a unique period. In fact, deflationary pressures have often been more difficult to tame, as students of the Great Depression will attest.Over the past 100 years, U.S. inflation has stayed below 5% the vast majority of the time. More recently, in the aftermath of the 2007–2009 global financial crisis, inflation has struggled to hit 2% on a sustained basis. And that’s despite unprecedented stimulus measures engineered by the Fed in an attempt to reach the central bank’s 2% goal.Another important point: It’s mostly at the extremes — when inflation is 6% or above — that financial assets tend to struggle. Stocks have also come under pressure when inflation goes negative, as one would expect.For investors, some inflation can be a good thing. Even during times of higher inflation, stocks and bonds have generally provided solid returns as shown in the chart below.Stocks and bonds have done well in various inflation environmentsSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., Morningstar, Standard & Poor's. All returns are inflation-adjusted real returns. U.S. equity returns represented by the Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index and are in USD. U.S. fixed income represented by Ibbotson Associates SBBI U.S. Intermediate-Term Government Bond Index from 1/1/1970–12/12/1975 and Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index from 1/1/1976–12/31/2020. Inflation rates are defined by the rolling 12-month returns of the Ibbotson Associates SBBI U.S. Inflation Index.",Inflation
Europe: 6 reasons for higher inflation and faster growth,2021-11-04T12:00:00,"Against the spectre of soaring energy prices, labour shortages and supply chain constraints, a question that has arisen in the U.S. and Canada has landed firmly on European shores: will inflation continue to rise and how persistent will it be?The prevailing school of thought is that inflationary pressures will peter out once economies are past the post-COVID recovery and Europe will return to its decade-old pattern of low growth, low inflation and low interest rates. My view is that the pandemic has brought about changes in consumer behaviour and the political climate that, when combined with secular shifts that were already underway, will likely result in a shift to higher inflation in the range of 2% to 3% in Europe over the next few years. I expect eurozone real gross domestic product to increase to around 5% in 2021 and 4.5% in 2022, with the U.K. economy growing by around 7% in 2021 and 5% in 2022.Eurozone inflation has recently climbed above its medium-term target of 2%Source: European Central Bank. Annualized quarterly data as of October 15, 2021.Interest rates could shift moderately higher, but that will depend largely on the reaction of the European Central Bank (ECB) and the Bank of England (BOE). The ECB has held its main refinancing operations rate at zero since March 2016 and does not seem likely to raise rates in the foreseeable future. It did, however, begin slowing the pace at which it is buying bonds through its Pandemic Emergency Purchase Programme (PEPP) in September. It is likely to let the program expire in March 2022.The BOE cut its benchmark bank rate to 0.1% in March 2020. Markets are pricing in an expected rate hike of approximately 0.25% by the end of the year with more hikes in 2022.Here are six reasons why I expect to see higher inflation and faster growth in Europe over the next few years:Central bank benchmark rates and market expectationsSource: Bloomberg. Data as of October 15, 2021. The futures implied rate reflects market expectations for rate changes for December 2021.1. Structural shifts in energy will keep prices higherIndustry is booming in Germany and the U.K., so there has been a rise in demand for energy. At the same time, both cyclical and structural factors have lowered supply.For natural gas, Europe is dependent on Russia and Norway, where there have been significant outages. That is partly due to politics and partly due to infrastructure, in terms of just not being able to get the gas into much or most of or the rest of Europe. The shortages are also related to the fact that last winter was actually quite cold and thus Europe didn't build up any gas stocks.This combination of very strong demand and low reserves has been made worse by the slow pace of transition to renewable energy. Europe is still too reliant on fossil fuels. Wind and hydroelectric plants, for all kinds of reasons, haven't been producing enough electricity to meet base requirements. Europe needs to build out much more renewable energy capacity, which is going to take some time. And that means this supply problem is likely to be present for years to come.I think the prices that we're seeing today are probably an overshoot. But even if they are an overshoot, the fact is that the demand and supply fundamentals will tell you that energy prices six months ago were just far too low. Given that energy has a weight of 9% in the eurozone consumer price index, these price increases will push up headline inflation rates over the next few months.2. Consumers appear to keep their wallets openHousehold savings have increased sharply as consumers have been housebound for a large part of the last 18 months. Now those savings are being released.The EU household saving rate had tracked somewhere around 12% since 2008, before doubling in early 2020 as lockdowns swept the continent and the European Central Bank unleashed the first wave of its €1.85 billion stimulus program.Europe’s household gross saving rate surged during the pandemicSource: Eurostat, U.K. Office for National Statistics. Data as of October 18, 2021.Before the pandemic, household consumption was heavily weighted toward services and away from durable goods, particularly in Europe and the U.S. Of course, people bought cars, refrigerators and bikes, but they spent most of their money on services like going out to restaurants and traveling. That flipped during the pandemic.Economists are now wrestling with the question: is this change in consumption a temporary thing and will we go back to normal pre-pandemic patterns? I think the honest answer is, we don't know.If the demand for durables remains robust, it's arguable that there isn't enough capacity to produce what we need. And that's a long-term structural issue.3. Labour shortages are likely to persistThere is also mounting evidence of acute labour shortages in some economies, which raises the probability that higher headline inflation rates could feed through to higher wage growth. German unions, for example, are sounding more determined in the run-up to the next round of pay negotiations in the spring. We have already seen a significant pick-up in wage growth in the U.K. as the economy has re-opened.There was a significant exodus of labour away from the service sectors during the pandemic. The shift has been pronounced in economies like the U.K., Italy and Spain. A section of the labour force migrated from services to assembly jobs in manufacturing. And manufacturing has seen a huge upswing because demand has been so strong. So, there are labour shortages across industries.While the labour mismatch in the eurozone isn’t as pronounced as in the U.K., and wages are still growing only modestly, ECB policymakers are worried that labour shortages and effective wage indexation could lead to a sharp rise in wage growth in 2022.4. Supply constraints are showing up across many industriesIt's tempting to say the supply issues will go away. The fact is that we just don't know how long it will take to resolve them, and indeed, there is a much more fundamental structural problem in many markets.Our equity analysts inform us some Asian countries are experiencing huge spikes in COVID cases and are mandatorily shutting down manufacturing facilities as a result. And there are also massive delays to load and unload cargo ships. The backlog of ships has grown so severe at the port of Felixstowe, which handles around 36% of the U.K.’s freight-container volume, that Swedish shipping company Maersk has said it is diverting a third of its ships bound for the port elsewhere.Bottlenecks started in the U.S. and China, where a COVID outbreak at one of its busiest ports resulted in a multiweek shutdown. Now the dysfunction is spreading to many other global ports that are providing overflow relief. This is resulting in multiweek delays in product deliveries for finished goods, and many manufacturers can’t even get the necessary parts to make their products in the first place.5. Back to Keynes – fiscal policies will remain stimulativeI believe we are close to a change in the policy regime that is a complete reversal of what we saw in the early 1980s with Thatcher and Reagan. I think we're now in a much more pragmatic world similar to the 1960s, where governments were much more willing to use fiscal policy to do public investment.The orthodoxy of the last 20 to 30 years has been that monetary policy is the primary instrument for managing demand, with fiscal policy playing a subordinate role. But if Germany, for instance, is spending €80 billion on public investment, that's 2% of its gross domestic product. If you get the same in France, Italy and maybe even the U.K., then that raises the growth potential of these economies in the medium- to longer run.In the West, we've seen a long-term downtrend in investment as a share of the economy. Partly that's about private investment, but there's also been significant underinvestment in public infrastructure.Governments know they made mistakes after the global financial crisis when they tightened fiscal policy too quickly. I think they will be at pains not to repeat those errors.6. Central banks don’t want to raise rates at the wrong timeCentral banks’ response to the coronavirus crisis had been to pin the pedal flat to the floor and print money at a rate not seen before. Now, with Europe facing inflationary pressures that are also visible in other parts of the developed world, it appears the ECB is thinking about easing off the accelerator and the Bank of England is ready to step on the brakes.Inflation surges across most of the G7Source: OECD, as of October 15, 2021. Darker colours indicate higher inflation.The BOE’s monetary policy committee signaled a hawkish turn in September with the publication of its policy meeting minutes. While the BOE voted to maintain its current policy stance, there were some clear signals of an emerging tightening bias.Christine Lagarde, president of the European Central Bank, has indicated publicly that the ECB is not planning to tighten. But the minutes of the ECB’s latest meeting also show some governing council members are growing concerned about upside risks to its inflation forecast.It seems likely to me that both central banks will tighten before markets expect, and the BOE is likely to react more swiftly than the ECB. By moving early, central bankers will hope they can avoid bigger inflation problems and more aggressive tightening later, which would be more of a threat to the recovery.Central banks must determine to what extent higher prices will choke off demand and growth. I think that is where most central bankers are really scratching around for an answer. The challenge is that the traditional models of relationships between labour, inflation and prices have broken down.The ECB appears to be particularly concerned with not repeating the mistakes of 2011, when it stymied growth by raising rates at the wrong time. The bigger risk, in my view, is that the bank could make exactly the opposite mistake. If the ECB leaves its policy too loose for too long there's a danger that, at some point, we could end up with an inflation problem that's much bigger than what we have today.",Inflation
China’s economy risks a sharp slowdown in growth,2021-10-05T02:30:00,"Investors in China should prepare for a rough patch. The economy is slowing, and regulations are tightening in several industries. The economic cycle turned in June/July, based on the official China Purchasing Managers Index readings and other indicators that we track. Heading into 2022, I think GDP (gross domestic product) growth will be considerably lower than the current consensus forecast of around 5%.Here are a few reasons that lead me to this view:1. Credit is tight in the real estate market.Primary real estate sales are about 15% of GDP, and the indirect demand the sector generates makes it even more important to the economy. And credit is tightening in the real estate sector. Home-buying restrictions could be loosened. But, with low inventories and contracting housing supply, any loosening could result in even higher house prices, undermining the government’s key policy objective that “housing is not for speculation.”Evergrande, the country’s second-largest developer, is likely headed for a managed bankruptcy process. The unwinding will likely involve selling off Evergrande assets project by project to SOEs (state-owned enterprises).The government’s top priority is to protect those who pre-bought Evergrande apartments, which reportedly amounts to approximately 600,000 buyers. Suppliers to Evergrande are already being “paid” in the form of property that’s been cut in price by 20% to 30%, based on what my colleagues and I have heard from our sources.But Evergrande is just the most obvious entity in a troubled sector. Dozens of medium-sized developers have weak cash flows and are having trouble obtaining bank loans or issuing debt. Some are slashing prices in order to raise cash. In the past, the larger developers would come in and buy the unfinished projects, but that’s unlikely now.There’s also the likelihood of a property tax program that will be piloted in some cities. Many middle-class urban households own two properties, and this could dampen consumer demand, depending on the tax rate that may be set and its scope.China’s economy appears to be weakeningSource: FactSet. Latest available data as of September 30, 2021. An index reading of 50 signals no change since the previous month. Above 50 signals an increase (or improvement), below 50 a decrease (or deterioration). The greater the divergence from 50, the greater the rate of change signaled.2. Consumer confidence is ebbing, and retail sales growth is slowing.Consumer confidence never fully recovered after China’s initial COVID-19 outbreak in early 2020. And neither did income growth, particularly for lower income groups. Retail sales growth is still positive, but again, the pace of growth is declining. Car sales are also falling in absolute terms ­though that’s mostly due to supply disruptions due to a lack of components, according to our analysts who cover the sector. Youth employment in urban areas is pushing up, while overall surveyed employment still has not returned to its pre-COVID-19 base.The government’s Common Prosperity agenda on improving life for the lower middle class could also result in a spate of taxes on property, inheritance, luxury and alcohol, which would impact a wide swath of the upper middle class, potentially further dampening consumer sentiment.3. Heavy industry could see excess capacity, and industrial profits have softened.The real estate boom of 2018-20 supported high levels of demand for steel. That, plus supply reforms that wiped out old and excess capacity in the mid-2010s, meant that heavy industry returned to health. With end demand contracting now, we could see some excess capacity return. The data is volatile, but the trendline shows that industrial profits are now below pre-COVID levels,which could dampen corporate capital investment in 2022.Profit in China's industrial sector has slowedSource: Capital Strategy Research. Data as of August 1, 2021Government has tools at its disposal to stimulateNo doubt, the government has tools at its disposal to stimulate the economy. China’s benchmark interest rate is 4%, which is very high compared to other economies, so the People’s Bank of China has room to lower rates. We could even see a 25 to 50 basis points cut in interest rates in the next few months.The challenge authorities face is that, at a time when they want to continue to clamp down on housing and local government debt, cutting rates may be risky. Beijing also might worry about lowering rates when the rest of the world is hiking, potentially dampening capital inflows. So, while rate cuts might suggest significant loosening, I doubt they’ll be enough.When Beijing has stimulated growth in previous cycles, it has usually both cut rates and told the banks to lend more, which creates end demand by stimulating the property and infrastructure sectors. But while property is paid for by households, infrastructure is paid for by local government-owned entities so it’s a de facto government liability.This time, there’s much less room on the fiscal front with government debt, when properly measured, at more than 100% of GDP and rising rapidly. Beijing has tried to make this debt more transparent by funding more of it through public bonds, but it has not effectively curbed the still-large “hidden debt.”I also believe that, in the near-term, Beijing is comfortable with sacrificing growth to achieve key strategic priorities.While many are focused on the 20th Central Communist Party (CCP) Congress in fall 2022 as a reason to expect a stimulus package, I think the leadership now has its eyes on 2035-40, when they envision being a strong and technologically advanced country. I believe the government is willing to take short-term pain for long-term gain.CCP General Secretary Xi Jinping, in addition to wanting to deflate the property market, wants funding to flow to the regime’s strategic priorities ­environmental protection, electric vehicles, semiconductors and weapons. It’s clear as well that the CCP today wants a different relationship with the private sector than the party of yesterday.As a result, I do not expect any significant loosening of policy in the next three to six months.I could be wrong, of course. For sure, there will be a lot of pressure to loosen by year-end, especially if fourth-quarter economic data is well below expectations. If that’s the case, we will probably get some rate cuts and perhaps a turn to proactive fiscal policy in 2022.But my base case is that these will not be big enough to turn growth around until at least the second half of 2022 and maybe later. Given that consensus market expectations are for an official GDP growth rate of 5% for 2022, I think there is a significant risk of a negative surprise.",China
Will the pandemic threaten the future of big cities?,2021-09-16T10:29:00,"You might think where you buy your coffee in the morning doesn’t amount to a hill of beans when it comes to the health of the U.S. economy. But, in fact, it could mean a great deal in the years ahead.“Working remotely for the past year and a half, I’ve been buying coffee closer to home instead of my usual downtown coffee shop,” says Capital Group economist Jared Franz. “In my case, it doesn’t mean much, but if a quarter of the U.S. labour force does it one or two days a week, it has significant implications for the economy, financial markets and the future of large cities.”While the data is short term and the jury is still out, there are early signs of a powerful deurbanization trend in the United States and other major developed economies. Since the start of the COVID-19 pandemic, migration from some big cities has accelerated while suburban home prices have soared. Moreover, national labour force surveys indicate an overwhelming majority of employees who have been working from home want to continue doing so one or more days per week.Moving out: 2020 urban exodusSources: U.S. Department of Commerce, Visa Business and Economic Insights. Net migration includes movers from abroad. As of December 31, 2020.By 2022, Franz estimates, roughly 25% of U.S. employees could be working remotely — up from just 5% prior to the pandemic — and many of them will choose to live in less expensive, less crowded areas. Assuming this shift persists, it would be the biggest change in labour force patterns since World War II.“From an investment perspective, we need to determine how durable these changes are, how they could affect consumer spending patterns and how companies may respond,” Franz explains. “For instance, what happens to that downtown coffee shop? Or the restaurants that serve the same area? Or the office space that is no longer needed?”“I don’t think we are talking about the death of big cities, by any means,” Franz stresses. “But I do think we may have reached peak density for urban centers such as Chicago, Los Angeles, New York and San Francisco. They will have to adapt to a world where much of the labour force is no longer coming into an office every day. Twenty-five percent may not sound like much, but it’s a huge change from 5%.”Many important questions remain unanswered: Will people flock back to big cities after the pandemic is over? Will they prefer life in the suburbs and other outlying areas? Or will both happen at the same time — perhaps with younger employees preferring to live in vibrant, dynamic cities and older workers continuing to fuel the growth of the suburbs and exurbs?One crucial question appears to be resolved: People like working from home.Want to work from home? Yes please!Source: National Bureau of Economic Research working paper, “Why working from home will stick.” Based on surveys of 33,250 respondents conducted from May 2020 through March 2021. Results include all respondents who said they can work from home at least part of the time and those who reported mainly working from home at some point during the COVID-19 pandemic, which was 64% of the full sample.Surveys by the National Bureau of Economic Research show that employees who are able to work from home definitely want to continue doing so. More than 77% said they would like to work remotely at least one day per week and 31% said they would prefer all five days. Not every job can be done remotely, of course, but 64% of respondents said their jobs are conducive to working from home at least part of the time.It’s important to note that not everyone is on board with the work-from-home phenomenon. There has been a quiet backlash in recent months from certain companies pushing for more traditional work schedules, as well as the possibility of lowering the pay of employees who move from high-cost cities to lower cost areas. Companies don’t appear to be gaining much traction on those issues at the moment.One large investment bank recently posed the question of whether we have reached the end of the honeymoon phase of remote work, citing concerns about employees’ isolation and mental health, the loss of company culture, the fate of downtown businesses and the growing threat of cyber attacks.Sectors that benefit from deurbanizationMany sectors stand to benefit if the deurbanization trend endures, including personal travel and leisure, technology and communications, cloud computing, and the home improvement industry and residential real estate — particularly in the suburbs and other outlying areas.Changes in consumer behaviour mean these trends could be durable even as we head back to the office several days a week. For example, stores such as The Home Depot and Lowe’s have clearly benefited from more people buying new and existing homes in the suburbs while the shift toward home fitness has boosted companies such as Peloton and Nike.Exercise and outdoor activities are a potential bright spot, says Capital Group portfolio manager Lisa Thompson. “As an investment theme, I think it’s almost metaphoric. People are spending more time in nature, hiking or riding bikes, and they are realizing it’s actually very nice to be outdoors, to spend more time with family, to visit the national parks. I have friends who go camping now I never imagined would go camping.”Sectors that suffer from deurbanizationOn the flip side, commercial real estate stands out as one of the hardest hit sectors, and the outlook remains challenging to say the least. U.S. office vacancy rates nationally rose above 17% in the second quarter of 2021, up from roughly 13% in the first quarter of 2020 before government-imposed lockdowns brought the economy to a virtual standstill.Commercial real estate has been hit hardSource: Cushman & Wakefield. As of June 30, 2021.Commercial real estate loans in the U.S., meanwhile, have not experienced the type of distress or outright defaults that investors might expect, largely due to U.S. government stimulus programs that helped small and mid-size companies meet their lease and payroll obligations. “We’re in a holding pattern right now because government support has been so strong,” Franz notes, “but as we move into 2022, I think that could change materially for the worse.”Within the wider real estate industry there has been a large disparity between subsectors that have been hammered — office, retail and hotel, for instance — and others that have rallied as the economy and stock markets recovered from the downturn. Those include storage, industrial and residential categories.A tale of two real estate marketsSources: Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's. As of 9/10/2021. Represents total returns in USD of subsectors within the S&P U.S. REIT Index.In U.S. cities with large urban centers, state and local government finances could also be impacted, Thompson adds.“Deurbanization puts a lot of pressure on states like New York and California that have relied on a very high tax base of wealthy people in Manhattan, Los Angeles and San Francisco,” Thompson notes. “It could wind up being a big challenge for states that have benefited enormously from the mega-city concept.”Echoing Franz’s sentiment, however, Thompson says she expects large urban centers to adapt and eventually thrive in a post-COVID environment. Big cities are resilient, she says, and they have a long history of recovering from difficult times.“I can remember when big cities were not places that people wanted to go in the 1970s and 1980s,” Thompson recalls. “Today, older people may say, ‘I don’t need to be in the city anymore,’ but I think younger people will still want to be at the center of civic life and entertainment. Cities will just reinvent themselves again.”",Demographics & Culture
Answers to your 5 biggest investment concerns,2021-08-09T01:00:00,"Markets have been climbing a wall of worry in 2021, reaching record highs even as investors brace for the possibility of elevated inflation, rising interest rates, runaway debt and a bitcoin bubble. With so much to trouble investors, many are wondering how these uncertain times will affect their portfolios.That’s what we found when we polled more than 5,000 financial professionals recently to identify their top questions and concerns. Here are our investment team’s answers to the five most frequently asked questions of 2021:1. Will U.S. inflation and rising rates affect my portfolio?We received more questions about rising U.S interest rates and inflation than any other topic. And that was before the U.S. Consumer Price Index accelerated 5.0% in May and 5.4% in June — the two highest year-over-year growth rates since 2008.The thinking goes like this: A powerful economic recovery fueled by massive stimulus measures will lead to runaway inflation, forcing the U.S. Federal Reserve to raise rates quicker than expected, which would slow economic growth and be a significant headwind to investors.U.S. economist Darrell Spence doesn’t expect current levels of inflation to be sustainable over the long term, as they are still being driven by significant price increases in a small number of categories. “That said, a clear risk to this scenario is that a resurgence of the virus causes portions of the economy to shut down again and policymakers to unleash another round of stimulus,” notes Spence. “This will simply prolong the imbalance between stimulus-induced demand and COVID-restricted supply, and likely cause inflation to remain more persistent.”U.S. inflation has jumped but labour data suggests it may be temporarySources: Bloomberg, Bureau of Economic Analysis, U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics, U.S. Federal Reserve. Data as of 6/30/21. Goals for the inflation and employment measures are estimated targets needed to meet the Federal Reserve’s stated dual mandate of achieving price stability and maximum sustainable employment. Goals for inflation are directly from the U.S. Federal Reserve. Goals for employment are estimates from Capital Group. Pre-pandemic peak considers the trailing 12 months prior to February 2020. Inflation shown based on the U.S. Consumer Price Index, with core excluding energy and food. Under-employment rate consists of total unemployed, plus all persons marginally attached to the labour force, plus total employed part time for economic reasons.Likewise, the Capital Group rates team does not believe we have shifted to anew era of high long-term inflation, although it may remain elevated for longer than some initially expected. “While we should continue to see inflation volatility, I expect it to subside by the end of next year,” says Ritchie Tuazon, fixed income portfolio manager.U.S. market jitters over these short-term inflationary pressures have hastened expectations for an interest rate hike to 2022. “That’s far earlier than anticipated given the U.S. Federal Reserve’s stated desire to let inflation run hot and get the U.S. economy back to full employment,” says fixed income portfolio manager Pramod Atluri.In recent years, the Fed has made it a priority to take their time and signal moves well in advance. So before the next rate increase, the Fed is likely to take several distinct steps to facilitate the tapering of its bond-buying activities and communicate an imminent hike.Bottom line:Inflation will likely remain elevated through the end of next year but then should moderate back to the Fed’s 2% long-term target. Higher volatility is likely as surprises in inflation data could trigger market turbulence in the near term. Our rates team believes the Fed’s first interest rate hike is at least 12–18 months away.2. Is surging U.S. debt sustainable?U.S. government debt has been mounting, and current policy proposals suggest there is no end in sight. The passage of a $1.9 trillion pandemic relief package in March helped drive the trailing 12-month federal deficit to 18.6% of gross domestic product — the largest shortfall since 1945. This will almost certainly push Uncle Sam’s public debt above its World War II-era peak of 106% of GDP.U.S. debt is projected to reach new heightsSource: U.S. Congressional Budget Office as of March 4, 2021. Federal debt held by the public. Long-term forecast excludes the impact of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and assumes no meaningful changes to current laws affecting U.S. government revenues and spending. Based on USD.So with U.S. debt nearing unprecedented levels, is it time for investors to worry? Opinions vary, but here arefour reasons U.S. debt may not spiral out of control:U.S. interest rates are lower than GDP growthThe U.S. debt position is worsening but is not an outlierGovernments have various levers to pullMonetary policy can adapt to changing conditionsBetween the perpetually low U.S. interest rate environment and a multitude of U.S. government response measures available, current debt levels should be sustainable for now. Typically, a debt crisis arises when investors are no longer willing to purchase a country’s debt, and that seems unlikely to happen in the U.S. anytime soon.Bottom line:Although U.S. debt may act as a headwind to long-term growth, it is unlikely to cause a crisis as long as interest rates are lower than GDP growth and the U.S. dollar remains the world’s reserve currency. Even if debt eventually becomes an issue, it could be decades before markets feel an impact.3. Should I shift from growth to value stocks?The growth-value decision doesn’t have to be an either-or proposition, says veteran equity portfolio manager Martin Romo, one of the portfolio managers on Capital Group U.S. Equity FundTM (Canada).“There can be growing companies that are cheap and cheap companies that grow, so value and growth are not in opposition,”Romo noted in a recent interview. We are in a target-rich environment, and there are opportunities to invest in fast-growing companies as well as classic cyclical companies.""Value stocks got a booster shot in November 2020 when the first COVID-19 vaccine was found to be highly effective. Since then, industries that suffered the most during the pandemic such as energy, financials and real estate have enjoyed massive rebounds. However, the two worst performing sectors in the market in 2021 through June 30 — utilities and consumer staples — are also traditionally value sectors.November 9 was a turning point for many cyclical companiesSources: FactSet, Standard & Poor’s. All data represent total returns for industries within the Standard & Poor's 500 Composite Index and are in USD. 11/6/20 was the last business day before the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine candidate was revealed to have more than 90% efficacy against COVID-19 in global trials.Bottom line:It’s important to balance individual investment opportunities rather than make decisions based on a binary label like growth or value. And as markets continue to reach new records and frothy valuations increasingly become a concern, company-by-company analysis will likely become even more essential.4. Is Big Tech in big trouble?U.S. government efforts to rein in Big Tech have been underway for years, but2021 could be a watershed moment. Political, societal and market-based forces are combining to put these companies — Alphabet, Amazon, Apple, Facebook, Microsoft and others — under the microscope. It’s an important issue for investors, as these stocks enjoyed dazzling returns over the last decade. They are among the largest in the world and may represent outsized positions in many portfolios.Assessing the regulatory risks of large tech companies is a complex task, given that they operate in different industries with vastly different competitive profiles — everything from retail to advertising to television.The antitrust cases against Google and Facebook don’t appear to be strong and likely won’t result in any forced breakups, according to Brad Barrett, an analyst who covers ad-supported internet companies. Notably, many of the products provided by these goliaths are free, diminishing traditional antitrust arguments that rely on pricing power to help determine monopoly status. And in the unlikely event that one or more of these companies is forced to break up, a reasonable argument could be made that some of the spinoffs may be worth more on their own.In addition to antitrust issues, legislation over content monitoring and privacy and data protections are also on the table. But according to internet analyst Tracy Li such regulationsmay have surprising consequences for the industry. “I believe that concerns related to privacy or content may actually strengthen, rather than weaken, the moats of the largest platforms,” says Li. “These companies often boast well-established protocols and deep resources pertaining to privacy and legal matters.""Bottom line:Regulatory pressures may continue to hang over Big Tech stocks for years, but current valuations already reflect much of this risk. An outright breakup of companies seems improbable, and even in that unlikely scenario a spinoff of certain assets could unlock additional shareholder value.5. My client wants to invest in Bitcoin. What should I tell them?Fear of missing out is a powerful force in investing. And it’s difficult to ignore an asset that has gained more than 500,000% in just a few years, eliciting headline-grabbing commentary from Elon Musk and Warren Buffett, among others.Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies have captured the imagination of investors, putting financial professionals, plan sponsors and consultants at the centre of an increasingly frenetic discussion about whether to jump into the fray or steer clear.“If you have a client who really wants to buy Bitcoin, just saying ‘don’t do it’ is a disservice,” says Barbara Burtin, an equity investment analyst who covers the banking industry. “In fact, owning a small amount can be a learning experience — for you and the client.”In a recent article,How to talk to clients about Bitcoin, Burtin suggested investors dedicate no more than 1% of their portfolio to any cryptocurrency. Such a limit may have seemed overly conservative because Bitcoin’s price had done nothing but skyrocket for months. But the fastest growing assets often fall just as quickly and, given Bitcoin’s speculative nature, the suggestion had merit. Since then, Bitcoin prices have declined nearly 40% in U.S. dollars.“If a client insists, ‘I must put money into this,’ advise them to invest no more than they can afford to lose,” Burtin cautioned.Bitcoin has had periods of spectacular gains — and lossesSources: Google Trends, Refinitiv Datastream. As of 7/14/21. Prices are shown on a logarithmic scale and expressed in U.S. dollars. Search volume data represent Google search volume relative to the highest point for the given time period. A value of 100 is the peak popularity for the term. A value of 50 means that the term is half as popular as the peak.Bottom line:It may be tempting to dismiss Bitcoin as a fad and tell clients it’s inappropriate for their portfolios, but simply discounting it won’t be an adequate answer for some. There are certainly risks associated with Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies, but there are also groundbreaking innovations and potential for the future of the technology. Whether looking at cryptocurrencies for your clients or your own portfolio, discipline and proper expectations are key.",Markets & Economy
4 reasons why U.S. debt may not spin out of control,2021-05-26T10:44:00,"Is surging U.S. debt sustainable, or will it spin out of control?It’s a question many are asking. U.S. government debt is on a sharp upward trend, and current policy proposals suggest that will continue. The recent passage of a US$1.9 trillion pandemic relief package has helped drive the trailing 12-month federal deficit to 18.6% of gross domestic product — the largest shortfall since 1945. This will almost certainly push Uncle Sam’s public debt above the World War II‒era peak of 106% of GDP.A rising tide of debt: U.S. debt-to-GDP ratioSource: U.S. Congressional Budget Office as of March 4, 2021. Federal debt held by the public. Long-term forecast excludes the impact of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and assumes no meaningful changes to current laws affecting U.S. government revenues and spending. Based on USD.While we are moving into uncharted territory, there are many factors that can influence whether — or when — this debt will ever become a real problem. Here are four reasons why we believe the federal debt should be manageable for the foreseeable future.1. U.S. interest rates are lower than GDP growthMany economists believe that debt crises arise when the debt-to-GDP ratio crosses 100%. Above that level, the debt stock can begin to spiral upward by itself, even without further additions from ongoing deficits. Italy and Greece are the most recent examples of this phenomenon. U.S. debt is currently crossing this threshold.However, this debt-spiral math only works if a country’s interest rate is higher than its growth rate. As long as the nominal interest rate on the debt is less than the nominal growth rate of the economy, the upward spiral can be avoided. That is the situation in the U.S. today, and it is likely to remain the case for the foreseeable future.Nominal interest rates have been lower than the nominal growth rate for most of the time since the early 1960s. However, this relationship has fluctuated. During the 1960s, nominal growth regularly exceeded the interest rate on 10-year U.S. Treasury bonds, but that flipped during the 1980s and into the 1990s as inflationary pressures drove interest rates sharply higher.In the 2000s, the relationship reverted to its more sustainable form, although at lower levels of nominal growth and higher levels of government debt relative to GDP. Looking ahead, this suggests that the biggest risk could be a sustained surge of inflation that drives interest rates well above the GDP growth rate.Sustaining the U.S. debt: GDP growth vs. interest ratesSources: Bureau of Economic Analysis, U.S. Federal Reserve, Refinitiv Datastream. As of March 31, 2021. Chart displays the difference in percentage points between the year-over-year growth rate of nominal GDP and the nominal 10-year U.S. Treasury yield on a quarterly basis since the first quarter of 1962.Notably, while a 100% debt-to-GDP ratio has proven to be a trigger point in some past debt crises, there are exceptions to this rule. Japan is the most prominent example. It has benefited from the fact that a large part of its debt is held by a somewhat captive domestic investor base that includes large banks, pension funds, the post office and other institutional investors.2. The U.S. fiscal position is worsening but is not an outlierThe COVID-19 pandemic has accelerated rising debt trends around the world, not just in the U.S. Many countries took aggressive fiscal and monetary policy actions to soften the economic impact of widespread lockdowns last year.The U.S.’s debt-to-GDP ratio has risen sharply since just before the global financial crisis of 2008–2009, but it still trails Japan’s by a wide margin. The U.S. debt burden is not far ahead of those of the U.K. and the eurozone. China and other emerging markets have lower ratios but have also seen significant increases.Debt rising around the world: Gross government debt to GDPSource: International Monetary Fund, World Economic Outlook Database, April 2021. Based on USD.While the U.S. debt burden has risen sharply on an absolute basis, the increase has been less substantial on a relative basis. From the perspective of sovereign debt investors, that means the U.S. is not a significant outlier in terms of debt sustainability. That reflects the global nature of the rising debt-to-GDP trend. Government debt worldwide reached US$82.3 trillion, or 105% of GDP, in 2020 ― up from 88% in 2019, the Institute of International Finance reported in February. In mature markets, it reached 130% of GDP in 2020, up from 110% in 2019.America’s relative position is also enhanced by the privileged status of the U.S. dollar as the global reserve currency, which creates a significant level of built-in demand for U.S. Treasury debt and other dollar-denominated assets. The U.S. Treasury market enjoys safe-haven status in periods of market stress, owing to a perceived low risk of default. Many assets, including most commodities, are priced in dollar terms and U.S. Treasuries remain the “risk-free” asset against which most other assets are priced. These attributes support demand for U.S. government bonds, which in turn helps support the debt burden.3. Governments have various levers to pullThat said, the higher the debt burden, the greater the potential for it to cause a problem. The textbook solution for a country running large deficits and a rising debt burden is to raise taxes, cut spending or both. While such measures may weigh on economic growth in the short run, paying down debt could help offset that in the longer term. The lesson from the post‒WWII experience is that the process of debt reduction can take decades.In the near term, while individual and corporate tax rates may go up modestly, government spending is likely to increase as well. This does not necessarily have to be negative for the deficit, however. To the extent that the U.S. economy sees higher levels of productivity andinnovationas a result, it could boost growth, and thus tax revenues. This is not all that difficult to imagine in an era of rapid technological change. There may even be innovations coming out of the pandemic that lead to improved productivity and growth, making the debt burden more manageable.U.S. government budget deficit widensSources: U.S. Treasury Department and Bureau of Economic Analysis. As of March 31, 2021. Based on USD.One alternative economic theory that has received some attention amid the surge in U.S. debt is Modern Monetary Theory. MMT posits that most countries that issue their own currency face no financial constraints. Thus, for many governments — including the U.S. — there is no risk of default. Governments can decide what they need to spend as their first priority, and then address financing through taxation and borrowing. There are limits to debt levels, but those levels are tied to inflation.As noted by economist and MMT advocate Stephanie Kelton, inflation is evidence that a deficit is too big, while unemployment is evidence of a deficit that is too small. Thus, under MMT, fiscal policy plays a more central role in the management of inflation. Critics note that, among other things, the management of inflation would be more heavily influenced by the political process under MMT. In addition, the Federal Reserve would lose its independence, and the framework that has anchored inflation expectations for arguably the last 30 years would be gone.4. Monetary policy can adapt to changing conditionsFinally, there is the Federal Reserve. While the goals and policies of the central bank have evolved since its founding over 100 years ago, the current monetary policy framework has shifted to an explicit inflation target and maximizing employment. The Fed’s recent move toward average inflation targeting, plus its signals that low policy rates and asset purchases will remain in place, support higher nominal GDP growth and low interest rates, a dynamic that makes the level of federal debt more tenable.The global financial crisis was the first time that many people had ever heard of the Fed using its balance sheet to support large asset purchases. But the practice of buying U.S. government securities as an instrument of monetary policy dates to the 1920s. Following World War I, Benjamin Strong, then head of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, did so in an effort to stem a recession in 1923.A few years later, the U.S. entered the Great Depression and, just as in the late 2000s, short-term interest rates quickly hit the zero lower bound in the early 1930s. During World War II, the U.S. Treasury directed the Federal Reserve to target short- and long-term interest rates through the purchase of U.S. government bonds as a means of financing the war effort.Fast forward to Ben Bernanke, who became Fed chair in 2006. His legacy is defined by the Fed’s actions to stabilize the financial system and the economy during the financial crisis. Having reached the zero bound on policy rates, the Federal Reserve purchased billions of dollars of U.S. Treasury and mortgage-backed securities. This quantitative easing may have been new to many market participants, but it was already part of the Fed’s playbook.There is no reason to think that U.S. monetary policy will stop adapting to the changing circumstances of the U.S. and global economies. As a result, it is useful to keep an open mind regarding potential approaches and regime shifts. For instance, a large balance sheet at the Federal Reserve could become a fixture for many years to come. This should not be underestimated as a policy tool with the capacity to absorb sizable government debt issuance.Bottom line: The outlook is not so direThe response by the federal government to the COVID-19 pandemic has taken us back to levels of debt not seen since World War II. While the level of government debt is high, it is elevated in other mature economies as well.The fact is that a debt crisis arises when investors are no longer willing to purchase a country’s debt. When that will occur is very difficult to predict, although it does not seem likely to happen in the U.S. anytime soon. Traditional analysis suggests that debt levels are sustainable as long as the cost of debt remains below the level of economic growth, but there are still likely limits. What they are, however, is unclear.Markets can act as a signaling tool in this process, which in turn can influence political choices and the role played by the Federal Reserve. The economy can also change, with technology and new behaviour driving innovation and improved productivity. Suffice to say that there are many forces that can influence the path of debt, and the federal response to it, going forward.",United States
How to talk to clients about Bitcoin,2021-05-19T02:16:00,"For advisor use only. Not for use with investors.Fear of missing out is a powerful force in investing. And it’s difficult to ignore an asset that has gained more than 500,000% in just a few years, eliciting headline-grabbing commentary from Elon Musk to Warren Buffett, among others.Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies have captured the imagination of investors, putting financial professionals, plan sponsors and consultants at the centre of an increasingly frenetic discussion about whether to jump into the fray or steer clear.Sure, it may be tempting to dismiss Bitcoin as a passing fad and tell clients it’s inappropriate for their portfolios. But simply discounting it won’t be an adequate answer for some. Moreover, the question itself presents an important opportunity for you to better understand your clients’ risk tolerance.“If you have a client who really wants to buy Bitcoin, just saying ‘don’t do it’ is a disservice,” says Barbara Burtin, an equity investment analyst at Capital Group who covers the banking industry. “In fact, owning a small amount can be a learning experience — for you and the client.”Bitcoin’s remarkable rise — in price and search activitySources: Google Trends, Refinitiv Datastream. As of 5/6/21. Search volume data represents Google search volume relative to the highest point for the given time period. A value of 100 is the peak popularity for the term. A value of 50 means that the term is half as popular as the peak. Bitcoin prices are shown on a logarithmic scale and expressed in U.S. dollars.What is Bitcoin?Bitcoin is by far the most popular variation among a class of assets designed to create a digital currency through advanced cryptography. Other popular cryptocurrencies include Ethereum, Ripple and Litecoin. Unlike traditional currencies, Bitcoin operates without central authority or banks and is not backed by any government.Bitcoin traces its roots to 2008, when an anonymous programmer operating under the pseudonym Satoshi Nakamoto published a white paper outlining the technology and code needed to enable the cryptocurrency.Most important, the paper described the process of “mining,” which creates a supply of new bitcoins. Bitcoins are mined using computer algorithms that solve a series of calculations. These time-consuming computations verify bitcoins and allow for the creation of new ones. Only 21 million bitcoins can be mined, and they become more time consuming to create as the supply grows.Volatility in action“Bitcoin tends to garner a lot of attention every time it has one of these steep run-ups in value,” explains Capital Group portfolio manager Alan Wilson. “But keep in mind, at some point it may go in the other direction, too. Anyone speculating should be prepared for extreme volatility in either direction.”In fact, Bitcoin experienced a sharp decline on April 17, falling nearly 14% in U.S. dollars in an hour before rebounding. The temporary plunge appears to have been triggered by unconfirmed internet rumours that U.S. authorities were planning to crack down on money laundering involving cryptocurrencies. A few days earlier, Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies rose as the trading platform Coinbase went public, attracting an US$86 billion valuation.Tweets from Tesla CEO Elon Musk have also famously contributed to Bitcoin's price volatility. For instance, his initial pledge in February 2021 to accept Bitcoin as payment for Tesla vehicles sent the cryptocurrency soaring. Then his reversal of that pledge in May triggered a slide. Meanwhile, the Securities and Exchange Commission issued a statement on May 11 calling attention to mutual funds with exposure to the Bitcoin futures market, noting that investors should “focus on the level of risk they are taking on” and whether they are comfortable with that risk.How Bitcoin is minedSource: Capital Group.With Bitcoin basics out of the way, what are the key issues to consider when discussing cryptocurrencies with clients? Several Capital Group professionals who’ve studied cryptocurrencies offered these four ideas:1. Suggest limits, and treat it as a learning experienceIt’s easy for investors to extrapolate how US$100,000 invested in Bitcoin five years ago would be worth over US$14 million today. But it’s your responsibility to explain that such spectacular past results are not predictive of future performance.Given Bitcoin’s extreme volatility, you might tell clients who are convinced they must own it to dedicate no more than 1% of their portfolio to any cryptocurrency, Burtin suggests. “If a client insists, ‘I must put money into this,’ advise them to invest no more than they can afford to lose,” she adds.In addition, owning a small amount of cryptocurrency could be useful as an educational exercise, Burtin notes. Having “skin in the game” is a way to encourage clients to learn about cryptocurrency. It’s also a way to assess their true risk tolerance and observe reactions to high levels of market volatility.2. Explain the significant risksSome clients might reconsider the idea of buying Bitcoin once they learn its limitations, says Douglas Upton, an equity investment analyst at Capital Group who covers metals and mining.Risk 1: Bitcoin is impractical as a means of exchange from a resources standpoint.Bitcoin supply is limited, and new bitcoin can only be “mined” using high-powered computer systems that crunch algorithms. The process requires so much computing power that cryptocurrency mining consumes roughly 0.6% of the world’s electricity — more than that used by the entire nation of Argentina, according to the Bitcoin Electricity Consumption Index maintained by Cambridge University’s Centre for Alternative Finance. As the price soars, it becomes more profitable for speculators to install high-powered computers for mining operations. If it rises further, then so will electricity consumption, much of it in places where electricity is coal-based and therefore generates significant CO2 emissions, says Upton.Risk 2: Governments are unlikely to allow bitcoin usage to flourish without controls,Upton says. “Bitcoin seeks to replace sovereign currencies,” he notes. “If allowed to proliferate, it could reduce the ability of governments and central banks to set monetary policy, and to tax earnings and wealth.” Accordingly, lawmakers around the world could decide to make the use of Bitcoin more difficult. South Korea recently introduced legislation to regulate cryptocurrencies to curb potential money laundering and other illegal activities. China, which has cracked down on cryptocurrencies in the past, just introduced its own digital currency, and the U.S. may someday follow suit with a “digital dollar.”Risk 3: Bitcoin is not a store of stable value.Some investors may be drawn to cryptocurrencies thinking they’re an asset to store value, but there have been several cases of bitcoin theft. Some unfortunate owners have lost access to their funds by misplacing or forgetting their private digital keys. Since Bitcoin isn’t controlled by any central authority, there’s no one to contact for assistance.Risk 4: Negative carry.Investors are normally paid to hold most major currencies, including the U.S. dollar, in the form of interest, Upton notes. That’s not the case with Bitcoin as investors who hold the asset may lose out on earned interest. The same is true of gold. This is called a negative carry, meaning investors can lose money simply holding the asset.Risk 5: Bitcoin is not always a hedge against U.S. equity risk,says Capital Group currency analyst Jens Sondergaard. A common assertion of Bitcoin enthusiasts is that it may help provide downside protection when equity markets decline. While that has been the case at times, Bitcoin did not act as an effective hedge during the bear market in late February and March 2020. The price fell sharply, followed by a rebound and then a huge run-up. “It remains an open question whether Bitcoin can act as a hedge,” Sondergaard says. “Investors should be careful assuming too much about how it will behave in various market environments.”Bitcoin's correlation to U.S. equity markets spiked in 2020Source: Refinitiv Datastream. As of 4/15/21. Data represents correlation over a rolling six-month period, using daily returns. Correlation indicates the tendency of two assets to move in the same direction. In portfolio construction, lower or negative correlation between two assets means that the assets have tended to move in opposite directions, which can help reduce portfolio volatility. Values in USD.3. Acknowledge the potential of the underlying technologyWhile there are certainly big risks associated with Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies, there are also groundbreaking innovations, says Ninou Sarwono, a Capital Group emerging technologies specialist.Innovation 1: Blockchain.Think of Bitcoin as the first application of blockchain, the underlying technology that powers digital ledgers that can be shared over public or private networks and tracks transactions. These ledgers are created from transactions, approved by network participants and recorded as blocks of information. As more blocks of transactions pile up, they are securely chained to older transactions. These chains of data can be shared and added onto by trading partners, providing an easier and more efficient way to handle financial transactions.Bitcoin’s underlying technology is already used by many large financial institutions. No matter the fate of Bitcoin, blockchain’s future looks very promising, Sarwono says.Innovation 2: Initial coin offerings (ICOs).ICOs are a way for companies to raise money for their operations using cryptocurrency. The proceeds fund new projects while the buyers receive “tokens” that in many cases can be traded or used to buy goods and services from the issuing company. Tokens are akin to rewards points like frequent flier miles, Sarwono explains.Such innovations could change the way companies raise money and widen the pool of companies available for investment. But again, the possibility has pitfalls. Government regulators have warned that ICOs are not registered and, therefore, are easy targets for fraud. Indeed, there have been quite a few problems associated with these vehicles.Innovation 3: New alternatives for some parts of the world.The attractiveness of cryptocurrency tends to be greater in countries with less stable currencies, Burtin says. Like gold, cryptocurrencies may be seen as a way to store value. Additional regulation could be a good thing in preserving the benefits of cryptocurrencies while controlling the negatives.4. Consider using Bitcoin to better understand investor psychologyAlthough it may seem prudent for advisors to discourage any attempt by clients to buy Bitcoin or other cryptocurrencies, there are valid reasons to explore the options. The best of which may just come down to investor psychology.If a client buys Bitcoin, you can gauge their reaction to high levels ofmarket volatility. This is a valuable, realistic way to understand true risk tolerance beyond what’s captured in a standard client survey, Burtin explains. That insight into a client’s psychology could be useful when crafting an asset allocation plan for their portfolio.“Behaviour is so important when investing,” she says. “It’s more than Bitcoin. It’s a social experiment.”",Currencies
The coming M&A wave: 5 key questions answered,2021-04-20T10:50:00,"Will M&A play a significant role in the post-pandemic world? Companies often rely on mergers & acquisitions to transform their businesses by buying, selling or divesting assets, and 2021 is shaping up to be a big year for deal making.M&A activity hit US$484.5 billion for January and February 2021, up 33% compared to last year.“Watching companies get acquired or become acquirers is one of my favourite aspects of small-cap investing,” says portfolio manager Greg Wendt. “It’s fascinating to track small companies and see which ones make it to a much bigger scale.”M&A is not just a big deal in small cap. It can impact companies across equity and bond markets. With that in mind, Wendt and a few other Capital Group portfolio managers shared their views on 5 key questions about the M&A boom:1. What’s fueling the rise of M&A?“Companies have come out of the shell shock of the first half of 2020 and are now more confident about the future,” Wendt says. Many have strong balance sheets and consider M&A as a growth strategy.Companies are also sitting on record amounts of cash, says Scott Sykes, a fixed income portfolio manager. Some industries such as cruise lines and hotel chains raised money to stay afloat through the pandemic. Others — after an initial dash for cash in case of a prolonged downturn — raised additional funds to take advantage of low interest rates.Many investors expect companies to buy back stock and debt, put funds toward acquisitions, or do a combination of all three, Sykes notes.Companies have amassed a record amount of cashSources: Federal Reserve, Refinitiv Datastream. As of 9/30/2020.2. Are sky-high equity valuations influencing deals?“CEOs are a little amazed at their stock prices. They want to use that advantage strategically, and many want to make acquisitions,” Wendt says. “We are in a buoyant market with high stock prices that companies can use as currency.”Companies that engage in M&A are often those with a history and pattern of deal making. “There are companies you know that make sense as part of bigger companies. And every now and then you’re surprised when the acquirer gets acquired,” Wendt adds.Meanwhile, companies with more leverage, such as those in the high-yield sector, could use this opportunity to go public, according to portfolio manager David Daigle. “Private equity firms will be minor players when it comes to buying public assets at these valuations,” Daigle adds. “They will, however, bid aggressively for carve out assets that come up for sale as companies seek to reposition their businesses. But paying a 30% premium on top of already high public valuations is not something you’ll see very often.”Valuations across most industries are highSources: RIMES, MSCI. As of 1/31/21.3. Is M&A good for investors?While companies often tout value creation as a result of M&A, many end up destroying value, Wendt says. The Harvard Business Review recently warned management that the “once-in-a-generation opportunity to make acquisitions” could lead to deals that ultimately hurt companies.“I’m not a huge fan of transformative acquisitions — I’ve seen too many that didn’t work,” Wendt says. “Often M&A is a product of a company running out of gas. They fail as often as they succeed.”“I think big picture, M&A is a key risk to credit,” Sykes adds. “Large deals tend to add leverage and increase risks. M&A is something I am tracking, and I actively avoid or reduce investments in companies I think could lever up dramatically.”But the right management team can make all the difference. “Many executives love their companies, and it says a lot about their commitment to maximizing shareholder value when they are willing to sell,” says Wendt. “One of my favourite examples is an airline that sold itself at a time when it was doing very well. The CEO said he just did not see a path to becoming a long-term winner in a consolidating industry.”On the flip side, there have been companies that turned down incredible offers only to languish for decades trying to get back to that higher price.Largest U.S. M&A deals of 2020Source: Bloomberg. Includes five largest announced deals in 2020 completed or still pending as of 2/28/21.4. What industries could be most transformed by M&A?Digitization across all industries will drive many M&A deals. The pandemic accelerated the growth of many tech companies, particularly Big Tech. Although Facebook, Amazon and Alphabet may refrain from acquisitions in the face ofintense regulatory scrutinythere are several smaller tech companies that could become targets or buyers, according to Wendt.For example, banks have always wanted a slice of the digital payment space, but the pandemic accelerated the move toward contactless payments. Large players such as PayPal continue to make acquisitions but may eventually find themselves a target.Gaming companies such as casino operators are also on the hunt for digital offerings in the areas of fantasy sports and online betting. “This industry is maturing quickly, and it is much easier to get a known customer to bet more than to identify new customers,” Wendt adds.Media is also another sector undergoing massive shifts, with cord cutting continuing to drive some of the changes. “There’s a lot more competition creating content, and it’s unclear if some of the programming translates well to streaming,” Sykes notes. “Will Amazon, Netflix, or Disney+ buy content the same way that CBS and ABC once did?”Meanwhile, Big Pharma’s penchant for acquiring smaller companies with drugs nearing regulatory approval is well-known. This year will be no exception, he adds.Innovation is particularly fragmented in drug development with many small players working to find solutions to big health care problems. Regulatory pressure to keep costs low and preserve patent expirations on key drugs tend to support M&A activity no matter the economic environment.In energy, companies may engage in M&A to create a better industry structure that allows them to be profitable, Daigle says. Many are investing in renewables as governments worldwide call for lower emissions, and legacy energy companies are seeking to consolidate amid persistently low energy prices.5. How are SPACs changing the game?The frenzy around special purpose acquisition companies (SPAC) has achieved star status. Shaquille O’Neal and Alex Rodriguez are among the names providing the funding. Even major corporations such as consumer food company Post Holdings and device maker Medtronic are in on the act.A SPAC allows a private company to become public without going through the lengthy process of filing an initial public offering, or IPO. Here’s how it works: The publicly traded SPAC raises cash via the market and uses the funds to acquire a private company. By comparison, an IPO is when a company files paperwork to raise funds as part of its effort to go public.More than 380 SPACs raised US$106 billion last year. And in January 2021 alone, SPACs raised roughly US$32 billion.SPACs are on the riseSource: Bloomberg. Includes all announced deals as of 2/18/21.The sheer number of active SPACs created in 2020 indicates the pipeline for acquisitions is exceptionally high.“M&A is going to be really interesting this year because of the rise of SPACs, which generally have two years to find a deal or the money gets returned,” says Wendt, who has already invested in several SPACs. “There are going to be lots of new companies introduced to the market, which is great for an organization with deep research capabilities.”",Markets & Economy
5G wireless evolution: Can you hear me now?,2021-04-08T02:26:00,"If measured solely by the pizzazz of its name, 5G doesn’t exactly set hearts aflutter. It lacks the futuristic allure of, say, artificial intelligence or machine learning. And it doesn’t conjure images of science fiction springing to life in the same vein as self-driving cars, advanced robotics or wearable electronics.But what 5G lacks in public relations appeal, it makes up for in sheer transformational potential. This fifth generation of wireless communication is projected to be as much as 100 times faster than the current 4G, with seamless connections that promise relief for cellphone users plagued by dropped calls or interminable waits to log into websites.In fact, 5G is an essential ingredient underpinning many of tomorrow’s most prominent technologies. Robots, for example, can only perform the intricate tasks envisioned for the future if they can wirelessly synchronize with one another in real time.The most far-reaching benefits of 5G might not come from what’s expected but from applications that are little more than sketches on a drawing board today. That was the case with 4G when it was rolled out nearly a decade ago. 4G made good on its promise of speed and connectivity. But beyond that, it provided the technological scaffolding that set the stage for today’s sprawling ecosystem of smartphone apps: streaming video and music, social networking and portable gaming.The high stakes involved in 5G are reflected in fierce competition between the U.S. and China. As part of their larger clash over trade and technology, the world’s two biggest economies are squaring off in a sprint for 5G superiority, believing it will provide a gateway to broader economic and digital primacy. Indeed, if 4G is any guide, the country that best implements 5G stands to reap significant financial rewards.5G is the digital promised landOf course, none of this will happen immediately. Despite breathless marketing campaigns from smartphone makers and cell service providers, it will take time to work through the normal growing pains that accompany a rollout this grand in scale and ambition. Technological standards must be ironed out, logistical hurdles must be overcome and major infrastructure investments must be made.Still, there’s a lot to be excited about, both for the companies providing the components and services, and for consumers thirsting for a digital promised land of blazing speed and nearly instantaneous reaction times. In coming years, 5G is likely to uncork some of the current 4G bottlenecks, lay the foundation for coming innovations and, ultimately, usher in a new era of communications.Reducing latency is a wireless game changerEvery generation of cellular network has improved on the one it preceded. The second generation added digital capabilities, allowing phones to send text messages and, eventually, photos. The third made those systems swifter and more reliable. The fourth added bandwidth by converting nearly all cell networks to digital streams.Where 5G shines is in its ability to reduce latency — the time lag it takes two machines to communicate with one another. Think of when you dial a friend on your smartphone and wait through a moment of silence before the other phone rings. That moment is travel time; your request must reach the other device and be processed, and the response must arc back to your phone.Latency is measured in milliseconds, or thousandths of a second, and though that doesn’t sound like much, it’s a major roadblock to time-sensitive actions. Imagine driving down the street and seeing another car darting into an intersection. You slam on the brakes to avoid a collision. That might feel like a single action, but it’s actually a multistep process. For most drivers, it takes about 1,500 milliseconds, or a second and a half.5G answers the need for speedFor most 4G networks, it takes about 50 milliseconds to carry your request one way; 5G networks have the potential to get to a reliable 1 millisecond. Again, that might not sound like much, but shaving that from your reaction time at highway speed would allow you to brake about 10 feet earlier. And if your car is driving itself, every inch matters.Such time savings are even more valuable in systems that make hundreds or thousands of server requests a minute, especially those in which the speed of one function depends on that of another. On an assembly line, for example, a robot can’t go faster than the one preceding it. Latency also limits multitasking or switching between jobs. High latency adds time to each step, making some tasks too inefficient to justify.Many sectors could benefit from 5GSelf-driving cars head the list of industries that are expected to reap the benefits of 5G. Ultrafast communications will give vehicles more time to react to surprises and broadcast warnings to others. Think back to the car in the intersection. For autonomous vehicles, a 2 millisecond call to central control, followed by a 1 millisecond warning to every nearby car, could prevent a crash.Industrial robotics could also get a huge boost, as automated machines would be able to execute more complicated tasks. Robots would be better equipped to handle multiple tasks. Beyond that, 5G may let factories operate robots without cumbersome wires. And machines with lightning-fast reflexes could minimize factory floor injuries by identifying and avoiding their human counterparts.The emergence of 5G could have profound effects on health care. For instance, it could speed the use of robotic surgery, allowing doctors to remotely control devices without any delay or loss in fidelity. This could allow a specialist in one part of the world to operate on a patient in another.And as network-connected devices become more common — think internet-enabled refrigerators and GPS-equipped dog collars — households are likely to place a much higher load on the network. Lower latency and greater bandwidth will serve to make the “internet of things” more manageable.Global race is on for 5G supremacyThe ultimate impact of 5G could extend beyond the merely technical. If past is prelude, successful adoption could add oomph to entire economies, as the U.S. experienced with 4G. By modernizing its creaky 3G system, the U.S. created a fertile environment for domestic technology companies to develop new ways of storing and transmitting content. And robust public access ensured there was an audience to consume that content. Investors benefited greatly as Facebook, Netflix and Alphabet (parent of Google and YouTube) fortified their market-leading positions.A feverish race is now on for 5G dominance. China has long sought to establish itself as a major player in cellular networking, both by helping to develop system protocols and nurturing its own hardware producers. One of these, Huawei, is among the largest producers of networking hardware, though it’s effectively been banned from U.S. markets because of concerns that its devices could provide sensitive data to the Chinese government.As part of its strategy, China siloed its internet and developed its own search engine, social media and e-commerce titans: Baidu instead of Google, WeChat instead of Facebook, Alibaba instead of Amazon. It now has its own highly developed internet ecosystem. That’s placed China in a strong position to reap the benefits of 5G — and perhaps position some of its companies as global leaders.The scramble for 5G primacy is sure to create opportunities for long-term investors. Businesses that churn out cutting-edge technology, as well as those harnessing it to roll out new or improved products, have the potential to stand out in the global marketplace. Once 5G becomes widely available, it will open business models that didn’t previously exist due to technological limitations. It will also boost the current tech giants as internet search, social media and e-commerce become further ingrained in daily life.Though it’s hard to fully predict what the 5G world will look like, a new era of technological innovation is on the horizon.",Technology & Innovation
China: Policy and investment implications under Biden,2021-03-29T09:24:00,"The first 100 days in power for any new presidential administration is never easy. With U.S.-China relations at arguably their lowest point in 50 years, the administration of President Joe Biden will have to make some difficult policy decisions that could affect the balance of the world’s two largest economies. How could the relationship evolve over the next four years?We asked Capital Group political economist Michael Thawley and portfolio manager Chris Thomsen to share their perspectives on potential implications for trade policies and investments.How much might policy change under the Biden administration?Michael Thawley, political economist:The Biden administration is facing the same problems as the Trump administration, so I don’t expect much change from a geopolitical standpoint. China’s economy is currently the single greatest contributor to global growth and its leaders have grown more self-confident and are seeking a greater voice in world affairs.I think the overall policy framework will carry over with a few caveats. I anticipate the existing trade tariffs will remain in place for the foreseeable future. Biden’s team will probably maintain the investment and technology restrictions against China but try to define them more carefully and create more streamlined and predictable processes. This could help certain U.S. technology companies and Wall Street banks that have investments and interests in China.For example, some of America’s leading semiconductor companies count China among their largest markets for sales. If they are restricted in shipping more advanced chips to China, this could affect their longer-term revenue. Meanwhile, Wall Street banks and asset managers want to make a bigger push into China after Beijing loosened rules to operate in the country.Elsewhere, coalition-building and mitigating climate change are part of Biden’s global agenda. This is a significant departure from the priorities of the past four years. Another shift might be more targeted sanctions when it comes to China’s policies toward Hong Kong and Taiwan. This is an ongoing risk.The U.S. has remained an IPO destination for Chinese companiesSource: FactSet. As of December 31, 2020.What do you see as potential challenges to this approach?Thawley:The Biden team will aim to rehabilitate alliances with allies and work more consistently with these other countries on China. While the previous administration was viewed as taking a unilateral approach, Biden will be challenged in forming an international coalition to influence China in hopes of reaching a new equilibrium.It won’t be easy to craft policy that allows for mutually beneficial economic cooperation while at the same time limiting the pressure China can put on the U.S. and its allies.South Korea, Japan and Australia are looking to the United States to help balance China’s power in the Western Pacific. It's complicated, because everyone has huge economic interests in their relationship with China. The U.S. and its allies still want to do business with China and investors want to invest there.The Biden administration could seek an arrangement with China that acknowledges its importance to the world economy. This could result in fairer economic practices and a level playing field. From my experience working in government, I’ve found that creating and sustaining coalitions behind such a set of common goals can be hard work.Could this herald a greater decoupling of the two economies?Thawley:I don’t think a decoupling will happen. It would not be in the best interests of the U.S. or the world. The U.S.-China economic relationship will still be substantial, but much more focused in areas where there is less concern about technology transfer and intellectual property, such as agricultural products and basic consumer goods.In the past, the U.S.-China economic relationship was fueled by business investment and technology transfer. That has changed and will continue to evolve. Current restrictions are also going to limit the amount of economic and commercial integration of corporations. This would affect both U.S. and Chinese companies. For instance, some top U.S. exports to China are semiconductors, aerospace products and motor vehicles.The Biden administration will likely make the investment and technology restrictions on China more systematic and targeted. This approach could provide more clarity and predictability to economic interaction between them. And I expect U.S. officials will remain preoccupied with cyber issues, protection of personal and consumer data and critical infrastructure.At this juncture, we are probably looking at a bifurcated world in terms of the internet and manufacturing. It’s clear that the U.S. won’t be importing 5G cellular technologies from China or exporting our most advanced technologies there.China is evolving from the world’s factory to innovative growthSource: OECD.What does this mean for strategically important areas like technology from a bottom-up perspective?Chris Thomsen, portfolio manager:In technology, the world is bifurcating into two separate systems: one centred around China and the other around the U.S. and its allies. In telecommunications hardware, this is already happening in 5G: China is ahead of the U.S. in developing its network, and the U.S. and many European Union countries have banned Huawei from their telecom networks.Semiconductors is another complicated area. Companies are being forced to navigate new trade rules and position themselves to meet customer demand in the U.S. and China. TSMC, the world’s largest contract chipmaker, plans to build a world-class manufacturing plant in Arizona, and some of its suppliers are weighing similar investments on American soil. At the same time, a leading Korean memory chipmaker is moving some of its manufacturing capacity for lower end chips to China.China wants to become self-sufficient in key industries, and for that reason developing the semiconductor industry is a critical component of the government’s five-year plan. Currently, companies in China that make mobile phones and other electronics rely heavily on Taiwan, Korea and the U.S. for more advanced semiconductors and manufacturing equipment.Even though Chinese companies like Tencent and Alibaba have created world-leading mobile payment and internet services platforms, the country lags the rest of the world in semiconductors and is many years away from having cutting-edge technology to compete in certain areas, including memory chips and leading node semiconductor equipment. For example, China's top chipmaker is producing chips on 14-nanometer process technology, which is at least two generations behind the global market leader. Given geopolitical uncertainties, China’s government is providing substantial financial incentives for both state-backed and privately run semiconductor companies to close the technological gap.How are U.S.-China relations shaping your investment perspective?Thomsen:The selective decoupling and strategic competition between the U.S. and China will likely last for the rest of my investing career. And while it can be easy to lose sight of long-term secular trends and potential investment opportunities when tensions flare up, China has significantly evolved from the state-planned economy of the 1980s and being the factory of the world in the 1990s and 2000s.Despite negative headlines about trade wars, I’m confident China will remain one of the most attractive investment opportunities in the world due to its young and vibrant population and an increasingly educated and talented middle class.Today China is home to many entrepreneurial and innovative companies. And the enormous domestic market enables successful winners to scale up exponentially. In my portfolio, many of the larger Chinese holdings weren’t even listed a decade ago.The trade war has reinforced China’s focus on its domestic economy. Under China’s new “dual circulation” strategy, Beijing wants to vertically integrate and insulate its economy by building reliable domestic supply chains that can serve its industries and be an alternative source for a wide range of products and services.I’ve avoided areas affected by the trade conflicts, such as exporters or state-run companies, which tend to be low-return businesses. Instead, I have focused on private sector companies that might become tomorrow’s national champions in areas of technology, services, health care, and the ever-evolving middle-class consumer. Hopefully these companies will be relatively insulated from global trade tensions and benefit from attractive secular trends.A surge in value for China’s consumer discretionary companiesSources: RIMES, MSCI. Data reflects market cap of MSCI China Investable Market Index (IMI) consumer discretionary sector as of December 31, 2020.Where do you see potential growth areas in China?Thomsen:The biopharmaceuticals industry is one example. The industry barely existed 10 years ago in China, but now there are several publicly traded firms with market values north of US$30 billion.Local biopharmaceutical companies have gained international credibility among multinational pharmaceutical giants that want to work with them to develop, test and manufacture drugs. Two of the key drivers for this evolution have been the large influx of scientists returning to China from abroad and the surge in venture funding for health care startups.The service side of the Chinese economy has been rapidly developing, and I have been focused on investment ideas that target domestic businesses or consumers.Take enterprise software. China has lagged the U.S. in adopting cloud-based technology. Corporations viewed software as a cost rather than a productivity tool, but today more Chinese companies are investing in and adapting software as a service.Rising wealth among China’s consumers is opening up a number of potential investment opportunities. We’ve seen strong demand for better health care, and private hospital chains offering specialized medical procedures have significant growth potential.As China’s car market continues to mature, I’m interested in auto dealer networks that have strong relationships with global manufacturers and are consolidating a fragmented industry. They should benefit from the sale of new cars and can also capture the high-margin after-sales service business for repairs and maintenance as well as used car sales.The most exciting area has been the internet space.Alibaba and Tencent initially copied U.S. peers but have since evolved into incredibly sophisticated multifaceted platforms. But today they could be viewed as the first-generation of Chinese internet companies.There’s been a new wave of innovative second- and third-generation companies run by dynamic entrepreneurs. These companies have scaled up incredibly fast due to the size and technological sophistication of China’s market. In my view, it’s extremely difficult to find these types of opportunities outside of China, and I enjoy hunting for these new ideas for my portfolio.",China
Roaring ‘20s: How pent-up demand could fuel recovery,2021-03-11T06:29:00,"Could pent-up demand for travel and leisure drive a Roaring ‘20s today?“I think the quick introduction of vaccines is a major game changer, even with all the growing pains we are seeing in terms of distribution,” says equity portfolio manager Lisa Thompson. “A travel recovery is coming, and I think it can happen relatively quickly. Everybody is eager to go on vacation or to just get out and do stuff. The question is whether the recovery has legs. I think we will have to see how the vaccine rollout evolves, among other things.”Ready, willing — and able — to spendIndeed, cabin fever appears to have taken hold of consumers everywhere. There are signs that consumers are prepared to act: Savings rates have soared since the start of the pandemic, and though they have slowed a bit in recent months they remain relatively high.Many consumers in the U.S. have boosted their savings during the pandemic“Once there’s an all-clear, I expect the desire to travel plus the ability for many consumers to spend means we could see a powerful recovery, even if it takes a few years,” adds Thompson, who has spent more than 30 years as a professional investor.“This crisis is much different than the global financial crisis in 2008 or any of the other crises I’ve seen in my career. Today, looser fiscal policy, looser monetary policy, a very strong banking system and high personal savings rates could help drive a very sharp pickup in demand.”These conditions not only can benefit the travel and leisure industries but also the broader economy. To be sure, there will probably be hiccups along the way, and some areas will likely recover more quickly than others.Passenger loyalty: A tailwind for cruise linesCruise ships became the epicenter of the COVID crisis in February 2020, when 3,700 people were quarantined aboard the Diamond Princess after a shipboard outbreak. At the time, the ship accounted for half of all known cases outside mainland China.“This industry has gotten so much negative media, yet people are still booking cruises for 2021 and 2022 at prices higher than they were in 2019,” says equity analyst Todd Saligman, who covers cruise lines and U.S. and European airlines. “That’s pretty indicative of the demand. There is a loyalty and enthusiasm among cruisers that people who don’t cruise may fail to appreciate, and that loyalty has persisted through the crisis.”In fact, more than 70% of respondents to an industry survey said they will cruise again.Loyal customers can keep cruise industry afloatWhile cruising has resumed in Europe, the U.S. Centers for Disease Control imposed a “no sail” order that has not yet been lifted in North America.“It’s not clear when the ships will set sail again, but I believe they will be cruising near full utilization quicker than many people expect,” Saligman says.Although cruise stocks have rebounded from their March lows, Saligman believes select cruise lines continue to represent opportunity for long-term investors.What’s more, with intense focus on healthy sailing practices, “There’s a case to be made that they could one day be considered among the cleanest places on earth to vacation,” says equity portfolio manager Chris Buchbinder.Vacation plans up in the airAs was the case in the cruise industry, global air travel was down an estimated 66% in 2020, about 20 times worse than the previous record. Within the U.S., which is more dependent on business travel, the devastation was worse: Air travel declined as much as 95% in the early months of the crisis.The rollout of the vaccines and prior experience gives Saligman confidence that demand will bounce back. “I believe it will happen quickly as the vaccine rolls out,” he says. “We also saw this after the September 11 attacks. A lot of people thought consumers would never fly again, and traffic recovered quickly.”Indeed, in China, where the virus is largely under control and the economy has rebounded, domestic air travel has nearly returned to pre-COVID levels.Air travel in China has soared back. Will the U.S. soon follow?The ripple effectA revival in travel demand can also have a powerful ripple effect, creating the need for a range of goods and services and helping drive job growth across a variety of industries. Among these are aircraft manufacturers, jet engine makers, hotels, casinos and restaurants — all of which were devastated by the pandemic.Consider aircraft engine makers, which operate a recurring revenue business model. Companies like Safran and General Electric build the engines and sell them at a modest profit, but the engines must be serviced regularly, and the engine makers can generate a great deal of revenue from the service contracts.“They're not making any money this year, because airplanes are grounded, but as air travel resumes, those manufacturers will potentially see their cash flows rebound,” Buchbinder says.Unlike other sectors of the economy during COVID, aircraft engine makers are not going to see digital disruption upend their business. “After all,” Buchbinder adds, “there are no digital aircraft engines.”Markets tend to anticipate recoveriesMarkets often anticipate recoveries in the underlying economy, so it’s important to recognize underlying trends early. Consider the global financial crisis, a period when the housing and automobile industries were severely beaten down. By 2012 it became clear that demand was building, thanks to changing demographics and an aging auto fleet. In both industries, a full recovery took several more years, but a rebound in auto- and housing-related stocks anticipated the recovery in demand and earnings. From February 2009 through December 2010, auto sales fell 6% while auto stock returns advanced 496%.Auto stocks rebounded ahead of sales after the global financial crisisMore recently, since the introduction of the vaccines, shares of companies across a number of travel-related industries have registered strong gains. Select companies likely have room to run, Buchbinder says.“The market often runs ahead of the actual recovery in earnings,” he says. “I think a year from now we will be in a very different environment where demand and earnings for some of these companies will begin to recover in a more meaningful and sustained way. Our job as investors is to identify those companies that stand to benefit most from the changing environment.”Maintaining a balanceStudents of history can look to many examples of past crises and declines that were followed by powerful recoveries thanks in part to pent-up consumer demand. Examples include the travel sector after 9/11 and the housing and auto industries following the end of the great financial crisis in 2008–2009.As long-term investors, Capital Group’s investment professionals seek to identify trends early enough to select the companies that stand to benefit from these dynamics. For investors and their advisors, it is important to make sure portfolios are balanced with exposure not only to growth strategies but also to strategies focused on more value-oriented companies, like many of the travel-related stocks.A review of more than 4,000 U.S. portfolios by Capital Group’s Portfolio & Analytics team found that investors significantly reduced allocations to value equities over the last three years. It may be time to rebalance.Returns for leading growth companies have continued to be strong, for good reason. But it may be shortsighted for investors to become seduced by the runaway growth stories, considering that many of the beaten down stocks in travel and other sectors have attractive valuations. And recently there have been some early signs that the market rally may be broadening as many of these stocks have posted meaningful gains.Investors have scaled back their exposure to value funds“We’ve just been through a market downturn and recovery where the great secular growth companies led during the decline and on the way back up,” Buchbinder says. “That is a historically unusual pattern. As the vaccines roll out and the recovery broadens we will begin to see companies in the travel industry, or perhaps energy or financials, all of which had been very hard hit during the downturn, participate in the recovery.”",U.S. Equities
Washington watch: Priorities emerge under new leadership,2021-02-24T02:52:00,"As President Joe Biden takes office, the prospects for his policy agenda appear more robust thanpreviously thought, following a Georgia runoff election that flipped control of the U.S. Senate.With Democrats now in charge of the White House, Senate and House of Representatives, some of Biden’s top legislative priorities may encounter less opposition between now and the 2022 midterm elections. But a 50-50 split in the Senate, with Vice President Kamala Harris as the tiebreaker, still means that major new legislation may require some degree of bipartisan support.Without a commanding Democratic majority, the most ambitious elements of Biden’s agenda are likely to face a difficult, but not impossible, path to approval. That includes large tax increases for corporations and the wealthy, which some moderate Democrats may oppose along with many Republicans, especially while theU.S. economycontinues to struggle with the COVID crisis.“This is not a blue wave scenario,” says John Emerson, Vice Chairman of Capital Group International, Inc.SM and a former U.S. Ambassador to Germany. “With thin Democratic margins in the House and a 50-50 Senate, Democratic moderates will have a moderating influence on legislation. President Biden will work hard to gain bipartisan support where he can.”Emerson also noted that, historically speaking, the U.S. stock market has performed well regardless of which party controls Washington. That includes many periods when Democrats ruled the White House and both houses of Congress — highlighted by a 26% return in USD for the Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index coming out of the global financial crisis in 2009.U.S. stocks have moved higher since the January 5 runoff election in Georgia, as well. In that race, Republicans unexpectedly lost both Senate seats, resulting in a 50-50 tie. With Vice President Kamala Harris’ pivotal role as tiebreaker, Democrats now control the Senate by a razor-thin margin. U.S. stocks rose to an all-time high on January 8, and continue to post modest gains on a year-to-date basis.U.S. stocks have rallied under Democratic ruleU.S. economic outlookIn addition, the outlook for the U.S. economy is marginally better under a political power structure where Democrats may be able to push through larger stimulus bills and higher spending on infrastructure projects, among other spending priorities, says Capital Group economist Jared Franz.With a vaccine-assisted recovery already underway, Franz expects the U.S. economy to grow at a greater than 3% pace in 2021 — and potentially 4% — depending on how quickly and effectively the government moves to distribute stimulus checks and vaccines to the public.“Reaching 4% growth is entirely possible, driven by government stimulus efforts, rapid vaccinations and organic recovery from the 2020 downturn,” Franz explains. “My concern, however, is with the unemployment rate (currently 6.7%). I think it will come down slower than most economists expect amid rising layoffs and the retooling of the economy to a post-pandemic labour-light regime.”Policy landscape takes shapeHigh-priority policy initiatives under the Biden administration are likely to include a modest corporate income tax hike, which previously appeared to be off the table when Republicans controlled the Senate.The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 — the most significant piece of legislation passed under President Trump — reduced corporate income tax rates to roughly 21% from 32%. Under the new administration, there is a decent chance of that number moving up in a phased approach to approximately 25%, rather than the 28% tax rate that Biden proposed during the campaign, says Capital Group political economist Matt Miller.“There probably will be corporate tax hikes at some point, but I think they will be tempered by the concerns of centrist Democrats who don’t want to go too far too fast,” Miller says. “A 50-50 plus the VP majority in the Senate is a different world compared to a 55-seat majority, and I think the outcome of Biden’s policy agenda will reflect that.”Modest corporate tax increases could be on the wayThe same holds true for many other hot-button issues, such as levying higher taxes on wealthy individuals and raising the federal minimum wage, both of which were high on the list of Biden’s campaign promises. “Remember, some of these Democratic Senators will be up for reelection in 2022, and they may not want to run on a platform of higher taxes,” Miller notes, “especially at a time when the Senate and House majorities are so narrow.”The environment and climate change could move front and centre, as well, including policies to encourage green investing and more disclosure requirements for public companies related to environmental, social and governance (ESG) matters.Is Big Tech in big trouble?Another issue that will likely arise during Biden’s first year in office is greater regulation of the technology industry. Both Democrats and Republicans have supported cracking down on Big Tech in various ways, including more aggressive antitrust enforcement and eliminating some long-standing legislative protections for internet companies.This is another area where the Georgia runoff election has had a big impact, Miller says, because a Republican Senate could have blocked Biden’s appointments to the Federal Trade Commission and the U.S. Department of Justice Antitrust Division, but that won’t happen in a 50-50 Senate.“I think those appointments will be a lot more aggressive than they would have been if Georgia had gone the other way,” Miller says. “And that means, yes, there will likely be a renewed focus on tech regulation. I don’t know yet how much of a threat it poses to their business models, but it’s something we’ll need to watch closely. At a minimum, I think it will be more difficult for tech firms to gain government approval to grow by acquiring promising competitors.”Ramped up COVID reliefOf all the issues competing for Biden’s attention, however, none will get higher priority than the COVID relief and economic recovery efforts already under way.As the president laid out in a January 14 2021 announcement, he will seek rapid approval of a US$1.9 trillion spending package that includes US$400 billion for vaccine deployment and school reopening, US$350 billion to help state and local governments, and US$1,400 direct payments to individuals, among other assistance for displaced workers.The announcement came one day after the House moved to impeach Trump, meaning a Senate trial, if it happens, could compete for time with COVID-relief deliberations and result in legislative delays.“For Biden’s first 100 days in office, the priority will be COVID, COVID, COVID,” Emerson stressed, “for the simple reason that everything else depends on it.”",Election
U.S. election results bring policy priorities into focus,2020-11-17T09:58:00,"Now that the results of last week’s U.S. elections are coming into focus, investor attention is shifting to the policy implications of a Joe Biden presidency. Bottom line: Don’t expect big, sweeping changes in the years ahead.With a Democrat in the White House and Republicans likely maintaining control of the Senate, consequential changes will be difficult to achieve in a familiar environment of Washington gridlock. That may prove to be the best of both worlds from an investment perspective.“Assuming the base case of a divided government holds, major tax increases should be off the table at least for the next two years,” says Jason Bortz, senior counsel at Capital Group who specializes in U.S. tax and retirement plan issues. “I think the 2017 tax cut bill — President Trump’s signature achievement — will stand.”Of course, that outcome hinges on the continuation of a Republican majority in the Senate, and not all Senate races have been resolved, Bortz notes. Two Senate races in Georgia are headed for a January 5 runoff election, which could change the equation. However, it’s been 20 years since a Republican lost a Senate race in Georgia, which requires an outright majority to win statewide office.U.S. corporate taxes are likely to remain low under a split CongressPolitical uncertainty persistsIn addition to Georgia’s unresolved status, a degree of uncertainty remains around the presidential election results. While Biden has been declared the winner by major news organizations, the Trump campaign has filed a flurry of lawsuits challenging the results — claiming election fraud and other irregularities in several key states. Recounts are also likely in Georgia and potentially other swing states where media outlets have declared Biden the winner.While those efforts are unlikely to change the outcome, they can’t be completely dismissed either, says Capital Group political economist Matt Miller.“I think we have to be prepared for a few weeks of litigiousness,” Miller says. “The Trump team will pursue every available legal challenge, and there could be some twists and turns before it’s all over. From an investor’s point of view, all we can do is keep calm and carry on while they work their way through the process.”Policy priorities in motionSo what might change under a Biden administration?The top priority will be a COVID-relief stimulus bill, which might even happen before Inauguration Day on January 20, 2021. The idea has bipartisan support; however, Democrats and Republicans have so far not been able to agree on a dollar amount. That could change now that Election Day has passed.“After the dust settles, I am cautiously optimistic that the Senate can work with the House of Representatives to get something done,” says Reagan Anderson, a senior vice president on Capital Group’s government relations team. “In my estimation, there is bipartisan support for roughly US$1 trillion in spending, which is half the size of the previous relief bill, but it’s probably a compromise that Republican and Democratic leaders can live with.”Other Biden administration priorities may include a modest infrastructure spending bill, immigration reform and drug pricing reform — all of which have some level of Republican support. The environment and climate change probably will move front-and-centre, as well, including policies to encourage green investing and more disclosure related to environmental, social and governance (ESG) matters.On the other hand, as long as Congress remains split, specific tax policy proposals are not likely to see the light of day, including corporate and individual income tax increases, a capital gains tax hike and a financial transactions tax.“We also expect no change to the Senate filibuster or to the number of justices on the Supreme Court, both of which became hot-button issues during the campaign,” Anderson adds.The fiduciary rule and Regulation Best Interest (Reg BI)Other policy priorities may be enacted through executive orders and federal agency regulations. “Changes that can be made without going through the legislative process will be high on the president’s agenda,” Bortz says. “It’s the means to affect change when you have divided government.”In the U.S. retirement industry, Bortz expects fiduciary standards to once again come under the regulatory spotlight. The Trump administration is working to finalize a U.S. Department of Labor (DOL) proposal that would give an exemption allowing investment fiduciaries to receive variable compensation for nondiscretionary investment advice, as long as they acknowledge fiduciary status in writing and adhere to certain conduct standards under current securities law.Biden’s team may nix that rule, even if it is finalized during the remaining months of the Trump administration. The new administration is also likely to start work on a proposal that is expected to track the controversial Obama-era fiduciary rule, which was struck down by a federal court in the early days of the Trump administration.Many prominent Democrats, including Vice President-elect Kamala Harris, have been supportive of tougher “standard of care” rules, arguing that current law does not go far enough to protect investors. Democratic leaders have also maintained that Reg BI does not adequately safeguard investors, and it is possible that a new SEC will tighten Reg BI’s requirements and take a firmer enforcement stance.Recently, the DOL also finalized a regulation that will make it more challenging for plan sponsors to offer ESG funds in defined contribution (DC) plans, particularly within a default investment option like a target date fund. Democratic leaders and a large portion of the asset management industry have sharply criticized the rule. Democratic leaders might seek to water it down via DOL-led amendments or interpretive guidance, Bortz adds.U.S.-China relationship will continue to be a key issueForeign policyOn the foreign policy front, U.S.-China relations will almost certainly remain the top priority under a Biden administration, says Michael Thawley, a Capital Group political economist and formerly Australia's ambassador to the United States. While Biden's foreign policy team will approach China in a more strategic and less confrontational fashion than Trump, they probably will take a tougher stance than the previous administration did under Obama.Biden’s trade policy toward China will likely borrow some tactics from the Trump administration, such as the use of tariffs. Technology and investment restrictions will remain and will almost certainly be tightened, albeit in a more systematic and targeted way, Thawley adds, given the growing support for such measures in Washington.""Overall, the trajectory of the U.S.-China relationship is becoming clearer, and the fundamentals would not be different under a Biden administration,"" Thawley says. ""The intensity of the strategic competition will not have diminished. In a few years, we could end up with a much more tightly defined but still substantial bilateral economic relationship.""",Election
What the U.S. election means for investors,2020-11-05T05:14:00,"The uncertainty of 2020 continues.After turning out in record numbers, voters awoke Wednesday morning with no clear winner declared in the U.S. presidential election. In a race that has proven to be much closer than many polls had predicted, the outcome may remain unknown for days or even weeks.“Patience will be the key to getting through this period of political uncertainty,” says John Emerson, Vice Chairman of Capital Group International and a former U.S. Ambassador to Germany. “There are literally millions of votes that have yet to be counted — including a large number of mail-in ballots — so a delay is not that surprising. We’ve been warning aboutthis scenariofor months.”From an investment perspective, Emerson explains, it is likely that market volatility will persist at elevated levels until President Donald Trump or former Vice President Joe Biden is declared the winner. U.S. equity markets staged a strong rally on Election Day, with the S&P 500 Index rising 1.8% (all returns in USD). On Wednesday morning, stocks continued to climb higher amid the uncertainty as results in several key states remained too close to call. U.S. Treasurys rallied, partially on the view that a split government could curtail prospects for excessive fiscal stimulus.“There’s understandably a lot of anxiety right now,” Emerson adds, “but investors should think hard about adhering to their long-term investment goals, rather than reacting to near-term political events. That is often a mistake.”Stocks have trended higher regardless of which party occupies the White HouseOver the course of history, markets have powered through contested presidential elections, deadly pandemics and economic recessions — usually not within the same year — but they have powered through, nonetheless. Whether a Democrat or a Republican occupies the White House has made little difference to overall long-term investment returns.Where do we go from here?The stage has been set for vote-counting battles and a flurry of lawsuits in swing states that have not yet been called for Biden or Trump. As of Wednesday morning (November 4), those states included Pennsylvania, Michigan, Nevada, North Carolina and Georgia, according to The Associated Press.“Thursday or Friday is probably the earliest we will know the preliminary vote results for each state, depending on the looming litigation,” says Matt Miller, a political economist and policy analyst with Capital Group. “The presidency could go either way in the fraught overtime ahead.”Uncertainty index is elevated and far higher than previous election cyclesLooking at the initial tally on election night, the nation essentially remains just as divided as it was four years ago when Trump unexpectedly won the 2016 election. “At midnight, Biden had 64.6 million votes and Trump had 63.2 million — on the way to what might be a record 160 million total votes,” Miller notes. “Whoever wins this election will have the daunting task of trying to bring unity and healing to a nation that is split right down the middle.”In other races, it appears likely that Republicans will hold a majority in the U.S. Senate, although that’s not certain just yet, Miller says, while Democrats will maintain control of the House of Representatives, resulting in a split Congress. That’s been the case since the 2018 midterm elections when Republicans lost the House. Coincidentally, according to our analysis, markets have performed best under a split Congress.Returns have historically been strongest when Congress is splitTwo key issues in the raceTheU.S. economyand the coronavirus outbreak were the top two issues in the presidential contest, according to most polls. Trump was generally viewed unfavourably for his handling of the pandemic, while voters gave him higher marks for his economic policies. The U.S. fell into a recession earlier this year, as government-imposed lockdowns brought economic activity to a near standstill.However, in the most recent measure of U.S. economic activity — released just five days before the election — U.S. GDP growth bounced back sharply, rising at a 33.1% annual rate, benefiting from pent-up consumer demand and massive government stimulus measures. A key driver has been U.S. home sales, which have benefited from rising demand and historically low mortgage rates.Despite extreme volatility during the year, U.S. equity markets also have trended upward. On a year-to-date basis through October 30, the S&P 500 Index gained 2.8% as technology and consumer-tech stocks rallied amid the lockdowns.“The near-term performance of the economy and the markets may have played a role in this election but, realistically speaking, presidents get far too much credit and far too much blame for what is happening in the economy and the markets,” says Capital Group economist Darrell Spence. “For the most part, the dynamics that contribute to economic growth and market returns are put in place long before the election and they remain long afterward.“As investors, we try to focus on the underlying fundamentals that are driving the economy and corporate profitability,” Spence notes. “That often has very little to do with who happens to win an election.”",Election
Recovery watch: When will growth return?,2020-10-20T05:25:00,"COVID-19 has forced economists to become students of virology.“The virus is the economy,” says Capital Group U.S. economist Jared Franz. “All economic growth forecasts depend on the trajectory of the virus — whether it gets better or worse, whether we can develop an effective vaccine and whether government stimulus measures will continue to help bridge the income gap for workers who have been displaced by this unprecedented downturn.”So when is growth likely to return to pre-pandemic levels? By the middle of 2021, Franz expects the U.S. economy to grow at an annualized rate of roughly 2% to 3%, fueled by pent-up demand from months of sheltering in place, as well as the growing likelihood of a pandemic-ending vaccine becoming available to the public.Due to the high level of uncertainty, Capital Group’s economic team has put together a scenario analysis of V-shaped, U-shaped and W-shaped economic recoveries. However, Franz said “K-shaped” — or moving in two different directions — might be appropriate, as well, given the disparity between sectors that have benefited from the pandemic and those that have been crushed by it.U.S. economy: The road to recovery remains uncertainCOVID causing a great divide in the economyOne perplexing element of the 2020 downturn is how uneven it’s been. For some areas of the U.S. economy, it has reached Depression-era levels: restaurants, hotels, retailers, airlines and, perhaps the hardest hit of all, thousands of small businesses that have closed and may never come back. But for others, it has been quite literally the best of times: e-commerce, cloud computing, video streaming and home improvement stores have skyrocketed in the stay-at-home era.Winners and losers in the COVID economic downturnThe same can be said for high-wage workers versus low-wage workers. From a job loss perspective, the 2020 downturn has been much more severe for workers earning less than US$27,000 a year — many of who cannot work from home — compared to those making US$60,000 or more. This disparity, of course, raises societal questions with no easy answer.“The post-pandemic U.S. economy is probably going to be very different than the economy we had in February 2020,” Franz says. “It’s going to be more efficient and more dynamic than before, but there will be winners and losers. Historically speaking, we have not done a good job of addressing the societal problems that arise from such disparate outcomes.”Unemployment levels are uneven among high- and low-wage workersExpect a grinding recovery near termCapital Group economists have also looked at therisks to a near-term recovery. What if we don’t get a vaccine right away? What if the federal government cannot agree on a new stimulus package? What if more job losses come in the months ahead?These fears have already been underscored by recent economic data and a series of layoff announcements from major American corporations. Personal income fell by 2.7% in August, according to the U.S. Commerce Department, largely due to reductions in enhanced unemployment benefits. Allstate, American Airlines, United Airlines and Walt Disney all announced major layoffs recently as the White House and Congressional leaders failed to reach agreement on a new stimulus bill.“I think we are going to see more of a grinding recovery in the near term,” says Capital Group economist Darrell Spence. “Since March, we’ve done everything we needed to do except get the virus under control in a manner that lets us return to some sense of normalcy. Now the fiscal stimulus is running out and, if the federal government doesn’t act soon, we could be looking at a much more difficult income profile in the months ahead.”In the second quarter of 2020 — the latest data available — the U.S. economy contracted by 31.4% on an annual basis, the biggest decline in 70 years. However, since that data reflects the worst of the downturn from April to June, the third quarter GDP reading is expected to show a dramatic bounce back as many U.S. states partially or fully reopen their economies. That report is scheduled to be released on October 29, five days before theU.S. presidential election.WithElection Day, perceptions about the U.S. economic outlook could shape the outcome. A recent Washington Post-ABC News poll confirmed that the economy is the most important issue to voters — more important than COVID by a 2-to-1 margin.Digital divide has created opportunities for stock pickersPotential investment implicationsFor investors, the pandemic-induced downturn has produced perhaps the biggest contrast of all. Amid the worst economic recession since the Great Depression, U.S. stock prices recovered quickly from the lows of March and hit new record highs in September.Leading the way have been those companies with a solid “digital advantage,” including e-commerce giant Amazon, microchip maker NVIDIA and social media titan Facebook. Apple, meanwhile, became the first U.S. company in history to reach a US$2 trillion valuation.“The market is saying this has been a disastrous year, but things are going to get better,” says Capital Group portfolio manager Steve Watson. “Given the exceptional nature of 2020, I think we need to brace for more volatility ahead, but we can still find good, compelling investments for the long term.”",United States
Election uncertainty looks increasingly certain,2020-10-12T05:01:00,"Remember all the turmoil over those hanging chads in Florida? The 2020 U.S. presidential election could make that dispute look quaint by comparison. In a year when seemingly everything has gone wrong, it is highly likely that Election Day will add another element of uncertainty to a most uncertain time.“I've been involved in presidential politics going back to the 1980s, and I have to say this is the most unusual election of my lifetime — and probably anyone’s lifetime who is alive today,” says John Emerson, Vice Chairman of Capital Group International, Inc.SM and a former U.S. Ambassador to Germany.“We have a pandemic, an economic crisis, civil unrest in the streets and, in the middle of it all,” he adds, “a dispute over a Supreme Court appointment suddenly enters the mix.” The Senate Judiciary Committee is expected to begin confirmation hearings on October 12 for President Donald Trump’s nominee, setting the stage for a partisan battle three weeks before the election.Adding yet another layer of uncertainty: Last week President Trump and his wife, Melania, tested positive for COVID-19. It remains to be seen how that could impact the campaign but, at a minimum, it places the pandemic back at the centre of the race. “Of course, our thoughts are with the President and First Lady wishing them a speedy recovery,” Emerson says.Uncertainty index is elevated and far higher than previous election cyclesTo put things in perspective, the U.S. Economic Policy Uncertainty Index — which tracks a mix of economic, policy and media-related uncertainty measurements — has hit unprecedented levels in 2020. Investors may be wondering: What could possibly come next?Mail-in ballots may trigger Election Day turmoilInstead of hanging chads — which got the spotlight in the 2000 election — mail-in ballots could be the central issue this time.Largely due to the COVID-19 outbreak, a record 80 million Americans are expected to vote by mail in this election cycle rather than visit the polls in person. That means election officials will be processing more than twice as many postal ballots as they did during the last presidential campaign in 2016.Unless it’s a clear landslide for President Trump or former Vice President Joe Biden, “the outcome of thepresidential electionprobably won’t be known for days or even weeks,” Emerson says, as states deal with the unprecedented volume of postal ballots. High levels ofmarket volatilitywould likely accompany this period of uncertainty, he adds.Moreover, Democrats are requesting mail-in ballots in much higher numbers than Republicans. This could set up a scenario where Election Day results appear to favour Republicans and then mail-in ballots — which take longer to count — shift the outcome toward Democrats. Either way, court challenges are a predictable outcome.More Democrats than Republicans are voting by mailExpect the counting to continue well past Election DaySome U.S. states don’t start counting mail-in ballots until Election Day. A few of them are key swing states where the presidential election could be decided, including Michigan, Pennsylvania and Wisconsin. By contrast, other swing states such as Arizona and Florida start tallying mail-in ballots two weeks and three weeks ahead of time, respectively, as the ballots are received.In recent months the subject of mail-in balloting has become highly politicized. However, putting those partisan arguments aside, the simple fact remains that many states have never before handled such a high volume of postal ballots. Under the best circumstances, it will be a challenge to count the votes in a timely manner.“We have to be patient,” says Reagan Anderson, a Senior Vice President with Capital Group’s government relations team. “Just because it takes longer to count the votes doesn’t mean there’s fraud involved. We may have to wait a while to ensure we get an accurate count so the American people can trust the validity of the results.”A state-by-state map for Election Day confusionWill the U.S. Supreme Court step in again?The disputed 2000 election was ultimately decided 36 days later when the U.S. Supreme Court, in a 5-to-4 vote, effectively ended recounting efforts in Florida. A key element of the decision involved a strict deadline: Under federal law, each state must determine its electors six days before the Electoral College meets.That deadline was December 12, 2000 — an impossible task to meet if recounts were permitted to continue in Florida. The court handed down its decision that same day, and former Vice President Al Gore conceded the next day. In the closest election in U.S. history, President George W. Bush won with 271 electoral votes, one more than he needed.Could the Supreme Court be called upon again? And will that deadline — this year it’s December 8 — play a similar role? Only time will tell.“At the end of the day, I think it's important to keep in mind we will have a result,” Emerson stresses. “We will have a president, and I believe we will have a peaceful transition of power.”For long-term investors, it’s important to remember that, historically speaking, the political power structure in Washington, D.C., hasn’t had much of a discernible impact on equity market returns. From 1933 to 2019, under unified and split governments, the average annual return for the Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index has fallen into a broad range from roughly 7% to 10%. A split Congress, as we have today, appears to be the market’s favourite choice, having generated an average return of 10.4%.For more on this topic, read ourGuide to investing in an election year.Investment implications:Investors should prepare for rising market volatility as Election Day approaches.Patience is key, as the outcome of the U.S. presidential race may not be known for days or weeks.The sheer volume of mail-in ballots means delayed results are probably inevitable.Despite the uncertainty, investors should remember that markets have eventually moved higher even in turbulent times.",Election
U.S. political change: Sweeping or incremental?,2020-10-05T04:38:00,"Roughly six weeks ahead of pivotalU.S. elections, one thing is becoming increasingly clear: Profound policy changes are on the horizon no matter which political candidates prevail.Certain critical issues facing the nation — income inequality and rising health care costs, for instance — have reached an inflection point where Democrats and Republicans alike are proposing solutions that would have been politically untenable just a few years ago. The only questions, in my view, are how quickly policy changes will come, whether they will be sweeping or incremental, and how they will affect theU.S. economy and markets.With those questions in mind, a multidisciplinary research team at Capital Group recently took a deep dive into the issues and reached some initial conclusions, including:In the long-running conflict between labour and ownership, the political pendulum is swinging toward labour, but the strength of the turn may not be as strong as investors envision. Despite intensifying societal imbalances exposed by the COVID-19 outbreak, there are plenty of crosscurrents that could and probably will slow that momentum.Some key issues — such as affordable health care, higher paying jobs and addressing the nation’s deteriorating infrastructure — are not solely a focus of the American political left. The right will also likely pursue these important goals, but with broadly different policy tools.Both parties have crossed the Rubicon of fiscal conservatism in the pandemic era. Large deficit spending will almost certainly continue regardless of which party is in power. However, the opposition party may find a return to fiscal restraint politically useful after the November 3rd elections.Three areas of agreementCOVID economic recovery:If COVID-19 is not contained and there is no pandemic-ending vaccine, the 2021 legislative agenda will focus on economic recovery. Depending on the path of the pandemic, additional stimulus bills could be on the way, along with other fiscal and monetary stimulus measures. To underscore how much the political lines have blurred, a GOP senator in April proposed that the federal government cover up to 80% of wages for all employees of U.S. businesses impacted by state-imposed lockdowns. More unconventional approaches may be necessary in the event of another COVID wave next year.U.S.-China trade tensions:Largely viewed as a Trump-induced conflict, U.S.-China trade tensions wouldn’t miraculously disappear under a Biden administration. A growing bipartisan consensus in Washington views a tense U.S.-China relationship as a long-term reality that will shape trade and foreign policy decisions for many years to come. One area of broad agreement is the need for greater protections for intellectual property, which is likely to be a high priority under a Democratic or a Republican administration.Technology regulations:Both parties have expressed frustrations with Big Tech companies, raising the prospect of antitrust actions, tougher regulations and greater oversight in the areas of privacy protection and suppression of political viewpoints. A breakup of perceived tech monopolies might be more likely under a left-leaning government, but there are supporters of this move on both sides of the political aisle.Four areas of disagreementTax policy.Taxation is undoubtedly the biggest source of disagreement, with Democrats proposing higher income taxes for corporations and wealthy individuals, along with a capital gains tax increase, and Republicans arguing for deeper tax cuts as a follow-up to the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017. On the political left there is also strong support for increasing the federal minimum wage, while the right may prefer to limit low-wage immigration as a way to boost employees’ wages.Education.Attempts to solve education inequality are highly partisan, and we are likely to see drastically different paths under a Democratic or Republican administration. A right-leaning government would favour school choice initiatives and reducing the influence of teachers’ unions, while a left-leaning government would likely pursue greater investments in public schools, early childhood development and student debt relief.Immigration.Another highly partisan issue, immigration policy is likely to undergo major change if Democrats win the White House and the Senate. We could see an easier path to citizenship for an estimated 11 million undocumented immigrants living in the U.S., along with expanded protections for asylum seekers. A Republican administration would likely continue to increase border security and seek to limit low-wage immigration.Supreme Court.With the passing of Supreme Court Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg, a new issue has emerged that could dramatically change the dynamics of the election. The appointment of Ginsburg’s replacement is likely to be a defining issue as we enter the final weeks of the 2020 election cycle.Investment implicationsEquities.Equity markets are likely to continue benefiting from a low interest rate environment under all four likely election scenarios — Trump wins and the Senate remains in Republican control; Trump wins and Democrats take the Senate; Biden wins and Democrats take the Senate; Biden wins and Republicans maintain Senate control.Growth-oriented stocksare particularly attractive with rates at historic lows. However, periods of extreme volatility should be expected given the economic uncertainty that prompted central banks to pursue zero- and negative-rate policies in the first place.Fixed income.10-year U.S. Treasury bond yields are likely to remain in the range of 0.5% to 1.5% under three of the four scenarios. The exception could be the so-called “blue wave” scenario — Biden wins the White House and Democrats take the Senate — in which case, bond yields could move higher (1.5% to 2%) as a Democratic administration finds it easier to advance its policy agenda, potentially boosting U.S. economic growth in the process.Sector impacts.Broadly speaking, sectors and companies that stand to benefit from the substantial political change of a blue wave include health care plan operators, environmentally focused companies (solar, wind, electric, etc.), discount retailers and small technology firms. A right-leaning government would likely foster a relatively more favorable environment for pharmaceutical companies, U.S.-based manufacturing companies and the energy industry.That said, it’s important to remember that attempting to time the markets based on expected political outcomes has proven to be an extremelydifficult task. History has shown that long-term investors are better served by staying invested — even during times of substantial political volatility — as markets have tended to power through even the most tumultuouselection cycles.",Politics
How elections move markets in 5 charts,2020-09-24T04:00:00,"How much do elections impact the stock market and portfolio returns? Should elections even matter to long-term investors in the first place? These are the questions investors and financial professionals are facing as we approach the November 3rd U.S. presidential elections. To provide answers, we’ve analyzed more than 85 years of data and identified five ways that elections influence markets and investor behaviour.1) Markets have tended to predict election resultsA simple stock market metric has correctly predicted the winner in 20 of the last 23 presidential elections since 1936 — a track record that might make even the top pollsters jealous. If the S&P 500 Index is up in the three months prior to Election Day, the incumbent party usually wins. If markets are down during that period, the opposing party typically claims victory.Why is this? It’s because equities tend to look ahead and “price in” uncertainty — including that caused by an upcoming election.When the stock market and the economy are strong, there is usually less motivation for a change in leadership. In those years, stocks may not need to discount the uncertainty, which often allows stocks to continue rising, further bolstering the incumbent’s chance of reelection.When the political and economic climate are more challenging, there is a greater chance that the opposing party will win. The market discounts the added uncertainty of the election outcome and what policy changes may occur, which can lead to higher volatility.What does this mean for 2020? As of September 15, the S&P 500 is up 3% since August 3rd (three months prior to Election Day) and 5% year-to-date. In more normal times that would favour the incumbent, but today’s shaky economy offers a different story. Since 1912, only once has a president been reelected if he oversaw a recession within two years of the election. While this trend may be interesting, investors shouldn’t use it as an excuse to try to time markets. Historically, whether the incumbent wins or loses, election volatility has usually been short-lived and quickly given way to upward moving markets.2) Gridlock or sweep? Equities have gone up either wayOne of the biggest concerns investors have this election cycle is the possibility of a Democratic sweep of the White House and Congress. Many assume this so-called “blue wave” will lead to a reversal of deregulation regulation initiatives and the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017. While it’s true that a new party typically brings its own policy agenda, assuming such an outcome will lead to meaningfully lower stock prices is probably over-simplifying the complexities of stock markets.History shows that stocks have done well regardless of the makeup of Washington. Since 1933, there have been 42 years where one party has controlled the White House and both chambers of Congress at the same time. During such periods, stocks have averaged double-digit returns. This is nearly identical to the average gains in years when Congress was split between the two parties. Historically the “least good” outcome has been when Congress is controlled by the opposite party of the president. But even this scenario notched a solid 7.4% average return.What does this mean for 2020? This year’s election will almost certainly end in either a unified government under a blue wave or a split Congress, which could happen with either a Trump or Biden victory. Voters may have a strong preference, but investors should take comfort thatboth scenarioshave historically produced strong equity returns.3) Markets have trended higher regardless of which party wins the electionPolitics can bring out strong emotions and biases, but investors would be wise to tune out the noise and focus on the long term. That’s because elections have, historically speaking, made essentially no difference when it comes to long-term investment returns.Which party is in power hasn’t made a meaningful difference to stocks either. Over the last 85 years, there have been seven Democratic and seven Republican presidents, and the general direction of the market has always been up. What should matter more to investors than election results is staying invested.What does this mean for 2020? Some have called the 2020 election the most important in our lifetime. But that has been said about previous elections and will be said again about future elections. This year has been unique in countless ways, but a look at past election cycles shows that controversy and uncertainty have surrounded many campaigns. And in each case the market continued to be resilient. By maintaining a long-term focus, investors can position themselves for a brighter future regardless of the outcome on Election Day.4) Investors often become more conservative during U.S. presidential election yearsIt can be tough to avoid the negative messaging around election coverage. And it’s natural to allow the rhetoric of political campaigns to make us emotional. History has shown thatelections have had a clear impact on investor behaviour, but it’s important that investors don’t allow pessimism to steer them away from their long-term investment plan.Investors have poured assets into money market funds — traditionally one of the lowest risk investment vehicles — to a much greater degree in election years. By contrast, equity funds have seen the highest net inflows in the year immediately following an election.This suggests that investors want to minimize risk during election years and wait until any uncertainty has subsided to revisit riskier assets like stocks. But market timing is rarely a winning investment strategy, and it can pose a major problem for portfolio returns.What does this mean for 2020? This trend accelerated in 2020: Through July 31, net money market flows increased US$546 billion while net equity fund flows decreased US$36 billion. Of course, part of this year’s flight to safety was related to the pandemic-induced recession and not the election. Still, equity funds saw their largest monthly outflows in July, indicating that investors are remaining conservative ahead of the election.5) Moving to cash in election years can reduce long-term portfolio returnsWhat has been the best way to invest in election years?It isn’t by sitting on the sidelines.To verify this, we looked at three hypothetical investors, each with a different investment approach. We then calculated the ending value of each of their portfolios over the last 22 election cycles, assuming a four-year holding period.The investor who stayed on the sidelines had the worst outcome 16 times and only had the best outcome three times. Meanwhile, investors that were fully invested or made monthly contributions during election years came out on top. These investors had higher average portfolio balances over the full period and more frequently outpaced the investor who stayed in cash longer. These results reflect four-year holding periods, but the divergence would be even wider if compounded over longer time frames.Sticking with a sound long-term investment plan based on individual investment objectives is usually the best course of action. Whether that strategy is to be fully invested throughout the year or to consistently invest through a retirement vehicle, the bottom line is that investors should avoid market timing around politics. As is often the case with investing, the key is to put aside short-term noise and focus on long-term goals.What does this mean for 2020?It’s too early to know what the impact of this year’s flight to cash will be on investors’ long-term portfolio returns. But with the S&P 500 soaring over 50% since the March bottom and net equity selling continuing throughout the year, it is safe to assume many investors missed at least some of thispowerful equity rallyand remain on the sidelines ahead of the November election.",Election
U.S. Election watch: What the race means for investors,2020-08-26T02:18:00,"Heading into 2020, there was little doubt that the U.S. presidential election would be the biggest story of the year. The coronavirus pandemic drastically changed that narrative, pushing the election aside as a health care crisis triggered the worst economic downturn since the Great Depression.With the election now less than 100 days away, however, investors are turning their attention back to the November 3 ballot. Amid rising COVID-19 infections, a battered economy and civil unrest in several U.S. cities, President Donald Trump is trailing former Vice President Joe Biden by a wide margin in major polls.Many pundits are predicting defeat for the president, but it’s far too early for investors to anchor on that outcome, says Capital Group veteran political economist Matt Miller.“We have more than three months to go before the election. That’s a lifetime in politics,” Miller says. “Given the rapid pace of developments and a compressed news cycle, we could have many turns of the wheel between now and November. In my view, the race will tighten as the Republican and Democratic campaigns shift into overdrive.”Election scenario planningFor long-term investors, the outcome of U.S. presidential elections hasn’t mattered as much as staying invested and maintaining a diversified portfolio. Markets have tended to power through presidential elections — with some volatility along the way — regardless of whether a Democrat or Republican won the White House.That said, election scenario planning plays a role in macroeconomic analysis, particularly in recent years as governments have increasingly intervened in the financial markets during times of crisis.Excluding a contested election — which is certainly within the realm of possibility — here’s a brief look at four scenarios that could play out in November and potential implications for investors.Scenario 1: Democratic sweepDemocrats win the White House, the Senate and maintain control of the House — otherwise known as a “blue wave.” This scenario would produce the greatest degree of political change, starting with the likely reversal of Trump’s policy agenda on many fronts, including taxes, immigration and regulation.One result could be a full or partial rollback of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017, which included significant tax reductions. Overall U.S. corporate tax rates declined from 35% to 21%, providing a major boost to corporate earnings. A full or partial reversal would have the opposite effect, prompting investors to take that into account when estimating the overall corporate earnings outlook.“We would see a much bigger emphasis on taxation and regulation across the board, with significant implications for the energy sector, telecommunications and technology companies,” Miller explains. “We could also see the elimination of the filibuster in the Senate, which, unlike today, would allow legislation to pass with a simple majority vote.”Scenario 2: GridlockBiden wins the White House; Republicans maintain control of the Senate. This outcome would likely result in a gridlock scenario where it could be difficult to pass major legislation. Senate Republicans could block major Democratic initiatives, much as they did during the second term of the Obama presidency.“In this case, I think we would see Biden governing through executive orders,” says Clarke Camper, head of government relations in Capital Group’s Washington, D.C. office. “There would be a great deal of pent-up frustration on both sides of the aisle. That’s an easy outcome to predict, though, perhaps not as easy to live with.”Under this scenario, federal regulatory agencies would also likely exercise more power. From a financial markets perspective, that could mean more aggressive enforcement by the Securities and Exchange Commission, as well as a renewed policy push by the Department of Labor in connection with its oversight of employee retirement plans.Scenario 3: Status quoTrump wins reelection, and Republicans keep the Senate. This scenario involves the least amount of change since it is, indeed, where we are today. The House is likely to remain in Democratic hands, so the current environment of political confrontation would continue — along with the rancorous attempts to approve COVID-19 relief legislation, including the US$2 trillion CARES Act.“Regardless of who is in the White House in January, there's going to be a lot of post-COVID cleanup work to do,” explains Reagan Anderson, a senior vice president with Capital’s government relations team. “Today we are in stabilization mode, and we will hopefully be moving into recovery mode by 2021.”Scenario 4: Unlikely splitTrump wins reelection, and Democrats take the Senate. This scenario could set the stage for even greater hostility than we’ve seen in the past two years. While such an outcome is theoretically possible, it’s unlikely given the political dynamics of key Senate races, which increasingly track the presidential vote in each state.“For instance, if Republicans lose key Senate races in Arizona, Colorado, Maine and North Carolina, then that’s clearly indicative of a ‘blue wave,’” Miller explains. “It’s hard to imagine Trump winning the White House if that happens.”Either scenario involving Trump’s reelection raises another risk: If he wins without a majority of the popular vote as he did in 2016, Miller warns, that could lead to more civil unrest and further demands to abolish the Electoral College.Investment implicationsElection season can be a tough time for investors to maintain a long-term perspective, given the strong emotions often evoked by politics. Campaign rhetoric tends to amplify negative and divisive issues. This election, in particular, is unprecedented in modern times — marked by the combination of a deadly pandemic, a global economic recession, widespread civil unrest and extreme market volatility.Moving to the sidelines would be an understandable approach for anxious investors who prefer to wait and see what happens. As history has shown, however, that is often a mistake. What matters most is not election results, butstaying invested.Consider the historical performance of the Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index over the past eight decades. In 18 of 19 presidential elections, a hypothetical US$10,000 investment made at the beginning of each election year would have gained value 10 years later. That’s regardless of which party’s candidate won. In 15 of those 10-year periods, a US $10,000 investment would have more than doubled. While past results do not guarantee future returns, election-year jitters should not deter investors from maintaining a long-term perspective.The only negative 10-year period followed the election of George W. Bush in the year 2000. During that decade, the S&P 500 posted a negative return amid two seismic events: the 2000 dot-com crash and 2008 global financial crisis.In contrast, the biggest election year return would have been in 1988, when George H. W. Bush won office, and US $10,000 would have grown to US $52,567 by the end of 1997.By design, elections have winners and losers, but the real winners have been investors who stayed the course and avoided the temptation to time the market.",Election
The Night Watch sheds daylight on market disruptions,2020-07-28T01:45:00,"On the surface, it seems unlikely that a 17th century Dutch painting would have much relevance in today’s volatile investment environment. But if you take a moment to look at Rembrandt’s masterpiece, “The Night Watch,” you may notice that every person depicted in the painting is looking in a different direction, each bringing a unique view to the gathering.Flash forward nearly 400 years and “The Night Watch” is the inspiration for a multidisciplinary research team at Capital Group that seeks to gain a deeper understanding of market disruptions, assessing the risks and evaluating the opportunities that arise during times of extreme crisis. Not surprisingly, the group’s current focus is COVID-19.“The goal of the Night Watch is to look at highly uncertain events, where the outcome is essentially unknowable, and study them from all angles,” explains Capital Group economist Jared Franz, who covers the U.S. and Latin America. “Like the individuals in the painting, we are looking out in all directions, evaluating possible scenarios and considering potential outcomes.”Rembrandt’s The Night WatchScenario planning, not predictions""The No. 1 rule of the Night Watch is: Leave your preconceived notions at the door. Don’t start with what you think will happen, look at what could happen,” adds Julian Abdey, an equity portfolio manager and active participant in the group. ""This is about evaluating the possible scenarios — from very negative to very positive — and understanding what each would mean for a variety of asset prices. At the end, it is up to the different investment units and individual portfolio managers and analysts to determine how probable each one is.""This concept goes to the heart ofThe Capital System℠, which relies on the multiple and diverse perspectives of Capital Group’s investment professionals, combined with independent, high-conviction decision-making. The Night Watch doesn’t make investment decisions on its own, but it helps inform the larger organization.The idea for Capital's Night Watch approach was formed in the aftermath of the 2008–09 global financial crisis to engage in scenario planning around severe downside events. In more recent years, the team explored the risk of rising corporate debt levels. This year, the group took on perhaps its most daunting crisis: the coronavirus outbreak and resulting government lockdowns that have triggered the worse economic downturn since the Great Depression.Corporate debt dilemmaIn the corporate debt analysis, the Night Watch team raised an early alarm about rising debt levels and deteriorating credit conditions in the U.S. corporate bond market.Following the financial crisis, ultra-low interest rates and central bank bond-buying activities created an environment where many companies could borrow vast sums of money at historically low financing costs. The “hunt for yield” by some investors accelerated the process, encouraging companies to continue the borrowing binge despite a late-cycle economic environment. Even more worrisome: Companies with relatively low credit ratings accounted for more than 50% of the market last year.“We could see that soaring levels of corporate debt were producing an imbalance in the economy,” says Franz — whose formula for anticipating a recession is equal parts late-cycle economy, rising imbalances and some catalyst to set it all off. “We worked closely with our fixed income team to quantify the downside risk in specific corporate bonds so they could make those investment decisions on a security-by-security basis.”This approach to bond investing is an important part of maintaining a balanced and actively managed portfolio, explains fixed income portfolio manager John Queen.“One of the real strengths of the Night Watch and other multidisciplinary research groups is the fact that we have multiple views — or multiple eyes, so to speak — on each problem,” Queen says. “We also have analysts who are investors, so when a crisis comes along, we already know the industries and the companies well, and we can act quickly if needed to address the unfolding events.”Confronting the virusIn its ongoing coronavirus analysis, the Night Watch group has, again, studied the crisis from all angles, including the economic, market and health implications. The team has looked closely at many recession and recovery scenarios: V-shaped, U-shaped, W-shaped, L-shaped and even a Nike-style swoosh. In doing so, they’ve put together a weekly dashboard to help track in real-time which scenarios are more likely.In terms of the U.S. economy, evidence is mounting for a U-shaped recovery, Franz says. Massive government stimulus measures are helping to soften the economic impact, but rising infection rates in many U.S. states are complicating the recovery effort.“There’s still a lot we don’t know about the virus, and I think the next few months are going to be tough,” Franz says. “But longer term, a year or so down the road, I think the chances of developing a vaccine are good, and that bodes well for a stronger recovery in late 2021 or early 2022.”Indeed, global equity markets are telegraphing such a recovery, given the extraordinary rally since late March. From a historical perspective, that pattern has played out many times before as markets powered through previous outbreaks, including Swine flu, MERS, Ebola and the Zika virus.Investment implicationsInvesting during the COVID-19 outbreak has, in some ways, accelerated trends that were already in place prior to the pandemic, such as the growth of e-commerce and cloud computing. The virus has hastened the decline of some companies, such as traditional retailers, that were already struggling to survive. But it has also devasted some industries that were previously doing well, particularly travel and tourism — meaning the outlook is very much sector-by-sector and company-by-company.Companies such as Amazon, Netflix and Shopify have benefited greatly from the “stay at home” era, while companies such as Airbus, Boeing and Royal Caribbean have suffered. However, both scenarios may present compelling investment opportunities, notes equity portfolio manager Anne-Marie Peterson.“My approach is more micro than macro, but there’s no question that the macro environment right now is creating a period of extraordinary change,” Peterson says. “Some companies are getting stronger, some are getting weaker and some are going away. I think what the Night Watch team highlights is that we have an incredible group of researchers that evaluates these macro events on a very deep level, helping us to understand the risks, and ultimately to act on the long-term investment opportunities that often emerge during times of crisis.”",Market Volatility
5 realities of this recession,2020-05-07T01:11:00,"Recessions can be hard to predict, but that’s not the case this time. The COVID-19 pandemic sweeping the globe has pushed the U.S. economy into recession, with U.S. GDP falling –4.8% in the first quarter. While the drop was sizable, an even more pronounced decline is in store for the second quarter, as broad swaths of the country remain shuttered. With the U.S. feeling the sting of a sharp reduction in consumer spending and industrial production, there are five realities to keep in mind.1) We’ve been here before (sort of)The largest post-1950 quarterly GDP decline was –10% in the first quarter of 1958.This sharp drop in growth came amid the 1957–1958 recession, which resulted from a confluence of factors, including a flu pandemic. While the makeup of the present-day economy is much different, the U.S. is not unfamiliar with pandemic-related economic turmoil. The U.S. economy bounced back strongly in the late 1950s, with growth surpassing 5%.As parts of the U.S. look to ease restrictions, I believe that a bounce back in activity could begin as early as June in some sectors and more broadly in the third quarter.2) Recessions have tended to be short; the subsequent expansions have been powerfulThe good news is that recessions generally haven’t lasted very long. While this time may be different, our analysis of 10 cycles since 1950 shows that recessions have ranged from eight to 18 months, with the average lasting about 11 months. For those directly affected by job loss or business closures, that can feel like an eternity. While there's no way to minimize that feeling, investors with a long-term investment horizon should try to look at the big picture. The average expansion increased economic output by 25%, whereas the average recession reduced GDP by less than 2%.3) It’s about the consumerThe U.S. consumer accounts for approximately two-thirds of the economy. With unemployment claims skyrocketing — although many may be temporary — and consumers staying in their homes, a weakening economy is no surprise. The US$2 trillion stimulus package will help support some levels of consumer activity, but employment uncertainty is likely to keep many consumers in a frugal mindset.4) Lower oil prices may be a tailwind for the economyA precipitous decline in crude oil prices has put pressure on the energy sector. May oil contracts turned negative in April as producers scrambled to find storage for bloated supply stores, aided by consumers’ sharp reduction in vehicle usage and gasoline consumption. While the negative impact of lower oil prices is likely to be felt in U.S. oil fields, lower energy prices can provide a tailwind for consumers and transportation-heavy industries.5) Timing may not be everythingWaiting for the all-clear may leave investors missing out on market gains. Since World War II, in recessions with a corresponding equity correction, the S&P 500 has bottomed, on average, three months before the end of each recessionary period. It’s little solace to investors who have endured market volatility, but even as the economy weakens, there are opportunities to invest in great companies at a discount.While the adage that the stock market is not the economy is true, market volatility tends to be captured, with a lag, in economic data. So even as financial markets are on a path to recovery, it may take time for the economy to catch up. Focusing on long-term investing can help investors navigate short-term volatility.",United States
Rob Lovelace on what a recovery could look like,2020-03-20T10:50:00,"What does the world look like in 2022? It’s a guidepost that’s driving Capital Group Vice Chairman Rob Lovelace as markets remain volatile and the world copes with COVID-19.“You have to stop and think about what will be different, as well as what will be back to normal, in 2022,” says Lovelace, who started his investment career at Capital in the mid-1980s. “When you are able to focus on how much will be the same and see the other side of the valley, that’s really reassuring. It was a much different situation during the 2008 financial crisis because we couldn’t see the other side of the valley and how we were going to reach it. But this time is different, and that gives me hope. While the global economy and financial markets are going to be challenged for some time and government leaders will have to make tough decisions, I believe we will make it through this.”In a recent call from his home office, Lovelace shared his perspective on Capital’s response to the virus, the company’s business operations, his outlook for global markets and investment opportunities.Q: What is your outlook for global markets?The impact of COVID-19 will be with us for some time, certainly into 2021, but will have a diminishing effect over time.What we learned from China is that we need to act quickly, decisively and with discipline. Chinese equity markets have been relatively stable since they got their situation under control. For instance, Chinese stocks are down 15.9% since February 19 (the beginning of this particular bear market) through March 17, compared with a decline of 25.2% for the U.S., 21.6% for Japan and 31.4% for Europe.There’s a bifurcation around the world in terms of the response to COVID-19.If governments take swift action, it’s still a very big economic shock, but then you have a recovery like we’ve seen in China and Singapore. Along those lines, we already are working on getting some of our associates back to work in our Singapore office.If those actions aren’t taken, you’ll likely wind up with a larger human shock and prolonged economic stress; that appears to be happening in Italy, Spain, the U.K., France and some other countries.In the U.S., we are trying to decide which way we will go. We’ve done the initial moves, but if we don’t get increasingly locked down and really nip this in the bud, it will move faster and have a bigger impact. It makes it hard to know how wide the valley is. There will be a recession. The question is for how long, and that’s what’s unsettling the market.The markets are recognizing that the different types of responses from governments will lead to different outcomes in the stock market. Either way, I believe we will get through this and end up in a better place 24 months from now. As long-term investors at Capital, that’s what we already see. It’s just the terrain along the valley floor that we don’t quite know yet.Q: What are you seeing within specific sectors?Pharmaceutical companies are obvious beneficiaries, particularly in the U.S. and a few other companies around the world that are working on promising vaccines. And we have companies with excess capacity in their manufacturing lines so they can produce these vaccines if successfully tested and developed.The consumer staples and food industries have been holding up in this environment, as are beverage makers. The real estate market should benefit from lower rates, but we could see some impact on the commercial side due to a potential hit to small businesses. Increased internet traffic helps phone and communications companies that benefit from higher data usage, and utilities benefit from lower rates. The positive trend for communications and utilities is most pronounced in markets outside the U.S.Another interesting pattern I’d point out is that quality growth companies in the technology and internet spaces with strong cash flows and strong balance sheets have been holding up.On the flip side, value stocks continue to struggle in this environment. Oil is running on a dual track, with the economic slowdown and the geopolitical fight between the Saudis and Russians. I ask some of my colleagues: If you wouldn’t buy an oil stock here, where would you buy it? Part of this is politically motivated, and ultimately things do come back.As investors, we need to focus on what’s permanently changed. The analogy we use is to look across the valley and see the other side. It may be a rough ride, but I know some companies are going to do well. That’s personally what I’m focused on, particularly on some of the internet companies and market leaders we’ve had in our portfolios for a long time.There are those companies for whom the world has fundamentally changed, such as the cruise line operators. Our analysis is focused on whether patterns have permanently changed for some industries, or will business be back to usual once we get through this?One other point I would make: There will be a global baby boom that emerges from the quarantines and social distancing, which may be good for diaper companies.Q: How should we think about the Fed’s recent moves?The U.S. Federal Reserve clearly signaled their concerns by cutting Fed Funds to near zero and instituting various extraordinary liquidity programs last used during the global financial crisis.Providing liquidity to the system is important and absolutely necessary. We were hearing from our fixed income desks that liquidity has been challenging, even in U.S. Treasuries, typically the most liquid market in the world. To help improve liquidity, the Fed has restarted quantitative easing (QE) with a commitment to purchase US$700 billion in Treasury and agency mortgage-backed securities. The Fed also restarted the Commercial Paper Funding Facility to help ensure access for companies to short-term liquidity.Unlike the Great Recession, the banks are healthy, in part because of the restructuring post 2008. Companies are drawing down lines of credit, and we are watching that closely. We will likely see government assistance to the aerospace, airline and hotel industries, similar to TARP (Troubled Asset Relief Program) in 2009. I also anticipate aid for hourly workers who may have reduced hours or lose their jobs here, as well as other forms of government support. I would view these kinds of actions as a positive.Q: How is Capital Group positioned to deal with current challenges?Because we have offices in China and across Asia, we have dealt with these kind of market conditions and have overcome these challenges in the past. There was the SARS epidemic, which was regionally focused, and more recently we had the Hong Kong unrest. We learned a lot from those experiences. When the coronavirus emerged, we already had work from home protocols established in Asia and the technology to support our teams. As the situation worsened in Italy, we were in a position that enabled us to be days — and in some cases weeks — ahead of the industry and government directives.Capital is built for bear markets and being a private company helps. We’re not focused on short-term quarterly earnings, and our associates are not worried about the company’s stock price or losing their job. That can be demoralizing, especially when your stock is losing value.We have an incredibly strong balance sheet with no debt and a substantial amount of cash.Another difference I believe that distinguishes us from publicly traded investment firms is we compensate our professionals the same way in down markets and up. This is particularly important for our investment group because our bonus pool is not based on our total assets under management, which can fluctuate depending on market conditions. We keep the formula exactly the same, emphasizing long-term results, and this helps our portfolio managers who may have been holding higher levels of cash and helps balance out the results in our funds.Q: Is COVID-19 affecting our research process?As a global investment firm, our investment professionals frequently travel to different parts of the world, meeting with company management teams, government officials and suppliers. Many of us are road warriors, so working remotely is not a huge transition and we are accustomed to using video conferencing to interact.Now we are all working from home, and that is giving us even more time to focus on analyzing the data and reflect on what's happening in the markets. We haven't even seen a dramatic drop-off in contacts with companies, because the companies themselves actually welcome video and phone conversations.Company management teams are hunkered down at home too, and in some cases, they have reached out to our analysts to find out what we know about what is going on in the world and with their industry.So, I would say our connections with management teams are as strong — or better than ever.",Market Volatility
Coronavirus rattles markets: What's next for global growth?,2020-03-19T02:03:00,"After reaching a record high on February 17, the S&P 500 Composite Index has declined by 12%, as of February 27, suffering its first market correction since 2018.A rising number of infections in Europe, in particular, has prompted markets to re-evaluate concerns about a global pandemic, even though the number of reported cases in mainland China has declined since news reports about the outbreak accelerated around January 17.“Until this week, the consensus market view of the coronavirus has been fairly benign, but now as it spreads beyond Asia, investors are clearly taking it more seriously,” says Capital Group portfolio manager Jody Jonsson. “The market is starting to consider what it means for global trade and travel. The market is worried about recessionary conditions in certain areas, including China, Japan and potentially Europe.”Is supply chain impact fully priced in?Given China’s stature as the world’s No. 2 economy, one of the most difficult questions that markets are grappling with is the possible impact on global supply chains, and the corresponding effect on multinationals and economic activity in other countries.For instance, what happens if China cannot send the intermediate products needed in the U.S. or South Korea or Japan to assemble finished goods? Are there enough truck drivers to move products, and do the ports have enough containers available?“We know for the past month that most people in China have stayed at home and haven’t returned to factories or offices. I believe China’s economy will experience negative growth in the first quarter, and then it’s just a question of how quickly the country can get back to work,” says Stephen Green, a Capital Group economist based in Hong Kong.“When we’ve pressed our industry contacts about the timing of workers returning to manufacturing plants and offices, we have heard mid-March,” Green adds. “That is the base case. But I believe that hinges on the number of confirmed coronavirus cases in China continuing to come down and people gaining more confidence in those numbers and returning to work.”Even then, there are logistical challenges.Factory operators have to get permission from the local government to reopen, and health inspections have to be done. Many cities and industrial zones can require 15 certificates. Is enough material on hand to make the product and are there enough workers to run the plant at full capacity? Once you’ve produced the product, is there a truck driver to get it to the port and are there workers at the port to load the goods on a ship? All of these questions are incredibly hard to solve at this time.“So, in my view, I don’t think the Chinese economy will normalize until April at the earliest,” says Green.Apple, which relies heavily on manufacturing plants in China, is the most prominent example yet of the broad ripple effects of the coronavirus on global business. The iPhone maker warned February 17 that its revenue for the current quarter would fall short of estimates.Capital Group U.S. economist Jared Franz says that his early research this week shows that computers, electronic equipment and industrial machinery are the three industries most vulnerable to supply chain disruptions from China.Global investment implicationsThis poses a potential threat to Europe’s fragile industrial recovery, with Germany the most exposed through trade links. Meanwhile, France and Italy also have significant exposure to China through tourism, services and luxury goods. And Japan, on the brink of another recession, is heavily dependent on China for intermediate goods that go into its manufacturing.The complexity and timing of this outbreak may make resumption of normal growth more halting and unpredictable. Global supply chains are tighter and more dependent on China than when the SARS outbreak hit the country in 2002 and 2003.With China now making up almost 20% of global gross domestic product, China’s slowdown from this outbreak will probably have broader impacts than the SARS outbreak.While the U.S. economy began 2020 in a much stronger position relative to the rest of the world — with very low unemployment, a robust housing market and a confident consumer — it is not immune to China’s slowdown and supply chain problems.“If the virus spreads further and China’s manufacturing base in not fully functional by April or May at the latest, we could shave half a percentage point from U.S. GDP in the first half of the year,” Franz adds. “And if it lasts longer, the impact could be more severe in the second.”Leading Chinese officials have said getting the country’s economy up and running again at full strength is a top priority. They have expressed that the coronavirus is a temporary setback to economic growth. So far, stimulus measures from Beijing have included interest rate cuts, more liquidity for small- and medium-sized enterprises and postponement of debt collections.The virus is taking its toll on business across the world.Many U.S.-based airlines have canceled flights to the country. And some companies are lowering earnings guidance for 2020, including some of the world’s biggest cruise line operators and consumer goods makers.Some companies are opting out of planned conferences in places such as San Francisco and New York as fear of the virus spreads.“In some ways, the impact is greater on certain companies outside of China — obviously, airlines and cruise companies fall into that category,” says Jonsson. “But it’s also providing a boost to some industries, especially e-commerce and gaming companies. As more people stay home, you’re seeing massive increases in the consumption of home entertainment and online shopping activities.”This is certainly the case for Chinese technology giant Tencent, which operates one of the world’s largest mobile video game and social media platforms.Adds Jonsson, “There are a number of industries where I've decided to wait and see how this plays out. For example, when it comes to luxury goods companies or travel-related companies, I think we have time to observe how widespread this situation becomes before making any big decisions in those areas.”",Market Volatility
Capital Group CEO Tim Armour on weathering the coronavirus,2020-03-11T11:13:00,"Rising fears over the continued spread of the coronavirus have led to a sharp stock market decline as investors grapple with its impact on the global economy. On Monday, March 9, in reaction to news of the virus spread and the recent oil shock, Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index fell 7.6%, triggering a 15-minute trading halt. In this interview, Capital Group Chairman and CEO Tim Armour offers his perspective on the latest events and what Capital is doing in portfolios to help guard against market volatility.1) What is your sense of the coronavirus (COVID-19) outbreak and market reaction?Until January 2020, most of us had never heard of this virus. In short order, we have grown increasingly concerned about the prospect of a global pandemic and its impact on the global economy. People are understandably frightened because this is a new disease, and there is much uncertainty over how it will all play out. First and foremost, the virus has a real human cost. We don’t know how many people are going to get ill or, worse yet, how many may die. Of course, our first thoughts are with the people who have fallen ill and their families.While this disease is new, there have been many pandemics and other crises in the past, and markets have survived them all. Today, a fair amount of panic has taken hold around the world, and I expect in the coming weeks that a rising number of cases may alarm many people. As an organization, we have been studying the history of pandemics and the pattern they have tended to follow. There have tended to be hot spots and flare-ups, and they lasted for a while, but then they went away. Eventually, the spread of the virus will slow down and people will get back to normalcy, as will markets.2) What does this mean for the U.S. economy?We are already seeing signs of a slowdown in the U.S., not only on the supply side as businesses brace for the road ahead, but also on the demand side. By now we have all heard of large conferences and entertainment events being canceled, firms postponing large meetings, and consumers delaying vacations and seeking to reduce their social contact.That means businesses related to travel, leisure, entertainment and recreation are likely to be the most impacted, not to mention oil and other commodities where we have already seen a collapse in global demand. A U.S. recession has become increasingly likely. We could see corporate earnings turn negative in the first quarter, which would continue to dampen investor sentiment.On the positive side, the U.S. economy remains among the most resilient in the world. It has a history of bouncing back from adversity. Interest rates are low, and the decline in oil prices should further support the consumer. What’s more, in China the spread of the virus appears to have peaked. Given that, I think the peak of its spread globally will occur sooner than many people anticipate.3) What does it mean for markets?We are experiencing a market decline that we have not seen since the Global Financial Crisis. As I speak today, March 9 is the 11th anniversary of the market bottom during the Global Financial Crisis — and the market noted the anniversary by recording the largest single-day point decline we have ever seen.As of the market close on Monday, the broader equity markets, as measured by the S&P 500, were down nearly 19% from their peak earlier in the year, and we may soon be in bear market territory, which is defined by a decline of more than 20%. This would be the first bear market after more than a decade of generally strong market returns. As a result, in general, equities appeared to be fully valued by most measures heading into this recent period, and markets could remain volatile for some time. In addition to the uncertainty resulting from the spread of the virus, the U.S. is in an election year.Turning to the bond market, we have seen a flight to safety that has pushed bond yields to unprecedented lows. The yield on the 10-year U.S. Treasury fell to 0.5%. Interest rates could go still lower as the U.S. Federal Reserve seeks to provide liquidity to markets through interest rate cuts and quantitative easing. Over time, low interest rates provide support to equities.While the pace and magnitude of the recent volatility can be unsettling, it is not entirely surprising. Investor sentiment is fragile and will likely remain so until the spread of the virus slows. In times like these, resilient investors who can demonstrate patience can be rewarded over the long term.I take some comfort in seeing that the Federal Reserve has demonstrated its willingness to take aggressive action, cutting interest rates 50 basis points in an emergency meeting on March 3, which lowered its target range to between 1.00% and 1.25%. The Fed stated that it is ""closely monitoring developments and their implications for the economic outlook, and will use its tools and act as appropriate to support the economy."" Markets are generally expecting an additional cut at the Fed’s next scheduled meeting, to be held on March 17 and 18.4) How does this compare with crises in the past?In the 37 years I have spent as a professional investor at Capital, I have experienced a number of unsettled markets, including the U.S. savings and loan crisis in the late 1980s, the tech and telecom bubble that ended in March 2000, and the Global Financial Crisis of 2008 and 2009. Each of these crises was very different, with very different underlying conditions. But in each case, the markets bounced back. I believe the markets, and great companies, will survive the current market decline and rebound.Let me share with you the words of two of my predecessors who mentored me through periods like this. Jim Fullerton, as Chairman of Capital in 1974 in the depths of one of the worst bear markets we have ever seen, wrote these words that are relevant today:“One significant reason why there is such an extreme degree of bearishness, pessimism, bewildering confusion and sheer terror in the minds of brokers and investors alike right now is that most people today have nothing in their own experience that they can relate to, which is similar to this market decline. My message to you, therefore, is courage! We have been here before. Bear markets have lasted this long before. Well-managed mutual funds have gone down this much before. And shareholders in those funds and the industry survived and prospered.”And Jim Rothenberg, former Chairman of Capital Group, said this amid the Global Financial Crisis in 2008:“I have seen many turbulent markets and know how hard it is to avoid getting caught up in the here and now. This is especially true when the media bombards us hourly with news, speculation and rumour. I also know, though, that as long-term investors we must focus on the real world underneath the noise and mesmerizing flow of data.”5) Should investors expect a quick recovery?At this point, I do not think it is realistic to expect a quick recovery. Circumstances may very well get worse before they get better. But I believe eventually markets will rebound. This too shall pass. When it does, long-term investors who can tune out the daily white noise — and red numbers flashing across their screens — and focus on the long term should ultimately be rewarded.I take the view that we will deal with outbreaks like COVID-19 and eventually we will adjust to it. At Capital, we are taking every precaution to prepare for it. We expect that we will be dealing with the COVID-19 virus for some time, possibly a year or two.One further point: We have offices in Singapore, Beijing, Hong Kong and Tokyo with a significant number of associates. They have already lived through four weeks of COVID-19. In China, people are already starting to go back to work. If you look at our associates in these offices, they were dealing with an emergency a month ago and today they are returning to a less disruptive life and business environment. They feel things are much more under control. I look at that as a pattern we are likely to experience here in the U.S. and Europe at some point.6) What are you doing in your portfolios now to guard against market volatility?Our company was founded in 1931 in the depths of the depression, with the aim of managing investment mandates designed to do well in volatile market periods. We seek to protect our investors’ capital on the downside, and we invest for the long run. This is true for Capital Group globally as it is for our investors in Canada, where we have offered portfolios since 2002. I recently looked at our funds’ results during this admittedly brief period of turmoil. Looking at our Canadian funds, you will find that many of our funds have done what we aspire for them to do: They have held up relatively better than their primary benchmarks (as of March 9, 2020).7) What is Capital Group doing to ensure continuity as we take care of client assets?Obviously our first concern is to ensure the health and safety of our associates. We hope the same for investors and advisors. But rest assured as this situation evolves, our more than 350 investment professionals in offices around the world continue to do what they have always done: analyzing companies and making real-time judgements about their potential long-term value. In-depth, fundamental research and a long-term view of markets is at the core of what we do. We will do our very best to provide investors with a smooth and less volatile experience than the broader markets.8) What should investors be doing?In periods of declining markets, emotions run high, and that’s natural and understandable. But it is exactly in times like this that a long-term orientation is important. Based on my prior experiences and what has historically occurred, I firmly believe markets will rebound and life will return to normal. Now more than ever, investors should be in close communication with their advisors, reaffirming their long-term objectives.",Market Volatility
3 mistakes investors make during U.S. election years,2020-03-05T04:23:00,"U.S. presidential elections can be tough on the nerves, and 2020 promises to be no different. Politics can bring out strong emotions and biases, but investors would be wise to put these aside when making investment decisions.Benjamin Graham, the father of value investing, famously noted that “In the short run, the market is a voting machine but in the long run, it is a weighing machine.” He wasn’t literally referring to the intersection of elections and investing, but he could have been. Markets can be especially choppy during election years, with sentiment often changing as quickly as candidates open their mouths.Graham first made his analogy in 1934, in his seminal book, “Security Analysis.” Since then there have been 22 U.S. election cycles, and we’ve analyzed them all to help you and your clients prepare for investing in these potentially volatile periods. Below we highlight three common mistakes made by investors during U.S. election years and offer ways to avoid these pitfalls and invest with confidence in 2020.Mistake #1: Investors worry too much about which party wins the electionThere’s nothing wrong with wanting your candidate to win, but investors can run into trouble when they place too much importance on election results. That’s because U.S. elections have, historically speaking, made essentially no difference when it comes to long-term investment returns.“Presidents get far too much credit, and far too much blame, for the health of the U.S. economy and the state of the financial markets,” says Capital Group economist Darrell Spence. “There are many other variables that determine economic growth and market returns and, frankly, presidents have very little influence over them.”What should matter more to investors is staying invested. Although past results are not predictive of future returns, a US$1,000 investment in the S&P 500 made when Franklin D. Roosevelt took office would have been worth over US$14 million today. During this time there have been exactly seven Democratic and seven Republican presidents. Getting out of the market to avoid a certain party or candidate in office could have severely detracted from an investor’s long-term returns.By design, elections have clear winners and losers. But the real winners were investors who avoided the temptation to base their decisions around election results and stayed invested for the long haul.Mistake #2: Investors get spooked by primary season volatilityMarkets hate uncertainty, and what’s more uncertain than the U.S. election primary season (i.e. a series of state elections to determine each party’s nominee)? With so many candidates on the campaign trail — 11 Democrats were still running when primaries kicked off in early February — the range of outcomes can feel daunting.But volatility caused by this uncertainty is often short-lived. After the primaries are over and each party has selected its candidate, markets have tended to return to their normal upward trajectory.Election year volatility can also bring select buying opportunities. U.S. policy proposals during primaries often target specific industries, putting pressure on share prices. This cycle, it’s the health care sector that’s in the spotlight as several candidates have proposed overhauls to drug pricing and the health care system.Does that mean you should avoid this sector altogether? Not according to Rob Lovelace, an equity portfolio manager with 34 years of experience investing through many election cycles. “When everyone is worried that a new government policy is going to come along and destroy a sector, that concern is usually overblown,” Lovelace says. “Companies with good drugs that are really helping people will be able to get into the market, and they will get paid for it.”In the past, those targeted sectors have often rallied after the campaign spotlight dimmed. It happened with health care following the 2016 presidential and 2018 midterm elections in the U.S., and has happened with other sectors in the past. This can create buying opportunities for investors with a contrarian point of view and the ability to withstand short-term volatility.Mistake #3: Investors try to time the markets around politicsIf you’re nervous about the markets in 2020, you’re not alone. U.S. presidential candidates often draw attention to the country’s problems, and campaigns regularly amplify negative messages. So maybe it should be no surprise that investors have tended to be more conservative with their portfolios ahead of presidential elections.Since 1992, investors have poured assets into U.S. money market funds — traditionally one of the lowest risk investment vehicles — much more often leading up to elections. By contrast, equity funds have seen the highest net inflows in the year immediately after a U.S. presidential election. This suggests that investors may prefer to minimize risk during election years and wait until after uncertainty has subsided to revisit riskier assets like stocks.But timing the market is rarely a winning long-term investment strategy, and it can pose a major problem for portfolio returns. To verify this, we analyzed investment returns over the last 22 U.S. election cycles to compare three hypothetical investment approaches: being fully invested in equities, making monthly contributions to equities, or staying in cash until after the election. We then calculated the portfolio returns after each cycle, assuming a four-year holding period.The hypothetical investor who stayed in cash until after the election had the worst outcome of the three portfolios in 16 of 22 periods. Meanwhile, investors who were fully invested or made monthly contributions during election years came out on top. These investors had higher average portfolio balances over the full period and more often outpaced the investor who stayed on the sidelines longer. (For more information on the methodology of this analysis, please refer to the notes section at the end of this article or the full Guide to investing in a U.S. election year.)Sticking with a sound long-term investment plan based on individual investment objectives is usually the best course of action. Whether that strategy is to be fully invested throughout the year or to consistently invest at regular intervals, the bottom line is that investors should avoid timing the market around politics. As is often the case with investing, the key is to put aside short-term noise and focus on long-term goals.How can investors avoid these mistakes?Don’t allow election predictions and outcomes to influence investment decisions. History shows that U.S. election results have very little impact on long-term returns.Expect volatility, especially during U.S. election primary season, but don’t fear it. View it as a potential opportunity.Stick to a long-term investment strategy instead of trying to time markets around elections. Investors who were fully invested or made regular, monthly investments did better than those who stayed in cash in election years.Download the Guide to investing in a U.S. election year(PDF)",Election
"Coronavirus: Our economists weigh in on the U.S., China and Europe",2020-03-05T03:36:00,"The spread of the coronavirus outside of China to a broader swath of countries in Asia and Europe is fueling a broad re-examination of 2020 global economic growth assumptions. Even with Tuesday’s 50-basis-point rate cut by the U.S. Federal Reserve, our economists say the global economy is headed for a significant slowdown at least in the first half of the year.The depth and severity of any downturn will depend on how policymakers in the U.S., Europe and China respond, both to the spread of the virus and to changes in the macroeconomic environment. As these events unfold, investors should consider staying the course. Timing the markets can be inherently risky.Here’s how our economists are assessing conditions in the U.S., Europe and China:The U.S. remains the most resilient of the world’s major economiesJared Franz, Capital Group economist in Los AngelesAmong the world’s largest economies, the U.S. remains the most resilient. The U.S. economy had been growing above trend with a solid labour market. Industrial sector activity was starting to pick up as détente was reached in the trade war and the General Motors strike ended.The Fed’s surprise announcement on Tuesday, March 3, was the first between-meeting rate cut since the 2008—09 financial crisis and clearly shows that the central bank is taking the coronavirus outbreak, and its potential impact on the economy, very seriously. After the announcement, the yield on the 10-year U.S. Treasury note declined to a new record low, falling below 1% for the first time.The challenge is that stock markets previously had priced in a goldilocks scenario and entered the year with an elevated price-to-earnings multiple of around 18, providing little cushion. On top of that, in contrast to the consumer, a large part of the corporate sector is burdened by high debt relative to its equity, or high leverage. Earnings expectations for 2020 for companies in the S&P 500 were already muted and have come down further given potential supply disruptions. Amid these challenges, the stock market fell more than 12% over the last seven trading days of February.Based on the current tightening in financial conditions, I expect the Fed to continue on a path of monetary easing. But it’s important to note that central bank policy has limited influence in an economy potentially hurt by both a demand and supply shock.If the virus spreads further and dampens economic activity, it could easily shave off one percentage point from my base case annualized GDP growth expectation of 2.0%. And if a negative feedback loop persists, I cannot rule out a recession, although that is not my base case scenario. If the situation comes under control relatively quickly, we could see a pickup in activity in the second half of the year.Around the world, the dilemma for central bankers is that the coronavirus poses as much of a negative supply shock as a demand shock. Monetary policy can influence demand, less so the supply side. Plus, with already low rates in the U.S. and negative rates throughout Europe, there is a severe shortage of policy ammunition.Central banks can accelerate quantitative easing programs, but that generally has a more limited impact than cutting interest rates. This means governments will also consider fiscal expansion to counter the effects of the virus.Nonetheless, some of the economic damage has already occurred. China’s factories have remained closed for several weeks and are unlikely to quickly become fully functional.In addition to manufacturing, an equally important economic impact may lie on the services side. On the manufacturing front, companies can catch up when things return to normal: firms ramp up production and rebuild inventories, producing a bounce-back recovery. But on the services side, lost GDP is not often recovered, whether it is the vacation that was not taken or the restaurant meal that was not had. This is why it is much more difficult to estimate the impact of the virus as compared to, say, a natural disaster.Brace for broad slowdown in China’s economyStephen Green, Capital Group economist in Hong KongWith China now making up almost 20% of global gross domestic product, China’s slowdown from this outbreak will probably have broader impacts than the SARS outbreak in 2002 and 2003. We know for the past month that most people in China have stayed at home and haven’t returned to factories or offices. I believe that China’s economy, which was already growing at the slowest pace in 30 years before the outbreak, will experience negative growth in the first quarter, and a mild growth recovery is likely in the last six months of this year.When we’ve pressed our industry contacts about the timing of workers returning to manufacturing plants and offices, we have heard that mid-March is a possibility. But analyzing the situation on the ground, I don’t think the Chinese economy will normalize until April at the earliest.Factory operators must get permission from local government to reopen, and health inspections have to be done. Many cities and industrial zones can require 15 certificates to operate. Factories need enough material on hand to make the product and workers have to be back at full capacity. Once the goods are produced, ships have to be at the port. Once you’ve produced the goods, they need to get to port and then to their end destination.In early signs of a slowdown, the February factory PMI fell to a record low of 35.7 — compared with a market-consensus estimate of 46. The non-manufacturing PMI fell even more significantly, down 24.5 points to a record low of 29.6 in February, reflecting the scare factor and disruptions in transportation, suggesting a broad-based contraction in the economy.Compared with other countries, Chinese party leaders have a wider arsenal of tools at their disposal to stimulate the economy.For example, they could cut benchmark interest rates by 200 basis points and still be well above zero. They can also provide fiscal stimulus as the country’s deficit is below 5% of GDP. Financing infrastructure projects such as bridges, tunnels and subway lines through bond issuance is an option. Recently, many cities have begun to decrease the percentage of money needed for a down payment to buy an apartment. And the government has told banks to extend loan repayments coming due for small- and medium-sized businesses.How effective any of these tools will be depends to a large extent on whether workers feel safe enough to return and confident enough about their prospects of buying an apartment.European economy likely to slow furtherRobert Lind, Capital Group economist in LondonWith major European economies growing only marginally before the outbreak, it is increasingly likely that the widening epidemic could push the eurozone into a recession in early 2020. The risk is most evident in Italy where more than 2,000 infections have been reported, as of March 3. If the virus spreads further, it could deliver a significant shock to one of the eurozone’s weakest economies. A sharp downturn in Italy would inevitably feed into the rest of Europe, weakening the entire region in the process.Beyond that, Europe has significant exposure to China’s economy. Falling demand from China, coupled with a breakdown in supply chains, would hit the European economy — with Germany and the U.K. exposed to weaker demand for goods, and France vulnerable to weaker tourism. Luxury goods, electronics and autos would be among the most negatively impacted industries.In 2019, the eurozone economy grew at an annualized rate of 1.2%. At such a low level, it doesn’t take much pressure for economic growth to go flat or negative. Before the outbreak, Europe was showing tentative signs of recovery from a protracted industrial slowdown.Given recent events, European Central Bank officials will probably feel the need to do something in the face of a widening outbreak. ECB officials are increasingly conscious of the impact of negative interest rates on the banking sector, which might deter them from lowering the deposit rate. But they may decide to increase their bond-buying stimulus program from a current level of €20 billion a month to something in the range of €25 billion to €30 billion a month.In this environment, there also will be greater pressure for a fiscal response from governments. In the event of a serious downturn, I’d expect more aggressive fiscal easing, including tax cuts and higher government spending.",Market Volatility
Your top 6 investing questions for 2020 answered,2020-03-03T11:51:00,"There’s no such thing as a bad question. Especially in a year like 2020 when investors are feeling nervous about the macroeconomic and political crosswinds blowing across the investment landscape.To find out what questions were on your mind, we polled thousands of advisors who attended Capital Group’s 2020 Outlook webinar. The following six questions were among the most frequently asked. Here’s how our investment team answered:1. Should I get out of the market during this election year?U.S. presidential elections have always been contentious affairs. As we get closer to November’s general election, investors can expect divisive political news to increasingly dominate the headlines, unsettling markets. That’s likely to be particularly true this year during a hotly contested Democratic primary season, which officially kicked off February 3 in Iowa.Investors may be tempted to sit on the sidelines until the smoke clears. Indeed, during previous election cycles investors appear to have done just that, rotating money into money market funds during election years, then moving back into stock funds the following year.But is this a winning strategy? History suggests otherwise. In past election years, markets have tended to return to an upward trajectory after primary season. Stocks, as measured by Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index, have had negative returns in only two of the last 20 election years (2000 and 2008), and both declines were largely attributed to asset price bubbles, not politics.“Presidents get far too much credit, and far too much blame, for the health of the U.S. economy and the state of the financial markets,” says Capital Group economist Darrell Spence. “There are many other variables that determine economic growth and market returns and, frankly, presidents have very little influence over them.”Bottom line:Investors who look past primary season volatility and maintain a long-term focus can succeed regardless of the election outcome.2. Will there be a recession in 2020?It’s a question that has been on investors’ minds for years now, and for good reason:Recessions can be painful. In 2019, the various twists and turns of the U.S.-China trade war and a buildup in inventories led to a manufacturing slowdown in the U.S., triggering concerns about an imminent recession.“We have seen a tale of two economies in the U.S.: a weak industrial sector but a reasonably healthy domestic economy, thanks largely to a resilient U.S. consumer sector,” adds Spence.The manufacturing slowdown and trade war captured the attention of policymakers as well as investors. The U.S. Federal Reserve cut interest rates three times in 2019, and major central banks around the world have taken similarly aggressive action to maintain easy monetary policy.“It takes a while for monetary policy to have an impact,” explains Spence. “But we are already starting to see some positive signs with a pickup in the housing market. Given the low-rate environment and the health of the U.S. consumer, I believe we are going to see a reacceleration in the economy in 2020, barring some unexpected shock.”Bottom line:Although recessions are notoriously difficult to predict, easy monetary policy and a strong consumer should keep the U.S. economy on a growth path in 2020.3. Why should I bother investing in international markets?For more than a decade the U.S. stock market has outpaced international equity markets by a wide margin, raising persistent questions about whether it still makes sense to invest in Europe, Japan and other non-U.S. markets. However, it’s more important than ever to take a global view of investing, says equity portfolio manager Rob Lovelace.“Investors should really be thinking of the world as one market today,” says Lovelace. “Where a company gets its mail is no longer a good proxy for where it does business. For example, many European companies are conducting much of their business in the U.S. or China. So it’s important to closely look at where companies generate revenue.”With the recent dominance of the U.S. market, a look at indices suggests that non-U.S. stocks offer more favourable risk-return potential than the U.S. To be sure, indices don’t paint a full picture, as differences in return can be distorted by differences in index composition.Consider that international indices are often heavily weighted toward companies in the financials and materials sectors, while U.S. indices are weighted more toward fast-growing technology and health care companies. What’s more, a close look at individual companies reveals that over the last decade those with the best returns were overwhelmingly domiciled outside the U.S.“I am finding as many or more opportunities outside the U.S. than in the U.S., even though I think overall the U.S. market will be one of the best markets going forward,” explains Lovelace, “That’s why I believe it is so important for investors to change their mindset.”Bottom line:Many of the best-performing stocks are outside the U.S. each year, so it’s important to stay globally diversified.4. How will the trade war affect my investments?The global trade picture improved somewhat at the start of the year. In January the U.S. and China signed a “phase one” trade agreement in which China agreed to buy more U.S. goods and the U.S. agreed to lighten some tariffs on Chinese goods. “Clearly this is a step in the right direction,” says equity portfolio manager Jody Jonsson. “But we have a long way to go.”Ironing out more complicated issues such as intellectual property rights, for example, could take many years to resolve. Investors may be growing concerned that a backslide in negotiations or a further deterioration of the global trade landscape could place multinational businesses in jeopardy. “To the contrary, I believe well-managed multinational companies will be able to navigate treacherous waters and succeed regardless of geopolitical headwinds,” notes Jonsson.In the last 15 years businesses operating in markets around the world have multiplied and thrived, outpacing the broader equity market while adapting to an ever-changing set of circumstances. Many have done so byadopting a multilocal approach, establishing successful operations in markets around the world.“For the most part these companies are run by smart, tough, experienced managers who have seen all types of trade environments, favourable and unfavourable,” Jonsson adds. “I believe the best-run companies in the world will find ways to win even when governments are trying to rearrange pieces on the chess board.”Bottom line:Smart companies find a way to thrive, even in a less friendly trade environment. Short-term volatility can be an opportunity for long-term investors.5. Will negative interest rates come to the U.S.?For years central banks in Europe and Japan have maintained negative short-term interest rates to help stimulate growth in their economies. Today there are more than US$15 trillion of negative yielding bonds in the developed world.So far the U.S. Fed has refused to employ negative rates in the U.S., but with the world remaining in a muted-growth, low-inflation environment, could that policy stance change? What if another recession hits?“Negative policy rates are, in my view, a remote possibility for the U.S. over the next few years,” says Tim Ng, a fixed income investment analyst. “I think the Fed’s playbook is more likely to follow what was done in the financial crisis: progressively cut rates to zero if needed and use forward guidance as a tool. The Fed could also buy bonds, as we saw with their quantitative easing program.”Negative yields essentially mean that investors are paying the issuer to hold their money. That generally happens during times of economic uncertainty, when buyers rush to snap up investments viewed as safe havens. While the U.S. has entered a late-cycle environment and some excesses have begun to build, Spence says the U.S., barring any unforeseen external catalyst, should remain on a growth path for the foreseeable future.Bottom line:With the Fed on hold and the economic growth picture brightening, negative rates are unlikely to surface in the U.S.6. How should I position my portfolio for 2020?Uncertainty will likely remain elevated in 2020. In such an environment, investors may be tempted to dramatically reduce stock holdings and shift to bonds. However, patient investors may be better served by maintaining well-balanced portfolios with a mix of global stocks and bonds.“I suggest that anyone who is managing money make 2020 the year in which you create a new framework for how to invest globally,” stresses Lovelace. “The U.S./non-U.S. construct served us well for 40 or 50 years, but the world has changed. It’s time to think about how to invest in the best companies wherever they're based.”Bottom line:Diversified, well-balanced portfolios can benefit patient, long-term investors.",Asset Allocation
3 questions for Canadian bond investors,2023-08-14T10:15:00,"After one of the worst bond years on record in 2022, Canadian fixed income investors expected a return to normal this year. This expectation has largely been met, as bonds are delivering on their promise of stability, income, diversification and results — albeit modest ones — as of the midway mark of 2023. But bond uncertainty remains as central bankers continue to raise interest rates — rather than cut — to cool economies that many expected to be in recession now.Is a recession still in the cards? Will inflation return to target? And is the bond renaissance still on? Tim Ng and Tom Reithinger, portfolio managers for Capital Group Canadian Core Plus Fixed Income Fund™ (Canada), answer these questions below.1.  Is the bond renaissance still on?“Yes,” says Ng. “With starting yields where they are today, bonds offer more value than they have in a decade.”Investors may have been surprised by a retreat in bond results in the second quarter, as the Bank of Canada (BoC) raised interest rates twice, but that has simply delayed — not derailed — the renaissance, according to Ng. In fact, yields inside and outside Canada have continued to march higher as the year has progressed and now stand markedly above the lows seen before rates started to rise in March 2022.Higher yieldsSources: Bloomberg, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., JPMorgan. As of 7/31/23. Sector yields above include Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, Bloomberg U.S. Corporate Investment Grade Index, Bloomberg U.S. Corporate High Yield Index and 50% J.P. Morgan EMBI Global Diversified Index/50% J.P. Morgan GBI-EM Global Diversified Index. Period of time considered is from 2020 to present. Dates for recent lows from top to bottom in chart shown are: 8/4/20, 12/31/20, 7/6/21, 1/4/21 and 7/27/21. Yields shown are yield to worst. Yield to worst is the lowest yield that can be realized by either calling or putting on one of the available call/put dates or holding a bond to maturity. ""Change"" figures may not reconcile due to rounding.“The fact that central bankers in Canada, the U.S. and Europe are reducing the pace and size of interest rate increases, with some near the end of their rate-hiking cycles, is bond-positive,” says Reithinger.Further, if bankers start cutting rates, prices should rise as bonds in an investor’s portfolio will be worth more, he says. And if the opposite happens — central bankers reverse course and start aggressively hiking again — investors can take comfort in knowing they’ve invested in much higher yields giving them ‘carry’ or coupon income, which is over 8% on a high-yield U.S. corporate bond as of July 31, 2023, according to Reithinger.“If a recession comes to pass, investors may also benefit, as bonds will provide much needed stability and diversification from equities,” he says.The bottom line? Ng says it’s more important to be early in bond markets rather than late, so investors can lock in higher yields and benefit from price appreciation.2.  Is a Canadian recession still in the cards?“There are definite signs the Canadian economy is slowing and likely to slow further, so yes, a recession is still in the cards,” says Ng, who points to May’s read on gross domestic product, which came in at a weak 0.3%. This suggests a 1% annualized rate of growth for the second quarter, which is below BoC estimates.Other signposts of slowing growth, according to Ng, are contained in BoC surveys that poll Canadian businesses on their outlooks. The surveys are especially informative because they’re leading, not lagging, indicators. In the BoC’s second-quarter Business Outlook Survey (BOS), Canadian economic weakness is evident on a range of fronts. The BOS’s key outlook indicator, which aggregates expectations of business across Canada for the next three to six months, continues to trend down.Negative againNote: The BOS indicator is a summary measure of the main Business Outlook Survey (BOS) questions. Business activity indicators are those related to past sales declines, future sales growth, indicators of future sales, employment and investment. Price and cost indicators are those related to input and output price growth as well as credit conditions. Capacity indicators are those related to labour shortages, labour shortage intensity and the ability to meet demand.Source: Business Outlook Survey, Second Quarter of 2023, Bank of Canada.“Results for all categories of questions, regions and sectors are now contributing negatively to the survey’s key outlook indicator,” says Ng. In addition to more businesses having weaker hiring and investment outlooks, companies are also experiencing broader tightening in credit conditions.Further, businesses linked directly and indirectly to consumer discretionary spending also think high interest rates have curbed sales of their products and services and they anticipate further weakening. Most notably, indicators of future sales, either through order books or sales inquiries, are well below historical average levels.“These indicators are flashing yellow, if not red, but at the same time, they don't say a recession is a sure thing. They just confirm the risk of recession is high,” Ng says.It’s worth noting that labour markets continue to demonstrate strength, although signs of weakness are also beginning to appear. The latest jobs report from Statistics Canada showed the Canadian economy shed 6,400 jobs in July, while the jobless rate ticked up to 5.5%. The economy has now lost jobs in two of the three previous months.According to Reithinger, this may lead the BoC to pause at its next policy-setting meeting September 6, but it doesn’t mean the rate-tightening campaign is over.“No central banker wants to be remembered as the one who let inflation get away, so we could see another rate increase whether it ultimately tips the economy into recession or not,” he says.3.  Will inflation return to target?“Inflation is trending in the right direction with peak price pressures likely behind us,” says Ng.His optimism stems from the “breadth” of inflation narrowing in the BoC’s preferred gauges used to measure price changes. Unlike the Total Consumer Price Index (CPI), which tracks the prices of a full basket of goods, the bank’s preferred gauges eliminate more volatile items such as gasoline to give the BoC a clearer picture of inflationary pressures. One of these gauges, CPI-trim, peaked at 5.6% in June 2022 and now stands at 3.7% in June 2023, while CPI—median, which reached a high of 5.4% in November 2022, has now fallen to 3.9% at June 2023.Falling, but how far?Source: Bank of Canada.“We think this trend will continue with inflation further moderating,” he says. But there’s a caveat. According to him, there are reasons to believe the trough for inflation will be historically higher than it used to be in the days to come.Due to the twin forces of deglobalization and enormous injections of money from central bankers during the pandemic and before (the Great Financial Crisis), Ng anticipates annual inflation may run higher than bankers are currently targeting.“I can see annual inflation above 2% for some time,” he says.This poses an interesting question for some central bankers who are bound by mandate to keep inflation in check. Although the BoC aims to keep inflation at 2%, it has some wiggle room above and below due to its stated inflation-control target range of 1% to 3%. In contrast, the U.S. Federal Reserve has no such “range” but rather a hard target of 2%.Does that mean the Fed will continue to raise rates if inflation remains stuck somewhere above 2%, say 2.25% or 2.50%?“That’s the million-dollar question,” says Ng, “and it’s something investors will be watching closely.”",Bonds
4 lessons from 50 years of bond investing,2023-08-10T02:03:00,"Imagine an economy plagued by persistent inflation and a U.S. Federal Reserve determined to fight it with aggressive, equally persistent interest rate hikes. While this might sound similar to what investors have recently been experiencing, it also describes 1973.That year, which marked one of the most turbulent economic environments since the Great Depression, Capital Group began actively managing fixed income portfolios for U.S. investors. Since then, over the past 50 years, our portfolio managers have navigated a multitude of market ups and downs, booms and bubbles, crashes and crises. We asked four of our most tenured fixed income portfolio managers — two retired and two current — to provide insights and lessons learned over their long careers.1. Don’t forget the simple power of bond couponsKirstie Spence, portfolio manager, Capital Group Multi-Sector Income Fund™ (Canada)I joined Capital Group through our undergraduate program, where a rotation brought me to fixed income. I was intimidated initially, but lessons I learned in that initial rotation have stayed with me throughout my career. At the time a seasoned portfolio manager told me, ""Your most important job in fixed income is not to lose money.” From there it became clear that, in many ways, the concept of fixed income is simpler than people think.One of the things that gets forgotten with bonds is simply the power of a coupon. In most bond structures, you earn an interest rate that is paid out over a specified period. That payment is very important in contributing to the total return you’re going to make on the investments. And certainly, in emerging markets debt, the capital appreciation or the value of the bond can move a lot over its life.Some things at the macro level are out of your control, but that coupon is a powerful cushion in terms of protecting that investment. And in the emerging markets bond sector where I specialize, it has always been the heart of the annual return and is often underestimated. People forget about that a bit when the headlines focus on interest rate changes, and they start worrying about technical terms like duration. But the coupon is a very powerful thing.Historically, income has dominated long-term total returnSource: Bloomberg Index Services Ltd. As of 12/30/2022. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.2. Know when to surrenderMark Brett, retired portfolio manager, Capital Group Global Balanced Fund™ (Canada), Capital Group Canadian Core Plus Fixed Income Fund™ (Canada), Capital Group World Bond Fund™ (Canada)Some important lessons come from mistakes. I remember early in my career before coming to Capital Group I came up with what I thought was a brilliant currency trade. Let’s just say it wasn’t going well. So I approached my supervisor at the time. He asked me, “Do you know the first rule of trading? Surrender.”As humans, we often cling to bad ideas that we know should be dismissed, but it’s difficult to do so psychologically. Part of being a good investor is knowing when to surrender a bad idea and move on.One example of a bad idea is to continue fueling an asset bubble. And that leads to another important lesson: Don’t ignore the obvious. Consider the tech bubble in the late 90s. A lot of investors looking at it thought it was a bubble, but they didn’t know how it would turn out or think through the consequences.The same is true of the 2007 housing bubble. It was obvious that there was a bubble in residential real estate. But how would it end? That one turned out to be a huge deal, as we all now know, due to the implications for money and credit. Some of the most brilliant investors on Wall Street lost enormous amounts of money.Pointing out the obvious and surrendering a bad idea might seem like basic concepts, but you would be amazed at how tricky they can be for some investors.Some notable asset bubbles over the last 40 yearsSources: Capital Group, ICE Benchmark Administration Ltd., London Bullion Market Association (LBMA), NASDAQ, Nikkei, NYSE Arca, NYSE, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's, Stock Exchange of Thailand (SET). Figures reflect cumulative price changes over eight-year periods in which the asset's price increased at least 250% before falling at least 50 percentage points. Benchmarks used: gold bullion price per troy ounce as quoted by the LBMA (gold); Nikkei 225 Index (Japan); Bangkok SET Index (Thailand); NASDAQ Composite Index (U.S. tech); S&P Homebuilders Select Industry Index (U.S. housing); NYSE Arca Biotech Index (biotech); NYSE FANG+ Index (U.S. large–cap internet). As of December 31, 2022.3. Company relationships are key in credit marketsDavid Daigle, portfolio managerA skill that I did not have when I started at Capital but worked to develop was building relationships. In active management, cultivating strong connections with the C-suite of the companies we invest in is essential. And I’ve always felt that if I can build a mutually symbiotic relationship with a management team, I’m providing value to them and they’re providing value to me. Those are the relationships that will endure over many years.Our relationship can benefit a company’s management team by sharing our insights with them about how we think as investors. Our discussions help them to understand what the investment community is looking for and sometimes what the rating agencies are looking for.What we get as investors is a better understanding of their strategy and whether they are good candidates for our portfolios. They can share how they see their competitive positioning and what they think of their competitors. They may explain how they think about the regulatory structure in which they operate or what their aspirations are over different time horizons. We’re sharing information with them and they’re sharing information with us. That’s where I think you build really lasting, tight relationships.John Smet in the trading room, 1986.4. Collaborative research is crucialJohn Smet, retired portfolio managerThere were many lessons I learned during my years as a professional investor, but I’m struck by what I’ve experienced since retiring. Now I am a fund shareholder instead of a fund manager. The contrast is remarkable when I try to assess investment opportunities on my own.Just think about where we are today with markets and fixed income. There are questions in many investors’ minds: Has the Fed stopped raising rates? Is inflation here to stay? What about a recession? Is the dollar going to strengthen?These questions are difficult to answer for professional investors with vast resources. But they’re near impossible to answer as a shareholder in my kitchen, reading the newspaper or listening to the news trying to figure all this out.By contrast, at Capital Group, I had hundreds of analysts that I was able to interact with, along with other colleagues and outside specialists. It was really a stunning amount of information. The thing that strikes me, as I look at the world and the markets, is how blessed I was to have all those resources as a fund manager and the value of collaboration.",Bonds
Outlook for credit sectors,2023-07-13T02:23:00,For advisor use only. Not for use with investors.Portfolio manager Damien McCann for Capital Group Multi-Sector Income Fund™ (Canada) explains where he sees value across four primary credit sectors.,Fixed Income
Opportunities in U.S. high-yield credit,2023-07-13T02:23:00,"For advisor use only. Not for use with investors.Shannon Ward, portfolio manager for Capital Group Multi-Sector Income Fund™ (Canada), discusses numerous factors she believes are creating a compelling opportunity in U.S. high-yield bonds.",Fixed Income
Bond outlook: Fed pause leaves many paths to income potential,2023-06-14T09:44:00,"Bonds today provide a sensible option to the dilemma facing investors — what to do as markets ricochet between hopes of a soft landing and concerns of a recession? After a rough 2022, fixed income is back to fulfilling its role as a source of relative stability and diversification from equities.Meanwhile, the U.S. Federal Reserve did its best to keep investors guessing. At their June meeting, policymakers kept the benchmark interest rate unchanged at a range of 5.00% to 5.25%, but left the door open for further hikes amid robust labour markets data and persistent inflation. Central bankers expect to end the year at a rate of 5.60%, implying two additional hikes.Additional hikes are also anticipated from the Bank of Canada, the Bank of England and the European Central Bank despite each lifting interest rates 25 basis points at their most recent policy-setting meetings in May and June. Canada’s current benchmark rate stands at 4.75%, the U.K., 4.5% and Europe, 3.5%.Markets have had to repeatedly readjust expectations as resilient consumers pushed central bankers to lift rates — ostensibly raising the stakes for recession. In the bond world, that suggests higher income potential and new opportunities.Pause, skip or pivot? Investors expect interest rates to declineSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., Refinitiv Datastream, U.S. Federal Reserve. Fed funds target rate reflects the upper bound of the Federal Open Markets Committee’s (FOMC) target range for overnight lending among U.S. banks. The market-implied rate is based on price activity in the fed funds futures market, where investors can speculate on where they think rates will be at a future point in time. As of June 14, 2023.“The possibility of the U.S. falling into a recession over the next year remains elevated as the consequences of the Fed's aggressive rate hiking campaign make their way through the economy,” says fixed income portfolio manager Pramod Atluri. Pausing gives the Fed a chance to see the impacts of higher borrowing costs and tighter lending conditions.Despite expectations of a relatively mild recession, there is a lingering sense that investors are waiting for the next shoe to drop. Money market funds have ballooned to a record US$5.2 trillion in the U.S. as investors flocked to cash and cash alternatives. Canadian money market fund assets are also elevated at $40.4 billion at the end of April versus $26.9 billion a year ago, according to the Investment Funds Industry of Canada. At the same time, bonds have posted moderate gains for the year-to-date period ended June 13, 2023.One reason behind the run-up is that inflation has declined from last year’s peak and may be on a sustained downward path. “If the economy slows further as an outcome of tight monetary policy and restrained bank lending, it should help maintain that trend and pull inflation down closer to the Fed’s 2% target range,” explains Atluri.An income ride that offers some shock absorbersThe upshot to higher rates is higher income. The Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, a widely used benchmark for investment-grade (BBB/Baa and above) bond markets, yielded 4.77% on June 13, 2023, compared to a rate of 1.75% on December 31, 2021. Unlike previous upticks we’ve seen over the past 10 years, yields have stabilized at these elevated levels across fixed income sectors. This indicates that strong income may finally persist after decades of low rates and a very painful 2022.Strong income may persist as bond yields stabilize at elevated levelsSources: Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., RIMES. As of May 31, 2023. Sector yields above include U.S. aggregate represented by the Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, investment-grade corporates represented by Bloomberg U.S. Corporate Investment Grade Index, high-yield corporates represented by Bloomberg High Yield Index, municipals represented by Bloomberg Municipal Bond Index and emerging markets debt represented by 50% J.P. Morgan EMBI Global Diversified Index/50% J.P. Morgan GBI-EM Global Diversified Index blend. Yields shown are yield to worst. Yield to worst is a measure of the lowest possible yield that can be received on a bond that fully operates within the terms of its contract without defaulting. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.Higher rates also mean that bonds are generally better prepared to absorb price or interest rate volatility, making it easier to post positive returns. The total return of a bond fund consists of distributions, price changes and interest paid. Today’s higher interest essentially provides more of a buffer against volatility.What’s more, if growth deteriorates or out-of-the-blue crises appear, high-quality bonds have tended to provide the important benefit of diversification from equities. Here’s why: These events have often spurred a flight to U.S. Treasuries, which in turn positively impacted bond prices as yields fell. Likewise, yields would fall if the Fed steps in to support growth via rate cuts.On that front, an inverted yield curve has implied the potential for a recession for some time in both Canada and the U.S. As the Fed began lifting rates in March 2022, interest rates on two-year Treasuries rose higher than rates on the 10-year. This yield curve inversion ignited an especially animated discussion among Capital Group’s Fed watchers as to whether the economy would enter a downturn.Recession risks present opportunities in yield curve positioningSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., National Bureau of Economic Research, Refinitiv Datastream. As of May 31, 2023.For investors, increasing exposure to interest rates now may offer an attractive combination of meaningful diversification from equities and total return potential, Atluri says. If the economy weakens, short-term Treasury yields may drift lower, particularly if Fed rate cuts are more likely. Meanwhile, longer term Treasury yields could remain anchored or even rise. These movements would cause the yield curve to steepen from its current deeply inverted state.Steady consumer spendingConsumers continue to flex their spending power, which has helped keep companies’ balance sheets relatively strong. For the most part, companies have sufficient cash to fund operations and growth plans.The premium investors pay over Treasuries to hold investment-grade or high-yield bonds, or spreads, are wider today compared to their levels prior to the current hiking cycle. This suggests some form of economic pain ahead.Many investors are particularly wary of adding high-yield bonds, which are riskier than investment-grade bonds. However, while past results are not predictive of the future, for those with a time horizon of at least one year, investing in bonds with current yields of around 8% has historically offered solid returns.Fundamentals are especially important as corporate profitability comes under pressure in the face of rising costs and higher interest rates, says fixed income portfolio manager Tara Torrens, who expects a slowdown.“I’ve positioned the portfolios I manage to be more cautious toward cyclical industries such as retail, autos and anything highly exposed to commercial real estate. In this environment, I prefer more defensive companies and bonds that are secured,” Torrens adds.Improved quality may lead to fewer defaults in high-yield bondsSources: Bloomberg Index Services Ltd. As of December 31, 2022.The quality of the high-yield universe has improved, with nearly half the market carrying the highest rating (BB/Ba). One reason is that many companies with riskier financial profiles have opted to raise funds in the private credit and leveraged loan markets, or secured loans provided by lenders to companies with high debt loads. Private credit, in which money is lent directly to companies in private rather than public markets, has grown nearly five-fold since 2007.Taken together, defaults will likely increase but remain low compared to prior recessions. And while spreads could widen in a downturn, investors waiting for better entry points may not see them, given the improved profile of high yield.Is the best yet to come for bonds?After a rather cruel 2022, in which fixed income didn’t even offer diversification from equities, investors may want to give bonds another chance. Attractive yields offer income potential across bond asset classes. An active manager can seek to provide further value by managing interest rate sensitivity, sector allocation, security selection and other levers.“Looking forward, as inflation falls, growth slows and the Fed’s rate hiking cycle nears the end, I expect interest rate volatility will fall and bond prices will rise,” Atluri says.As recession talk heat up, more investors could turn to bonds in search of relative stability and income. “We’ve come a long way from just a year ago, and I’m excited about the opportunities in front of me,” he notes.",Bonds
Capital Group’s fixed income leadership recognized,2023-06-12T11:40:00,"Who’s the new bond leader among active management firms in the U.S.? According toInstitutional Investormagazine, it’s Capital Group.In an article published in March entitled “This New Bond Leader Doesn’t Have a King,” the magazine documents the slow, steady rise of the global Capital Group organization in the fixed income universe. Founded 92-years ago as an equities-only investor, Los Angeles-based Capital Group bought its first bonds — U.S. Treasuries and corporates — many years later in 1973.The magazine extols Capital Group as an “intentionally faceless asset manager” that has “significantly outgrown its peers” among U.S.-based active managers. Over the past five years, Capital Group’s U.S.-based fixed income strategies have pulled in more than double the fixed income strategy assets of any active peer, according to the magazine.As of March 31, 2023, Capital Group manages US$467 billion in fixed income assets around the world across a wide variety of bond strategies, including core, global, and multi-sector credit.Broad fixed income capabilitiesAssets under management by Capital Fixed Income Investors as of March 31, 2023. All values are in USD. Totals may not reconcile due to rounding.In terms of personnel, the global Capital Group organization has 241 investment professionals in fixed income, with expertise spanning portfolio management, research and macro analysis, trading and more.A process built on experienceData as of March 31, 2023. Trading includes traders, trading analysts and head of Global Fixed Income Trading. Investment services professionals includes investment specialist, Investment management associates, directors of fixed income markets and liability-driven investing solutions associates. Other fixed income professionals includes strategists, research associates, Aladdin team and business management.This didn’t happen overnight, explains Capital Group fixed income business development director Ryan Murphy, who is featured in the article. Murphy acknowledges the fixed income buildout picked up speed over the last 10 years as the fixed income world demanded greater research capabilities, coverage and expertise.The Capital System™The foundational pillar bringing it all together is The Capital System™ of investing, which also explains the “doesn’t have a king” reference in the article’s title. Unlike some investment management companies that rely on a single individual or “star portfolio manager,” Capital Group doesn’t have any singular decision-maker or “star.” Rather, for its funds the firm uses teams of portfolio managers who manage individual sleeves. Another crucial point of differentiation is that Capital Group analysts also get their own sleeve of a portfolio to manage, a structure uncommon in the industry. The multi-manager structure has resulted in better collaboration and investing, and it incentivizes analysts who often deliver the best ideas out of their research, Murphy says.“As a firm with deep research and immense collaboration among the fixed income and equity analysts, the investment teams know the industries and companies — their businesses and the capital structures — really well,” Murphy says.Discussions with Capital Group equity professionals bridge the world between stocks and bonds, with fixed income investment professionals routinely meeting with their counterparts sharing research, intelligence and insights that benefits investors in both asset classes.Investment opportunity“There’s always an investment opportunity somewhere across the fixed income universe. Maybe it can be found in credit curves, maybe liquidity is mispriced, maybe the market’s view of an industry or country or sector is different from ours or maybe companies aren’t valued correctly. Because there’s always an investment opportunity, you must be flexible when it comes to generating alpha. If you rely too heavily on one tool or only have skills in one area, then when that area is fairly priced, there’s less room to add value. But our investors deserve and expect good returns, so you should have experience, capabilities and insight in every dimension of the market,” says Murphy.Overlaying both equity and fixed income worlds are macroeconomic and political economists who are regional specialists. Some are U.S.-focused, others European and still others Asia and the Pacific Rim. There’s also a multidisciplinary research team at Capital Group that seeks to gain a deeper understanding of market disruptions, assessing the risks and evaluating the opportunities that arise during times of crisis.“Collaborative views — independent views — is how you elicit better bottom-up implementation and investing. It’s an acknowledgement that you don’t want one voice dominating the room and you don’t want to run into the perils of groupthink,” Murphy said.The structure also creates career development and succession opportunities that might be less common or even nonexistent at other asset managers.Smooth transitionThis was recently exemplified in 2023 with the retirement of fixed income portfolio manager Thomas Høgh, who retired after 32 years with Capital Group. Høgh, who got his start at Capital as a fixed income analyst covering Yankee bonds and non-U.S. bond markets, progressed to become a portfolio manager and worked on two Capital Group funds in Canada: Capital Group Global Balanced Fund™ (Canada) and Capital Group World Bond Fund™ (Canada). He has been succeeded by fixed income portfolio managers Philip Chitty on Global Balanced and Tom Reithinger on World Bond. Chitty has 19 years of experience at Capital and Tom Reithinger, nine years.“The multiple-manager system eases transition planning and avoids the perils of a ‘star system’ reducing key-person risk,” says Murphy.In so doing, it’s designed to last generations and is a key reason the global Capital Group organization is marking 50 years of fixed income investing.“And we’re looking forward to the next 50,” says Murphy.",Bonds
What real estate risks mean for commercial mortgage-backed securities,2023-05-16T11:30:00,"For advisor use only. Not for use with investors.The failure of Silicon Valley Bank (SVB) has put renewed pressure on the commercial real estate sector in both the U.S. and Canada, as fears about tighter credit conditions and a slower economy have begun impacting the already beleaguered sector.In the U.S., one area clearly reflecting these concerns is the commercial mortgage-backed securities (CMBS) market, notably in the non-agency space (those not issued or guaranteed by any U.S. federal government-sponsored enterprise or agency), which currently stands at US$724 billion. The CMBS market has been under a cloud since the economy was hit by COVID in 2020. Over the last three years, changing consumer and worker habits have led to a fundamental shift in how investors perceive commercial real estate, from both risk and value perspectives. This shift, in combination with higher rates from substantial tightening from the U.S. Federal Reserve, has resulted in a sharp sell-off for the non-agency CMBS market.However, we still see some attractive opportunities in CMBS. While some subsectors like office properties face profound challenges, other areas like multifamily housing have remained more resilient, which is also the case in Canada. Overall, repricing across the market could provide an opportunity to add exposure. In this article, we primarily examine the outlook for the much larger U.S. CMBS market and discuss how investors can position for continued uncertainty amid higher rates and a potential recession.CMBS spreads have reached interesting levelsOver the past 10 years, non-agency CMBS spreads have generally been narrower than those of corporate bonds. Along with other securitized assets, CMBS assets have traditionally been a fixed income allocation for those investors seeking some yield while remaining closer to the core, compared with corporate bond markets.However, spreads have been widening since early 2022, as concerns related to the underlying commercial real estate market have been exacerbated by Fed tightening. While we saw some recovery in early 2023 on the view that Fed action may be slowing down, the collapse of SVB quickly reversed those moves. In April, non-agency CMBS spreads were more than 70 basis points above investment-grade (BBB/Baa and above) corporates, levels not seen since 2011.This significant repricing in CMBS assets could provide an opportunity for investors to build exposure at more attractive valuations if they see potential for markets to hold steadier in the next 12 to 18 months.Non-agency CMBS spreads have surpassed corporate bondsSource:Bloomberg. As of April 30, 2023. Data shown is for the Bloomberg U.S. Corporate Investment Grade Index and the Bloomberg U.S. Non-Agency CMBS Investment Grade Index.Concerns can be largely traced back to officesIt is often the case that when one subsector is facing major headwinds, the full sector feels the impact. For commercial real estate, office properties are the main source of anxiety for investors south of the border and in Canada.The office market has been facing challenges for several years. Office tenants in sectors such as finance and law had been cutting space even before COVID amid the shift to more flexible working habits. Meanwhile, technology companies were the driver of demand for new office space. Now many are cutting their physical space in an effort to reduce costs and are even willing to spend to end their leases early.The change in sentiment toward office space is becoming more apparent in the market. High-profile borrowers are walking away from troubled office properties at a faster rate than expected. That, in part, led the Bank of Canada to flag the commercial property sector in its recent financial review. In its May 18 report, the central bank said lenders with large exposures to commercial real estate “could face credit losses” if some firms default on their loans.Fundamentals remain resilient outside of officesWhile the negative outlook for office space has driven spreads in the U.S. CMBS market notably wider, it is estimated to account for less than 20% of the US$5.6 trillion in outstanding commercial real estate debt. Pockets of opportunity remain for investors who can take a risk-aware, considered approach to CMBS.Commercial real estate debt is broader than officeSources: Bank of America Global Research, Federal Reserve, Mortgage Bankers Association, company 1Q 2023 earnings presentations. As of March 31, 2023. This breakdown is based on estimations of commercial real estate debt outstanding. Dollar value in USD.In terms of fundamentals, the commercial real estate market outside of office space has remained relatively resilient. There should be room for continued growth in rents in these markets, as long as a sharp recession is avoided. For example, multifamily properties continue to enjoy strong demand, as high home prices and mortgage rates are making it necessary for many people to continue to rent. Meanwhile, robust growth in e-commerce is fueling demand for warehouses and other types of industrial real estate.Even within office real estate, we are likely to see more bifurcation in the market over the next several years, which should paint a clearer picture for investors and uncover the buildings that can keep tenants and sustain rents.Historical trends suggest owners of high-quality offices — who know how to attract tenants and have the money to maintain the buildings — should be able to continue to borrow. This divergence happened with malls over the past 10 years, when the valuations of most large malls were hit hard but the highest quality mall real estate investment trusts (REITs) repositioned themselves and continued to attract tenants. Over time, non-agency CMBS valuations should begin to reflect this differentiation.U.S. banking stress has had varied impactsOne of the biggest concerns for CMBS investors this year has been the stress in the banking system south of the border. It’s estimated that, over the past decade, smaller banks have increased their market share in commercial real estate lending to around 40%, which could leave borrowers more vulnerable to a change in bank sentiment or regulations. While Canadian banking exposure to commercial real estate is small in comparison to U.S. exposure, the recent bank failures south of the border have also sent a chill through Canada’s Big-6 banks. Heading into earnings week near the end of May, analysts were expecting Canadian banks to report a rise in bad debt provisions and have highlighted commercial property loans as the cause.Expectations have increased for banks to pull back lending in commercial real estate, particularly for office. Tightening standards by the banks could leave borrowers struggling to find options for refinancing, particularly at comparable interest rates or levels of leverage. Meanwhile, holders of loans that are near maturity will likely try to extend. These are two key risks for investors that may not have been fully priced into the market.The degree of exposure to this risk differs depending on the property type. While office real estate is estimated to get more than 50% of its funding from banks, the percentage remains much lower for properties such as multifamily. With significant funding from governmental agencies, this backstop could provide multifamily properties with a greater level of protection from the impact of a pullback from the banks.Bank lending differs across property typesSources: Bank of America Global Research, Federal Reserve, Mortgage Bankers Association, company 1Q 2023 earnings presentations. As of March 31, 2023. Other includes REIT, government and pensions. This breakdown is based on estimations of commercial real estate debt outstanding.Uncovering opportunities in CMBSThe CMBS market is currently reflecting investors’ concerns about future losses in the office subsector across the board. However, there may be numerous ways to build exposure, on the view that much repricing has already taken place.For example, across both conduit loans (pools of commercial mortgage loans) and single-asset single-borrower (SASB) loans, lower quality assets have experienced a particularly sharp sell-off, and if volatility persists, it is likely they will continue to be under the most stress. However, higher quality assets as well as securities higher up the capital stack — where we believe the structure can provide some cushion amid future volatility — appear to offer value.The underlying assets are also important when analyzing CMBS. Conduit loans can have meaningful exposure to office real estate of varying quality. While attractive opportunities remain, SASB loans can give an investor a clearer view of the asset’s risk profile and potentially offer a greater level of diversification in a portfolio.The market is pricing in continued concerns for non-agency CMBSSource: Bloomberg. As of April 30, 2023. Data shown is the option-adjusted spreads for the subindices of the Bloomberg U.S. Non-Agency CMBS Investment Grade Index.In closing, there is no doubt commercial real estate has hit a rough patch, given rapidly tightening lending from banks, high interest and mortgage rates and a slowing economy. This has a knock-on effect on the CMBS market.That said, considering the repricing we have already seen across the quality spectrum in CMBS, and given the sustained positive fundamentals of a large section of the commercial real estate market, we see selective opportunities in this sector. Yields and spreads appear attractive, especially relative to corporate bonds, as well as in some other areas of the securitized market.Investors seeking exposure to securitized debt may want to consider Capital Group Multi-Sector Income Fund™(Canada). The securitized debt sector is one of four primary fixed income sectors in which the portfolio normally invests (the other three being high-yield corporate debt, investment-grade corporate debt and emerging market debt). The active mandate has the flexibility to move among credit sectors based on bottom-up research and portfolio manager outlook.",Real Estate
Income is back: A multi-sector view into credit,2023-03-16T02:23:00,"For advisor use only. Not for use with investors.Fixed income portfolio manager Damien McCann ofCapital Group Multi-Sector Income Fund™ (Canada)delves into the advantages of a flexible approach to credit sectors, the mandate’s relative value approach, and the outlook for higher income opportunities within bonds.",Fixed Income
3 reasons why 60/40 portfolios may make a comeback,2023-02-02T11:21:00,"The death of the 60/40 portfolio has been greatly exaggerated.Ask your search engine, “Is the 60/40 portfolio dead?” and it will generate about half a million results, many of them published recently. Following a difficult year for both stocks and bonds, the increased interest is understandable.The 60/40 portfolio — shorthand for a diversified portfolio built with 60% equities and 40% fixed income — is intended to generate solid returns while minimizing risk. This did not happen in 2022, as stocks and bonds declined in tandem.Investors expressed their disappointment with their dollars. In the U.S., investors withdrew US$43.6 billion from strategies in U.S. Morningstar’s “Allocation — 50% to 70% Equity” category in the U.S. in 2022. That followed a period when investors withdrew billions from such strategies in six of seven years for different reasons, including when stock markets were soaring.Canadian investors did likewise in 2022, withdrawing precipitously from the balanced fund category, which saw nearly $30 billion in net redemptions for the year, according to the Investment Funds Institute of Canada. (The year 2020 also had net redemptions in balanced funds — $534 million — although all other years from 2013 to the end of 2019 and 2021 were positive in Canada.)“We saw a lot of folks exit balanced strategies in 2022,” says Hilda Applbaum, a portfolio manager for Capital Group Global Balanced Fund™ (Canada). “While there is a lot of wisdom in markets, there also is a herd mentality. I believe many investors have become disbelievers in balanced strategies at the wrong time. I am confident that, going forward, balanced portfolios — whether they are a 60/40 split or 65/35 — may continue to be a successful approach for most investors over the long term.”A tale of two bar charts: Investors pulled billions of dollars from balanced strategies in 2022Source for Canada chart: Investment Funds Institute of Canada. Data is adjusted to remove double counting arising from funds of funds. The balanced funds category includes funds that invest directly in a mix of stocks and bonds or obtain exposure through investing in other funds. Exchange-traded funds data are not included. Source for U.S. chart: Capital Group, Morningstar. Figures reflect the total estimated combined net flow of funds across exchange-traded funds (ETFs) and mutual funds that fall into the Morningstar category “Allocation — 50% to 70% Equity,” and broadly represent funds that reflect a roughly 60/40 blend between equity and bond exposure, respectively. Data as of 12/31/2022.Below, Applbaum, who invests in both stocks and bonds, and David Hoag, a fixed income portfolio manager on Capital Group Capital Income Builder™ (Canada), share three reasons they believe conditions today are more favourable for balanced investing, as well as perspective on how they see balanced approaches evolving.Reason #1: 2022 was an anomaly, not the normLast year stands out as the only time in the past 45 years that both stocks and bonds declined in tandem for a full calendar year. “The culprit for the chaos in both stocks and bonds last year was the U.S. Federal Reserve’s aggressive rate hikes,” Hoag says. “I think it’s very reasonable to say that bonds will go back to offering diversification benefits as we near the end of the tightening cycle.”Applbaum says such correlation between the two asset classes won’t likely repeat soon. “With stocks and bonds correlated in terms of their returns, I believe last year reflected an inflection point, not a new normal,” she says.Most investors had never faced a year as challenging as 2022Sources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., Standard & Poor's. Each dot represents an annual stock and bond market return from 1977 through 2022. Stock returns represented by the S&P 500 Index. Bond returns represented by the Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.Once the Fed gets inflation under reasonable control, it will have more flexibility, and investors can likely expect bond markets to zig when stock markets zag.Reason #2: Attractive income is back in fixed incomeIf there’s a silver lining to the aggressive Fed action, it’s that most classes of bonds are offering significantly higher yields than a year ago. The yield on the Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, a widely used benchmark for investment-grade (BBB/Baa and above) bond markets, was 4.25% as of January 25, 2023. That compares to 1.75% on December 31, 2021. The yields for the Bloomberg U.S. Corporate Investment Grade Index and Bloomberg U.S. Corporate High Yield Index stood at 4.96% and 8.16%, respectively, on January 25.Dating back to the 2008–2009 global financial crisis, historically low rates meant that investors were not able to count on bonds to make much of a contribution to a portfolio’s total return. But with bonds offering higher potential income today, investors may be able to take less risk with their equity investments and still meet their return expectations.“Today many core bonds can provide a dependable return in the mid-single digits,” Applbaum says. “And investors who are comfortable taking a little more risk by including some investment-grade and high-yield bonds can look for their bond portfolios to potentially contribute even more to a portfolio’s total return. That means you can take less risk with respect to your allocation to stocks in your pursuit of income and total return.”Reason #3: Dividends can make a differenceIf a bond portfolio can provide mid-single digit returns or better, dividends can potentially contribute to an attractive overall return picture within a portfolio’s equity allocation — without taking undue risk.Historically, dividend-paying stocks have tended to be less volatile than growth stocks. And although dividends accounted for a slim 16% of total return for the S&P 500 Index in the 2010s, historically they have contributed an average 38% from January 1, 1926, to November 30, 2022. In the inflationary 1970s, they climbed to more than 70%.Many investor portfolios don’t focus on larger dividend payers*Less than 0.5%.Sources: Capital Group, FactSet and Morningstar. Totals may not reconcile due to rounding. The average advisor portfolio is representative of the aggregate exposures of 543 U.S. portfolios analyzed by Capital Group’s Portfolio Consulting and Analytics team from 10/1/2022 to 12/31/2022. Capital Group portfolio data is based on the average weightings in the portfolios from 10/1/2022 to 12/31/2022.“For the first time in a long time, I get to talk about the importance of dividends in terms of shareholder returns,” says Applbaum. “When interest rates were zero, companies really didn't have to think about their cost of capital. They could have lower hurdle rates in terms of returns on investment. Now that capital isn’t free they must be more thoughtful about how they can get the best return on investment, in addition to being thoughtful about when it makes more sense to return money to shareholders in the form of dividends.”Bottom line: Look for better returns, lower risk in 2023There are several reasons investors can expect a 60/40 portfolio to deliver better potential returns and lower volatility in 2023 and beyond. Bonds today are offering higher yields than a year ago, and with the Fed taking a less aggressive approach to rate hikes lately, interest rate volatility will likely be more muted. Valuations across a range of stocks are more attractive than they were a year ago as well.But it is important to remember that there is more to balanced investing than deciding on how much equity and how much fixed income to include in a portfolio. “These aren’t monolithic allocations,” explains Applbaum. “For example, growth stocks and dividend payers offer very different risk-reward profiles. So successful balanced investing depends not simply on how much equity is in a portfolio but also what kind of equity is in a portfolio.”A balanced portfolio would have outpaced other strategies over the past 16 yearsSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., FTSE Russell, ICE Benchmark Administration Ltd., MSCI, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor’s. Returns figures are as of December 31, 2022. ""Buy the dip"" strategy represents buying the prior year’s worst performing asset class every year. ""Ride the wave"" strategy represents buying the prior year’s best performing asset class every year. ”Balanced portfolio” strategy represents maintaining a 60/40 split between U.S. large cap stocks (represented by the S&P 500 Index) and U.S. core bonds (represented by the Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index). This assumes the portfolios are rebalanced annually. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Based in USD.“Last year many types of asset allocation models failed to deliver on their pursuit of solid returns with moderate risk,” Applbaum adds. “But that followed a long period of relative success. Asset allocation is not a broken or failed strategy. It will always make sense to think about balance, diversification and risk in portfolios. But a one-size-fits-all approach doesn’t work. It’s about building portfolios from the bottom up that align with investor objectives.”",Asset Allocation
Securitized credit can be an important diversifier in bond portfolios,2022-10-18T11:51:00,"As the risk of recession looms large over financial markets, how will securitized credit fare? It’s a growing area of bond markets that has become an important anchor of some actively managed, fixed income portfolios such asCapital Group Multi-Sector Income FundTM(Canada). The mandate primarily invests in four higher income sectors: investment-grade and high-yield corporate bonds, emerging markets debt and securitized credit. Portfolio manager Xavier Goss, who manages the securitized credit sector within Multi-Sector Income, discusses the reasons he remains optimistic on several areas of this market despite some near-term challenges.The economic outlook is mixedThe U.S. Federal Reserve is obviously looking to bring inflation under control, which means we will likely see the economy slow down and unemployment go back up. But while tightening financial conditions should be a headwind, consumers have remained strong because of wage inflation and low unemployment, as well as the subsidies they received directly from the government. Therefore, even if we head into a recession, consumers are starting from a much better position than they were in the lead-up to the global financial crisis.Overall, it is not a bad time to be looking at fixed income broadly. With the backdrop of rising unemployment and slower growth, I do expect defaults to increase from current low levels, but relatively tight underwriting standards and a stronger consumer should help mitigate downside risk. Additionally, the excess yields available from investment-grade (BBB/Baa and above) and high-yield corporate bonds are beginning to attract “crossover” investors who are dipping their toes into fixed income. There is a lot of cash in the system and new issuance is low. This could provide a nice backstop for the securitized market.1.    Asset-backed securities provide income, diversificationSecuritized credit today is a large and diversified sector. At one end of the spectrum, you have asset-backed securities (ABS), comprising U.S. consumer credit such as student loans and auto loans. At the other end, you have commercial mortgage-backed securities (CMBS), backed by loans on a variety of assets such as industrial warehouses, office buildings and retail malls. The securities are segmented into different credit ratings, depending on the level of collateralization (i.e. the value of the assets backing the loan) and/or their position in the capital structure.Today, in the portfolios I manage, the largest relative exposure in securitized credit is to asset-backed securities backed by consumer loans. I am optimistic about the continued strength of consumers’ balance sheets. Given where we are in the financial cycle, I prefer taking shorter duration credit risk in consumer loan sectors as opposed to longer duration commercial assets. ABS look attractive in this rising rate environment as they tend to have significantly shorter duration (meaning they are less vulnerable to interest rate fluctuations). These assets have tended to be good diversifiers and income generators for portfolios.In the U.S., consumers remain strong despite economic headwindsSources: New York Fed Consumer Credit Panel, Equifax. Data from 1/1/2003 through 6/30/2022.In the coming years, I expect there will be significant divergence in performance across sectors. This should increase the opportunity to generate alpha through security selection. Bonds backed by subprime auto loans are a good example of asset-backed securities that have shorter duration and increased credit risk, depending on the originator of the loans. This is an area where credit research can add substantial value.Private student loans are another example. Credit risk on these loans has come down marginally because of President Joe Biden’s move to provide debt relief to educational loan borrowers in the U.S., though the program is being challenged in court. Private student loans are, of course, not being forgiven by the government, but it is common for students to have both a federal loan and a private loan. However, the debt relief on the federal loans should lighten the overall debt load, thus the credit risk on private loans should be lower. If the program receives approval to go ahead, it would likely provide a further catalyst for the sector.Overall, the portfolios I manage are about a year-and-a-half to two years short spread duration versus their benchmarks. (Spread duration is a measure of how the price of an asset moves in relation to its credit spread.) I believe financial conditions will tighten further, and as a result, structured credit spreads need to widen from current levels. I try to keep the investment portfolios I manage balanced between income generation and total return. So, while the market is tilting toward a risk-off stance, I want to own a decent amount of assets that provide a strong revenue stream.Even with the Fed tightening aggressively, I do not expect unemployment to spike significantly in the next 12 to 18 months. So, if I am buying a bond that matures in two to three years, I am comfortable going down in credit quality given the shorter maturities.2.    Select opportunities in CMBS despite retail headwindsCommercial mortgage-backed securities are a different story from consumer ABS. These assets are longer duration in nature and closely tied to U.S. gross domestic product (GDP) growth and corporate profits. I currently favour the more senior part of the capital structure in CMBS. In a slowing economy, I don't really want to own long-duration intermediate-risk (mezzanine) tranches as they tend to be more vulnerable to slowing GDP growth.While I remain cautious on CMBS overall, there are some corners of the market that still look attractive. In terms of the underlying collateral of these bonds, warehouses for companies like Amazon and other large retailers, data centres and industrial buildings have held up better, but there is still a lot of uncertainty in the office and retail sectors. Some companies are bringing their employees back to the office five days a week, which should be positive for CMBS. But it is impossible to project what the office sector will look like in the coming years. Lower office attendance has also meant less foot traffic in commercial city centres, which can be a headwind for retail. But even if the reopening brings more people into stores, the retail sector is still facing the same challenge it has faced for years with people shopping more online.I see better opportunities in commercial mortgages in single-asset, single-borrower (SASB) deals, where instead of the bonds being backed by a broad portfolio of commercial real estate, it's just one asset or a small handful of assets. The majority of the total volume of deals coming to market this year have been SASBs. This is representative of a shift in investor preferences. Single-asset borrower deals are also easier to analyze than a traditional CMBS security that contains multiple underlying assets. Currently, in portfolios I manage, the CMBS sleeves are almost equally split between SASBs and more traditional conduit deals backed by multiple properties.Single-asset CMBS have gained significant market shareSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg. Data as of 10/13/2022. Values are in USD.3.    Managing risk in non-agency residential mortgagesIn non-agency residential mortgage-backed securities (RMBS) assets, I currently prefer credit risk transfer securities, which are government-originated loans that have been offloaded to the private sector. I think the biggest potential headwinds in this sector are extension risk and a moderate increase in delinquencies as U.S. unemployment increases. With rising interest rates, borrowers are likely to extend their mortgages. Borrowers who received loans or refinanced their existing mortgages during the pandemic when rates were below 3% are unlikely to prepay any time soon. Relative to asset-backed securities, mortgage-backed securities need much greater management of duration and convexity risk.I am also starting to look out for deteriorating underwriting standards. Broad market underwriting standards in the U.S. appear to have returned to pre-COVID-19 levels as certain lenders look to increase origination volumes to meet loan demand. However, as financial conditions tighten, I expect we will see significant bifurcation in terms of what loan originators will do.Savvy originators are likely to tighten their underwriting standards, or at least keep them consistent and be willing to let their origination volume go down as a result. On every call that our analysts and I have with originators, we ask about their underwriting standards and their origination volumes. If their volumes are up in the last year, it is an immediate red flag.Originators that have steady backing from long-term investors tend to accept that their origination volumes can decline 20% or more given current financial conditions. I expect any weakening of standards to first appear in private equity-funded issuers since many commercial banks have maintained a more conservative stance.Given this backdrop, I strongly believe that security selection will be a key driver of results in the coming years. We have a team of analysts that aims to sort the good originators from the bad ones.U.S. home sales have declined amid rising mortgage ratesSource: Refinitiv Datastream. Data as of 9/15/2022. Values are in USD.4.    Highly selective on CLOsOne of the key benefits of having securitized credit in a diversified fixed income portfolio is that it has a lower correlation with corporate credit. You can generate similar returns while getting decent diversification. Right now, I’m looking for relative value opportunities along the same lines I mentioned before: shorter duration credit in consumer loan sectors.That's manifested itself in the portfolios I manage in an overweight position in consumer ABS. I am also looking to build a position in collateralized loan obligations (CLOs), although I am highly selective and opportunistic when investing in these securities. I think there is going to be an opportunity in CLOs, but for now there are a lot of technical headwinds. Valuations are relatively high and there are a significant number of loans sitting on dealer warehouse lines, which have not yet been securitized. U.S. and Japanese banks, which have historically been large investors in CLOs, are also dramatically reducing their demand due to recent changes in the regulatory environment for U.S. banks. Meanwhile, a strong U.S. dollar is reducing demand from Japanese banks. That leads me to believe spreads are likely to grind wider in the coming months. Given the above technical backdrop, potential purchases in the future will be very slow and deliberate.5.    Fundamentals are supportive of securitized creditWhile an economic slowdown always increases risk, I am less worried about forced selling by leveraged investors than I have been in past cycles. Many securitized credit investors have been cautious on the market since the start of 2022 and are holding significant cash positions.It is probably one reason why credit spreads have held up relatively well despite the recent selloff in equities. Another factor supporting structured securities is that there is just not a lot of supply coming to market. New issuance in the corporate sector is down around 30% year over year; structured products supply is lower by around 50% relative to the prior year.While the risks emanating from a weakening economy cannot be ignored, the securitized credit market appears to be in a pretty good spot overall from a fundamental perspective. I expect overall credit fundamentals to weaken, but security selection will be the key to alpha generation in the coming years. There will be ample opportunities to utilize our deep credit analysis to add value for clients.",Bonds
Multi-sector income investing and the high-yield opportunity,2022-10-11T11:55:00,"High yield is finally deserving of its name again. The high-single-digit yields that the sector is offering are renewing investor interest in this asset class, even as the spectre of a recession raises some concerns in the short term. Investors may want to consider slowly wading into the high-yield pool, while being careful of diving straight into the deep end.“We do not believe in timing this market,” says fixed income portfolio manager Shannon Ward ofCapital Group Multi-Sector Income FundTM(Canada).The fund invests in a blend of four primary higher income sectors in the fixed income universe: investment-grade bonds, emerging markets debt, securitized credit and yes, high yield, with the ability to increase or decrease allocations in each sector.Among the four sectors, high yield is currently telegraphing positive signals.History shows that when yields rise to the high-single-digit range, they tend not to stay that elevated for very long, as the discounted price and higher yields tend to draw in a broader cross section of investors. The carry (interest earned) that the high coupon provides also helps mitigate the risk of return volatility.High-yield investors also benefit from cash flows arising from calls and tenders. This creates an ability to redeploy that cash in opportunities at potentially higher yields.We discuss here five factors that make the case for an increased exposure to high yield and how we are approaching this market in a period of economic uncertainty, as well as when macro factors are having a large influence on markets.There is no doubt that we are in an uncertain economic environment. The U.S. could also be in a recession that is in large part the result of the U.S. Federal Reserve’s aggressive stance on fighting inflation. As expected, the Fed raised interest rates by 75 basis points at its September meeting. But how soft or shallow will the recession be?If the Fed’s actions are not successful in bringing down inflation, or if they push the economy into a longer, deeper recession, the high-yield market — and credit and risk assets more broadly — could face a bumpy ride.Against that backdrop, an investment vehicle that can increase or decrease exposures to high yield with the flexibility to redeploy assets to other higher income sectors may be prudent.One could argue that the negative scenario is reflected in high-yield prices already, given that returns for most areas of fixed income were in the negative high single digits through the end of August this year. On the other hand, if the Fed manages a “softer landing,” high-yield bonds could rally. Thus, it may make sense for investors to remain dexterous when building exposure to high yield. We believe several areas of the market could be resilient. In this environment, our focus is on quality: for example, one of our largest high-yield portfolios is invested 34% in bonds rated BB and 40% in bonds rated B.1.    Stronger fundamentals and lower issuance support valuationsEven with a softer macroeconomic backdrop, the high-yield market appears healthier and more stable than it has been in many years. We have a weaker economic environment but a stronger asset class, and the combination has resulted in yield spreads of around  480 basis points (bps) that are in line with historical averages, bringing the yield to worst on the benchmark Bloomberg U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index to 8.4% as of the end of August.High-yield spreads and yields are in line with their long-term averages for U.S. high yieldSource: Bloomberg. OAS = option-adjusted spread; YTW = yield to worst. Data as of August 31, 2022.A second positive factor is the absence of near-term large-scale refinancing requirements. Savvy corporate management teams have tapped into the low-rate and favourable credit environment of the past few years to complete their financing requirements. Especially in 2021, companies were able to refinance their near-term debt at exceptionally low yields and push maturities out by several years.As a result, corporate borrowers have entered this period of rising rates with financing that has been locked in for a few years. Because of that, many can sit on the sidelines today and do not need to issue new debt at prevailing higher rates. Many companies don’t need to tap capital markets or refinance until 2025, so the volume of issuance could remain low for at least another year, unless rates fall or high-yield spreads tighten.Year to date through August, there has been about US$92 billion in high-yield issuance in the U.S., compared to approximately US$366 billion for the same period last year. So, the opportunity set for us has shifted to the secondary market, where we are looking at relative value across capital structures and between issuers in the same industry, or even between industries.We are concerned about the lower-rated segment of high-yield companies that were waiting for their own prospects to improve before refinancing their debt. These firms may have missed the window to capture the lowest rates. While they represent a small segment of the high-yield market today, they also present us with opportunities to find solid companies seeking fresh capital that will now have to come with higher coupons.Many borrowers have time to refinance and are sitting on the sidelinesSource: Bloomberg. Data as of June 30, 2022. Illustrates dollar volume of high-yield bonds maturing in calendar years 2022 through 2030.2.    Default rates are likely to remain lowAlso supporting the high-yield asset class are solid economic fundamentals, which should keep default rates relatively low. At less than 1%, the latest 12 months’ default rate is very low by historical standards. When we evaluate future default probabilities, we consider the amount of bonds that are trading at distressed levels, because this can be an early indicator of future defaults. Today, distressed debt as a percentage of the high-yield universe is in the mid-single digits. Based on this metric, while we do expect the default rate to rise from very low levels, we are not forecasting a spike in defaults.Another factor that we consider is the universe of high-yield debt that is rated triple-C or below. This too, is around historical lows at about 12% of the high-yield market, compared to 20% in December 2007, prior to the recession following the global financial crisis. So, when we combine these three parameters — historically low default rates around 1%, triple-C and below-rated securities at about 12% of the market, and distressed debt stock in the mid-single digits as a percentage of the universe — it presents an overall supportive credit picture for the high-yield market.High-yield default rates are near historic lowsSource: J.P. Morgan. Trailing 12-month results. Data as of July 31, 2022.3.    Risk of contagion from leveraged loan market is limitedThe relationship between the high-yield and leveraged loan markets has evolved over the past decade. Historically, companies might have issued floating-rate loans as part of the secured portion of their capital structure, and separately issued fixed-rate unsecured bonds in the high-yield market. Today, many companies — often backed by private equity — that would have come to the high-yield market to finance themselves, have instead chosen to issue solely in the leveraged loan market. So, a lot of the risk traditionally associated with high-yield bond investing has migrated to the leveraged loan market. (Both the leveraged loan and private credit markets have expanded so rapidly that, today, their size, at about US$1.2 trillion, is similar to that of the high-yield market.)Companies that are tapping both the high-yield and the leveraged loan markets tend to be higher quality, larger firms issuing loans in conjunction with high-yield bonds, rather than to finance their entire capital structures. As a result, the high-yield market now is made up of stronger companies, based on credit ratings, and is also less exposed to private equity portfolio companies (which can be the most aggressively financed issuers in the debt markets).Companies that are seeking to be upgraded to investment-grade (BBB/Baa and above) can be attractive because they not only present an opportunity to earn a high coupon today, but can also benefit from the price appreciation that often comes from a rating upgrade as and when it occurs. Several large issuers in the high-yield market today have only been high-yield issuers since they were downgraded from investment grade during the onset of the COVID-19 pandemic in 2020, and they seek to return to the investment-grade market. In many high-yield portfolios, we also have the flexibility to hold issues rated BBB once they are upgraded, so there’s nothing forcing us to part ways with many of these rising stars. In light of the current economic environment, we are focused more on higher quality companies that have the potential to weather a longer, more pronounced recession, and there are more of these than ever in the high-yield market.Credit risk in the U.S. has migrated to the leveraged loan marketSource: Bloomberg, S&P/LSTA. High yield represented by the Bloomberg U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index. Leveraged loans represented by the S&P/LSTA Leveraged Loan 100 Index. Data as of June 30, 2022.4.    Finding value across a spectrum of industriesTelecommunications has been a large part of the high-yield universe for many years. Another historically large segment, consumer discretionary credits such as lodging, gaming and cruise lines, saw their valuations recover with the reopening of the economy following the pandemic. We remain selective in these sectors given the uncertain economic outlook and the leverage that issuers in these sectors took on while they were shut down during the pandemic.We see value in certain subsectors that represent a smaller part of the high-yield market, such as asset managers and insurance brokers. Given the recurring revenue models, these types of businesses have the potential to do better than the more cyclical issuers in a soft economy or a rising rate environment. Many of these companies have had predictable cash flows, whether through management fees earned on the assets under management or via commissions earned from the sale of insurance products.Investment time horizons matterBloomberg. Data as of August 31, 2022. Data incorporates the one-year, three-year and five-year rolling monthly periods between January 2002 and August 2022. Based in USD.5.    Energy sector fundamentals have improvedOver the past decade, the energy segment of the high-yield market grew rapidly as issuance to finance oil/gas exploration and production ballooned. But when oil prices fell, many of those companies were forced to restructure their debts and cut back on capital spending. This wave of defaults is now behind us and  the energy segment is now much smaller than it was at its peak.Today, the energy segment is the healthiest it has been in many years. As balance sheets have improved, capex plans have been curtailed, and as oil/gas prices have surged, energy has been the best performing subsector within the Bloomberg U.S. Corporate High Yield 2% Issuer Capped Index. Elevated oil/gas prices and restrained spending on exploration and production have transformed this segment from cash-burning to massively cash-generating, and management teams appear laser-focused on protecting their now-healthy balance sheets. And so, while the sector is still cyclical, we view it as less risky today and it also features a larger number of high-quality companies in which to invest.Bottom lineAssuming a duration of four years, given a 100-basis-point rise in interest rates, a high-yield fund would be expected to lose 4%. However, given recent yields of more than 8%, the risk of rising rates is mitigated by the high yield and coupons. Of course, additional factors could impact losses that a fund experiences.In our view, the goal of investing in high yield is to try to manage the risks that are inherent in lower quality, lower rated companies and be appropriately compensated for the risk we take. At the same time, we are careful not to be too cautious and give up yield opportunities along the way. It is not advisable to try to time the high-yield market. We believe that investors willing to maintain a long-term perspective should consider a strategic allocation to high yield through a multi-sector income investment vehicle which can opportunistically invest in high yield and other higher income sectors depending on fundamentals, valuations and market outlooks.",Bonds
Rising yields put bond markets back on a road to normal,2022-09-01T03:11:00,"Rising inflation and slowing global growth are two dominant themes casting a pall over the current market environment. With increasing geopolitical uncertainty, tightening monetary policy, supply chain challenges and higher commodity prices at play, a period of global stagflation could potentially be on the horizon.Navigating the foggy road to normal has never been more challenging, but with a long-term lens one can better understand the strong normalizing effect that disinflationary forces such as rising debt levels, technological advancements and aging demographics could have. Having a clear understanding of these can help investors better find their way.Investing in fixed income during a time of a high inflation and rising rates can seem worrisome. However, today’s starting yields offer an attractive entry point for investors. Yields across fixed income sectors are sharply higher than their lows over the past few years.Rising yields reflect more income potential across bond marketsSources: Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., JP Morgan. As of 6/30/22. Sector yields above include Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Index, Bloomberg U.S. Corporate Investment Grade Index, Bloomberg U.S. Corporate High Yield Index, and 50% J.P. Morgan EMBI Global Diversified Index/50% J.P. Morgan GBI-EM Global Diversified Index blend. Period of time considered from 2020 to present. Dates for lows from top to bottom in chart shown are: 8/4/20, 12/31/20, 7/6/21 and 1/4/21.At current yields, history suggests higher total returns over the next few years. This means that investors could benefit from holding bonds across fixed income asset classes, including investment grade, high yield and emerging markets. This higher income can offer more of a cushion for total returns over time, even if price movements remain volatile. In fact, a greater portion of investors’ income needs could potentially be met with traditional fixed income than would have been the case in recent yearsHistorically, at current yield levels, longer term returns have been strongSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg, J.P. Morgan. Yields and USD monthly return data as of June 30, 2022, going back to January 2000 for all sectors except emerging markets debt, which goes back to January 2003. Sector yields in USD above include Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, Bloomberg U.S. Corporate Investment Grade Index, Bloomberg U.S. Corporate High Yield Index, 50% J.P. Morgan EMBI Global Diversified Index/50% J.P. Morgan GBI-EM Global Diversified Index blend. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.Despite current volatility, the broad credit universe provides ample opportunities for investors to add value through bottom-up research and security selection in each of the four primary credit sectors — high yield, investment grade, emerging markets and securitized debt (or debt backed by auto loans, credit card receivables or other assets). Keeping a long-term view and employing balance can help smooth the way.Investors who seek a balanced portfolio should ensure that their fixed income allocation meets the four key roles bonds are meant to play in a portfolio.1. Diversification from equities:When stocks struggle, owning bonds with a low correlation to equities can result in lower portfolio volatility.2. Capital preservation:A fixed income allocation should help protect principal in most market environments, especially when rates and rate expectations have moved higher.3. Income:Providing dependable income is a central function of a bond allocation.4. Inflation protection:Bonds directly linked to an inflation index can help to protect an investor’s purchasing power.Notably, investment-grade corporate bonds have become more attractive as corporate fundamentals continue to improve, with relative debt levels falling across both European and U.S. investment-grade bonds. Valuations also look attractive as global investment-grade corporate yield has increased alongside higher government bond yields and wider spreads.U.S. high-yield fundamentals have also been improving. The credit quality of the market has improved with a higher proportion of BB-rated companies and a lower share of CCC-rated bonds, which could potentially make the market more resilient to a slowdown in growth. Defaults are currently very low, and although they may pick up should we enter a recession, we believe the yield cushion and active security selection can offset the potential risks. Yields have also become more attractive, moving from the low levels reached in 2021 to 7.5% currently. However, as volatility is expected to remain high and a higher degree of uncertainty in the economy persists, we position our credit portfolios defensively focusing on fundamentals and bottom-up research.The emerging market debt (EMD) universe has broadened and deepened significantly in the last few decades and, as the asset class has developed, it has become more appealing to a broader investor base. Issuance has increased thereby improving liquidity. That said, rising inflation, slowing global growth, tightening U.S. monetary policy and a soaring U.S. dollar have all weighed on the sector.The Russia-Ukraine conflict has created an additional headwind relative to other comparably rated developed market corporate debt. However, there is reason to be optimistic about the future of emerging markets. Current yield levels can provide significant cushion to further volatility.Many EM countries have aggressively hiked interest ratesSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg, JPMorgan, Morningstar. As of 6/30/22.Emerging local currency debt has been the fastest growing segment of the EMD asset class for quite some time and is now the largest part of the universe. We have a preference for local currency bonds. Compared with developed markets, EM central banks are much more advanced in their policy tightening. In addition, the increase in core inflation in emerging markets has generally been more modest than in developed markets. More aggressive rate hikes coupled with more muted inflation suggest good value in EM duration. In most of these markets hedging costs are high, so our duration exposure is primarily on an unhedged basis.Overall EM currencies remain undervalued, but selectivity remains crucial in assessing mainly those currencies from commodity exporters countries. We still have a constructive view on commodity prices because supply shortages haven’t been alleviated. In many cases, supply issues have actually deteriorated yet global activity is still reasonable. As such there is still a structural tailwind for commodity prices.Securitized credit can also offer a diverse array of investment opportunity across asset-backed, commercial real estate, non-agency mortgage and collateralized leveraged loan sub-sectors. Many of the fundamental drivers of these sectors are distinct from corporate and sovereign credit. This brings diversity to a portfolio.We are currently finding good value in the single-asset single-borrower (SASB) market. These niche investments create more concentrated risks than traditional commercial mortgage-backed securities (CMBS), but the market largely consists of very high-quality properties and lends itself to deep, property-specific fundamental research. This presents an opportunity for investors to gain access to specific assets that they find attractive. This sector is under-researched by many market participants, and this enables our team of securitized credit analysts to identify numerous mispriced investment opportunities.Uncertainty will remain in markets for the foreseeable future, and the investment environment will be challenging for investors globally. However, there will continue to be opportunities for active managers with strong research capabilities to navigate these headwinds, and allocations to fixed income assets will remain as crucial as ever.This commentary has been republished here with permission from Global Investor Group, publisher ofGlobal Investormagazine. Additional charts and data were added by the Capital Ideas staff.",Bonds
Bond outlook: What to know as U.S. Fed fears hit markets,2022-06-16T02:58:00,"The path to higher interest rates is painful, but it should ultimately benefit bond investors over the long haul.The U.S. Federal Reserve raised its benchmark policy rate by 0.75% to 1.50%–1.75%, the biggest increase since 1994. The central bank also signaled an additional 1.75% of increases ahead. Policymakers specifically raised the median year-end projection for the Fed funds rate to a range between 3.25% and 3.50%.U.S. bonds have tumbled more than 10% in USD so far this year, but there are signs the worst may be over. Investors have several reasons to own bonds as the Fed attempts to steer the economy toward a much-debated soft landing.1. Big declines may bring opportunitiesBond investors have snapped up debt as prices declined sharply on fears the Fed’s effort to tame inflation could severely strain economic growth. The buying spree helped most bond sectors post positive returns in May.Questions that drove volatility remain, but now may be an opportune time to turn anxiety into action. “Equity market swings will likely continue, but bond markets are unlikely to decline another 10% from here,” says fixed income portfolio manager Ritchie Tuazon.The downward selling pressure has brought valuations for most bonds back to Earth and more in line with expectations. This may provide an attractive entry point for investors.Exposure to high-quality bond funds can again offer the diversification investors want, especially amid heightened equity volatility. Investors can also seek opportunities across bond sectors to achieve investment goals such as income and inflation protection.2. Current bond yields largely account for inflation-driven rate hikesThe Fed’s rate hikes and balance sheet reductions suggest a focus on bringing down inflation. But there is still work to do.The U.S. consumer price index jumped 8.6% for the year through May and is up 1% from April. Core inflation, which excludes food and energy, rose 0.6% from the prior month.Prices for services in the U.S. soar, which may be harder to tameSource: U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics. As of 5/31/2022.The overall number is worrisome. “I think the Fed is still behind the curve on rate hikes,” Tuazon adds.Prices in the U.S. likely peaked for some items that surged in demand during COVID lockdowns. Case in point: Lumber prices jumped alongside home sales and renovations during the pandemic but have slid 50% from the start of the year. However, prices for services and necessities such as food, housing and energy have skyrocketed. “It may be a case of one replacing the other, keeping inflation high,” Tuazon notes.Persistent inflation may force the Fed to revise its rates path higher. However, since investors have mostly priced bonds to account for the more aggressive plan, future adjustments are unlikely to result in as much bond market turmoil.Over the next year, bond yields are less likely to climb as much as they have since July 2021, when markets began to worry about elevated inflation.U.S. Treasury yield expectations show rate hikes are largely priced inSource: Bloomberg. As of 6/15/2022.3. Income is back in fixed incomeInvestors may soon be able to cash in on higher rates.The yield on the 10-year U.S. Treasury hit 3.48% in mid-June, the highest close since April 2011. Yields, which rise when bond prices fall, have jumped across bond sectors. Over time, rising yields mean more income from bonds.Income opportunity in bonds is the brightest in yearsSources: Bloomberg, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., JP Morgan, Federal Reserve. As of 6/15/22. Sector yields above include Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, Bloomberg U.S. Corporate Investment Grade Index, Bloomberg U.S. Corporate High Yield Index, and 50% J.P. Morgan EMBI Global Diversified Index/50% J.P. Morgan GBI-EM Global Diversified Index blend. Period of time considered from 2020 to present. Dates for lows from top to bottom in chart shown are: 8/4/20, 12/31/20, 7/6/21 and 1/4/21.There are still pitfalls ahead, so an active approach might help. While a recession does not appear imminent, credit spreads may widen as investors forecast the likelihood of one, says fixed income portfolio manager Tara Torrens.Certain industries that are defensive in nature, such as health care and food, may offer more value in this environment. Commodities companies can also offer refuge in a late-cycle period. “There are always opportunities, but I’m maintaining a lot of liquidity that could then be redeployed if we see the type of spread widening that I’m expecting,” Torrens says.Emerging markets debt — a corner of the bond market that has been especially volatile — offers some opportunities as well. Several countries have raised rates ahead of the Fed and are on good financial footing, according to fixed income portfolio manager, Rob Neithart. Given the nuances of emerging markets investing, an active approach can help steer investors toward select investment ideas.4. Current yields have delivered attractive returnsAt today’s yields, history suggests higher total returns in the future. This means that investors could benefit from holding bonds across fixed income asset classes, including high yield.Higher yields have boosted total returnsSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg, J.P. Morgan. Yields as of June 15, 2022. Monthly return data as of May 31, 2022, going back to January 2000, for all sectors except for emerging markets debt, which goes back to January 2003. Based on average monthly returns for each sector when in a +/–0.30% range of yield-to-worst shown. Sector yields above include Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Index, Bloomberg U.S. Investment Grade Corporate Index, Bloomberg U.S. Corporate High Yield Index, 50% J.P. Morgan EMBI Global Diversified Index/50% J.P. Morgan GBI-EM Global Diversified Index blend. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.“Average annual returns for the high-yield market historically are approximately 6% to 8%. We are again at a starting yield level where these returns could be achieved, with a multi-year investment horizon, which is the first time this has been true in a while,” Torrens says.Why own bonds now?Investors have a lot to be pessimistic about: war in Ukraine, inflation and fears of a looming recession. Big declines occurred as investors feared the Fed could crimp growth as it raises rates and ends its asset purchases.Although risks remain, bond investors have largely priced in rate hikes. Now could be an attractive entry point, particularly for those using bonds to buffer equity volatility.“There’s a lot to be positive about despite all the negative headlines,” Tuazon says. “While past results are no guarantee of future outcomes, a long-term perspective can help investors recognize that yields at current levels have historically delivered more income and attractive returns.”",Bonds
Look to credit opportunities amid bond market rout,2022-06-13T12:30:00,"It is no secret that 2022 has been challenging for fixed income investors. High inflation and the U.S. Federal Reserve’s initiation of interest rate hikes have weighed on markets. Nevertheless, the broad credit universe provides ample opportunities for investors to add value through bottom-up research and security selection in each of the four primary credit sectors — high yield, investment grade, emerging markets and securitized debt.In this article, the first in a series exploring the credit universe, we discuss how income-seeking portfolios can be structured with the aim of adding incremental alpha (excess return) through security selection and asset allocation within a prudent risk management framework.Among these four credit sectors, capitalizing on relative value can be a very powerful way to enhance returns, especially during periods of high volatility like the one we are experiencing now.Here are our current views on each sector within credit and where members of our investment team are finding what they believe are attractive return opportunities within the construct of a multi-sector income portfolio.1.High yield has not seen prolonged periods of negative returnsThe high-yield corporate bond market has a long-term record of producing a high level of income, which is the primary contributor to its total return over a full market cycle. The sector is large, at about US$1.5 trillion, and spans a multitude of industries and issuers. Investors comfortable with taking on the higher risk associated with high-yield bonds can also choose from a range of bonds of varying quality (secured and unsecured across the BB to CCC ratings spectrum). The high-yield universe also provides significantly shorter duration than investment-grade (IG) corporates and emerging markets debt (EMD).Unlike equities, where valuations reflect expected future cash flows, high-yield returns are much more a function of an issuer’s current cash flows and ability to service debt. While high-yield spreads can be volatile and directionally correlated with equities, the yield serves to cushion drawdowns and drive attractive total returns over multi-year periods. Spreads refer to the difference in yield between two bonds or types of bonds, which investors use to gauge the valuation of a bond. In fact, it has been quite rare for the high-yield sector to experience prolonged periods of negative total returns.High-yield returns tend not to stay negative for longChart Source: Bloomberg. Data as of June 3, 2022. Returns are in USD.A large part of the sector is reasonably liquid, allowing for fundamental research to guide relative value decisions by moving between securities from different parts of a company’s capital structure, within an industry or across the high-yield sector. That said, we believe the sector’s relative value has declined compared to emerging markets, securitized credit and investment grade.Over multiple decades, the relationship between high-yield and investment-grade spreads has followed a similar pattern. High-yield spreads tend to widen significantly compared to investment grade during crises and periods of weak economic growth. Historical spread relationships act as a guide for when high yield becomes more attractive than investment grade during periods of stress. Outside of those crisis and recession periods, spread relationships are much more stable and generally hover within a predictable range. In the current environment, we expect that slowing economic growth will continue to push high-yield spreads wider compared to investment grade. As such, we are monitoring valuations and the economic backdrop and will increase our holdings given the right windows of opportunity.High-yield vs. investment-grade spreads appear tight in the U.S.Chart Source: Bloomberg. Data as of May 31, 2022.2. Securitized credit is under-researched, providing alpha opportunitiesSecuritized credit can provide a higher level of income than investment-grade corporate bonds with comparable ratings, while offering similar downside protection. The sector offers diverse investment opportunities across asset-backed, commercial real estate, non-agency mortgage and collateralized leveraged loan sub-sectors. Many of the fundamental drivers of these sectors are distinct from corporate and sovereign credit. This brings diversity to a portfolio. The sector is also under-researched by many market participants, enabling our team of securitized credit analysts to identify numerous mispriced investment opportunities.Securitized credit has relatively lower liquidity. As a result, repricings happen with a lag, compared to more liquid credit sectors, such as corporates and emerging markets debt. For example, when corporate spreads widened earlier in the year, especially after Russia invaded Ukraine, securitized credit initially did not move as dramatically. Spreads on securitized debt started to widen in March, at which point corporates had begun rallying back. This created a relative cheapening of securitized credit, which presented a good opportunity for investors. We added to asset-backed securities (ABS) and commercial mortgage-backed securities (CMBS), and took some small positions in collateralized loan obligations (CLOs), which were attractive relative to comparably rated investment-grade corporate bonds.We are currently finding good value in the single-asset single-borrower (SASB) market. These niche investments create more concentrated risks than traditional CMBS, but the market largely consists of very high quality properties and lends itself to deep, property-specific fundamental research. This presents an opportunity for investors to gain access to specific assets that they find attractive.Elsewhere in securitized credit, we are seeing good value compared to investment-grade corporates in AAA-rated tranches of several sectors: subprime auto, single-family rental and private student loans. In each case, the strong jobs market and high cash balances provide strong support for the consumer making payments on underlying loans.Spreads between CMBS and corporates remain wideChart Source: Bloomberg. Data as of April 29, 2022.3. Emerging markets debt offers diversified sources of income and returnEMD offers investors a high level of income and total return. The investable universe for emerging markets debt includes both investment-grade and below investment sovereign and corporate debt, which allows for broad relative value comparisons within the sector and across similarly rated investment-grade and below investment-grade corporate and securitized debt.EMD valuations, especially those of below investment-grade-rated securities, have remained cheap relative to high-yield corporates following the March 2020 selloff. More recently, rising inflation, slowing global growth, tightening U.S. monetary policy and a soaring U.S. dollar have all weighed on the sector. The Russia-Ukraine conflict has created an additional headwind relative to other comparably rated developed market corporate debt.But there is reason to be optimistic about the future of emerging markets. Indeed, many emerging markets central banks are well ahead of the Federal Reserve in terms of hiking rates to rein in demand in their economies to try to tame inflation. As emerging markets economies tend to be smaller, less economically diverse, and more reliant on exports and imports, inflation is a much more prevalent issue in these markets. Where developed markets are scrambling to address inflation that hasn't been seen in many decades, many emerging markets have an established playbook for how to rein in inflation domestically. Additionally, while higher energy prices are a challenge and many EM countries face food security problems as a result of the Russia-Ukraine conflict, numerous emerging markets (especially in Latin America and parts of Africa) are net beneficiaries of higher commodity prices since they are net exporters. Therefore, we believe that, at current valuations, EMD compensates investors well for the risks they face from what we believe should be a manageable situation.At today’s starting yields, EMD forward returns have historically been attractiveSources: Bloomberg, JPMorgan. Data as at April 30, 2022, in USD terms. Global IG Corporate: Bloomberg Global Investment Grade Corporate Bond Index (inception: 01/01/2001), Global HY Corporate: Bloomberg Global High Yield Index (inception: 01/01/1990), EMD Blend: average of JPMorgan EMBI Global Diversified Index and JPMorgan GBI-EM Global Diversified Index (inception: 01/01/2003). Average 2- and 5-year forward returns refer to the average historical returns for each index over the 2- and 5- year periods following the points at which they have touched today’s starting yields. Yield to worst is the lowest yield that can be realized by either calling or putting on one of the available call/put dates, or holding a bond to maturity.4. Investment-grade corporates: Higher quality but more sensitive to ratesInvestment-grade corporate bonds make up the largest sector in the credit universe. It is well-diversified across issuers and industries, and includes securities with maturities across the yield curve. We specifically like how the sector can be accretive to a portfolio’s overall yield, in addition to being less volatile than high yield as a result of tighter relative spread movements.Investment-grade corporates tend to be longer duration and lower coupon than high yield. This makes the sector more sensitive to interest rate movements. That said, because it is higher quality, spreads tend to widen much less relative to high yield when the economy slows and fundamentals weaken.Following the March 2020 selloff, investment-grade spreads compressed toward historically tight levels, while issuance remained at record volumes. Against the backdrop of stronger value in other sectors, we saw the relative value in investment grade to be less attractive. We have found value in certain financial services, health care and media issuers. We have the flexibility to further increase exposure or decrease as the near- to medium-term outlook for the global economy remains uncertain.The bottom lineIn summary, all four sectors of the credit universe play an important role in income-seeking portfolios. The high income of the high-yield and emerging markets debt sectors are balanced by the defensiveness of the higher quality investment-grade corporates and securitized sectors. The shorter duration of high-yield and securitized credit temper the higher interest rate sensitivity of the investment-grade and EMD sectors. Overall, credit spread correlations (or the tendency for spreads on different securities within a portfolio to move in a similar fashion) are reduced by the inclusion of securitized and sovereign credit. These sectors offer fundamental drivers that can be distinct from the corporate credit drivers in high-yield and investment-grade corporates.Given the uncertain economic environment, we believe taking a diversified, balanced approach to credit is more important than ever. We currently favour securitized credit, followed by emerging markets debt, and are taking a somewhat cautious approach with our investments in high-yield and investment-grade corporates.",Fixed Income
Multi-sector income: Investing for income as rates rise,2022-05-04T12:02:00,"Markets are on edge over soaring consumer prices, the war in Ukraine and recession fears in the U.S., Europe and China.The Bloomberg U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, a broad representation of the U.S. bond market, declined 5.9% in U.S. dollars in the first quarter, the worst quarterly loss since 1980. In April, it was down another 3.8%. With bond returns battered, investors may be wondering if there are any bargains in fixed income markets. Given the low prices, is now a good time to buy?The risks are real. The U.S. Federal Reserve’s efforts to contain inflation are likely to pressure growth and employment in the near term as its outlook remains hawkish.Rate hike expectations have jumpedSources: Bloomberg, Federal Open Market Committee. Projections assume rate at year-end.And as Europe seeks to wean itself from Russian oil and gas, energy prices — up 38% year-to-date — may remain elevated.Against this challenging backdrop, three of our fixed income portfolio managers with Capital Group Multi-Sector Income FundTM(Canada) offer their views about what’s ahead for some of the riskier bond market sectors. (Multi-Sector Income is available to investors as of June 30, 2022.)Companies are benefiting from consumer demand, but expect a more volatile environment for creditDamien McCann, fixed income portfolio managerThe Fed seems intent on trying to slow economic activity. Rate hikes tend to impact economic activity with a lag of at least two quarters. Right now, corporate fundamentals are fairly strong, and companies are benefiting from a consumer that is able to withstand price increases. I am seeing early indications that lower income consumers are spending less, but overall, there is no significant pullback.Inflation is a major concern, and Russia’s invasion of Ukraine has only added fuel to the fire. The economic toll of the invasion has far-reaching effects that are not yet fully visible. Obviously there has been an impact on the energy and grain sectors, but it has also spilled into certain parts of auto manufacturing and industrial gasses the semiconductor industry relies on.Food and autos are more exposed to higher input costs and shortages compared to telecom and cable, or health care companies.Spreads have widened over the past year, and it is a more volatile environment for credit. The issuance of high-yield bonds has dropped dramatically as companies wait for things to settle down.As an active manager, I have the flexibility to react to these ongoing shifts.The returns across investment grade, high yield, emerging markets and securitized debt are not the same over time. Being flexible and adjusting your portfolio can help buffer some of the current headwinds. There have been more opportunities in investment-grade bonds over the past few months, but I still think high-yield bonds offer better value.Within investment-grade corporates, certain California-based utilities seem attractive. In high yield, energy companies have some upside. In my view, oil prices will stay fairly high as supply is likely to remain tight. Beyond Russia, U.S. energy companies have a labour shortage problem which will limit increases in drilling activity. People in West Texas can work remotely and earn the same wage as if they were working on an oil rig.Among high-yield credits, I also see value in insurance brokerage and financial advisory issuers. These are resilient business models that can withstand high leverage.Valuations and fundamentals suggest cautious optimism for emerging marketsKirstie Spence, fixed income portfolio managerWhat’s happening in Ukraine is heartbreaking. I’ve dealt with many crises in my 25-plus years of investing in emerging markets, and this one is uncharted territory on so many levels.I think it’s prudent to stay cautious given the heightened volatility from war, inflation and the slowdown in China. However, there are idiosyncratic opportunities in emerging markets debt that an active manager can pursue.Bonds across many emerging markets have traded lower, but some of that trading has been related to risks tied to inflation and what central banks are doing. The asset class has matured significantly over the past decade. I think valuations generally reflect some downside risks.Overall, fundamentals are fairly decent. Several emerging markets banks have raised rates dramatically to combat inflation. And in some markets like Brazil, investors are being fairly compensated for elevated inflation. I also think certain currencies may even be cheap by historical standards.There are bright spots. Commodity exporters such as certain Latin American-based countries have traded higher, as surging prices could help them withstand a slowdown in global growth.Proactive rate hikes could provide attractive entry points for some emerging marketsSource: Bloomberg. Data shown as of 4/30/2022.Securitized assets may be more resilient compared to other bond sectors as inflation and rates riseXavier Goss, fixed income portfolio managerSecuritized assets cover a wide gamut of sectors such as U.S. residential mortgages, auto loans, commercial real estate and student loans. Broadly speaking, asset-backed securities and commercial mortgaged-back securities have some upside even with higher inflation. Select areas appear attractive compared to corporate credit, particularly at current spread levels.I remain a bit cautious as tighter monetary policy will slow growth and loan demand. That will flow through and impact consumer spending. I expect an uptick in delinquencies and defaults as eviction moratoriums and other pandemic-era programs roll off. While the increase could be higher than pre-pandemic levels, it shouldn’t be exceptionally so because consumers are in a better financial position today as compared to past financial crises.Consumers in the U.S. may be better prepared to weather an economic slowdownSources: Capital Group, Federal Reserve Bank of St. Louis, National Bureau of Economic Analysis, Refinitiv Datastream. Personal savings figures are seasonally adjusted and released quarterly. All prices shown in USD.I have been spending more time meeting with loan originators to better understand their specific underwriting standards. As financial conditions tighten, there may be a bifurcation in deal performance as weaker originators loosen their underwriting standards to maintain current loan volume.In the current environment, I foresee more bespoke and privately negotiated transactions across the securitized space, particularly as security selection becomes a more prominent driver of returns. This is especially relevant in the consumer asset-backed securities market where there are more niche issuers.",Bonds
The long unwinding road: Our take on Fed tapering and inflation,2021-09-23T04:23:00,"In the final months of this year, we expect the U.S. Federal Reserve to begin scaling back some of the extraordinary stimulus measures launched last year in the early stages of the pandemic. Although the Fed chose not to break any news about its first move at the September 2021 meeting, we already know the initial step. The central bank will begin by reducing, or tapering, the pace of its bond buying.The last time the Fed tapered, it prompted the infamous Taper Tantrum of 2013. Markets were caught off guard and bond yields soared. With investors better prepared for tightening this time around, we don’t expect another tantrum. The Fed’s unwind has been well telegraphed with only the precise timing unknown. Let’s unpack that path and consider how it might affect fixed income markets.Fed tapering soon but no hikes likely before late 2022As recently as August 2021, some investors believed that the Fed could announce the start of its taper program at its September meeting. The relatively weak jobs report paired with a softer inflation rate reading in August closed the door on that possibility, however. We now believe the Fed will announce its intention to taper as soon as its November meeting, unless economic conditions deteriorate significantly before then.The U.S. central bank will probably begin tapering assets in the weeks following that announcement. Once that begins, based on the Fed’s previous statements and its prior tapering program, we expect it to last roughly six to nine months, most likely ending sometime around the middle of 2022. Currently the Fed is buying US$120 billion of U.S. Treasuries and mortgage bonds each month. That amount will decrease gradually until the Fed is no longer adding any securities to increase the size of its balance sheet.Once the taper has ended, the Fed will only buy assets sufficient to maintain the size of its balance sheet, replacing old securities that mature. At that time, the central bank will consider a three-part test prior to raising interest rates:Has the economy achieved maximum employment?Has core inflation — the rate that excludes food and energy prices — reached its 2% target?Is core inflation on track to exceed its 2% target?We’ll dig into these conditions next. We believe the Fed isn’t likely to begin considering hiking rates until late 2022 at the earliest. Once it doesallow short-term interest rates to drift higher, we expect it to do so in a very gradual manner, as it did from 2015 through 2018.Sources: Capital Group, Bloomberg, Federal Reserve. As of 9/22/2021.Why the Fed hasn’t hit the brakes, despite rising inflation rateAs most investors are aware,the inflation rate is not holding the Fed back. This year it has risen above the Fed’s 2% target. Consider the Fed’s favoured measure, the U.S. Core Personal Consumer Expenditures Price Index. Its July reading was 3.6%. That puts it well above target — at a level not seen since the early 1990s.U.S. core inflation is the highest in three decadesSource: Bloomberg. As of 7/31/2021. Core inflation excludes food and energy prices.But today’s inflation rate is not necessarily what matters when it comes to interest rate hikes. The Fed probably won’t begin considering that move until late next year. We’ll have to wait to see if the current high inflation rate is durable enough to last until then. If price growth recedes below its target, the Fed may have to wait longer.On the other hand, inflation pressures could begin to look more severe. For example, we could see higher prices begin to bubble in areas like rent, housing and services. If the Fed begins to worry more about inflation running too hot, it may feel compelled to respond sooner.The Fed is unlikely to signal interest rate hikes until there is a clearer employment outlook in the U.S.Full employment is tougher to measure. Right now, we’re seeing some real dislocations in the labour market. Payroll surveys show the U.S. had 5 million fewer people working this summer than it did in early 2020. And that doesn’t even account for the expected natural growth of 200,000 new workers each month. That widens the gap to at least 8 million fewer workers than full employment would imply.But looking at wages and job openings complicates this picture. Lower wage workers have seen income gains exceeding 3% this year — well above average. We are also seeing 1.3 job openings for each unemployed worker. These factors would normally indicate a very strong labour market. Current trends paint a murky picture, however. For example, the labour market could look less healthy next year than those job openings and wage increases indicate, delaying the Fed’s first interest rate hike if the unemployment rate needs more time to heal.Mixed signals: High job openings, low employmentSource: Bloomberg. As of 8/31/2021.Why we don’t expect Taper Tantrum 2.0Fixed income investors panicked when the Fed announced its last taper. We don’t expect that this time. First, investors have seen the Fed take such action before. They saw its impact and that broader normalization was far from catastrophic. Back in 2013, investors feared the Fed would eventually increase the federal funds rate from zero to a range of 4% to 5% over time. That didn’t happen. This time they’re not expecting the Fed to hike interest rates much above 2%.Second, the market should not be caught by surprise once the process begins. The Fed has been very transparent with its plans. In numerous speeches and other communication, Federal Reserve Chair Jerome Powell and other governors have explained what to expect. As a result, the market isn’t likely to react as dramatically. Of course tighter financial conditions — through reduced liquidity and higher borrowing costs — will still have some negative impact on investors’ appetite for risk.The Fed’s clarity has led current bond yields to already reflect the assumption of a taper announcement before the end of the year. After that happens, investors’ concerns will likely shift to how quickly the Fed reduces its asset purchases and when it will start hiking interest rates. If inflationary pressures persist and the labour market trends in the positive direction, we could begin to see Treasury yields rise across the maturity spectrum.When the Fed begins raising short-term interest rates, shorter term yields may feel a more direct impact, prompting the yield curve to flatten. Historically, this is how we have seen it play out.While yields throughout the market should rise over time as the Fed normalizes, the past 12 months have shown justhow stubborn low yields can be. Concern about the longevity of robust economic growth has been one factor. Investors began to understand the persistence of COVID-19 when Delta and other strains caused new infection surges. The Chinese economy, a source of global economic strength over the past decade, has also been slowing. Lastly, investors believe the Fed’s inflation narrative — that the high rate we’re seeing is just transitory.Some investors may fret or become nervous about the Fed pulling back. Yet, policymakers will only do so when they’re confident the economy can sustain it. Ultimately, normalization should help ease the concerns about inflation that have cast a long shadow over markets this year. Importantly, once the Fed has trimmed its balance sheet and, eventually, raised interest rates, it will be in a much stronger position to act when the next major economic challenge begins. Looking at the taper through the lens of a Fed that wants to maintain price stability should reassure investors: Core fixed income funds should continue to provide ballast in diversified portfolios.",Monetary Policy
"Amid an economic boom, how high can rates go?",2021-04-14T11:39:00,"The possibility of an economic boom this year has stoked worries about higher inflation and prompted a sharp selloff in U.S. Treasuries. We spoke with fixed income portfolio manager Pramod Atluri and U.S. economist Darrell Spence about the outlook for the economy and interest rates, and whether the market could force the U.S. Federal Reserve to tighten monetary policy sooner than expected.Darrell, let’s start with you. What’s behind the current expectations, and how fast do you think the U.S. economy can grow in 2021?Darrell Spence:It’s all about the stimulus. The US$1.9 trillion coronavirus relief package, which sends more than US$400 billion directly to consumers, should provide a powerful tailwind for growth. All of that money hitting the economy at once is powerful, and gross domestic product growth could be pretty spectacular. There are also unspent funds from prior relief packages, plus a vaccination timeline that currently puts the U.S. somewhere in the second half of August for achieving full vaccination of the over-16 population. As that timeline compresses, the economy should open further. Finally, the Fed has said it will view near-term inflation as transitory and remain accommodative.I think all of this could drive a quarter or two of growth of around 10% this year. Supply chain bottlenecks and residual weakness in the labour market could be impediments to reaching that level, but high-single-digit growth is very likely in 2021.We’re seeing many signs of economic acceleration. Look no further than the recent surge of U.S. consumer spending on pleasure boats. While some American families have saved their stimulus payments, as reflected in a savings rate close to 15%, others have essentially viewed them as a bonus. While purchases of pleasure boats is a signal of high-end spending, we’re starting to see a more broad-based increase in consumer spending as well.High seas: U.S. consumer spending on pleasure boats soarsSource: Bureau of Economic Analysis, Refinitiv Datastream. As of February 28, 2021. Gray bars denote recessions as determined by the National Bureau of Economic Research.Given the economic outlook, the market has grown concerned about inflation. Do you share that concern?Darrell Spence:I agree with the consensus that inflation will rise this year, but a lot of that is likely to be temporary. We’ll be lapping last year’s super-low inflation, massive stimulus will be hitting the economy, and supply chain bottlenecks may drive some upward pricing pressure. I think we could see the consumer price index in the area of 2.5%.These things will probably play out by the end of this year, and then inflation should get back to a longer-term trend rate. I don’t expect it to stage a major breakout. But it could persist a little bit higher over the longer term, especially if there is more fiscal support in the form of a large infrastructure bill.It’s clear that the market is already sniffing this out. That's why TIPS (Treasury Inflation-Protected Securities in the U.S.) breakeven rates, which measure inflation expectations, are elevated. But inflation would have to really take off for expectations to rise meaningfully from here. At this point, a market pricing in 2.6% inflation doesn’t seem to be worrying the Fed.5-year breakeven inflation rate hits highest level since 2008Source: Bloomberg. As of March 26, 2021.Pramod, given this backdrop, where do you see interest rates moving over the next year?Pramod Atluri:With the 10-year Treasury yielding almost 1.75%, interest rates at the long end of the curve are back to pre-pandemic levels — a time when U.S. growth and inflation were both trending at around 2%. That was a late-cycle economy that looked tired in many respects. Today, the economic environment is vastly different. So it makes sense to me that interest rates could move higher, although the bulk of the repricing has already occurred.I’d say long rates could move higher by around 50 basis points, but it will be hard for them to move too high, too fast. Here’s why. First, there’s the Fed. By holding overnight interest rates close to 0% and promising to keep them there for years, the Fed is preventing the curve from moving significantly higher, particularly at the front end (less than seven years). Second, this effect is magnified by the Fed’s purchase of well over US$1 trillion of securities per year. And third, there’s global interest rates. While the U.S. has a very positive growth and inflation outlook, other countries are still dealing head-on with the effects of COVID-19. With interest rates still low and even negative in many parts of the world, the U.S. should continue to attract international capital, which will weigh on U.S. rates.How do you see the yield curve evolving?Pramod Atluri:The yield curve has already steepened significantly, with the 10-year Treasury yield almost 125 basis points above the 2020 lows and the Fed pinning the short end near 0%. If growth and inflation reach the levels that Darrell suggests are possible, then 10- and 30-year Treasury yields may rise further, but shorter maturities will find it difficult to move higher.At this point I’m finding value at the front end of the curve, such as the five-year maturity. At a yield of around 0.9%, it’s approaching my year-end target of 1%. The income generated from holding these bonds would significantly outweigh a move higher of 10 basis points. When you layer on the extra yield from investing in sectors such as corporate bonds and agency mortgage-backed securities, plus the benefit of falling yields as bond holdings get closer to maturity — what we call rolling down the curve — I think it is quite possible that short and intermediate fixed income securities could have positive low-single-digit total returns over the next year.U.S. Treasury yield curveSource: Bloomberg. As of March 26, 2021.In terms of monetary policy, could a stronger-than-expected economy force the Fed’s hand?Pramod Atluri:The Fed will adjust policy based on actual employment and inflation outcomes, not on forecasts. So the key to understanding how fast the Fed will hike rates is how quickly growth picks up. If U.S. economic growth approaches 8%-10% instead of the consensus of 5.5% for 2021, this may accelerate the Fed’s timeline. The more growth you have, the faster we're going to hit the Fed’s targets, and the market is going to start pricing it accordingly.My base case is that theFed will begin to hike ratesin early- to mid-2023 at a pace of 25 basis points every quarter, which is the same pace as the last hiking cycle. The Fed has signaled that it will taper asset purchases ahead of any rate hikes, so that implies a Fed taper in late 2022 or early 2023 — roughly two years from now.U.S. Treasury yields rebound from 2020 lowsSource: Bloomberg. Shows U.S. Treasury yield to maturity on the last trading day of each month from January 2008 through February 2021. Data for March 2021 as of March 26, 2021.Darrell, how do you think the labour market might affect the Fed’s decision-making?Darrell Spence:At 6.2% in February, the unemployment rate looks a lot better than it probably is under the surface. If you're out of the labour force, you’re not counted as unemployed. But we have to assume that a good chunk of those people would normally be employed — they dropped out because they had to care for kids who were at home, or for other reasons. So the true unemployment rate may be around 8%-8.5%. Overall, I think we’re around 6 million jobs below where we were before the pandemic. There's still a lot of lingering damage.Now, it could go in the other direction quickly, but we need to see a broader and more sustained reopening, particularly in schools and things like that. In my view the jobs market is healing, but there’s a long way to go. Meanwhile, the Fed wants to see sustained improvement in the labour market and broad-based participation in the economy. All of this just makes me think it’s going to be slower to tighten.What does all of this mean for bond investors?Pramod Atluri:In an environment where longer rates rise by 50 basis points while the five-year Treasury yield remains around 1%, one might expect that a passive index bond fund could have a negative total return of –1% to –2% over the next year. However, active managers can do better than this.For example, by focusing investments at the front end of the curve while avoiding or underweighting the long end, active managers with a duration of six years may be in position to maximize their gains and minimize their losses, leading to potentially better total returns. In fact, investors who are nervous about higher rates can do this themselves by shifting their fixed income allocation into short and intermediate bond funds that have a majority of their assets in the part of the curve that has already repriced and may be poised for positive total returns in 2021.The flipside to higher rates is that they improve the ability of bond funds to diversify equity risk and provide downside protection in the event of another market correction. Even though asset valuations are high, there are many indications that markets are more fragile beneath the surface. It certainly seems plausible that the extreme liquidity provided by central banks has fueled massive speculation. If so, then investors need to be very careful to not overextend, which is why maintaining a high-quality fixed income allocation is as relevant today as it was in 2020. In the event of another significant shock that threatens the recovery, we could easily see interest rates fall significantly, which would push bond prices higher. In this situation, the fixed income allocation can provide ballast, capital preservation and liquidity to help cushion portfolios, just like it did during the COVID-19 shock of 2020.",Interest Rates
Emerging markets debt outlook: What will 2021 bring?  ,2021-04-12T10:18:00,"For advisor use only. Not for use with investors.The path of the COVID-19 pandemic and the global macro environment are likely to be key drivers of returns for emerging markets (EM) debt in 2021, as they were in 2020. Continued monetary and fiscal stimulus, a recovery in developed economies and less aggressive geopolitics have the potential to create a virtuous cycle for EM debt. On the other hand, rising national debts funded in international capital markets pose risks, as do looming elections in some EM countries. The specifics of each developing economy and local politics are likely to influence returns, leading to meaningful divergence within the asset class. We see pockets of value in both U.S. dollar and local currency debt. While sovereign bonds continue to provide the bulk of the investment opportunity, we also find value in select corporate bonds.EM bonds are one of the few markets to still offer decent yieldsREAD FULL REPORT",Emerging Markets
Three reasons not to fear rising interest rates,2021-04-08T02:35:00,"After a stellar 2020, the bond market is coming under pressure. Massive government stimulus measures and an improving economic outlook are combining to stoke one of fixed income investors’ biggest fears: higher inflation.The selloff has been sharp. After rising more than 7% last year, as of March 29 the Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index was down more than 3% on a year-to-date basis in USD. The key questions for investors: Is the selloff warranted, and are rates likely to continue rising significantly from here? Our answer to both is no.Long-term yields have risen but remain historically lowSource: Bloomberg. As of 3/19/21.1. The market is overreactingWe believe the market is getting carried away with rate hike anxiety. Market expectations for a U.S. Federal Reserve rate hike in 2022 are earlier than we anticipate.Our view is based on the Fed’s desire to get the U.S. back to full employment. On evaluating the labour market, the Fed has articulated a broad approach. That means no single employment measure will work as a rate hike trigger. Fed officials will consider a variety of measures of underemployment, labour participation and even employment trends within specific demographic and income groups. Some of those, such as a weak labour participation rate, suggest labour market slack and possibly some longer term scarring. This should lead to patience on the part of U.S. central bankers when considering when to tighten policy.Additionally, the Fed has indicated that it is comfortable allowing inflation to run “hot” — above its 2% target — for a period of time if monetary policy is helping to hasten job creation amid elevated unemployment. This is evident by embracing policies such as average inflation targeting. This policy targets an average inflation rate over a period rather than having a rigid ceiling for all periods.For these reasons, we believe that the Fed will remain broadly accommodative. It appears likely to encourage strengthening economic activity until late 2023 or even early 2024. Fed Chair Jerome Powell seems committed to projecting any action that could tighten policy well in advance of implementation. We believe the Fed will follow a structured unwinding path. This strategy is likely to be similar to its 2013–2015 signaling that led to its first hike after the financial crisis.How will the first rate hike unfold?Source: Capital Group, Federal Reserve. As of 3/22/21. Fed dots represent the median Federal Open Market Committee projections when rate increases will occur. The market dots represent investor expectations based on futures pricing. The lower timeline represents how Capital Group’s interest rates team believes the unwinding path could unfold. The Fed is likely to ""taper,"" meaning to reduce its asset purchases, as an early step towards policy normalization prior to raising rates.Due in part to our view on the Fed, we find shorter term U.S. Treasuries attractive at present. If the market comes around to our view on monetary policy, these yields could decline and associated bond values rise. We are neutral on longer term Treasuries.The combination of loose monetary policy and fiscal stimulus has led inflation expectations to rise over the past few quarters. That has helped boost values of U.S. Treasury Inflation-Protected Securities (TIPS). However, the Fed’s tolerance for moderate inflation could lead expectations to rise further. This may occur if the central bank’s policy remains stimulative for longer than the market currently anticipates. If those expectations rise, so too will the value of TIPS.What if we are wrong and higher rates are rapidly approaching? Even then, there are strong reasons to stay invested in high-quality bonds.2. Rates are rising for a good reason — a strong recoveryGrowth and inflation expectations have picked up, as markets are seeing light at the end of the pandemic tunnel. Vaccines are steadily rolling out, and infections are on the decline: These are harbingers of stronger growth. They also underscore that the improving U.S. labour market trend will likely continue as COVID-19 restrictions lift.These positive factors have not prompted the Fed to signal rate hikes. However, their commitment to maintaining low rates amid more robust economic activity has helped boost inflation expectations. The Fed has pledged to endure moderate inflation to cut unemployment further. Yet the market believes rising inflation could mean higher rates are not that far off. An investor consensus projects an initial hike in 2022.Inflation expectations are risingSource: Bloomberg. As of 3/19/21. Break-even inflation rates convey the average inflation required over the life of an inflation-protected bond and similar nominal bond to generate the same total returns.3. Core bonds have shown resilience amid U.S. rate hikesBond values decline when rates rise. But history suggests that this isn’t the whole story. When rates rise, they historically haven’t done so quickly and sharply enough to cause significant losses over a hiking cycle for core bond investors.The yield bonds offer investors and other factors that push up bond values can help provide a positive total return. The chart below shows rate hiking periods over the past several decades. In all those periods, only two have seen negative total returns for the core bond benchmark. Despite rising rates, the average return for these periods was nearly 4% in USD.Rising rates don’t always mean negative bond returnsSources: Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., Federal Reserve. Data through 3/17/2021 in USD. Periods represented above include: 4/1/83-7/31/84, 1/1/87-9/30/87, 4/1/88-5/31/89, 2/4/94-2/1/95, 6/30/99-5/16/00, 6/30/04-6/29/06, 12/16/15-12/20/18. Note: Daily results for the index are not available prior to 1994. For those earlier periods, returns were calculated from the closest month-end to the day of the first hike through the closest month-end to the day of the final hike.Recent history is probably more relevant to what we can expect from the Fed as well. When central bankers began raising rates in 2015, they did so gradually. They began with a 25-basis point hike in December 2015. The Fed then waited a full year for another. Over the next year it raised rates three more times, again by just 25-basis points per hike.History alone may seem a compelling enough reason not to abandon your core bond allocation when rates begin to rise. However, we would argue a core bond allocation is something a balanced portfolio needs in any market environment. Having a strong core bond allocation can help to provide a measure of stability when unexpected shocks hit. Indeed, today’s market makes an even stronger case for maintaining a solid core.With riskier asset prices soaring, we believe investors should prioritize diversification from equities and capital preservation in fixed income. Markets are reflecting the likelihood of a post-pandemic economic upswing, but there could be bumps along the way. As the market crash in early 2020 illustrated, high-quality core fixed income can serve as ballast in portfolios during periods of equity stress.What kind of core or core-plus funds should you consider? Those that do not take excessive credit risk. Their correlation to equities — how closely tied their returns are to those of stocks — should be relatively low. In Canada, Capital Group offers two bond mandates:Capital Group Canadian Core Plus Fixed Income FundTM(Canada)andCapital Group World Bond FundTM(Canada). Both portfolios have historically had low correlation to equities, which can help smooth the ride when equities hit a rough patch.",Interest Rates
3 pillars of Canada’s business model and their impact on bonds ,2021-04-05T02:35:00,"As an investment analyst and portfolio manager, when I look at companies, I analyze their business models and their competitive advantages. I do the same thing for a country when I examine its macro environment. For Canada, I break down the country’s “business model” into three pillars: real estate, oil and the real economy. The COVID pandemic has upended Canada’s economy and changed its trajectory. Here is my current assessment of the three pillars and how they impact bond markets.Real estate, or housing, is every Canadian’s favourite financial topic. Over the last 10 years or so, this sector has contributed a large chunk of growth to Canada through construction, finance and household wealth accumulation. The outlook is extremely strong, and there are three good reasons for that.The first reason is huge demand for detached houses. Given the COVID-induced lockdowns, many people think living in the suburbs is cool again. They want more space and they want a backyard – that's changed, within the last year.The second factor: aggregate household income has increased during the pandemic, which seems counterintuitive. But with so much government stimulus and unemployment benefits, people have money to spend on housing now. The reality is, the money might not be equally divided or very fairly divided among Canadians, but the money is there, so people can invest it on housing.The last factor is low mortgage interest rates in Canada. Real estate is one of the most interest-rate sensitive parts of the economy. The rate cuts last year by the Bank of Canada pushed mortgage rates down, which has led to a frenzy of refinancing and new housing investment. Overall, I see solid prospects for the real estate sector.At Capital Group, we don’t have one “house view” on a topic. Personally, I'm quite bullish on oil. COVID caused supply to be reduced. For the people of western Canada, I'm sure you know of oil wells lying dormant. At the same time, demand was reduced. There were cutbacks on airline travel and reduced car usage because of lockdowns. Looking ahead, when vaccines take hold and demand returns, it may come roaring back to such an extent that supply will not be able to keep up with it. That means in the short term — one to two years – oil prices should rise, and that's good news for Canada.The third pillar I call the “real economy” and it includes car manufacturers, technology companies and other traditional industries in Canada. It boils down to two things: manufacturing and services. The manufacturing sector was not impacted significantly by COVID. Most manufacturing could continue shortly after the first lockdowns last year, and low interest rates and high demand for physical goods have prompted manufacturing companies to invest in new capacity. Service sector demand was hit harder by the strict lockdowns. However, that demand has been plugged by government stimulus. Demand for services could come back quickly once lockdowns are lifted. There are certain services that will take longer to recover, like tourism, but in general, I believe the mechanical reopening of the economy will bring back the service sector to near its pre-pandemic level. So overall, the real economy looks to be recovering well after COVID.Fixed income positioning based on the three pillarsIt seems like the Canadian economy is clicking on all cylinders. One concern now is: is it too good? Given the record stimulus in the system – both monetary and fiscal – plus the potential for a strengthening economy, and you have the risk of inflation. The Bank of Canada has two options. One is to just ignore it and let the economy overheat and cause inflation. That generally is bad for long maturity bonds, so we must be careful in our long bond exposure. The Bank of Canada’s other option is to hike interest rates and fight inflation preemptively. That is bad for the front end of the yield curve: bonds with shorter maturities. In my opinion, interest rates are likely to grind higher, so I’ve positioned my portion of the portfolio for that scenario. As I have said, Capital Group doesn’t have one single viewpoint on a topic, so other portfolio managers may take different approaches based on their view. That’s what The Capital SystemTM represents: investment professionals basing decisions on their core convictions. This approach can enhance diversification in portfolios.Consider Canadian Core Plus Fixed IncomeI’ve been a manager onCapital Group Canadian Core Plus Fixed Income FundTM(Canada)since 2019. The mandate invests in a broad range of Canadian and global fixed income securities.Put simply, we want this bond mandate to behave like a bond mandate. We strive for it to function as a counterweight to equities. One of the key functions of bonds is to assist in providing stability to a diversified portfolio. The Canadian Core Plus mandate has historically had low correlation with equities, meaning it hasn’t tended to move in sync with equities. This can help smooth the ride for investors, and keep them invested when equity markets hit rough patches.",Canada
How “creative destruction at light speed” impacts bonds,2021-03-29T03:21:00,"Understanding creative destructionIn 2020, I dusted off my old economics textbook and reread the section on creative destruction. The term was coined by Austrian economist Joseph Schumpeter back in the 1950s. According to Dr. Schumpeter, the “gale of creative destruction” describes the constant cycle of innovation that replaces obsolete companies, products and services with new ones. The profit motive for entrepreneurs is what drives this process. This big-picture, fundamental economic concept will have a major impact on investments for the next several years. Of course, there will be harmful fallout from this process that society will wrestle with. I don’t want to minimize that. But over the long term, creative destruction is positive for investors.An accelerant to the futureOur entire fixed income investment team gets together two or three times a year to discuss macro issues and their potential impacts on bond markets in a forum we call our Portfolio Strategy Group. At last year’s virtual forums, I talked about “creative destruction at lightspeed”: how the COVID-19 shutdowns — which have extracted a distressing human toll — accelerated into a period of less than one year a cycle that could have taken years or decades.Short- and long-term impacts to bondsThis development could be negative for bonds in the early stages, as expanding demand runs into supply disruptions (even unproductive companies and industries produce some goods and services required by productive businesses). That could lead to a period, maybe a short period, with higher inflation that might be serious enough for central banks to re-think their commitment to zero interest rates. And that could have an impact on bond markets. But beyond that period, the major improvement in productivity should support non-inflationary growth – that’s a major positive over the long term for capital markets, including the bond market.Positioning Canadian Core Plus Fixed IncomeCapital Group Canadian Core Plus Fixed Income FundTM(Canada)reflects a lot of these ideas. The mandate is diversified and flexible, and we can allocate to non-Canadian developed market bonds, emerging market debt, high yield debt and more.Right now, the portfolio has a slightly defensive interest rate posture, but not extremely so. It has a lighter allocation to provincial bonds and Canada housing bonds, as their valuations are stretched. On the other hand, as of the end of February, the mandate had a larger allocation to credit than the FTSE Canada Universe Bond Index, as our credit analysts have faith that they have potential through the whole cycle. And, its holdings outside of Canada are at a low level compared to past years. The portfolio’s foreign-domiciled holdings are generally hedged into the Canadian dollar. If we do get a period of inflation that impacts monetary policy, we're prepared to become more defensive in our interest rate and yield curve positioning. It’s something that we're going to be watching over the next three to six months.",Bonds
"Bobby Hull, Canadian Club and bonds: Reflections on 4 decades of investing",2021-03-29T03:09:00,"Growing up “south of Manitoba”I grew up just south of Manitoba in the great state of Minnesota in the Twin Cities of Minneapolis and St Paul. I’ve always been a big fan of all things that happened in Canada. As a young man living in the land of 10,000 – often frozen – lakes, I aspired to play hockey. I’m afraid I wasn't quite good enough to play in college, but that was a fun time of my life, and I remain a hockey fan to this day.When I was a kid, our big family summer vacation was to drive up the north shore of Lake Superior. Typically, every year we’d travel all the way to what used to be called Port Arthur, and is now Thunder Bay. We didn't own a cabin – I always wish we had – so we would rent one. Fishing, hiking, swimming and enjoying the great natural beauty of the region – those were some of the best times of my life.Bobby Hull and the golden eraI was a hockey-crazy kid in Minnesota when Bobby Hull – “The Golden Jet” – was at his peak with the Chicago Blackhawks. That was before the great 1967-68 NHL expansion when Minnesota finally got a franchise. Before that, the Blackhawks were the closest thing to a “home team.” Bobby Hull was the “Great One” of his era (although some thought the Detroit Red Wings’ Gordie Howe deserved that title). At the time, Bobby Orr was just coming up in the league and Wayne Gretzky was 8 years old (and already skating circles around everyone in Brantford), so Hull reigned at the top. It was a great era for hockey, and I was so fortunate to have seen those giants play.Training for a future in financeWhen I went to college, my original plan was to study math. But to be honest, after a fairly short period of time, I came to the conclusion that it was both too pure and too hard. So, I switched over to economics, but I was always interested in the mathematical side of things, which led me to study interest rates, bonds and all the theory behind them. I was inclined toward the bond market ever since then.I was fortunate to land a job at the Federal Reserve Bank of Minneapolis as a research associate back in the 1970s. It was a very interesting time at the Minneapolis Fed research department, because there was a whole group of people doing groundbreaking work, including Thomas Sargent, who won the Nobel Prize in economics a few years ago.The Fed wanted me to get a PhD and become an economist. They were really pushing me to do that and I thought about it a lot. But then I considered the four-plus years it takes to get your dissertation done, and decided to go for an MBA at Columbia University instead. I joined Capital Group right after business school, and because of my background analyzing interest-rate fundamentals I immediately moved toward bonds as opposed to equities. Capital proved to be the right place for me.The evolution of the Canadian bond marketMy first research assignment at Capital was covering the Canadian credits that issued bonds in the U.S. market (known as Yankee bonds). That’s another reason I have great affection for Canada. Back then, the Yankee market was dominated by provincial bonds and non-U.S. banks. We also regularly invested in the Canadian domestic bond market in our global accounts.A lot has changed over the years. The Canadian bond market has become more closely correlated and highly integrated with the U.S. market. Before 2005, Canadian bond yields were regularly higher than comparable U.S. yields – as much as 200 basis points higher. We were managing Canadian bonds relative to U.S. bonds, similar to the way we managed U.S. bonds relative to U.K. bonds, or other developed nations’ bonds. There was still a fair amount of currency movement, interest rate variation and very different monetary policies.Now that has converged over the years. Of course, nations have different economic and monetary policies, but bond markets themselves are extremely correlated. And it's actually a rare day when markets go in different directions. All bond markets are far more efficient and far more complex than when I started.Analyzing bonds through a global lensCapital Group has always believed in on-the-ground research ever since opening its first office outside the U.S. in Geneva in 1962. At the end of 2020, we had more than 440 investment professionals located around the world, who meet with executives and government officials in countries worldwide.Back in the 1980s, I worked out of our London office and traveled around the continent visiting government officials and company managements. As a sovereign analyst, I regularly met with officials at various central banks. Getting direct contact with policymakers helped inform my investment decision making. Plus, having a global view is critical. There's no way you can invest in bond markets — including the Canadian bond market — if you're not very intimately involved in the other bond markets around the world. I think that my time in London expanded my horizons and made me a student of international bond markets.Managing Canadian Core Plus Fixed IncomeI’ve been a global bond manager for some time, and always held Canadian bonds in global portfolios. I started managing a Canada-centric strategy –Capital Group Canadian Core Plus Fixed Income FundTM(Canada)– in 2008.The portfolio’s investment objective is:Steady income, capital preservation and long-term total return consistent with prudent management by investing mainly in a broad range of Canadian and global fixed-income securities.I’d sum it up by saying we want this bond mandate to behave like a bond mandate. We strive for it to function as a counterweight to equities.One of the key functions of bonds is to assist in providing stability to a diversified portfolio. The Canadian Core Plus mandate has historically had low correlation with equities, meaning it hasn’t tended to move in sync with equities. This can help smooth the ride for investors, and keep them invested when equity markets hit rough patches.Canadian Club with a twist of analyticsCapital managed US$440 billion globally in bonds as of the end of 2020, and yet most people think, “Capital Group, they’re equity managers.” We’re probably the best kept secret out there, but we are trying to make sure the word gets out.Over the years we’ve built our bond division — we had 190 fixed income investment professionals as of the end of last year. Most have deep experience; in fact, 55% of our bond portfolio managers experienced the difficult bond market of 1994.We’ve also enhanced our analytical tools. We adopted the Aladdin trading and risk system some years back, and we use its capabilities in every market. We have a dedicated Risk and Quantitative Solutions team, which is incredibly active and looking closely at our portfolios. We have a monthly meeting, which we call the Canadian Club. On these calls we take an in-depth look at risk in portfolios. The risk reporting is very detailed, including looking at the risk in credit spreads, or the difference between corporate and government bond yields, which reflects their price differentials. Our analytics are important and have allowed us to make better decisions in portfolios.How The Capital System shapes portfolios and eases transitionsI grew up steeped in The Capital SystemTM, our proprietary multiple-manager investment approach. It’s the lifeblood of this organization. It starts with our deep, global, fundamental research. And then, we use that research to build portfolios. Our approach combines the concept of an individual manager with a high level of accountability, along with the concept of a team and shared information. The Capital System builds portfolios that house multiple, disparate views. This diversity creates the potential for portfolios to fare well in a variety of market conditions.One of The Capital System’s many benefits is that changes to a portfolio’s manager lineup are less disruptive to the overall strategy than they would be in a single-manager system. A manager's departure or addition to a strategy happens in an orderly manner as each strategy is built to ensure long-term continuity around a team of decision-makers. These shifts can be made with minimal disruptions to the day-to-day operations and the overall objective of the strategy.The next chapterMy future is probably a little uncertain until COVID restrictions are eased. But, when the world returns to some semblance of normal, I look forward to getting on the road and visiting places I’ve never seen before. I also look forward to visiting some of my favourite places – and Canada is at the top of my list.",Canada
The outlook for credit in a recessionary economy,2020-06-08T11:20:00,"With the severity and duration of the economic downturn still unclear, investors may be wondering what this means for corporate credit, particularly the riskier high-yield sector.We talked with Damien McCann, fixed income portfolio manager, to get his perspective on the broader credit market and how companies are traversing the pandemic.What’s your outlook from here?We’re in a period of incredible uncertainty given the unknown path of the virus. We do know, however, that much of the economy has been significantly disrupted by the pandemic. Revenues and cash flows in many industries are currently under severe pressure. Other industries are faring much better. Second-quarter earnings will be ugly but should represent the bottom for most companies. More important than second-quarter earnings, however, will be what managements of companies are seeing for third- and fourth-quarter activity.My base case is that the economy is beginning to improve as we speak, and that this recovery will continue through the remainder of the year and 2021. How fast is unknown. I expect anuneven recovery by industry and more volatilitygiven the unprecedented economic disruption, and the many uncertainties regarding the spread of the virus, containment efforts and progress on therapies and vaccines.Is this downturn different from the global financial crisis (GFC)?Each is similar and different. Similarities with the GFC include the significant economic contraction and related sharp rise in unemployment. Both periods include significant stock and bond market volatility, as well as a seizing up of credit markets. Both periods have received significant stimulus and support by governments and central banks.But the drivers of each downturn are very different. The GFC came from within our economy and markets. The pandemic is an exogenous shock, and the hit to economies is more severe than during the GFC. The monetary and fiscal stimulus came much faster this time around, and in much larger size, because policymakers have learned from the past and want to prevent a severe recession from becoming a financial crisis.The Fed is actively supporting numerous markets — including U.S. Treasuries, mortgages and credit markets. Some of this, such as buying corporate bonds and ETFs, is without precedent in the U.S. In my view, these programs indicate a deep commitment by the Fed to ensure credit markets continue to function. This helps explain why credit markets have responded favourably and, after widening dramatically in mid-March to the widest levels on record for a few days, spreads recovered some of that widening later in the month.What steps are companies taking to manage through this period?Companies are grappling with a high level of uncertainty about the duration of the downturn. As a result, many companies are taking steps to bolster liquidity. In other words, companies are trying to build up a lot of cash so they can survive this period. Steps companies are taking to build cash include cutting operating expenses and capital outlays,reducing or eliminating dividends and share repurchasesand raising capital.On this last point, the Fed’s injection of liquidity and its direct participation in corporate bond markets have restored order to markets and made it possible for investment-grade companies and certain high-yield issuers to borrow again.The combination of the Fed’s support for credit markets, and the severity and uncertainty of the downturn, has led to record levels of investment-grade bond issuance in recent months. Certain companies, such as Disney, have tapped the bond market more than once in recent months. What’s more, companies in the eye of the storm — including certain leisure and travel-related issuers — have been able to access markets.What is your expectation for default rates?I expect defaults and downgrades to be higher than in prior cycles given the severity of the economic contraction. In fact, U.S. corporate downgrades have spiked to their highest level in more than a decade in the first quarter, according to data from Standard & Poor’s.Companies that are more exposed to economic disruption, as well as those with more leverage and less liquidity, are most vulnerable to defaulting. Despite efforts to cut costs and preserve cash, some companies won’t be able to handle the sudden near full stoppage of economic activity.I expect downgrades may exceed previous cycles, with the potential for bankruptcies of companies in the U.S. high yield and loan market.Can you provide some colour on “fallen angels” — the large companies such as Ford that have recently entered the high-yield market? How does that impact the high-yield market?Credit rating agencies have been more aggressive with downgrades in recent years. Given the magnitude of the economic contraction I expect this to continue. There will certainly be many downgrades in the months and quarters ahead.I also expect more companies to enter the high-yield sector. Some investors fear that a rash of supply in this sector could overwhelm the market, but keep in mind that it has actually shrunk in recent years on fewer issuances and more companies turning to the loan market. In that sense, the high-yield market could use some additional supply. Also, the Fed’s move to scoop up corporate debt should help absorb the shock. In some cases, these downgraded bonds could represent attractive investment opportunities in high-yield portfolios.In what areas are you finding value?As I look across the corporate market, exposure to this pandemic and economic contraction varies dramatically by industry and company. For example, at one extreme are certain insurance underwriters that have become more profitable due to fewer claims in this environment. At the opposite extreme are certain leisure companies that have seen revenues fall to zero. But even within this sector, exposure varies significantly based on the business model and balance sheet. Some leisure companies adapt and survive better than others.The variation in exposure to the pandemic represents an incredible opportunity for deep, fundamental credit research to add value in portfolios. Our credit analysts are well versed on their companies and are in regular contact with managements. They are identifying and investing in issuers they believe have the ability to navigate this period.Market events like this can and have historically represented a good entry point for long-term investors. Spreads today are broadly comparable to past crisis and recessions, excluding the global financial crisis. I don’t believe in timing the market but I do feel that current spreads provide an opportune entry point for a long-term investment strategy.What about relative value between investment-grade and high-yield bonds? And what about the BBB-rated area of the market?While income opportunities are higher in both investment-grade and high-yield corporates, I’ve been finding even more in high yield. In particular, the improved valuations have led to more opportunities within health care, technology companies and consumer staples.The BBB market is huge (nearly US$3T) and very diverse. The work our analysts have done suggests that a large majority of this particular market is unlikely to fall to high yield during this period. Some of the BBBs that fall to high yield may be attractive investment opportunities within that space, particularly if the downgrade leads to wider credit spreads.How is Capital navigating this environment?From a credit perspective, we are diving deep into understanding which companies will come out of this crisis intact and be able to repay their lenders. Our strong relationship with management teams and focus on fundamental credit research help us in this endeavour, as it’s our belief that that the prospects for recovery will very much be company, industry and geographically specific.We remain very selective about our investment decisions, which are made on a security-by-security basis. This is especially important in today’s environment as downgrades and defaults become more frequent. Knowing what you’re buying helps mitigate broader credit market risks.We also can’t stress enough the benefits of a long-term perspective, as a multiyear view may provide investors with the opportunity to capture higher returns.",Fixed Income
Bond market perspective: Why it’s important to stay strong at the core,2020-04-23T05:44:00,"Needless to say, it’s an unusual time. We won’t add to the noise that “markets are volatile” or make other obvious statements. Rest assured, we see that reality and are working hard to manage through the challenges associated with dislocated and somewhat illiquid markets.The reset in asset prices over the past several weeks has been driven by the fear of aneconomic downturn. As we move forward, the driving force behind the continued reset will be the reality of much weaker growth and sharply lower corporate earnings.We know from past downturns andperiods of volatilitythat often the best course for investors is to stick to their individual plans. In equities, popular wisdom argues that you should maintain a long-term focus, stay invested and take advantage of dollar cost averaging through the downturn.In bonds, however, now is the time to take a closer look at what you own.Interest rate outlook: Lower for even longerWe’ve been preaching “lower for longer” for years. In March, U.S. Treasury yields reached new all-time lows as the U.S. Federal Reservecut its policy rateto 0.00%–0.25%. With the return of zero interest rate policy, the discussion of negative rates in the U.S. will begin in earnest.It’s not our base case that we see a negative policy rate in the U.S., but everyone should be prepared to hear more noise on this front. Although U.S. rates are closer to the zero lower bound now, they still have room to fall if, for instance,the recoverytakes longer than expected.Leverage remains highDuring a recessionary period, we know credit becomes challenged. Our starting point adds to the difficulty: Going into this downturn, the riskiest segments of the credit market (BBB-rated investment-grade corporate debt, high-yield credit and leveraged loans) had reached a 20-year high as a percentage of U.S. GDP at 25%. Notably, BBB debt as a percentage of the investment-grade credit market had also ballooned to roughly 50% of that universeWorking through this imbalance will take time. We also expect the unwind and repricing of risk in the market will continue to be exacerbated by a lack of liquidity. In the initial price decline, banks quickly reached balance sheet risk limits. Investors who have been blindly riding the credit wave for years haven’t been able to unwind, even if they wanted to do so.The lack of liquidity has been more severe in this downturn compared to the 2008–09 financial crisis. Measures have been taken to alleviate stress in the system, and they’re helping, but it’s unlikely that we will see markets return to their pre-COVID-19 complacency.Excesses need to unwindAs spreads in corporate credit have widened substantially, we are now less defensively positioned, but we remain risk aware as we evaluate new opportunities. Years of excesses still need to unwind. We will ultimately find value, as we did in recent weeks when credit spreads — the difference between yields offered by U.S. corporate debt and U.S. Treasuries — hit their widest levels. We will continue to take advantage of opportunities on a security-by-security basis, viewed through the eyes of our experienced analysts.We’re still mindful that we’re likely to shift from the “hope” that’s driven the recent rebound in asset prices to the “reality” stage reflecting the weak currentstate of our economy. With a lot still unknown, spreads have the potential to move wider again, notwithstanding central banks that have gone all-in, particularly in those areas of the market that were not previously supported by central bank purchases or lending programs. Over time, further credit spread widening may present attractive entry opportunities.Stay strong at the coreIn previous commentaries, we’ve talked about considering “upgrading the core” of your fixed income allocation. That message is more relevant today than ever. Our view is that now is the time to stay strong at the core, remain risk aware and avoid the temptation to reach for yield. Even with historically low U.S. Treasury yields, it’s not too late to make sure your bond portfolio is doing what it should — providing diversification from equity exposure and preserving capital.During this volatile period, many investors have been surprised to see their bond funds fail to perform their intended role. For example, all five of the largest core-plus bond funds available in the U.S. declined in the month of March, posting an average loss of 3.3%. And even some short-term bond funds have struggled, producing negative returns in this environment.Be mindful that bond funds with “core plus,” “total return” or “income” on the label tend to be overweight lower rated corporate credit, emerging markets debt and structured products, and they can be significantly underweight U.S. Treasuries. These types of funds can be important components of an overall bond allocation if they are part of a well-diversified bond portfolio.The truth is, no one knows what will happen next. But you can focus on making sure that as the highs and lows of these volatile times continue, your fixed income portfolio is designed to absorb the shocks and help provide a measure of stability when you need it most.",Market Volatility
Answers to your 5 biggest interest rate and bond questions,2020-03-18T09:30:00,"Stock markets around the world have continued to sell-off amid concerns that emergency measures by central banks and fiscal stimulus from governments will fail to ward off a global recession caused by thecoronavirus outbreak.The lack of liquidity in areas of bond markets and pricing discrepancies in pockets of the exchange-traded funds (ETF) markets led the U.S. Federal Reserve to act over the weekend with extraordinary measures to stabilize the economy. It delivered a package that is larger in aggregate than any single move in the past. The stimulus measures included a cut in the benchmark interest rate to near zero — the second emergency rate cut this month. In addition, the Fed announced a US$700 billion program to purchase U.S. Treasuries and mortgage-backed securities. It also cut the rate charged to banks in the U.S. for short-term emergency loans from its discount window and said it would activate swap lines with five other central banks.On Tuesday March 17, the Fed announced a further measure to help companies with short-term funding to purchase commercial paper through a special credit facility. Fiscal stimulus may be on the way to help calm markets as well, with news reports suggesting that the Trump administration is pursuing a massive US$850 billion stimulus package.The bond market is in uncharted territory. The 30-year U.S. Treasury yields recently touched yields below 1%, and the 10-year dipped below 0.5% for the first time. Against this backdrop, Mike Gitlin, head of fixed income, and portfolio manager Pramod Atluri discuss fixed income markets and the outlook for interest rates.1. What is your outlook for U.S. interest rates, and what are your expectations from the Federal Reserve?We believe the Fed will continue to act to support financial markets and the real economy in the coming weeks and months. As 2020 began, the market expected a pretty uneventful year from the Fed. Economic growth looked to be improving as U.S./China trade tensions eased and employment growth remained healthy.Then the outbreak of COVID-19 and the extraordinary efforts to contain it changed everything. As the virus spread and its deadly nature became more evident, this initial supply disruption morphed into a massive demand disruption as businesses and consumers began to self-quarantine leading to reduced travel and consumption. This was then compounded by an oil price war between Saudi Arabia and Russia that led oil prices to fall more than 25% in a day, causing yet another disruption to financial markets.Interest rates have fallen and credit spreads have widened, leading to a tightening of financial conditions. If left unchecked, this would hurt both businesses and consumers, and ultimately worsen the economic outlook.In response, the Fed has conducted two emergency rate cuts totaling 150 basis points on March 3 and 15. This brought the monetary policy rate down to its zero bound, 0%–0.25%. Despite the cuts, financial conditions remain challenged as equity prices and credit spreads have continued to weaken. We believe the Fed will continue to act to support the economy using a variety of tools at their disposal, including a commitment to keeping rates low for the foreseeable future and potentially more large-scale asset purchases known as quantitative easing.2. With rates in the U.S. already near zero, what other tools could the Fed employ?Given the rapidlyworsening economic outlook, the Fed was forced to act both quickly and forcefully as the sudden stop in economic activity by consumers and businesses roiled financial markets. But with the Fed funds rate now at 0% to 0.25%, we believe that reducing short-term interest rates will no longer be the primary tool of the Fed.Many global central banks have pushed interest rates into negative territory. However, the Fed is reluctant to follow suit given differences in the structure of U.S. money markets as well as concerns over how negative interest rates would affect financial conditions in the banking system. Instead, it is more likely to lean more heavily on other tools.Those include:Forward guidance: Telling the market to expect more stimulus in the futureMore quantitative easing: Expanding its balance sheet to buy assetsAdditional liquidity facilities: They may introduce additional such measures, perhaps targeting specific sectors that are facing the greatest stressEncouraging banks to lend: They may use their authority to encourage otherwise reluctant banks to extend creditAverage inflation targeting: An explicit willingness to let inflation rise above its 2% target for a period of time, since it may be below target during another period3. What is your outlook for credit? How do you distinguish between investment grade and high yield?In times of enhanced uncertainty and volatility, the flight to quality is high as investors seek safety in U.S. Treasuries. If you look at credit markets, both high-yield and investment-grade bonds, the risk premium investors demand over U.S. Treasury yields can rise significantly. Corporate bonds tend to have a greater correlation to equities, so when equities decline in value, these bonds historically also decline, and high-yield bonds fall (credit spreads widen) typically much more than investment grade.Given significant market volatility and the rapidly declining economic outlook, we are very cautious on the outlook for credit. We believe there are many scenarios where credit may continue to weaken before markets stabilize and prices improve. Over the past decade, corporations have tapped into the low interest rate environment and taken on a large amount of debt. Many companies are highly leveraged and will be vulnerable if credit spreads continue to widen. It is important to be very discriminating in the credit space, considering the increasing leverage we have seen over the past few years.Overall, in our broad fixed income portfolios, we have generally had a long duration exposure, which translates into an exposure to interest rates, and a less-than-benchmark exposure to credit and mortgage-backed bonds. However, valuations are changing rapidly, and we are also likely to see a significant series of steps to help support markets and the economy from both central banks and fiscal authorities. Therefore, our analysts and portfolio managers look to take advantage of volatile markets to find investments in credits they like at more attractive valuations.4. Given that we are in an environment facing constraints on both the supply side and the demand side of the economy, should investors brace for a recession in the U.S.?Our economists believe that the U.S. has been in the late part of its economic cycle for some time. Before COVID-19 hit, investors anticipated modest growth might persist over the medium term. But the outbreak of COVID-19 and the Saudi/Russia oil shock have rapidly changed the economic outlook.Suddenly, investors are faced with a grave new uncertainty that has caused significant disruptions. On the supply side, factories are experiencing stoppages, and both supply chains and global trade have been disrupted. On the demand side, nervous consumers and businesses may not spend as much as they would in normal times. And given the oil price collapse, the market is bracing for another wave of defaults from related sectors. This could particularly affect energy sector issuers in the high-yield market, as many of those issuers are already starting with more stretched balance sheets.Additionally, liquidity is very challenged in the commercial paper market. If such pressures persist, they could force creditworthy businesses to issue shorter maturity commercial paper over a one- to seven-day horizon versus the usual one month. This could potentially constrain cash flows for companies even further as they would need to roll over their issuance of short-term debt more frequently. In response, the Fed has announced it will open a commercial paper lending facility for the banks.The probability of a recession has increased dramatically from where it was just a few weeks ago. Investors should expect a period of heightened volatility. Knowing how much risk they are taking in their overall portfolio is essential, and they should consider upgrading their bond portfolios to hedge against the volatility of their equity portfolio.5. How should investors position bond portfolios?The recent drop in equities and rise in price of 10-year U.S. Treasuries is a timely reminder that high-quality bonds can help to stabilize investor portfolios against losses during volatile periods. In times of great uncertainty, investors should look to bond funds first and foremost as a way to diversify their portfolio and preserve capital. But not all bonds or bond funds are created equal. There are many broad bond funds which own significant amounts of lower quality bonds that may not provide the protection and stability investors need when risk assets decline.We would encourage investors to do a health check and ensure the bonds in their core portfolios are high quality, like U.S. government bonds, AAA-rated mortgage bonds and investment-grade corporate credit. These bonds have historically been more resilient when shocks occur, helping to preserve investors’ capital while also providing some income.While it can be tempting to increase holdings of riskier bonds like high-yield corporate debt in a reach for yield as interest rates fall, it is important that investors know that high-yield bonds can be highly correlated to equities. When equity prices fall, so do many high-yield bonds, which means investors have not really reduced risk in their overall portfolio.Consider the five deepest equity market corrections — those where the S&P 500 Index lost at least 12% — since the financial crisis ended. In each one, higher quality bond funds experienced solid absolute returns, on average. Importantly, during these stressed equity periods, higher quality funds as represented in the U.S. by Morningstar’s Intermediate Core category experienced stronger returns than the Intermediate Core-Plus and Multisector Bond categories that tend to be much more exposed to the higher risk end of high-yield bonds.This demonstrates how a strong core bond allocation can act as a ballast in an investor’s overall portfolio. A fixed income allocation should zig when stocks zag to provide some shock absorption.We would urge investors to focus on the important role of bonds in an overall portfolio. When the economic outlook becomes more uncertain, we believe investors should prioritize capital preservation and diversification from equities over adding a few more basis points of yield.Since investors never know when volatility will hit or how bad it will get, and depending on their financial circumstances, maintaining an investment grade allocation may be their best defense against the unknown. This present episode of market volatility is not unique. Long-term investors know that bouts of volatility are a constant in the market. Even if the current scare fades, another will eventually take its place — and a recession at some point is inevitable. For this reason, we encourage investors to take a long-term view when making investment decisions and to consider whether their fixed income funds are positioned to serve their important role in maintaining a well-balanced portfolio.",Market Volatility
Weight loss drugs could reshape industries beyond health care,2023-11-22T09:52:00,"From deep-fried turkey to pumpkin pie, the holidays are a time to indulge. But a new category of weight loss drugs is designed to curb appetites and thereby prevent a multitude of health problems associated with obesity.At the same time, these drugs — sold under the brand names Ozempic, Wegovy, Zepbound and others — are raising questions for the food industry and companies that rely on cravings to sell their products.“Executives in nearly every industry are being asked about the impacts of these weight loss drugs on their businesses,” says portfolio manager Michael Beckwith. While concerns are valid, “some of these conclusions are more fanciful than logical.”Nevertheless, with estimated potential annual sales of US$100 billion, this is a category of drugs that must be considered when making investment decisions, says equity portfolio manager Greg Wendt. “I’m keeping an open mind — there are more questions than answers right now, but could this be an innovation as significant as the creation of the mobile phone? Possibly.”Obesity is a growing problemSources: Capital Group, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), World Health Organization (WHO), World Obesity Federation. 1975–2015 data is from WHO. 2020 U.S. data from CDC. Projections from the World Obesity Federation as of March 2023.Big Food vs. Big PharmaThe media frenzy around weight loss drugs reached a fever pitch in the U.S. when Walmart’s U.S. chief executive officer said that people on glucagon-like peptide-1 (GLP-1) weight loss drugs are buying less food compared to the general population. From there, reports surfaced that airline companies could save millions on fuel if more people lost weight. Some people have posited that GLP-1 could dampen addictive behaviours such as drug and alcohol use.“The challenge is that it’s very hard to disprove a negative, and there’s a lot of speculation right now,” Beckwith says. Talks of GLP-1 upending the status quo reveal just how little we know about these drugs.People who use GLP-1 drugs lose weight in part because they eat less. These drugs work in two ways, according to biotech and pharma analyst Laura Nelson Carney. First, in the pancreas, they stimulate the release of insulin, block the unhelpful release of glucagon after meals and slow gastric emptying, which together reduce food intake.Second, and less well understood, the drugs also act centrally in several regions of the brain where GLP-1 receptors are involved in signaling for stress response, anti-inflammation, feeding behaviour and reward/reinforcement. This encompasses food intake, feelings of satiety, and the sense of pleasure we get from food and maybe other things.“This might explain why some people on these medications report they’ve become less interested in alcohol, cigarettes and other non-food vices,” explains Nelson Carney. However, while these purported benefits are widely discussed in social media and among some academic researchers, they have not been demonstrated in large randomized clinical trials.GLP-1 users are eating less overallSources: Capital Group, Barclays, Numerator. Data compares consumption volumes for the 12-week period ending September 24, 2023, against the same period in the previous year between a sample of roughly 300 GLP-1 users and roughly 140,000 non-GLP-1 users. GLP-1 refers to a specific class of medications called glucagon-like peptide-1 agonists, which are currently used in the treatment of Type 2 diabetes and obesity.“Big Food” is already cooking up new product ideas. Nestlé and PepsiCo executives both played down risks tied to GLP-1, with the former saying that new food products are being developed to address the “risk of malnutrition and the loss of lean muscle mass” while on these weight loss drugs.“As more people take GLP-1, there could be a decline in overall calories in the general population, but that would require an extremely high number of people on these drugs,” Wendt says. “We just aren’t there yet.”In the meantime, investors will be assessing how businesses such as restaurants and gaming adjust to changing consumer tastes. “There will be winners, and usually it’s the companies that are flexible and scalable that can meet the challenge.”Industry side effectsEasier to imagine are theside effects weight loss drugs could present for the health care sector. “The drugs will likely change disease progression for diabetes and obesity and other associated co-morbidities in heart, liver and kidney disease,” says health care analyst Henry Wu.There are decades-long studies that show people who have undergone weight loss surgeries usually experienced an improvement in their blood pressure, cholesterol levels and other conditions associated with obesity. “It’s a good indicator of what we could expect from GLP-1s in a broader patient population, particularly as the next generation includes small molecule pill forms,” Wu says. GLP-1s are also being studied for liver and kidney diseases.This doesn’t mean the long list of obesity-associated diseases will disappear. “The devil is in the details: Who will pay for it, how long do they stay on the drug and what’s the compliance rate?” Beckwith asks. “That’s important because these drugs require a long-term commitment to produce beneficial health care outcomes.”Nelson Carney expects that many people will cycle on and off these drugs rather than remain on them continuously over many years. Moreover, the field may evolve to include stronger drugs for the initial induction period to maximize weight loss, followed by a maintenance phase of weaker or less frequent drugs.A new era of weight loss drugs may have far-reaching benefitsSources: Capital Group, Alzheimer's Disease International, American Heart Association, International Diabetes Federation, National Institutes of Health. Figures represent latest estimates available, as of November 16, 2023. Peripheral artery disease figure from NIH.On the regulatory front, Wendt points to the tantalizing possibility that GLP-1 drugs could reduce annual health care spending by the U.S. government. Over the last few years, Medicare spending has been well below projections, with some research noting that older Americans have had fewer heart attacks and strokes. “People are trying to figure out if these weight loss drugs are also going to have an impact,” Wendt explains.The ripple effect has already been felt across health care stocks, particularly medtech, with the Dow Jones U.S. Select Medical Equipment Index down 6.4% year-to-date as of November 20. “I think there are some mispriced stocks based on misunderstandings of these drugs. For example, companies that treat Type 1 diabetes appear undervalued,” Wendt adds.Type 1 diabetes is an autoimmune disease that prevents the pancreas from making insulin — these patients are generally not prescribed GLP-1. Roughly 20 million people in the U.S. are taking GLP-1 drugs, the bulk for Type 2 diabetes and only about 1 million for obesity. The first GLP-1 drug, exenatide for diabetes, was approved in the U.S. in 2005. For obesity, Novo Nordisk’s Wegovy was approved in June 2021, and Eli Lilly’s Zepbound in November 2023.From GLP-1 to GPT: A golden era of disruptionAmara’s Law goes something like this: People tend to overestimate the impact of technology in the short run and underestimate the long-term consequences. “Last yearit was all about artificial intelligenceandhow large language models will change the world. Now, we are factoring in both the short- and long-term effects of GLP-1,” Beckwith says.There will be more to come, and we likely haven’t scratched the surface of where disruptors such as AI or GLP-1 will take us, Wendt believes. “These are very important breakthroughs that could scramble a lot of current expectations, but it will take some time to sort out the winners and losers.”",Health Care
Electric vehicles in the fast lane: Who wins this race?,2023-11-14T12:49:00,"Walking the showroom floor of Germany's international auto show used to be a time to admire the latest and greatest gas-powered Mercedes-Benz, Volkswagen or even a Bentley. Not so much this year. One can sense the electric vehicle future coming. Two questions are at the forefront of people's minds: Will European consumers be interested in buying Chinese electric vehicles (EVs), and will China’s automakers slash prices to grab market share?China has surpassed Japan as the top global automobile exporter so far this year, a feat that was unimaginable a decade ago. Several of China's leading EV makers are starting to charge into Europe's market, marking an early litmus test of demand in developed markets for Chinese EVs.It's already having ripple effects in Europe, where regulators and politicians are grappling with how best to protect their traditionally strong auto industry. It's too early to know how the situation plays out, but it seems clear it will change the operating dynamic for Europe's automakers and how investors value their businesses moving forward.Based on conversations with industry officials and company executives during our recent trip to Munich, here are several implications we are watching closely.China has the technology to compete globallyIt's increasingly apparent that China has moved into pole position to dominate EV production and battery technology.  The country made a strong push into EV development around 2009 and now accounts for about 60% of global EV production. China's early-mover advantage has been buoyed by strong government financial support — so much so that some of our auto analysts estimate European car makers are three years behind China and Tesla in EV product lineups.China's dominancein this industry is also a reminder of how the country has moved up the technology curve and can build massive scale when government and entrepreneurs join forces to focus on an industry. Cheaper labour costs, advancements in software development and China's abundance of key minerals used in EV batteries are giving its automakers a strategic edge. For instance, Chinese manufacturers have more capability to build integrated vehicle platforms in-house, rather than rely on foreign vendors.Chinese EV Brands rank among the top inthe world by salesSource:Bloomberg. Data as of June 30, 2023.It's also becoming clear that European manufacturers are losing out in China, at least for now. Chinese brands such as BYD, Li Auto and XPeng have gained in popularity, not just among domestic consumers but in several European and Asian markets.In the past couple of years, Chinese companies have excelled in model design and infotainment software that cater to their domestic customers. The cars are loaded with technology, with 80% of them equipped with LiDAR (Light Detection and Ranging), which measures the distance between points of reference. In Europe, only the premium vehicles are expected to be fitted with LiDAR. Infotainment systems, which are essentially the car’s computer dashboard, are also more advanced. Some car interiors resemble an IMAX on wheels.European regulators will have to thread the needle geopoliticallyEurope is pushing back in an attempt to protect its auto industry, which is a major contributor to overall economic growth and jobs. The European Commission in September launched an investigation into the imports of electric vehicles from China and whether Chinese automakers are benefitting from government subsidies.In our view, the European Union (EU) is waking up to the challenge posed by its dependence on China. In a world of rising geopolitical risk, the EU likely wants to avoid a situation akin to its over-reliance on Russian energy when Russia invaded Ukraine. We also believe the EU is scarred from its retreat on solar panels over a decade ago, a move that gave the lion's share of the global market to Chinese manufacturers.The commission will have to carefully weigh the interests of its key member states, namely France and Germany, the two countries with the most vested interests.So far, the French government has taken a tougher stance because Chinese EVs could affect the low to mid-priced market for cars sold in Europe, the primary market for French automakers. At the same time, France's automakers have never been that successful in China, so they have the least to lose. It's a different matter for Germany, whose automakers have a substantial presence in China but have been gradually losing market share in recent years.German automakers have lagged China's BYDSources:MSCI, RIMES. Data as of November 7, 2023 from November 7, 2022. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.Meanwhile, Hungary has been the most China-friendly among EU members. Chinese companies such as CATL, BYD, and Nio have been using Hungary as a launch pad into the EU. Germany itself has welcomed battery production investment from Gotion, a Chinese battery partner of Volkswagen.As a result, we think a likely direction the European Commission could take is to steer clear of any immediate, large tariff increases on Chinese EVs and focus on greater localization of EV supply chains. Given that there are substantial trade linkages between Europe and China that go beyond autos, the commission would probably prefer to avoid any retaliatory measures from China's government. Currently, Chinese EV imports face a 10% EU import tariff, while European-built imports into China face tariffs of 15% to 25%, depending on the model.Another potential outcome could resemble Japan’s voluntary export restraints in the early 1980s, in which an agreement was reached that allowed the U.S. to catch up in terms of developing new vehicles. During this time, a U.S. recession impacted demand while Japan improved production efficiencies. This also resulted in layoffs for U.S. autoworkers and became a political issue as the U.S. sought to cool Japan’s auto dominance.Then there's the EU commitment to end production of all internal combustion engine cars by 2030. Although there has been little debate about pushing the deadline, we are not ruling out that possibility given the dependence on EVs the deadline would create. It will depend on the outcome of the commission's anti-subsidy case.European automakers must shift gears to catch upEurope's major car makers are arguably facing the most challenging and complicated business environment in their history. They are at a significant cost disadvantage and substantial investment will be needed to catch up with China’s EV makers and Tesla, the U.S. marquee manufacturer of luxury EVs.Current valuations for Europe's larger auto manufacturers are not pricing in a bright future.  Many are trading at less than four times expected earnings for the next 12 months, according to consensus estimates collected by FactSet as of November 8, 2023.Automakers have taken notice and are not sitting idle. Volkswagen plans to invest upwards of €180 billion over the next five years to develop its EV strategy. Mercedes-Benz is budgeting more than €40 billion for electric vehicles through 2030. And BMW and Stellantis have also unveiled significant investments.We believe Germany's premium manufacturers BMW, Mercedes-Benz and Porsche look better positioned for success in EVs. Mercedes, for instance, has previewed an attractive next-generation EV lineup set to roll off assembly lines over the next two to three years.Where companies recognize they cannot compete, they may well join forces, as they have in the past. The most likely partnerships will be between European and Chinese firms. Recently, China-based EV maker XPeng inked a deal with Volkswagen to leverage technology and supply chains. Stellantis is investing €1.5 billion to buy 20% of China-based EV manufacturer Leapmotor.Smaller manufacturers may be constrained by limited budgets and may turn to joint ventures. French maker Renault could prove to be an exception. It has carved out a new EV unit and is having early success with its Megane E-Tech model. It plans to make its EVs in northern France and forecasts automation can knock up to 40% off production costs. Like other manufacturers, Renault has shifted some production of traditional gas-powered cars to other international regions, such as India, to reduce its overall cost structure.It's too early to pick winners and losersThe global push to reduce dependence on traditional combustion engines, the surge of innovation in EV battery technology and software, as well as achieving competitive labour costs, are making the auto industry a challenging place to invest.Near-term demand concerns along with economic uncertainty have prompted some automakers to dampen their bullish EV outlooks. U.S.-based Ford Motor said in its recent third-quarter earnings it was withdrawing a target to build 400,000 EVs by mid-2024. Tesla expressed concerns about high interest rates and the affordability of EVs.Despite the initial headway China has made, many of its domestic auto manufacturers are losing money. The rush to drive down costs and prices may force lesser-capitalized EV makers out of business, and we could see a wave of consolidation.Until then, we believe it would be a mistake to write off European automakers. Low valuations and technology advancements could provide attractive entry points for investors. They have a long and glorious legacy to build upon. They've been here before, staving off competition from Japanese car makers.European consumers are discerning and historically chose to stay with European manufacturers even at slightly higher price points.  But the global dominance of European brands, especially at the luxury end, may not last as EVs gradually replace traditional combustion engine or hybrid technology cars and other automobiles.",Automotive
Emerging markets: Positive signs even as China slows,2023-10-18T09:27:00,"The post COVID-19 era has seen a reset in financial markets on many levels – interest rates, geopolitics and growth paradigms. It's also led to a redrawing of the landscape for emerging markets (EM).We believe the next phase of growth for EM will be different than the past 20 years. China's economy has matured and is going through a difficult patch of reforms. Geopolitical tensions and the world's energy transition are driving foreign investment into a broader mix of developing countries for manufacturing and natural resource needs. And government-led reforms are changing the trajectory of some developing countries, such as India and Indonesia.Many asset managers, including us, have increased their capital market assumptions for both EM equities and debt. We believe the outlook for EM is constructive over the medium-term and will expand to markets that have not been front-and-centre for investors.Here we discuss the macro variables as well as some of the trends and opportunities we are seeing across markets and industries.Returns among large EMs have diverged post-COVIDSources: MSCI, RIMES. Returns reflect MSCI India Index, MSCI Mexico Index, and MSCI China Index. Five-year time period shown to reflect returns pre and post-COVID. Data as of September 30, 2023.Macro headwinds could become tailwinds1. Inflation and interest rates are on a downward trendCentral banks in many developing countries, notably in Latin America, raised rates ahead of the U.S. Federal Reserve to blunt the impact of inflation. Most EMs lacked the ability to undertake quantitative easing over the last decade, which buffeted growth rates in developed markets. As inflation slows across some EMs, central banks in these markets are likely to pivot toward rate cuts in the coming months and quarters. Many have already started the process, including Brazil, Chile, Hungary and China.A decline in rates and inflationary pressures should provide a boost to economies and in turn to cyclical areas of the market. Monetary authorities will have to balance pressure on their currencies from declining interest rates against the boost to domestic economies. On balance, we believe lower inflationary pressures and declining rates should be positive for EM economies and stock markets.Countries across Latin America have been more aggressive in tackling inflationSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services, Ltd. Core inflation is represented by the year-over-year change in consumer price index (CPI) excluding food and energy across countries. Inflation rate as of August 2023. Central bank policy rates as of October 5, 2023. Real interest rates reflect the true cost of funds to a borrower. Nominal interest rates equal the real interest rate plus the rate of inflation.2.Economies are fundamentally strongerThe economic profile of many EM countries is much better than it was a decade ago. Government balance sheets are stronger. In 2021, the current account surpluses of developing economies totaled US$480 billion, more than triple the amount recorded for 2019. And during COVID, unlike the case in many developed markets, policymakers in developing countries did not dole out large handouts to individuals, which helped their fiscal position.Government reforms have improved the ease of doing business in countries like India.India's government has ushered in pro-business reformsand a digital identification system that have accelerated growth by facilitating the expansion of credit and bringing large swaths of the economy into the formal sector. Production-linked incentive programs designed to elevate India's domestic manufacturing base are also gaining traction.Indonesia has built more airports, roads and seaports, opened more industries to foreign investment and sought to cut red tape by making changes to labour and tax laws.EMs then vs. nowSources: MSCI, RIMES, World Bank, World Development Indicators. Internet users for India as of 2021. Equity market value represents the MSCI index for each country. Values in USD.3.A weakening U.S. dollar should be supportive over the medium-termThe U.S. dollar is overvalued against most major and EM currencies on several metrics, according to our currency analyst. In the near-term, the dollar may maintain strength against several major currencies including the euro, the yen and the British pound, largely driven by interest rate differentials. In the medium-term, our analyst and global bond portfolio managers expect the dollar to weaken, or at a minimum, move within a range of current levels.In the emerging markets, central bank policy rates are higher than the U.S. in many countries. Even as a few central banks have started to cut interest rates as inflation starts to move lower, nominal rates still remain higher. Many EM countries also have current account surpluses while the U.S. and other major developed economies are running deficits. This should bode well for EM currencies in the medium-term. We have started to see some EM currencies make advances against the dollar in the past 12 months, notably the Mexican peso and Brazilian real. This should be supportive of EM returns, purely from the currency translation effect in portfolios. But we do not expect it to be the major driver of our investment decisions.Emerging markets have historically benefited from a weakening dollarSources: Capital Group, J.P. Morgan, MSCI, Refinitiv Datastream, RIMES. Relative returns data represent cumulative rolling monthly three-year total returns of the MSCI Emerging Markets Index vs. the MSCI World Index in U.S. dollars, with positive values reflecting periods of outperformance by the MSCI Emerging Markets Index relative to the MSCI World Index, and negative values reflecting periods of outperformance by the MSCI World Index relative to the MSCI Emerging Markets index. U.S. dollar is represented by the J.P. Morgan Real Broad Effective Exchange Rate Index. As of August 31, 2023.China is the elephant in the roomChina's rise as a major manufacturing powerhouse and its property boom drove global commodities demand and powered EM from 2000 to 2010. China became the dominant constituent in the MSCI Emerging Markets (EM) Index, making up 43% of the index's weight at its peak. That figure has declined to 29% as an economic slowdown and government regulation of several areas of the economy took its toll on the stock market.Going forward, China has matured and its US$18 trillion economy is likely to grow at a slower rate. The government has taken a piecemeal approach to fiscal stimulus and will have to address how to reform and resurrect a highly indebted property sector. More importantly, having built out world-class infrastructure that has set up the economy for the modern age, the next phase of China’s economy will have to be powered both by the consumer and by moving further up the value chain in manufacturing and technology. In areas such as robotics and electric vehicle battery technology, China is already showing it prowess as a high-end manufacturer.However, consumer confidence has been battered by strict COVID lockdowns and the woes of the property sector and will need both time and government efforts to be restored.  Nevertheless, we remain optimistic that this will happen over time. There are many areas of China’s economy where domestic consumption will be the key driver of growth. These include pharmaceutical treatments, autos, video gaming, e-commerce, and financial products. Companies in these areas range from small to large and a few have emerged as multi-nationals.Auto and battery manufacturer BYD and carmaker Geely are good examples. Both began as domestic manufacturers. By focusing on newer technologies of battery development and efficient manufacturing of electric vehicles, they have joined the ranks of the largest auto manufacturers worldwide. China is on course to surpass Japan to become the world’s largest exporter of automobiles, a feat that was unimaginable a decade ago and a reminder of how quickly the country can gain market share in an industry.China’s emergence as a leader in electric vehicles challenges the dominance of German carmakers that have enjoyed a large market share in China and other EMs. This might contribute to ongoing geopolitical tensions and could result in tariffs and other restrictive measures.Greater competition, at times marked by geopolitical tension and negotiation, is expected to characterize many industries over the next decade, be it electric vehicles (EVs), industrial automation tools or semiconductors. But with talented entrepreneurs, China and its companies are likely to be in the mix by either emerging as global leaders or dominating their own domestic market or as providers of components along the supply chain.China's weight in the EM benchmark peaked in late 2020Sources: MSCI, RIMES. Postponement of Ant IPO contributed to selloff in Chinese equities. Data reflects January 31, 2002 to September 30, 2023. Values in USD.Is China investable?Often, we get the question: Is China investable?  Our answer is not a binary yes or no. The reality is that China is an integral part of the global economy, especially given the large volume of trade and cross-border investment between Europe, Asia and the emerging markets. Do these regions want to reduce dependence on China as the growth engine of many industries? Yes. Can Europe, the U.S., Japan, India or other emerging markets completely disentangle from China’s economy? No.Over the last few years, investors have swung from wanting to maximize their China exposure to having very few investments. The sharp selloff in Chinese equities since 2021 has weighed on the EM benchmark, leaving investors vulnerable to volatility, especially those who had exposure to China through a passive index vehicle, which typically seeks to track the weight of a particular benchmark.As such, it is incumbent for asset managers and other investors to investigate firsthand and calibrate which areas, industries and companies are best positioned to benefit from these secular shifts and trends. We think this represents a good opportunity for active managers.Geopolitical tensions can benefit emerging marketsThe reconstruction of supply chainsin many industries may benefit the developing world and help drive new sources of growth for a broader set of countries.For instance, rather than aligning with one economic superpower, countries like Indonesia, India, and Mexico are tapping into funding and investment from both leading Western countries and China. Furthermore, in seeking to diversify their supply chains, multinationals are also setting up manufacturing facilities across different geographies. Chinese companies are also diversifying abroad, some of them setting up final assembly for export to the U.S. in countries like Mexico.A rise in foreign direct investments (FDI) can have positive effects on local economies. When a multinational builds a manufacturing plant, it often draws in investment from other companies in the supplier ecosystem who also establish a physical presence in that particular region of the world. And FDI investments have tended to be sticky compared to portfolio flows. In addition to being a longer term capital investment, FDI flows typically have a multiplier effect on economies, generating employment which in turn stimulates consumption.Supply chain shifts broaden the investment landscapeThe diversification of global supply chains should benefit several different markets.Indonesiais making a concerted push to be a major nickel processor and an integral part of the supply chain for electric vehicle batteries, leveraging its position as the world's leading supplier of nickel, an essential mineral for EV batteries. In 2020, the country's president banned exports of unprocessed nickel ore as part of a broader plan for the country to transition from being an exporter of raw materials to a value-added metals processor.Relative to its boom-bust history driven by commodity cycles, success here could be transformational for the economy. Capturing a greater share of the entire supply chain, from smelting nickel to battery and car production, could change the country's economic profile.Indonesia has lured foreign companies to invest. China's state-owned enterprises have spent billions of dollars to help finance and build nickel refinery plants in the country. Meanwhile, multinationals from South Korean auto company Hyundai, German chemical maker BASF and U.S. automaker Ford have all inked agreements to be involved in nickel processing.Mexicorecently replaced China as the largest trading partner of the U.S. With a strong foundation in automobile and small-electronics manufacturing, investment today is broadening to medical devices, more complex electronics, furniture and general industrial goods.Foreign direct investment has been rising. Some of the largest investments have come from automakers Tesla and BMW and electronic component makers Bosch and Continental. Another large investor is Japan-based Daikin, which is expanding its manufacturing footprint for energy-efficient air conditioners.On our recent trips to Mexico, the scale of new manufacturing and distribution facilities under construction reminded us of China in the early 2000s. There's also been an influx of Chinese manufacturers into the northern Mexico states, which are being used for final assembly for electronics products shipped into the U.S. Chinese companies have accounted for roughly 40% of leasing activity for manufacturing facilities in the past two years, local real estate sources have told us. Altogether, China's direct investment in Mexico for computer equipment manufacturing totaled US$282 million in 2021-2022.Asia is well positioned for the rewiring of global supply chainsSource: AmCham Shanghai 2023 China Business Report, published 9/19/23. Based on a survey of 325 foreign companies doing business in China. Of those companies, 40% said they were redirecting investments from China to other locations, including Southeast Asia, Mexico, India and the United States, among others. Survey respondents could provide multiple responses, so total does not add up to 100%.Indiahas been expanding its manufacturing capacity for mobile phones, home appliances, computers and telecommunications equipment. The government has been aggressive in courting Japanese, Taiwanese and U.S. companies to invest in new capacity, including Apple, Foxconn, Daikin and Mitsubishi Electric.The playbook for the Indian government is twofold: ramp up capacity to serve the domestic population and over time become a larger player in export markets. It also wants to develop a supply chain ecosystem, as a wide array of product components are imported.India, like China early in its development, has been investing in the building of ports, roads, housing, and industrial warehouses. This is preceding the manufacturing transition and could be additive to the economy and help sustain economic growth.The energy transitioncould be another growth tailwind. Since the last mining super cycle ended in 2011 with overleveraged balance sheets and excess capacity, mining companies have become more financially disciplined, focusing on value over volume. They also spent more cash flow on distributions to shareholders over increasing capacity. Now, with the global push to build energy-efficient vehicles, power grids and buildings, there is growing demand to secure supplies of copper, nickel, iron ore and lithium. We anticipate this will drive major investments into new mining projects in parts of Africa, South America and Asia.A dividend culture prevails in many marketsA culture of dividends has prevailed in many emerging markets, as historically many companies were part family-owned, and depended on the payouts. And while capital markets have expanded and family ownership has declined, the culture of dividends has persisted. Corporate managements have shown an inclination to support dividend payments through different economic and market cycles and worked it into their capital allocation and planning.The number of companies in the MSCI EM Index that offered a dividend yield higher than 3% totaled 468 as of September 30, compared to 349 for international markets (MSCI EAFE) and 147 in the U.S. (S&P 500).As would be expected, dividend payouts tend to be higher in traditional industries such as telecoms, banks and industrials and less so in the newer technology companies. This allows us to build rounded portfolios of pro-growth cyclical companies and dividend-oriented corporations.EM has evolved and so have the opportunitiesWe've also been digging deeper into developing countries that are not the traditional index heavyweights of China, India and Brazil. Our EM-related funds have made incremental investments in Mexico, Indonesia, South Africa and Saudi Arabia over the past year. And perhaps over time, these countries may be larger in our funds than they have been historically.22 years ago, the phrase ""BRICs"" was coined to describe the potential for the emerging markets of Brazil, Russia, India and China. Not all have lived up to those heady expectations, and EM equities have lagged developed markets for the past decade.We do think durable trends — reshoring of supply chains, powerful shifts in demographics, infrastructure growth, the energy transition, the emergence of sticky and large domestic brands – could add more depth to EM equity markets.Furthermore, government balance sheets are stronger, inflation is coming under control and a decade-long bull market for the U.S. dollar may be abating. On top of that, valuations for nearly all sectors in the MSCI EM Index are near 10-year lows, making for an attractive asset class over the medium- to long-term.",Emerging Markets
How I survived 23 market shocks in 35 years of investing,2023-09-27T01:16:00,"This past winter I celebrated my 35th anniversary in the fund management business, and that milestone prompted me to start jotting down lessons I’ve learned along the way. I thought it might also be useful to share some perspective on how I’ve come to accept market crises as both inevitable and frequent, and how I’ve learned to manage through them.I stumbled into this industry in 1987 because the China‐focused consulting boutique I worked for was going bust and my wife was pregnant with our first child. I talked to a headhunter who asked if I had considered equity research. Given my somewhat unconventional background, she said the only fund management firm in New York that might consider hiring me was Sanford Bernstein. It didn’t hurt that like Bernstein’s then-president, Lew Sanders, I had once driven a taxicab. Amazingly enough, it worked.Market disturbances are a fact of lifeSources: MSCI, RIMES. As of August 31, 2023. Data is indexed to 100 on January 1, 1987, based on the MSCI World Index from January 1, 1987, through December 31, 1987, the MSCI ACWI with gross returns from January 1, 1988, through December 31, 2000, and the MSCI ACWI with net returns thereafter. Shown on a logarithmic scale. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.A frequent acquaintance with market crisesKnowing almost nothing about company analysis or portfolio management, I became a generalist equity analyst some three weeks before the October 1987 market crash.So a career begun in crisis has been marked by it ever since. Over my 35 years as an investor, I have lived through 23 market shocks, including the 1987 crash, the bursting of the technology bubble, the global financial crisis, COVID-19, the Ukraine war and most recently the rise of global inflation.I mention these events only to highlight the fact that market disruptions are inevitable. It’s just a matter of time before the next. My list suggests it happens every 16 months or so.An early introduction to dividendsWhen I began as an analyst, Bernstein’s investment process was driven by their proprietary dividend discount model. Early on I was imbued with the idea that dividends are important, and from a theoretical standpoint, companies are worth the current value of all the future dividends they'll pay.My big takeaway was this: Over the long term, share prices are more volatile than earnings. This is because markets are driven by emotion perhaps as much as by the cool quantification of the value of firms. That has guided my investment philosophy ever since: I watch for the extremes of sentiment change and attempt to benefit from them.But just selling the beloved firms and buying the mistrusted isn’t in and of itself a recipe for success. Couple the contrarian philosophy with an informed judgment about future profits, however, and there is power to the approach. That’s why I listen carefully to what our analysts at Capital think about where they see company returns headed.A global citizen in search of a new homeBefore I began as an investment analyst I worked on China business development as well as the restructuring of Venezuela’s public sector debt, having previously studied at both the undergrad and graduate levels in Europe and China. I considered myself a citizen of the world and wanted to globalize my investment work.When I joined Capital Group in late 1989, I was thrilled to pack up my young family and head to London. Even 30 years ago, I found U.K. property prices ridiculously high, so we instead lived on a boat in the Thames River. A glorious adventure, but I won’t go into detail here.Steve Watson and his young family aboard their London home in the early 1990s.Early successes covering U.K. utilitiesInitially I covered European utilities, starting with the recently privatized U.K. water firms. The privatization process had been a political minefield, and opposition was feverish. Selling the industry had been a must for the government, however, as the system was collapsing. Huge capital expenditure was required to get things in shape. Prices would need to rise, and cash flows would need to grow. The resulting dividend streams were going to be attractive, but all the political drama hindered valuations. Just my thing!Fortunately for me, the Capital Income Builder equity-income investment strategy had been launched in the U.S. two years before I joined Capital (Capital Group Capital Income Builder™(Canada) would become available to Canadian investors in 2018), and the fund was open to investment ideas offering a combination of strong current yield and rising dividends. In addition, Jon Lovelace, son of Capital’s founder and the driving force behind the creation of the fund, regularly visited London. JL, as we called him, was receptive to my U.K. utility ideas. I was lucky enough to spend a fair amount of time with him, visiting companies and sharing ideas about investing.Bumps along the roadThe water and electricity utilities I recommended initially faced tough sledding. As the U.K. general election of 1992 approached, the Labour Party was making noises about renationalization. Utility shares went into freefall. I retreated into a state of fear about how it would end. Fortunately, JL happened to be visiting London at the time and we sat down for a discussion about possible outcomes. I suggested that renationalization would be too expensive for any future government, and that prices had to rise to facilitate the capital expenditure plans in place. JL concluded, “Well, I think we should be buying then.” And buy we did. And, as luck had it, Labour lost in a surprise upset, the sector soared, and I learned a lesson about not caving in to fear when things are against you.In the years since, I have had the privilege to serve as a portfolio manager for Capital Income Builder as well as other growth-and-income and growth strategies.An encounter with disasterThe biggest failure of my analyst career was Eurotunnel. In 1993, five years after its IPO, the company was a mess. The under‐the‐English‐Channel rail project was late and over budget. Management was in disarray while the largely French retail investor base was in revolt. Clearly there was fodder here for the contrarian.Construction delays, cost overruns, new safety regulations, the French government’s refusal to halt subsidies to their Channel ferries and disappointing traffic derailed the project. From the recommendation price of GBP 4.00, the share rose to about GBP 5.60 and then began a sad slide toward zero. By late 1995 we had seen the writing on the wall and sold with a loss of around 80%.A fresh perspective from Hong KongIn 1999 I was asked to move to Hong Kong to help build Capital’s presence there; the Watsons arrived in early 2000. Severe acute respiratory syndrome (SARS) followed three years later. With many of the hallmarks now familiar to us from the COVID-19 pandemic, SARS hit Asian economies and markets hard. It was in that tough environment that I took on my new role asGreater China property analyst.Steve Watson and his wife, Barbara, visiting the Great Wall of China in 1981.Contrarian that I am, the collapse of Hong Kong property prices gave me useful opportunities once prices began to recover.In the 23 years I’ve lived in Hong Kong and followed China closely, I’ve witnessed periods of tremendous growth along with challenges including regulatory clampdowns on entire industries and restrictive zero-COVID policies. Today, China is a tough market. It's not done well for several years. Interestingly though, it's done a bit better than emerging markets as a whole, but I believe it’s overlooked because people are so focused on the country’s disappointing returns.There's a great debate raging globally, and we have an interesting debate within Capital along the same lines. Will China return to growth? I think it will. And I think that what may be the world's most disliked market can offer some pretty good returns. That's probably my most contrarian view today. I have a greater concentration of China and China-related investments in the portfolios I manage than most of my colleagues.A final word on surviving crisisMarket shocks and crises are simply part of the investing landscape. They are painful, but eventually we recover. And it's easy to say at moments of crisis that I'm going to wait for clarity before I invest. I want to see the catalysts for a turnaround.I've concluded that it's just not worth it to try and time things. We’re always looking for value. We're always weighing. We're always judging. But my own attempts to be clever about building cash and going more defensive haven't paid off very well.What has worked for me as a portfolio manager is the collaboration with our analysts — who know the companies we can invest in better than I ever will — to get a sense of intrinsic value. And then I can do my own thing trying to decide where the market is wrong, over or underestimating fundamental values, and then invest accordingly, while doing my best to remain patient and focus on long-term results.So that's what I do. And it enables me to look beyond crises because the crises seem like such a constant. So yes, this too shall pass. And I'll be relatively fully invested, most of the time.",Global Equities
Global investing: Many paths to capital appreciation,2023-09-21T09:14:00,"For advisor use only. Not for use with investors.Mega-cap U.S. technology companies with a head start on artificial intelligence (AI) have almost single-handedly pulled the S&P 500 index higher through August 31 this year and, by extension, the MSCI ACWI. Amid such narrow market leadership, global equity investors may have been disappointed if they didn’t have exposure to the technology titans south of the border and in the same amounts as the index. But those investors can take comfort knowing there are often less visible paths to long-term capital appreciation that can be equally, if not more, rewarding. Further, taking an alternate path may provide more resilience than holding a handful of highly correlated stocks that can move up as quickly as down.“There are many different ways to deliver results,” says Jeremy Burge, portfolio manager of Capital Group Global Equity FundTM(Canada).To illustrate, information technology played an outsized role in the MSCI All Country World Index one-year results through August 31, 2023, contributing 35.9%, with industrials accounting for 13.2% and financials contributing 12.6%. In contrast, Global Equity’s results came from a more balanced set of sector contributors, highlighting the opportunities that exist off the beaten path. Industrials were, in fact, the fund’s leading sector contributor at 19.1%, followed by consumer discretionary at 16.7% and information technology at 16.7%.Different paths, different outcomesSource: Capital Group.Widening the lens, Global Equity has taken many different paths over its 20-plus history when seeking superior results with the emphasis on the long term. As shown in the chart below, one of the fund’s greatest areas of conviction since its November 1, 2002, inception is not information technology as some may expect but consumer discretionary. Think Canada’s Lululemon Athletica, Germany’s Adidas, Home Depot and Amazon in the U.S., and Sweden’s Evolution AB, a more recent contributor.Source: Capital Group.Notes: 1. Real estate included in financials before October 2016. 2. Cash and cash equivalents includes short-term investments. 3. MSCI World Index from inception to May 31, 2011, and MSCI ACWI thereafter. Data as of each year-end and as of June 30, 2023, for the Current column. Effective September 30, 2018, the telecommunication services sector was broadened and renamed to communication services. Certain stocks in the information technology and consumer discretionary sectors were reclassified as communication services companies.Although Global Equity’s paths to capital appreciation may differ from that of the index over the years, the way the fund determines its path remains unchanged.“Lighting the way is company-by-company research,” says equity investment specialist Kathrin Forrest. Global Equity’s research team combines the insights of nearly 50 analysts and multiple portfolio managers who bring diverse perspectives to each company under consideration. This leads to a highly differentiated portfolio compared to the index when it comes to individual companies and, as an outcome, sector exposures.“One key point is that it’s not just the portfolio that has multiple avenues to success, but the individual companies as well,” says Burge, referencing the forces at work that may help a company thrive in different environments.Company innovation is one such force, and it has played an important role in aiding Global Equity’s historical results over the years. Yahoo! Japan and Motorola were some of the fund’s top contributors in 2003, while Gilead Sciences was a pivotal holding in the early 2010’s. It’s worth noting that innovation can occur in any sector of the market, whether it’s health care (drug discovery), industrials (factory automation) or financials (fintech).OpportunityAll of which brings us to present day. What are the differentiated, fundamental features that are important today?“Amid today’s economic and geopolitical uncertainty, we’ve positioned the portfolio to perform in multiple scenarios, including a global recession. We do not need a bullish investment environment to deliver results,” says Burge.Individual company features in focus include strong competitive positions, resilient end markets and solid balance sheets that generate free cash flow. Solid near-term fundamentals are just part of the equation as long-term superior results remain the fund’s North Star.Structural growthA primary feature for Global Equity’s potential holdings is structural growth, and this can occur through innovation, evolving preferences, or policy or regulation gateways. Opportunities here can stretch across regions, sectors and industries.Denmark-based Novo Nordisk is one example. The company is well-capitalized, enjoys strong cash positions and offers near-term visibility into earnings, all contributing to a solid foundation. Equally important, Novo Nordisk has strong growth potential primarily stemming from its innovative product pipeline, with the most recent example being its obesity drug, Wegovy. Novo Nordisk’s weight-loss drug cleared a large-scale clinical trial in August, which also showed it reduced the risk of serious cardiovascular events among participants by 20%.In the industrials sector, there are various companies that not only have strong fundamentals but also offer structural growth opportunities. U.S.-based construction equipment maker Caterpillar has strong market share, solid customer relationships through onsite collaboration and a sticky aftermarket business. Caterpillar may also benefit from long-term opportunities stemming from the U.S. Inflation Reduction Act. One key aim of the act is to encourage investment in domestic energy production while promoting clean energy. Caterpillar is poised to benefit from the act, as the company manufactures heavy equipment required to mine metals such as cobalt, lithium, copper and nickel, materials used to support the energy transition from fossil fuels to electricity and renewables.Beyond the obviousOther opportunities may look more cyclical at first glance but may have longer term trajectories. Examples include companies in the aerospace industry (Airbus and Safran) as well as travel and leisure (Ryanair and Booking Holdings). There are also companies that are underfollowed or misunderstood, where changes to the underlying business can set up a different path to earnings over time, such as Canada’s Fairfax Financial.“We look for opportunities before the rest of the market sees them,” says Burge.An ability and willingness to return cash to shareholders in a meaningful, sustainable way can also play a key role in favourable results. Examples include some select companies within the energy sector, such as Tourmaline Oil, which has been paying steady dividends and recently announced a share buyback program.Of course, it’s worth noting that Global Equity’s portfolio managers and analysts are deliberate when it comes to companies, approaching some with caution or staying clear of others altogether. This is in part because the same conditions that can point forward for key investments can work against others. For instance, while certain companies may have strong underlying business models, they may face headwinds due to cyclical forces and a heightened focus on regulation. Along with winners there may be some losers.“Avoiding the not-so-good companies is just as important as investing in enough of the good ones,” says Burge.",Global Equities
Japan: Will reforms unlock stock valuations?,2023-09-05T02:43:00,"A significant shift is underway in Japan, and equity markets are taking notice. It may not have been obvious to U.S. dollar-based investors, but in local currency terms, Japanese equities as measured by the MSCI Japan Index have climbed 25% year to date (as of August 31, 2023).The wave of optimism has been driven by two key factors: inflation and reforms. While inflation has been challenging for many developed economies, it’s a welcome sign in Japan, which has been battling deflation for three decades. Sustained and healthy inflation could change the mindset in Japan from saving to investing.In terms of reforms, there is tremendous emphasis on improving corporate governance, and companies are focusing more on shareholder returns. In a recent move, the Tokyo Stock Exchange asked all listed companies to enact policies to improve profitability, long-term returns and valuations. About 39% of companies in the TOPIX (an index comprising Japanese stocks) trade below book value, compared to just 5% for companies in the S&P 500 Index.Book values are depressed in JapanSources: Capital Group, FactSet, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor’s, STOXX, TOPIX. The price-to-book ratio is the ratio of a company's publicly traded share price to its equity value per share. As of August 18, 2023.Many Japanese companies have also fallen behind on converting information into digital formats and are now making concerted efforts to catch up, which could boost productivity. Put together, these steps can create a virtuous circle with a potentially positive impact on corporate earnings and valuations.The economic transformation is not entirely new. It began around 10 years ago with Abenomics — then-Prime Minister Shinzo Abe’s program aimed at reinvigorating Japan’s stagnant economy through a combination of monetary policy, government spending and structural reforms. But investor optimism has fluctuated. That said, in our recent travels through Japan, where we and many Capital Group portfolio managers and analysts met with various policymakers and corporate managements across many industries, we observed that the desire for change is more palpable today than it has been in the prior two decades.Some other factors that support our positive outlook: valuations appear reasonable compared to other markets, the political situation is relatively stable, foreign investment in manufacturing is coming back and tourism has rebounded since COVID-19 restrictions were lifted. Interest rates also remain low relative to other developed markets.Against this backdrop, we have additional views on Japan and areas of the market that may present potential investment opportunities.1. Japanese companies occupy niches in key industriesFor all its economic woes, Japan has created a tremendous competitive advantage in certain industries. Japanese firms have developed unique technologies in niche markets from which they’ve been able to build durable businesses with highly defensible moats. These include areas like industrial automation equipment, sensors, inspection tools for semiconductor manufacturing, energy-efficient air conditioning systems and battery technology. Medical devices and pharmaceuticals are other areas where Japanese companies have built market share.These types of companies should have long product cycles as we see an industrial renaissance in developed economies and ongoing industrialization in emerging markets.SMC, for instance, is a leader in specialized components for automation equipment and semiconductor production. Shin-Etsu is the world’s largest maker of silicon wafers for semiconductor products, while TDK is one of the largest manufacturers of high-end batteries and specialized circuits used in electric vehicles.Japanese stocks trade at highest levels since early 1990Sources: Capital Group, MSCI, RIMES. Cumulative price returns shown from December 31, 1980, to July 31, 2023. Returns shown in Japanese yen. The cumulative return is the total change in the investment price over a set time. As of July 31, 2023. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.2. Corporate reforms are gaining tractionMany Japanese companies have excelled in cutting-edge areas of science and engineering. However, equity prices in most cases have been hurt by subpar corporate governance. A number of companies have hoarded cash, created insular corporate structures, and operated conglomerates (large and small) that have not always been efficient or profitable.Since the start of Abenomics in 2012, corporate Japan has been on a journey to improve profitability, capital allocation and corporate governance. But while progress has been painfully slow, in part due to Japan’s cautious approach to change, there is a stronger sense of urgency to address cash-heavy balance sheets and inefficient business lines.We now believe there is greater alignment between companies and the government to improve governance standards, business models and capital structures. Over the next few years, this may well result in improved shareholder returns through divestitures, higher dividend payouts and share buybacks.In our meetings with officials from the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry and the  Financial Services Agency, they highlighted how company book values were much lower than those in the U.S. and Europe, and that this needed to be fixed. They also voiced support for more acquisitions between domestic companies.Japan Inc. is cash heavySources: Capital Group, FactSet, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's (U.S.), STOXX (Europe), TOPIX (Japan). Net cash reflects the difference between the cash and short-term securities reported on a company's balance sheet and its outstanding debt. As of August 18, 2023.3. Potential for M&A and consolidation to add valueMore specifically, the government’s recent proposal addressing governance standards for mergers and acquisitions would make it more difficult for boards to reject reasonable takeover offers without justification.This would represent monumental change. We believe merger-and-acquisitions activity has the potential to unlock the biggest hidden value remaining in Japan, which is the mountain of cash doing nothing across a multitude of corporate balance sheets.At the height of their influence and power in the late 1980s, many Japanese companies decried the ruthless takeover environment in the United States. They placed more emphasis on operating large and stable businesses. Japan favoured lifetime employment, seniority-based compensation and shared salary cuts over job cuts.In sum, we don’t expect changes to happen overnight. They will likely be gradual, but getting ahead of those opportunities as investors is important.4. Transforming legacy businesses may unlock shareholder valueSome companies have been reinventing themselves by shedding noncore businesses and narrowing their business focus. In others, there is new leadership driving change or existing managements and boards that seem willing to make changes.Here are several examples:Pharmaceuticals firm Daiichi-Sankyo was once hampered by poor product development, a portfolio of undifferentiated drugs and the unsuccessful acquisition of India’s largest generic drugmaker. Daiichi shifted course several years ago, cutting many of its R&D programs to focus on building what has become a promising pipeline of novel cancer treatments. It now ranks as one of Japan’s most valuable companies by market capitalization, boasts a differentiated antibody drug conjugate (ADC) platform and a blockbuster drug used to treat breast cancer.Toppan is looking to address its cash-heavy balance sheet. Its new president has been deemphasizing the company’s commercial printing business in favour of specialty packaging. Toppan has launched a large share buyback program, shrunk the size of its board and introduced a target for return on invested capital. It also sold equity stakes in two of its businesses.Industrial conglomerate Hitachi has been shrinking its portfolio, divesting interests in its construction machinery, metals and auto parts businesses. The company aims to pay out approximately 50% of its net income in dividends and share buybacks.Broadly speaking, we think these kinds of self-help stories can help support long-term growth.Dividend growth in Japan looks encouragingSource: FactSet. Dividends reflect the aggregate amount paid by companies on a per-share basis in the respective indices. Data for 2023–2025 is based on consensus estimates as of May 31, 2023. Compound annual growth rate is the mean growth rate of an investment over a specified period of time longer than one year.5. Spending on enterprise software should grow amid digital transformationJapan is playing catch-up when it comes to moving into the digital age. The pandemic exposed this weakness when the government struggled to distribute emergency payments and as workers were challenged to work remotely.Many Japanese companies need to upgrade their legacy computer systems, which we believe foreshadows a rise in information technology investment. Given the country’s aging demographics and persistent labour shortage concerns, businesses will need to improve productivity and increase automation. OBIC is one company that has benefited from this trend; it has seen sales for its computer cloud software grow for the past several years.Meanwhile, Nomura Research Institute (NRI) is an example of how big companies are seeking to harness the productivity benefits of artificial intelligence (AI), which NRI is using to help large enterprises organize their proprietary data in a format that can train very large datasets for AI.6. Geopolitical tensions are reviving manufacturing investmentsJapan is a country with relative social stability, and as an export-driven economy, it has a proven and reliable manufacturing base. With growing risks to doing business in China, Japan has been attracting more foreign investment. Manufacturing costs are also more reasonable after decades of deflation and the weaker yen.One case worth watching is the construction of Taiwan Semiconductor’s plant in Kumamoto, where it reportedly may build a second facility as well. Japan’s government has brought in more than USS14 billion in planned investment since 2021 from companies in the U.S., Europe, South Korea and Taiwan. Among those are South Korea-based Samsung Electronics and U.S.-based Micron Technology, both leaders in the development of memory chips.We think Japan is in a position to capture some higher-end manufacturing as multinationals seek to diversify their supply chains in Asia. Countries like Vietnam and Cambodia can make items like sneakers and toys but lack the necessary expertise and infrastructure for more technologically sophisticated products. If this trend continues, it would be a sharp reversal from the past and could potentially reinflate the economy and provide a boost to regional business hubs.7. A rebound in the yen should be additive to stock returnsA weakening yen has eroded Japanese stock returns for U.S. dollar-based investors. The Japanese currency weakened from 103 yen to the dollar at the end of 2020 to the current level above 145 yen to the dollar. The Bank of Japan’s (BOJ’s) bond-buying policy of depressing yields, known as yield curve control, combined with an anemic economy, have weighed on the currency.Over the last couple of months, the BOJ has acknowledged that inflationary pressures have risen and adjusted monetary policy to allow 10-year yields to rise to 1.0%.In the view of our Japan economist Anne Vandenabeele, it’s likely that inflation will persist above the BOJ’s target of 2% over the next 12 to 18 months. The central bank could therefore be in a position to end its negative interest rate policy next year and further loosen its controversial yield curve control policy as well (although the BOJ will likely continue to buy bonds to manage the rise in yields). This chain of events is expected to lead to the yen plateauing at these levels, or even strengthening from here, although much will also depend on other central banks and U.S. rates, in particular.And a stronger yen should benefit U.S. dollar-based investors purely from the currency translation effect on portfolios.From a fundamental perspective, many of Japan’s major exporters such as the auto companies, have diversified their manufacturing bases with factories around the world. As such, the impact of a strengthening currency on corporate earnings should be much more muted than in the past.8. Loss of reform momentum and a global downturn are risksWe’ve seen similar market rallies fizzle over the past decade. The introduction of Abenomics and subsequent corporate reforms in 2014 and 2015, along with the growing presence of U.S. activist hedge funds in Japan, have led to bursts of exuberance.While positive developments are taking shape, we are taking a measured approach. Foreign investors make up a large portion of Japan’s equity market. The country’s economy is export-driven and heavily focused on industrial production. If the global economy weakens or reforms lose steam, stocks could come under pressure in a risk-off environment.Nevertheless, we are currently more positive on Japan than we have been over the past two decades. The number of portfolio managers and analysts who have visited Japanese companies continues to grow, and the discussion on where the opportunities are is robust across equity groups and portfolios.",Japan
5 investing mistakes to avoid,2023-08-16T11:14:00,"There is an old saying in the investment business: If you haven’t experienced a bankruptcy, then you’re probably not taking enough risk.Bankruptcy should never be taken lightly, of course. But investing is a business of assessing risk and seeking reward. Mistakes are inevitable.“It is very hard to consistently outsmart the market,” says equity portfolio manager Greg Wendt, who has been a professional investor for 35 years. “Even the most successful portfolio managers are right 55% of the time and wrong the other 45%. At Capital, we have a tradition of sharing our experiences with colleagues: to be supportive, empathetic and to remind them that if they keep working hard, they will get it right again.”For equity portfolio manager Lisa Thompson, mistakes are the building blocks of future successes.“You learn more from your mistakes than your successes,” says Thompson, who has 34 years of investment industry experience. “When you buy a stock and it works out well from the start, that feels great, right? But there is a chance that might be due to being in the right place at the right time. But I find that where I’ve learned a lot is when an idea didn’t work out or took very long to work out.”In that spirit, five veteran portfolio managers share their investing mistakes and the subsequent lessons they learned.1. Beware of story stocksGreg Wendt, equity portfolio managerEarlier in my career I invested in a cruise ship operator called American Classic Voyages based on a very powerful story. The company had roots in the Delta Queen Steamboat Company, which operated popular cruises up the Mississippi River. Billionaire financier Sam Zell, who saw an opportunity to disrupt the cruise industry, was the company chairman. American Classic Voyages planned to attain exclusive rights to cruise the Hawaiian Islands through a protectionist U.S. maritime law.I looked closely at the tourism dynamics for Hawaii and the cruise industry in general and recognized there would be strong demand for these trips. The company raised all the necessary capital, hired a dream team of managers, and began building the cruise liner at a Mississippi shipyard.Now at the time, a cruise ship had not been built on U.S. soil in more than 25 years, but the shipyard had extensive experience building military vessels. What could possibly go wrong?Well, it turns out that recapturing industrial skills once they are lost is not so simple. The multibillion-dollar effort to build the ship failed, and for this and other reasons the company went bankrupt. It never occurred to me that you couldn’t find the talent to build a cruise ship in the U.S. The unfinished vessel ultimately was towed to Europe where it was eventually completed. Meanwhile, the investment thesis sank like a rock.The lesson:Don’t assume a company can execute its business strategy without understanding how it will be done.2. Avoid analysis paralysisLisa Thompson, portfolio managerInvesting is a discipline that is part science and part art. To succeed, you need to be able to gather the data and do the math. But you also need to make judgment calls based on knowledge gained through experience.I am by nature a contrarian investor. As such I tend to avoid the crowd and get interested in an investment when others are selling. The great commodities super-cycle of the early 2000s driven by a rapidly growing China had more or less come to an end by 2014. After rising sharply from US$10 a ton in 2003 to around US$170 in April 2009, the price of iron ore plummeted to below US$70 a ton by December 2014.Shares of mining stocks also fell, pressured by the price drop. Against this backdrop, I began working with our analyst who covered mining stocks and grew interested in Brazilian iron ore producer Vale. Now, experienced investors in cyclical companies like Vale know it can be very difficult to call the bottom of a cycle. So during this period I was meeting regularly with the analyst to go over the numbers. Meanwhile the stock continued to drop.At Capital we have what I consider a competitive advantage in that our analysts often spend years, even decades, covering an industry. Through them we have access to a vast amount of detailed knowledge. But at some point, I remember meeting with the mining analyst and asking, “We know so much about this company now, is more information going to tip the scales?”I remember thinking that I already knew the discounted cash flows, the premiums, the fines, the global demand environment. One more data point would not help. I have to make the best decision I can with the information at hand. And these can be very hard decisions, but that is the job of a portfolio manager.The lesson:Research is critical, but sometimes more information is too much. To invest successfully you have to know when it is time to pull the trigger with the information you have.3. Trust, but verifySteve Watson, portfolio manager for Capital Group Capital Income Builder™ (Canada) and Capital Group Monthly Income Portfolio™ (Canada)At Capital we place a lot of importance on knowing managements — meeting and having regular communication with them. Understanding executives as people can help us evaluate their business strategy and whether they are the right people to execute it. But it can potentially lead to a disinclination to ask, ""I wonder if I'm being lied to?” Now the majority of executives we encounter are honest, well-intentioned people, but that doesn’t mean they’re always honest with us — or even themselves.But occasionally even savvy investors can get caught up in a fraud. A few years after I began working in Capital’s Hong Kong office, I decided to invest in Sino-Forest, a Chinese company that owned and managed forest lands with the intent of eventually selling them to other investors.Between 2003 and 2011, Sino’s shares, which were listed in Toronto, soared more than 500% based on company reports of strong profit growth. It turns out the company had fabricated numerous transactions, including some 450 in the first quarter of 2009.In 2011, the company came under investigation by the Ontario Securities Commission. Trading of the company’s stock was suspended and by 2012 Sino had filed for bankruptcy. Ultimately the Ontario securities commission found that certain executives of the company “engaged in deceitful or dishonest conduct related to Sino-Forest’s standing timber assets and revenue that they knew constituted fraud.”The lesson:Regard the financial statements and executives who manage them with a healthy dose of skepticism.4. Resist your confirmation biasJustin Toner, portfolio managerI was hired by Capital Group on September 4, 2001, to cover the aerospace and defence industries — a week before the September 11 terrorist attacks. I was assigned coverage of industries directly in the crosshairs of that catastrophe. Among the companies that I covered for more than 20 years was airplane manufacturer Boeing, in which I have invested in various amounts on and off over the years.Boeing has lived through its share of crises — not only the September 11 attacks but more recently in 2019 with crashes of its 737 Max plane due to malfunctioning flight controls and in 2020 with the COVID pandemic. I was quite surprised by how rapidly Boeing’s stock reacted to the pandemic and shutdown of the global travel industry. Looking back with the benefit of hindsight, I can say that I underappreciated how bad things were going to get.To be fair, I don’t think anyone could have envisioned how bad it was going to get. But certainly, circumstances deteriorated rapidly and right on the heels of lingering difficulties from the 737 Max. That was a very difficult period for me as an analyst. I also held the shares as a portfolio manager in some portfolios.After covering the industry for almost 20 years, you’d think that I would have seen the writing on the wall and been able to react quickly and decisively. But this job is very difficult, and just like all humans, investment managers can be victims of their own emotions and biases. We can be guilty of confirmation bias, the tendency to seek out information that confirms our pre-existing biases. That was a huge learning experience for me.The lesson:Challenge your own point of view and be prepared to act quickly when circumstances change.5. Know when to walk awayMartin Jacobs, portfolio manager for Capital Group U.S. Equity Fund™ (Canada)Successful long-term investing is incredibly difficult, although it might seem incredibly simple: consistently identify great companies whose shares can generate superior returns over time.But what I have also learned over my career is that great companies can stumble, so having a strong sell discipline and sticking to it can be just as important. This skill was highlighted in the bookThe Art of Execution: How the world’s best investors get it wrong and still make millions in the marketsby Lee Freeman-Shor.Freeman-Shor, a fund-of-funds manager, analyzed seven years of data based on real investment outcomes for 45 of the world’s top investors. One of the most interesting observations that came out of that study was the importance of weighting and conviction.What he found was that it’s not how often you are right or wrong, but how much money you make when you’re right and how much you lose when you're wrong. I can see across the portfolios I manage that these weighting and conviction decisions are so important.The book identifies five different “tribes” of professional investors based on their behaviour. One of the groups was called “assassins” because they were ruthless sellers. They were very focused on cutting their losses when a stock was down. Numerous studies in behavioural psychology have shown that investors find it about 10 times harder emotionally to realize a loss in real life than on paper. In other words, we all have an emotionally driven tendency to avoid cutting our losses and moving on.So that ability to walk away from an investment when it’s no longer working can be a very important discipline for successful investing. Long-term investors must learn to be willing to pivot when an investment thesis is broken. I have found this to be one of the hardest things to do as a portfolio manager.The lesson:Knowing when to sell a stock and move on can be as important as knowing when to buy.",Long-Term Investing
AI and the new megacycle for tech,2023-07-25T11:30:00,"Too busy to plan your next business trip? Imagine this scenario: You set a date and destination in your digital calendar and then a bot powered by artificial intelligence (AI) does the rest. It searches for the cheapest flight that complies with your employer’s work travel policies, picks your preferred aisle or window seat, pays for the ticket, and adds it to your calendar.Science fiction? This reality may not be too far in the future.Given the vast potential of AI, it’s no surprise the market has sought to sniff out early winners and losers. Many technology stocks have soared since ChatGPT captured the public’s imagination earlier this year.We believe this is the start of the next megacycle for the technology sector. But it won’t be linear, and investors will need to be nimble. Stock prices will likely go through fits and starts, with stocks getting overextended at times and pulling back when the market doubts progress.There are also outstanding questions about AI’s impact on society and how best to regulate its development. With that in mind, here are six unfolding themes we are trackingthat have potential impacts on companies and markets.1.This tech cycle has important differences from previous onesIn several respects, AI is going to be different than previous technology cycles, whether it was mainframe computing, broadband internet or cloud computing. The big incumbents possess many first-mover advantages to deploy AI at massive scale. Large tech companies already have proprietary data, massive amounts of capital to spend and some of the brightest engineering talent. Some of them also own the very expensive cloud computing infrastructure necessary for training AI models.Another advantage for the likes of Microsoft, Google and Apple is their large user bases to sell AI products and services to. While we expect some AI startups may find dramatic success over time, the starting point for incumbents is strong.Importantly, the AI cycle appears likely to move fast. Take cloud computing as a comparison. That cycle began around 2008, and more than a decade later we estimate roughly 30% of corporate workloads are in the cloud. This is in large part because replacing existing architecture is a complex and time-consuming process.AI is very different. It can simply be additive in some cases. For example, if a software vendor adds AI functionality to an existing product, it could be deployed in days or weeks — not years. Therefore, it will be key for big tech incumbents to be able to adapt quickly as the technology progresses.Leading tech companies are spending far more than the capital-intensive energy sectorSources: Capital Group, FactSet, Standard & Poor's. Companies in the ""Magnificent 7"" reflect the top contributors in the S&P 500 year to date as of June 30, 2023, and include Apple, Microsoft, Alphabet, Amazon.com, NVIDIA, Tesla and Meta. Contribution to the S&P 500's total return is based on individual stock return performance multiplied by each constituents' weight in the index at the beginning of the period. Periods reflect calendar years, and figures for 2023 are forecasted based on the mean analyst estimates for capital expenditures across each company. As of July 18, 2023. E = estimated.2.Speed and thoughtfulness of AI adoption can create differentiationWe believe that the speed of adoption of AI can create a competitive advantage for some companies. Put another way: If there are two firms that compete against each other today, and one company embraces AI holistically and early while the other doesn’t, we believe this could drive very different long-term business outcomes.For example, companies that thoughtfully implement AI by making changes in areas such as research and development, product design and logisticscould see benefits in their margin structures, product development cycles and customer satisfaction scores.High-quality management execution will also be crucial. The range of outcomes for all businesses has expanded substantially with this technology, and a premium will be placed on management teams that are forward-thinking, thoughtful and proactive. In our recent company meetings in Silicon Valley, we heard firsthand how venture capitalists are seeking to identify public companies whose leadership teams appear behind in implementing AI strategies so that they can back startups to disrupt them.The global AI market is projected to reach nearly US$2 trillion by 2030Sources: Next Move Strategy Consulting, Statista. Years 2023 through 2030 are estimated. Lighter blue boxes represent estimates. Data as of January 2023. CAGR = compound annualized growth rate. Dollar values in USD.3.While AI offers a lot of opportunity, it also poses disruptive threats that companies are navigatingHistory has shown that simply trying to bolt on new technology to an existing business model can be problematic. Consider U.S. book retailer Barnes & Noble. Although the company had a website, its core business remained focused on physical stores. This limited its ability to compete in the digital age against online-native competitors like Amazon.com. As a result, Barnes & Noble’s market value plummeted. This lesson is particularly relevant now as AI has the potential to transform industries in unforeseen ways.Online education firm Chegg is a recent case study taking place in real time. Its shares plunged 48% on May 2 after the company indicated that ChatGPT hurt its customer growth rate. In response, Chegg plans to launch a new tool with OpenAI, called CheggMate which will blend ChatGPT’s AI technology with Chegg’s educational services platform.From our perspective, companies that own an exclusive set of data could be better positioned to strengthen or defend their businesses against competitors, especially if the data is hard to replicate and can be used to train large-scale AI models.Adobe’s large stock photo library comes to mind, for example. The company may be able to use this library to train and fine-tune its algorithms. And importantly, unlike potential competitors, Adobe in our view may not run into copyright infringement problems on the images generated from those algorithms.The tech giants will likely have to play some offence and defence. AI may change consumer engagement with web search for example, which is a huge profit centre for Google. Microsoft has been piloting versions of its flagship software programs (Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Teams) with AI functionality, known as 365 Copilot. And recently, Microsoft announced its business pricing strategy for Copilot, sending its shares intraday to an all-time record high.4.The breadth of investment opportunities spans up and down the value chainThe investment cycle for AI has – and should continue to – produce early winners. But other beneficiaries across the value chain are also likely to emerge over time.Underpinning the AI application layer is a critical set of infrastructure for training and deploying the models. Since AI requires tremendous computing power, some semiconductor companies are well positioned to benefit, particularly those that design chips that are the computational engines and backbone of AI. These would include graphic processing units (GPUs) as well as custom-built chips, called ASICs (application-specific integrated circuits).NVIDIA, for instance, soared past US$1 trillion in market value after making bullish comments in May about potential revenue from demand for its processors used in AI computing. Other tech companies like Google, Amazon, Meta and Tesla have also been designing their own specific AI chips as they seek to explore supplements to Nvidia’s chips in a highly supply-constrained environment for AI processors. Demand should also grow for less discussed types of chips like networking and memory.A wide range of potential end-industry applications is also likely to emerge.In the field of radiology scans, for example, AI could be used to look at every scan globally and discover cases that may have not been previously identified in certain regions. Generative models might also be able to shorten the drug discovery process by identifying novel compounds of interest. Food production, with its many variables such as fertilizer usage, planting cycles and animal feed, is ripe for an AI-powered system that can cut costs while potentially increasing yields.While it is early days in the diffusion of this new tech platform, the possibilities are expansive.The potential value chain and investment opportunitiesSource: Capital Group.5.A nascent app ecosystem is developing around AI foundation modelsWhen the iPhone was launched in 2007, Apple’s App store had a limited number of offerings. Now it's home to millions of apps, giving users a wide assortment of tools and services that were unimaginable before the iPhone. From being able to order an Uber from your phone, send a video on Snapchat, or pay with Apple Pay, the iPhone led to the creation of a vast ecosystem that generated US$1.1 trillion in developer billings and sales in 2022.A similar moment is taking shape with ChatGPT, which now has plug-ins that can be thought of as the equivalent of an app store. This powerful new functionality on top of OpenAI’s core model enables it to gain new abilities like ordering groceries on Instacart, exploring travel bookings on Expedia or checking restaurant reservations on OpenTable.Our expectation is that we will see considerable innovation along these lines in the months and years to come. It’s still early days, but we anticipate consumer tech giants will strive to develop powerful virtual assistant tools that could book all your travel, do your expenses and maintain your medical data, among a range of other possible functionalities. Apple has an interesting starting point here given its rich data set.ChatGPT wins the race to 1 million usersSource: Statista.Data as of December 31, 2022. Kickstarter refers to the number of backers. Airbnb refers to the number of nights booked. Foursquare and Instagram refer to the number of downloads.6. Building an effective regulatory framework will be challengingThere's a push by some to limit the pace of AI. Amid several ongoing developments, several large technology companies in the U.S., including Microsoft, Amazon and Google, reached an agreement with the Biden administration on July 21 to voluntarily put more guardrails around AI development and deployment. The U.S. Federal Trade Commission has also launched a probe into OpenAI, the creator of ChatGPT. That said, it’s difficult to envision what an effective regulatory framework would look like.The main challenge is that there’s not yet agreement about which types of risks policymakers should be most focused on mitigating, let alone how to enact policy that will do so effectively. One approach that the U.S. has started to implement is regulating access to sensitive technologies via export controls. This in theory would be a way to control a key input for these AI models.Others have advocated for a pause on certain categories of large model development, but this seems exceedingly difficult to implement in practice.Even as the trajectory of regulation remains unclear, we do anticipate the U.S. will remain an innovation-friendly environment, which would further foster its leading position in global AI development.U.S. leads in venture capital investments for AISource: OECD.AI (2023), using data from Preqin. Data accessed on May 11, 2023. Dollar values in USD.",Artificial Intelligence
Will India be the breakout emerging market this decade?,2023-06-30T11:30:00,"India is known as the market that has confounded optimists and pessimists alike. Could this be its decade to shine?India‘s significance as a rising global power came to light with Prime Minister Narendra Modi’s recent visit to the United States, where he addressed Congress, met with high-profile business leaders and dined at the White House. From our recent travels around the country, we believe indications are pointing in the right direction: Corporate confidence is high, the economy is expanding at a decent clip and technological innovation is leading to new areas of growth.For a democracy of its size, the country has seen relative political stability over the past 10 years, allowing economic development to be a top priority. While political instability and market volatility may increase in advance of general elections next year, we believe that India is poised for a period of secular growth, fueled by significant expansion in direct and fixed asset investment. Here are some of the key aspects that make India appealing compared with other emerging markets.1. Reforms have set the stage for growthSince Prime Minister Narendra Modi took office in 2014, he and his team have helped usher in pro-business reforms that have accelerated growth by facilitating the expansion of credit and bringing large swaths of the economy into the formal sector.Aadhaar — a voluntary biometric identification system similar to the social insurance number in Canada — has brought more than a billion people into a national database. The Aadhaar program, along with the development of credit rating agencies, has helped boost consumer lending.A national goods and services tax (GST) implemented in 2017 has replaced an inefficient web of state taxes. As a digitalized system that can also track goods and services at each point in the supply chain, GST has brought the manufacturing and industrial sectors into the formal economy.Launched in 2016, Unified Payments Interface (UPI) created an instant real-time payment system. UPI allows non-banks as well as banks to facilitate electronic transactions and provide credit.Key reforms under ModiSources: Indian government, media reports.Together, these reforms have revolutionized credit underwriting and sped up the lending process. This should boost the economy and meaningfully expand the market for banks and non-bank financial companies.Production-linked incentive programs designed to elevate India’s domestic manufacturing base are gaining traction too. Modi, while still controversial on some social and human rights issues, has delivered in terms of governance, infrastructure and economic programs. India is projected to become the world’s third-largest economy behind the United States and China by 2027, according to the International Monetary Fund. It’s currently the fifth largest, after Japan and Germany.1Reforms have helped bolster Indian stocksSources: MSCI, RIMES. Data as of May 31, 2023.2. The infrastructure boom is realThe lack of infrastructure has been a major impediment to unlocking India‘s true growth potential. Over the past five years, the government has pumped billions into building out roads, railroads, airports and seaports. On our recent research trip to meet with companies, it was very clear that the construction of infrastructure as well as more affordable housing is finally happening. We traveled by car from Surat to Mumbai, a distance of 170 miles. Ten years ago, that trip would have taken 12 hours. We did it in six, driving on six-lane highways and stopping at several quality food establishments along the way. That was unheard of just a decade earlier.In Mumbai, the skyline is unrecognizable from 15 years ago. Dozens of buildings reach 50 or more floors, and a subway system is under construction. Residential housing is fast expanding. As an example, the town of Palava, 20 miles from Mumbai’s central business district, is a master-planned community that reminds us of what we used to see in China. In 15 years, Palava has gone from a concept to a city of 120,000 residents.3. Tailwinds for manufacturing are getting strongerThe playbook for the Indian government is twofold: ramp up capacity to serve the domestic population and over time become a larger player in export markets. Leaders also want to develop a supply chain ecosystem, as a wide array of product components are imported.Manufacturing capacity is expanding for mobile phones, home appliances, computers and telecommunications equipment. Modi’s team has been aggressive in courting Japanese, Taiwanese and U.S. companies to invest in new capacity. Apple is producing its iPhone 14 line in India, while Japanese companies Daikin and Mitsubishi Electric are teeing up investments to make air conditioners and related parts.Local firms have been investing heavily to scale up businesses and tap into the rapidly growing domestic market. These include Amber, a leading maker of air conditioners; Dixon, one of the largest electronics manufacturers; and Havells, an electrical equipment company.Overall, manufacturing is getting easier. Securing government approvals for land is less onerous, labour is affordable and industrial parks are creating dedicated power sources (consistent power availability has historically been a big challenge).We anticipate India will become a desirable location for companies looking to diversify their supply chains outside of China, a strategy commonly known as China plus one. That said, it likely has many years to go before it can challenge China as a global manufacturing powerhouse. On the flip side, the upside looks promising.India trails China in supply chain infrastructureSources: Capital Group, WorldData, World Bank, Statista, news articles. Data as of 2021.4. India‘s equity market has been growing and should evolveWithin the MSCI Emerging Markets Index, India represents 14% of the composite index, behind China at 29% and Taiwan at 16%.2We expect potential investment opportunities to increase, especially in the small-cap space given India‘s economic trajectory.The equity market is still relatively small compared with the size of the economy and its potential growth. The MSCI India Index had a market capitalization of close to US$1 trillion as of May 31, 2023. Smaller companies, or those with a market value between US$1 billion to US$10 billion, made up nearly half the index.India's equity market is expanding in the small- and mid-cap spaceSources: Capital Group, MSCI, RIMES. Data represents MSCI India Index. As of May 29, 2023. Dollar values in USD.The country‘s capital markets have seen a proliferation of initial public offerings (IPOs) in recent years. The types of companies going public — and those in the IPO pipeline — reflect its ongoing transformation. These include online platforms such as Paytm (payments), Zomato (food delivery services) and Policybazaar (insurance quote aggregator). Venture capital has been pouring into the country. India is now behind only the U.S and China in terms of the number of “unicorns” (unlisted companies valued at US$1 billion) as of December 2022.5. Investment opportunities span real estate, financials and industrialsReal estate:India, which the U.N. projected in April will overtake China as the world‘s most populous country this year, is a massively underhoused society. Housing is expected to be a key driver — and beneficiary — of the economy‘s growth. Real estate is projected to rise to nearly 15% of India‘s gross domestic product (GDP) by fiscal year 2031, up from 7% currently. With that will likely come demand for building materials, cable, refrigerators and air conditioners.The sector is undergoing a dramatic structural shift, which should boost profits. Government policies have helped reform corrupt practices and build trust in the homebuying process among consumers. A liquidity crisis several years ago also wiped out many smaller developers. Taken together, a once highly fragmented market has become more organized and consolidated.This should create opportunities for larger regional developers to take market share, especially those building homes and apartments for first-time buyers.Banks:The overall environment looks positive. Loan growth remains solid in both the retail and corporate categories, and the credit environment remains benign. We could be entering a favorable cycle for banks given the trajectory of the economy and several rounds of consolidation among weaker state-owned banks in recent years.Valuations for the largest private sector banks appear reasonable relative to history. For example, on a price-to-earnings basis, HDFC Bank is trading at 18 times earnings for the next 12 months, compared with its five-year average of 21 times. On a comparable basis, Kotak Mahindra Bank is trading at 29 times versus its five-year average of 40 times, according to FactSet (as of June 23).Markets have been concerned that net interest margins3— a key profit measure — have peaked, as monetary authorities are expected to cut benchmark interest rates. The flip side is that lower rates should spur the economy. We believe there is sufficient potential for loan growth to offset margin compression given the expansion of credit and robust economic growth.A closer look at India's digital transformationSource: Indian Council for Research on International Economic Relations, “State of India’s Digital Economy Report 2023.” Data as of February 2023.Non-bank financial companies:As mentioned, the market has consolidated following a liquidity crisis several years ago, making it much more attractive from an investment perspective. Data gathering through the country‘s technology infrastructure has helped to improve underwriting standards. This has the potential to be a large market, especially in areas of affordable housing and vehicles.Mobile communications:The telecommunications market has consolidated, effectively leaving conglomerate Reliance Industries and Bharti Airtel as the dominant players. We anticipate smartphone and data usage will continue to increase, especially as 5G and fibre-to-the-home technologies are rolled out in more cities.Reliance, in particular, has witnessed rapid growth, underscoring the pace of India‘s digital revolution. Since its Jio telecom service was launched in 2016, it has amassed 439 million subscribers and handles 60% of the broadband data traffic.4India is currently the world‘s second-largest telecom market by subscribers, making it an attractive proposition for global technology giants. In 2022, Google made a US$1 billion investment in Airtel to make smartphones more affordable.6. China plus one: The chemicals industry sets a good exampleThe chemicals industry exemplifies how both governments and multinationals are turning to India to diversify manufacturing beyond China. Many chemical companies have come up over the past decade as the West sought to diversify its sourcing of both specialty and generic chemicals.India‘s competitive advantage has been its large pool of trained scientists and chemical engineers, which has enabled it to establish expertise in specialty and commoditized chemicals. This includes those being used in semiconductors, electric vehicle batteries and solar panels, where additional capacity is being built.That said, India’s chemicals industry is a fraction of that of China, the world's largest producer. But if 10% of demand sourced from China came to India, it would be meaningful. To make a broader point, India is a US$3.5 trillion economy, compared with an annual gross domestic product output of US$18.1 trillion for China,5leaving a long runway for growth ahead.7. The energy transition could be transformationalIndian corporations are seeking to compete with China all along the value chain of clean energy, especially with green hydrogen. So far, the companies looking to capitalize on this effort include Reliance Industries, Larsen & Toubro and Tata Power, based on our conversations with government and industry sources.The energy transition is potentially transformational for India. If done right, the payoff could be massive: The country is a large importer of oil and gas, so more renewable power would make it more energy independent. It would also significantly boost its manufacturing base.India‘s ambition in this area is in the early stages. Specifically, India must build its renewables supply chain from scratch, establish global cost competitiveness, continue to push policy forward and attract a lot of capital. While this will take time, both government and the private sector seem highly motivated.8. Demographics are the biggest advantageWhile India will very likely benefit from Western countries exploring China-plus sourcing strategies, the bulk of economic growth will come from domestic consumption and investment. With a median age of 29 years, India in our view has one of the most attractive demographic profiles among the world’s largest economies and can reap benefits from its productive capacity, provided the right policies are in place.We have already seen that technological innovation combined with an improving regulatory and legal framework has put the nation‘s economy on a path of 5% to 6% annualized growth, among the fastest of the world‘s large economies. With a general election due in 2024, political risk will rise. The consensus view in markets today is that the pro-business Modi government will retain power, possibly with a reduced majority in parliament.Should that change, market volatility will no doubt increase. But the imperative of economic growth and job creation is well-understood by political parties across the ideological spectrum.India has emerged on the global unicorn stageSources: Inc42 (for Indian unicorns), TechAviv (for Israeli unicorns) and CB Insights (for all others). Unicorn refers to a startup valued at or above US$1 billion. Data as of December 2022. Dollar values in USD.9. Valuations are stretched but not insurmountableWhen it comes to investing in emerging markets, India has historically traded at a premium on a relative price-to-earnings basis. Currently, the market looks a little expensive by historical standards. The MSCI India Index trades at 20 times forward earnings versus its 10-year average of 18 times.6That said, we believe the fundamental outlook for India is arguably better than ever. The market has a lot going for it: It‘s one of the world‘s fastest growing economies, inflation is under control, the government has been fiscally responsible, and corruption is lower than it was a decade ago. If Indian companies can deliver on earnings and cash flows, we think it‘s possible the market can grow into these valuations.The path of India‘s equities has never been a straight line, but over longer periods, the stock market has delivered some of the best returns among emerging and developed markets.India‘s equity benchmark has delivered over the past 20 yearsSources: MSCI, RIMES. Data as of May 31, 2023.",Emerging Markets
Stock market outlook: Broader opportunities emerge,2023-06-08T11:18:00,"Even as the global economic outlook weakens, powerful tailwinds are forming behind certain areas of the equity markets that previously spent many years in the wilderness.Chief among them are international stocks, particularly in Europe and Japan, that have surged in recent months amid a pronounced decline in the U.S. dollar. This trend is part of a larger broadening of investment opportunities over the past year — in contrast to the prior decade when large-cap U.S. tech stocks dominated market returns.“What had been a binary market — a market that was either/or — is now more balanced,” says Martin Romo, a portfolio manager with The Growth Fund of America®. “The opportunity set has grown to include U.S. companiesandinternational companies, growth stocksandvalue stocks, the technology sectorandhealth care, industrialsandenergy.”Declining dollar could boost international stocksAt least part of this dynamic has been driven by a significant reversal in the strength of the U.S. dollar. After an 11-year bull run, dollar dominance appears to be on the ropes as the greenback weakens against the euro, the yen and many other currencies. A continuing downward trend would be welcome news for investors in international stocks and bonds, where currency translation effects have eroded returns in recent years.International stocks have rallied in periods of dollar weaknessSources: Capital Group, J.P. Morgan, MSCI, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor’s. Relative returns and change in the USD index are measured on a cumulative total return basis in USD. The U.S. dollar index reflects J.P. Morgan’s USD Real Broad Effective Exchange Rate Index, which is re-based to 100 as of 2010. As of May 31, 2023. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.Markets outside the U.S. are already showing signs of a currency boost. As the dollar slipped, European stocks generated the strongest returns among developed markets during the fourth quarter of 2022 and the first quarter of 2023. Japanese stocks, too, have staged an impressive rally — with the Tokyo Stock Price Index, commonly known as TOPIX, rising to a 33-year high in mid-May.Since reaching a peak last October, the dollar has declined about 6%, as measured by the J.P. Morgan USD Real Effective Exchange Rate Index. While that may not seem like much, currency trends often play out over long periods of time, says Andrew Cormack, a portfolio manager withCapital World Bond Fund®. “The dollar tends to move in big cycles over many years,” Cormack explains. “And I think the strong dollar cycle we saw over the past decade was a bit long in the tooth.”While the dollar may yet see intermittent periods of strength due to its perceived status as a safe-haven asset, Cormack believes the long-term trajectory is lower. That’s due to several factors, including a soft U.S. economy, a weak housing market and indications that the Federal Reserve may be done raising interest rates for the balance of 2023.U.S. equities also have done well so far this year, largely thanks to a rebound in Big Tech stocks. Technology has been the best performing sector so far this year in the S&P 500 Index, driven in part by investor enthusiasm for the rise of artificial intelligence (AI) systems, such as ChatGPT. Earlier this year, ChatGPT, co-owned by Microsoft and Open AI, became the fastest growing consumer app in history.The difference now is that tech stocks are no longer the only game in town. Other areas of the market are also enjoying time in the spotlight, suggesting the future of growth investing may be more inclusive.Dividend stocks rise in importanceIn this environment, dividend-paying stocks may take on greater prominence, especially if global economic growth continues to slow and market volatility returns. This is also an area where international markets have had an advantage given the higher number of dividend-paying companies headquartered outside the United States and the emphasis they place on returning cash to shareholders.For example, French drug maker Sanofi has increased its dividend payout for 28 consecutive years. U.K.-based consumer goods giant Unilever has done so for 22 straight years. While there are many solid dividend payers in the U.S., international and emerging markets tend to offer a better hunting ground. As of May 31, 2023, more than 600 companies headquartered outside the U.S. offered hefty dividend yields between 3% and 6%. That compares to 130 in the United States.Across all markets since the start of 2022, dividend contributions to total returns have increased, as have total payments to investors. Global companies distributed more than $2 trillion in dividend payments for the 12 months ended April 30, 2023, an 8.9% increase from the previous 12.“I expect dividends will be of greater significance to investors this year and beyond,” says Caroline Randall, a portfolio manager with Capital Income Builder®. “But in a period of relative instability and rising debt costs, it is essential to focus on the quality of dividend payers.”The dividend decade is hereSource: FactSet. Data for 2023 to 2025 is based on consensus estimates as of May 31, 2023. CAGR = compound annualized growth rate.For Randall, finding quality dividend payers means closely scrutinizing company balance sheets, credit ratings and interest costs. This has guided her to select companies across the pharmaceutical and medical device industries, utilities, energy producers and some industrials.“It is critical to track what management says about dividends and equally critical to follow what they do. If you are going to rely more on dividends, you must be confident the companies will pay them. That’s where we can add value as active managers.”Bullish signal: A mountain of cash on the sidelinesGiven these and other opportunities, now may be the time for investors to consider moving out of cash. In recent months, investors have shifted assets from stock and bond investments and driven money market totals to a record $5.39 trillion, as of May 26, 2023.This flight to cash and cash alternatives such as money market funds and short-term Treasuries is understandable following last year’s tandem decline of stocks and bonds in the face of rising interest rates, inflation and slowing economic growth. Many investors moved deposits from banks to money markets amid ongoing volatility and relatively high yields on cash alternatives.But conditions have shifted thus far in 2023, and long-term investors may want to rethink their approach. Levels of cash alternatives peaked near two recent market troughs. During the global financial crisis, for example, money market fund assets peaked two months before the S&P 500 Index reached a bottom on March 9, 2009. The stock market recorded a 40% return over the subsequent three months and a 55% return over the following six months.Investors’ flight to cash has been followed by strong returnsSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg Index Services Ltd., Investment Company Institute (ICI), Standard & Poor’s. As of May 26, 2023. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.Similarly, during the pandemic, money market fund levels reached a high weeks after the S&P 500 hit its trough in March 2020.After the painful losses of 2022, more risk averse investors might consider allocating some cash to dividend-paying stocks, which provide income and capital appreciation potential, as well as select short- and intermediate-term bonds, which have been offering higher yields than in 2022. (Unlike cash which may be insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, dividend-paying stocks, short- and intermediate-term bonds are not guaranteed and are subject to loss.)Looking out across the investment landscape, short-term bonds, dividend-paying stocks and international stocks stand out for their attractive valuations and historically lower volatility, offering potentially attractive alternatives to cash for cautious investors seeking a re-entry point.",Global Equities
Big Tech turnaround: Can it continue?,2023-05-24T04:34:00,"Big Tech is making a comeback. Many of the names that led the last great bull market — Alphabet, Apple, Microsoft, Meta and Nvidia among them — are leading a nascent recovery this year.Whether the powerful advance will continue remains an open question, but the tech-heavy CRSP U.S. Mega Cap Growth Index has gained more than 26% on a year-to-date basis, as of May 18, nearly triple the return of the S&P 500 Index in U.S. dollar terms.What’s driving the rally? That’s open to interpretation.“This is the area of the market that fell the farthest in 2022, so there’s a bounce-back effect that I think is certainly part of the explanation,” says portfolio manager Mark Casey.  “You could argue some of these companies were punished more than they should have been as entire sectors fell out of favour and the selloff became indiscriminate at times.”Big Tech has enjoyed a big bounce this yearSources: Capital Group, Center for Research in Security Prices (CRSP), Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor’s. As of May 18, 2023. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.The changing interest rate outlook also is providing a helpful tailwind, Casey notes, as the U.S. Federal Reserve has indicated it might not raise rates as much as previously expected. That’s provided a boost to long-duration assets, including many tech stocks where investors are speculating on the companies’ long-term prospects, and basing valuation assumptions partly on long-term rate expectations.The rise of artificial intelligence (AI) systems, such as the popular ChatGPT, is another factor driving enthusiasm for the tech sector. Earlier this year, ChatGPT, co-owned by Microsoft and OpenAI, became the fastest growing consumer app in history.“Beyond that, you have to look at these companies one by one,” Casey added. “Many of them are cutting costs. Profit margins are improving. In some cases, strategic objectives are changing. And so then, the key question becomes: Will they be able to earn their way back to success?”Last year’s laggards are this year’s leadersSources: Capital Group, FactSet, RIMES, Standard & Poor’s. Sector returns reflect total returns in USD. As of May 18, 2023. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.Tech stocks power through a tough quarterRecent corporate earnings reports have provided a glimpse into the tech turnaround. Despite worries about a global recession, the largest tech giants found ways to rise above the fray by focusing on profitable growth, rather than growth at any cost. Meanwhile, S&P 500 earnings fell by 2% in the first quarter.Apple reported quarterly earnings on May 4 that beat consensus expectations by a wide margin, driven primarily by higher iPhone sales. Amid a challenging macroeconomic environment, iPhone revenue rose 1.5% on a year-over-year basis, sending Apple shares soaring to their highest level in more than a year. The company also initiated several cost-cutting measures, including hiring freezes for some divisions, reduced travel budgets and delays in new product launches.Microsoft shares moved sharply higher after the software giant reported better-than-expected top-line revenue growth, boosted by a 31% gain in its Azure cloud-computing division. The software giant has also eliminated 10,000 jobs in a recent round of cost reductions, amounting to about 5% of its workforce.Nvidia reported a sharp decline in quarterly profit, but its shares skyrocketed anyway based on the chipmaker’s forecast for rapid growth in demand for AI-related chips. Nvidia is the world’s dominant provider of specialized graphics chips used to power AI applications such as ChatGPT. The company has also made big strides reducing its manufacturing costs over the past year.It’s no surprise then that those three technology companies are the top contributors to the rise of the S&P 500 Index this year, as of May 18. In fact, the combined weighting of Apple and Microsoft alone now accounts for 13.3% of the index, the highest level on record.Focusing on profits and efficiencyThe resurgence of Big Tech is an investment theme that resonates with portfolio manager Martin Jacobs. “Quite a few of the mega-cap technology and media companies look interesting today for different reasons,” explains Jacobs, one of the portfolio managers for Capital Group U.S. Equity Fund™ (Canada). “Obviously, they were down a lot last year, so their valuations are more reasonable today. But many of them also had to recalibrate their growth ambitions. As a result, they're taking actions to operate more thoughtfully and more efficiently.”Meta Platforms, formerly Facebook, is a high-profile example. The social media giant went through three rounds of layoffs in recent months and revamped its digital advertising business using AI tools designed to improve its ad-targeting systems. These and other aggressive moves contributed to Meta reporting a 3% increase in year-over-year revenue on April 26, ending a three-quarter losing streak.Netflix provides another example of this new-found cost-consciousness. In recent months, the streaming giant has taken several major steps to make its business more efficient, including the addition of an ad-supported tier of service, a crackdown on password sharing and the planned elimination of its DVD rental business.Can the tech rally continue?Although profitability may be improving at some tech-related companies, one area of concern is that there are few signs of robust top-line revenue growth, says portfolio manager Cheryl Frank. “We’re seeing profit margins beating expectations as companies all of a sudden get more cost discipline,” Frank explains. “Investors are reacting positively to companies that are saving their way to profitability, which is a sensible strategy in a high-interest rate environment. But the stocks are not rising because there’s a lot of organic sales growth.”That leaves Frank concerned about tech valuations, which are still high relative to history. It’s also possible the economic backdrop could deteriorate in the months ahead if the U.S. falls into recession or if the impasse over the U.S. debt ceiling gets worse and potentially leads to a catastrophic default.“We need a soft landing for this rally to be sustainable,” Frank says.Investment implications: Broadening opportunitiesWhether the Big Tech run continues or eventually fizzles out, the movement is clearly part of a larger trend of broadening opportunities since the start of the bear market in early 2022. While U.S. large-cap tech stocks are now leading the rebound, they aren’t the only game in town, as they were for much of the previous decade.Over the past year and half, as inflation has moved sharply higher and interest rates have followed, various other sectors and regions have started to bloom. They include the energy, health care and industrial sectors, as well as European stocks — which are outpacing U.S. stocks for the first time in years. At various times over the past 18 months, traditional value-oriented and dividend-paying stocks have surged ahead of growth-oriented stocks.The investment opportunity set has widened significantlySources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's. As of 5/16/23. Indexed to 100 as of January 1, 2005. The S&P 500 Index is weighted by market capitalization, meaning the largest companies have the biggest impact on the path of the index. The S&P 500 Equal-Weighted Index gives each stock equal weight, thereby removing the outsize impact of large-cap stocks. The ratio between the two indexes reflects time periods when market breadth is increasing or decreasing. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.That’s good news for active investors, says Martin Romo, a portfolio manager for Capital Group U.S. Equity Fund (Canada).“We have moved from a market that was either/or to a market that is now more balanced,” Romo explains. “We’re no longer going in just one direction. The opportunity set has grown to include U.S. companiesandinternational companies, growth stocksandvalue stocks, the technology sectorandindustrials.“We’re living in a world where there are both cyclicalandsecular opportunities,” he adds. “For investors willing to do their homework, it’s a much more compelling, target-rich environment.”",U.S. Equities
Why macroeconomic predictions can be misleading,2023-05-04T02:30:00,"The past year has reminded me that predictions based on macroeconomic events can be unreliable guides to the future.A year ago, if I told you that the war in Ukraine would continue to drag on, that the European economy would produce virtually zero growth and that U.S.-China tensions would intensify, I doubt you would have expected a positive return for international stocks. And yet, despite the escalating war in Ukraine, skyrocketing energy prices, record high inflation and weak economic growth, European markets have staged a powerful rally, outpacing U.S. stocks over the past two quarters.Even with the benefit of perfect hindsight, or a crystal ball, you might still have come to the wrong conclusion. Knowing all the macroeconomic facts in advance, we would have predicted negative returns. The headlines would have misled us.European markets have far outpaced U.S. markets in recent monthsSources: Capital Group, MSCI, Standard & Poor’s. Figures reflect the difference in total return on a year-over-year local currency basis between the MSCI Europe Index and the S&P 500 Index. As of March 31, 2023.So why did it happen? Why did European stocks, as well as the broader universe of international stocks, do so much better than U.S. stocks? In my 29 years as a portfolio manager all I can say is, markets sometimes give you a hint that something important is going on. I think this activity in international markets is something we need to watch closely.Why have stocks outside the U.S. had better returns?There’s no question that valuations are generally still more attractive outside the U.S. That’s been true for a long time, but nobody has cared because it hasn’t made any difference in recent years. However, when it comes to individual companies, we may be getting some hints as to why international markets are perking up.Take a company like Holcim, a Switzerland-based cement maker. While there is no good news anywhere to be found in the building materials sector, Holcim trades at a 10% free cash flow yield — a financial metric that compares the company’s free cash flow per share to its market value per share — and the company is growing not shrinking. Sometimes that’s good enough.Then there’s Shin-Etsu Chemical, Japan’s largest chemical company. It has various business lines tied to housing, agriculture and semiconductors, among other areas. Shin-Etsu has a strong balance sheet, low debt levels and, like Holcim, the business is growing. Shin-Etsu trades at a price-to-earnings (P/E) ratio around 13, and Holcim carries a P/E of 11. (The P/E ratio compares a company’s share price to its net profits). These are very low valuations, compared to similar multinational companies. Maybe these low valuations, combined with earnings news that isn’t terrible, are carrying the day.Many non-U.S. companies trade at a discount to their U.S. counterpartsSources: IBES (Institutional Brokers’ Estimate System), MSCI, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's. As of March 31, 2023. A lower P/E ratio means investors are paying less for every dollar of earnings generated by a company.Is this the start of a new golden age for international investing?One swallow does not make a spring. I am not here to say that international markets are going to do better than U.S. markets for years to come. There is still skepticism around that idea because it’s been more than a decade since we’ve seen it. U.S. markets have won for such a long time that nobody wants to suggest this may be the turning point. Bottom line: This may not be a “ring the bell” moment, but I think investing in international stocks is unlikely to be as disappointing as it has been at times over the past 10 to 12 years.Is it time for international stocks to retake the spotlight?Sources: Capital Group, MSCI, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor’s. Relative returns are measured on an annualized rolling three-year total return based in U.S. dollars. As of March 31, 2023.Going forward, I think balance sheets are going to matter more than ever, and I'm paying attention to that. Avoiding disasters is going to be as important, or maybe even more important, than finding the next big thing. And I believe it’s possible you may be able to generate solid returns investing outside the U.S.One good sign is that I continue to have meetings with company managements where no one is super bearish. I just met with the executives of a large restaurant company. Are things great? No, but they’re good — and they expect to grow, even amid recession fears. I also met with the management of a semiconductor company. They said this may be a tough year, but they expect to grow five-fold over the next decade because of rising demand for computer chips.In my view, there are three important things to keep in mind going forward: Valuations will matter. Balance sheets will matter. Avoiding disasters will matter.And that might just be good enough.",International
Making the case for international equities,2023-05-01T11:30:00,"International equities have long been overshadowed by the market’s fascination with leading U.S. technology companies. But the tide may be shifting. A confluence of top-down and bottom-up dynamics is making the case for international equities much stronger.From a macro perspective, the U.S. dollar has weakened significantly against the euro and other global currencies since last October. Currencies can overshoot for extended periods, and the dollar has been overvalued on several metrics for many years. That said, in the past few months, we have seen signs of a turn. And in periods of dollar weakness, currency translation effects can significantly impact total returns from equities.Weaker U.S. dollar can help boost international equitiesSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg, FactSet, J.P. Morgan. The dollar index is an effective exchange rate that measures the value of the U.S. dollar against a group of developed and emerging markets currencies. The annual currency contribution to the total return of the MSCI EAFE Index is expressed in percentage points of return. Shaded area represents prolonged period of U.S. dollar weakness. Data as of December 31, 2022.Meanwhile, Europe has weathered the energy disruption from the Russia-Ukraine war better than expected, although a mild winter has helped. The European Central Bank’s efforts to rein in inflation had a dampening effect on the overall economy. GDP growth in the fourth quarter was flat as higher interest rates started to bite. Nevertheless, consumers have shown resilience, buffeted by savings built up during COVID lockdowns and by generous fiscal support provided to consumers during the pandemic.China’s reopeningcould be another positive catalyst for Europe, given the strong trade ties between the two regions. It’s also a large export market for Japan and other Asian countries.Against this supportive macro-economic backdrop, international equities led by European stocks have had a strong run over the past six months. Yet valuations remain below long-term averages for many sectors, suggesting there could be upside ahead.Europe is trading at historically low valuationsSources: MSCI, RIMES. Forward price-to-earnings ratio reflects the current share price relative to the consensus estimate for earnings per share on a forward 12-month basis. Data as of March 31, 2023.Here, we discuss eight investment themes prevalent in our international equity portfolios and why they may be sources of returns over the next few years.1. Semiconductors are crucial to power the digital economyDespite the recent cyclical downturn and geopolitical headlines, the semiconductor industry appears poised to enjoy years of growth ahead. And companies outside the U.S dominate much of the industry.The need for computing power is only increasing. Industry-wide revenue is projected to reach US$940 billion by 2030, doubling from 2020, based on estimates from leading semiconductor equipment manufacturer ASML.Several demand drivers are gaining traction. One is high-performance computing chips used in cloud computing and artificial intelligence (AI) functions like ChatGPT. Another is autos: Today’s average car contains many times more semiconductors than a smartphone.We expect companies in Taiwan, Japan and Europe to thrive from these trends. Many of them have developed specialized expertise that is hard to replicate in manufacturing, chip-making equipment and laser-inspection tools for microchips.Western governments have also realized semiconductors are essential to national security. The CHIPS and Science Act of 2022, which provides US$52.7 billion for U.S. semiconductor development, and a new fund established in Europe are among the efforts to incentivize companies to move production back home.The pace of semiconductor sales is acceleratingSources: Capital Group, ASML, Statista, WSTS. Data as of November 2022. 2022 estimate provided by WSTS. Projection through 2030 provided by ASML. The first semiconductor was created in 1960. Values in USD.2. European firms have dominated interactive online entertainmentIf you got lazy about making that trip to Las Vegas and decided to play online blackjack instead, chances are the platform is powered by a European company. Gaming and sports betting are among the fastest growing areas of online entertainment. The global online gambling market was valued at US$63.5 billion in 2022 and is expected to grow at a double-digit rate for the next decade, according to various estimates.Flutter of Ireland, Entain of the United Kingdom and Evolution of Sweden command this space, having developed the technology over the past decade. Online casinos and sports betting became legalized in many European markets earlier than the U.S. Now, as legalization of online casinos and sports betting expands state by state across the U.S., European firms have been gaining market share at a rapid pace.We are seeing innovation in other areas of technology as well. Sweden’s Spotify is one of the world’s leading music-streaming platforms. U.K.-based Ocado developed valuable technology for the online grocery business. And there’s ASML in the Netherlands, whose EUV (extreme ultraviolet) lithography machines dominate leading-edge semiconductor manufacturing for high-end phones and data centres.3. The energy transition is creating new opportunitiesEurope’s transition to energy sources outside of Russia is creating new opportunities across a host of industries, including renewed interest in European oil giants.At the same time, many governments around the world are committed to reducing their reliance on fossil fuels and pivoting to renewable energies. The Inflation Reduction Act in the U.S. provides for a massive US$369 billion package of tax credits, loans and grants to spur the capital investment needed to create a meaningful U.S. domestic solar and wind power-generation industry. But this energy needs to be stored using batteries that rely heavily on rare earth materials and industrial metals including copper, nickel and lithium.Mining companies are gearing up for the energy transition. Rio Tinto recently said it intends to double its annual copper output by 2030, while BHP Group acquired OZ Minerals, a copper and gold miner. Mining companies in Canada, Great Britain and Australia have both the resources and the highly specialized expertise. In the near term, the materials sector can also benefit from a pickup in manufacturing activity in China as factories reopen across the country.When it comes to building new homes or retrofitting older buildings, industrial companies in Europe are rapidly transitioning to alternative energy sources and newer, less energy-intensive manufacturing technologies.Raw materials will play an important role in the energy transitionSources: Capital Group, European Federation for Transport & Environment. Figures above reflect the mineral content of the average lithium-ion battery with a 60-kilowatt-hour capacity, which refers to the weighted average of electric vehicle battery chemistries on the market in 2020. Figures exclude materials in the electrolyte, binder, separator and battery pack casing. Data as of July 2021.4. Consumer companies are showing pricing powerAlthough European economic growth has remained flat, the consumer has shown resilience, partly due to savings accumulated in the last few years amid COVID lockdowns and fiscal support from central governments. Against this backdrop, and facing rising input costs, large consumer goods giants have raised prices. In the near term, this can put pressure on operating and profit margins. Longer term, the price hikes usually stick, even as costs plateau or soften over time, which can help expand margins and profitability.Consumer demand has been surprisingly resilient in many parts of the world. Now, with China’s reopening, we expect demand for luxury goods and travel to shoot higher. Prominent luxury goods companies LVMH and Hermès both reported strong first-quarter results, bolstered by demand from customers in China. While there is a degree of risk, given the potential for an economic slowdown, rising demand from China should offset slower demand in other markets. And importantly, European brands have become synonymous with luxury around the world, building leading market share positions and a level of expertise that is difficult to replicate, affording them a degree of pricing power.5. Aircraft makers, suppliers should benefit from secular growth in travelAir travel is picking up again in a post-pandemic world and should get a big boost from China ending its three-year lockdown. Travel is a secular growth industry in a lot of countries, and demand is growing for new airplanes. Only about 20% of the world’s population has ever been on a plane. So there is huge room for growth, especially in emerging markets, where the middle class is growing, and air travel is still in its infancy.More than 39,000 new aircraft are projected to be built by 2040, with roughly 40% slotted for Asian countries, according to Airbus and Boeing, who dominate the market. While U.S.-based Boeing specializes in wide-body aircraft, Airbus in France leads in midsize planes used for short-haul flights — the segment seeing the fastest growth. European companies also build engines and components, led by Safran, the world’s largest maker of engines for single-aisle planes as well as landing gear.The dynamics of aircraft orders benefit the manufacturers. Airlines pay in installments and have prepaid most of the cost by the time the planes are delivered. Given the backlog, they don’t like to lose their place in the queue for deliveries. This provides a strong baseline for forecasting cash flows and revenue streams.Commercial aircraft production has a long runwaySources: Capital Group, company reports. Boeing's last reported order backlog is over 4,500, while Airbus has an order backlog of 7,239 planes. Data as of December 31, 2022.6. Japanese companies are showing signs of reinventionJapan’s corporate world doesn’t garner much headline attention. But several companies are undergoing transformations. Olympus is known worldwide as a camera brand, but that’s no longer its emphasis after a multiyear restructuring. Leveraging technology developed over the decades, Olympus has transformed itself into the world’s leading supplier of endoscopes used in medical procedures. Fujifilm is another example. The company has evolved into a major player in health care, offering drug development and manufacturing services to multinational pharmaceutical companies. It has also expanded into the semiconductor materials business.In other areas, Japanese firms have carved out unique technologies used in industrial automation equipment and inspection tools for semiconductor manufacturers. These companies will likely play a central role as we see an industrial renaissance in developed economies and ongoing industrialization in developing economies.Corporate Japan has been on a journey to improve profitability, capital allocation and corporate governance since 2012 under policy reforms advocated by former Prime Minister Shinzo Abe. And more recently, Japanese companies have seen a rise in shareholder activism, with investors asking for a better return on investments. As many companies tend to have high levels of cash on their balance sheets, this could lead to companies paying out more of their excess cash in dividends.7. Innovation could benefit pharmaceutical giantsInnovation is ramping up in health care. Europe is home to many high-quality pharmaceutical companies. Many have invested heavily in drug discovery in recent years and have built deep pipelines of pioneering treatments to tackle some of the world’s biggest health issues.Some pharmaceutical companies such as AstraZeneca are transitioning from a broad suite of health care drugs toward specialty care; roughly 40% of AstraZeneca’s drugs are now related to oncology. This allows companies to create dominant franchises in select areas of health care.As investor optimism has risen, valuations have expanded, making us somewhat cautious in the near term. That said, with better visibility on future growth and no major patent expirations in the coming years, pharmaceutical companies may see higher price-earnings multiples than they did in the prior decade.In an uncertain macro environment, the strong capitalization of many pharmaceutical companies is another positive factor. Many have plenty of cash on their balance sheets to pay dividends or fund their own growth through acquisitions. This could help in a higher interest-rate world where raising debt capital will be more expensive.8.  Select opportunities may exist in European and Asian financialsCredit Suisse’s merger with UBS in late March generated headlines about weak links in the banking system. But overall, the European banking sector is arguably in its strongest operating position since the great financial crisis. Banks have built up significant capital reserves to absorb potential loan losses, which should protect earnings in a recession. Capital ratios and profitability are at all-time highs. Furthermore, positive interest rates should help net interest income (a key profitability measure) for the rate-sensitive banks.Compared with their U.S. counterparts, European banks do not take on large amounts of interest-rate risk due to tighter regulations. Banks in Europe also tend to be relatively well-diversified, with large funding bases built on retail branch deposits. Our banking analysts anticipate returns on capital should improve. Given a less restrictive regulatory environment, dividends could increase, and buybacks may rise.Similarly, domestic-focused Asian banks appear relatively sound for several reasons. Besides operating in countries where economic growth rates are projected to outpace the developed world, they have limited exposure to U.S. regional banks and Credit Suisse. They are well-capitalized and tend to have smaller investment portfolios.European and Asian bank stocks have held up relatively wellSources: Capital Group, MSCI, RIMES, Standard & Poor's. Data reflects period from December 31, 2022, through April 14, 2023.An increased focus on dividendsWe are also seeing a greater-than-ever focus on and commitment to dividends. Corporate managements, particularly in Europe and Japan, seem to be balancing capital expenditure and operating cash flow needs with a stronger desire to return cash to shareholders via dividends.International dividends projected to growSources:FactSet. Data for 2023-2025 is based on consensus estimates as of February 17, 2023. CAGR = compound annualized growth rate. Based in USD.A broad opportunity set spans growth and valueInflection points in markets tend to prompt investors to take a fresh look at asset allocation. The rise in interest rates around the world triggered by tighter monetary policy has been a reset of sorts for all financial assets. Growth stocks pulled back last year and have rebounded as the monetary tightening cycle appears closer to the end than the beginning.Nevertheless, portfolio flows over the past six months can be read as a signal that investors are looking to broaden their equity exposure beyond the dominant U.S. technology companies. International equities spanning many industries across the growth and value spectrum provide a diversified opportunity set with valuations that appear reasonable by many measures.",International
Dividend investing across portfolios: More than just income,2023-04-14T11:22:00,"For advisor use only. Not for use with investors.Measure twice, cut once.That old proverb may be the best way to describe Capital Group’s approach to dividend investing: we take extra first steps to try to ensure we don’t make a mistake. In the following, seasoned Capital Group investment professionals take you through their advanced research methods when dividend investing and explain why dividend-growing companies can provide more advantages than simply offering income in tough times. Dividend-investing does, they assert, have the potential to add value through long-term real return generation, making it an essential ingredient for diversified portfolios designed to meet various investment outcomes: income, capital appreciation and preservation.Not all dividends are created equalWinnie Kwan, equity portfolio manager, Capital Group Capital Income Builder™(Canada)In a dividend growth strategy, one should expect to find companies that are growing. Their management should exercise good capital allocation discipline and enable dividend payments to reward shareholders. Companies generating rising streams of free cash flows can guard against inflation.At Capital Group, our research team goes to great lengths to study the quality of dividends. We group them into three groups based on their unique characteristics.Dividend compounders.These are companies that typically grow dividends over time and generate risk-adjusted returns above the broader market. Linde, one of the largest industrial gas makers, is an example of a dividend compounder. Its uninterrupted track record of dividend growth and payments is underpinned by healthy cash flows generated through long-term client contracts. The company’s investment in hydrogen creates an added growth element.Bond proxies.The second group comprises bond proxies, which have higher-than-market yield but lower dividend growth. These are often regulated businesses with predictable cash flow and earnings. An example is U.S. regulated utility company Entergy, which operates in industrial-heavy states and generates predictable free cash flows.Cyclical winners.The third group is focused on companies towards the end of their cyclical cycle which creates the opportunity to capture the recovery in earnings, dividends and market multiples. An example of a cyclical winner is Raytheon Technologies in the aerospace and defence sector, where revenue and margins have yet to return to pre-COVID levels.It is also our job to look out for dividend cutters and avoid them as they tend to fair worse than market averages.The importance of historical track recordHistory does not lie. We get a good sense of a company’s capital allocation strategy and the key incentives of the management team through its historical track record. We also look at board dynamics (understanding how they interact with each other and make decisions) and study how they work with the management. A healthy board-management relationship is key to good governance and organizational effectiveness.These are some of the factors we analyze using the dividend-ratings process developed by our Quantitative Research & Analytics group which is illustrated in the following exhibit. The quantitative screening, a starting point for additional analysis, works like a credit-rating system where companies that pass seven criteria are rated AAA. It screens out companies with unsustainable dividends, weak balance sheets, low quality earnings and poor cash flow visibility. The complete assessment involves the pairing of quantitative screening with qualitative analysis. There is a need to differentiate between a company’s ‘ability’ to pay a dividend (based on variables such as business fundamentals and outlook) and a company’s ‘willingness’ to sustain and/or grow its dividend. The latter is where qualitative analysis can add value and our research and role as an active manager come into play.Capital Group’s dividend ratings process for analyzing companiesDPS: dividend per share. EBITDA: earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization.Analyzing dividendsChitra Gopal, equity investment analystDividend payments can impact companies in two ways. First, they cultivate financial management discipline to maintain a dividend commitment. This could, for instance, drive project selectivity, and thus reduce resource wastage and improve the return on invested capital (ROIC) over time. Second, the ability to grow dividends can demonstrate profitability as well as confidence in the sustainability of a business.I use two buckets when categorizing dividends. Bucket one consists of industry leaders with products or services so valuable there is little risk of substitution. These companies sustain margins due to some competitive edge, which can be in the form of information technology, scale, or assets with long useful lives. This bucket contains the most fertile hunting grounds for dividend growers and companies that are committed to protect and grow dividends over time as illustrated in the following chart. It shows dividend growers typically have strong returns with low volatility compared to the global universe, while non-dividend payers have a poor risk-reward profile. One company that fits this bucket is U.S.-based KLA, which serves the semiconductor industry with highly complex inspection tools coupled with multi-year service contracts. Maintaining a long-term commitment from clients allows KLA to generate a steady stream of free cash flow, while its advanced tools provide the company with a competitive advantage given the lack of substitutes.Dividend growers have delivered superior results over timePast results are not a guarantee of future results.Data from December 1989 to December 2022. Returns are based on the weighted average of total returns in USD (with gross dividend reinvested) of a global universe of companies. The universe consists of the 1000 largest companies in the S&P BMI Global Indices for North America (50% weight) , Europe (25%), Japan (10%) and the 500 largest companies for Emerging Markets (10%) and Pacific x Japan (5%) from December 1989 to December 2004 and the 1000 largest companies in the MSCI IMI Indices for North America, Europe and Japan and the 500 largest companies for Emerging Markets and Pacific x Japan thereafter. The universe constituents are rebalanced quarterly. Volatility reflects annualized standard deviation of monthly total returns. Sources: QRA, Factset, Compustat, Worldscope, MSCI.Bucket two comprises low capex-intensive businesses with very high conversion of net income to free cash flow. While free cash flows and dividends can surge when margins are expanding, the reverse can also be true, hence it warrants extra care when investing in such companies. In some countries, companies tend to have a high-dividend pay-out ratio, but this is motivated by the desire to reduce tax payments, which isn’t really a sign of financial discipline.Engaging management teamsEngaging companies on dividends is a dialogue. My objective is to help them address their commitments and arrive at the best decisions. A common issue is company managements sometimes view share repurchases and dividend payments as equivalent. In reality, paying dividends is a direct return of cash to shareholders, while repurchasing shares is a capital allocation decision made by management, similar to mergers and acquisitions or capital expenditure.Key trends shaping today’s worldSome managements lean toward share repurchases over dividends, as repurchases reduce share count, and boost earnings per share — and often they may be compensated based on earnings per share growth. But having that as the preferred option to rewards shareholders means they may have not fully understood the differences between dividends and a share buyback. Engaging the management on this topic can take years, and the resources we use to facilitate dividend discussions include a 30-page presentation, which has tested analysis and fully automated company specific analytics.When market cycles shift, market leadership changes, along with many trends that are taking shape around the world. The key ones I’m observing include the development of artificial intelligence and energy-efficient computing. These span a wide gamut of use cases from drug discovery, identifying social media disinformation, fraud detection to predictive maintenance. Another major trend is the shift towards decarbonization. It goes beyond putting more electric vehicles on the road. Rather, there is a need to fundamentally change our infrastructure such as equipping factories to be power efficient and retooling energy grids to accommodate more renewables.Understanding of business cyclicalityBen Lin, investment analystThe market environment has moved away from being overly growth focused. Instead, we are entering one where companies with steady dividends will become more prevalent and the projection of principal value can be done with greater accuracy.Over the years, I have grown to understand the cyclical nature of companies’ earnings and dividends in the industrials space. I tend to look for industrials companies with a strong starting yield and a healthy balance sheet, and have the ability to generate free cash flow. These are key features to maintaining earnings.Another area of potential opportunities is in the insurance space. The earnings of insurance companies can be volatile due to high levels of investment income and the need to comply with mark-to-market accounting requirements. What insurers like AIA Group have done is pegging dividend payouts as a percentage of normalised earnings. This provides stability in dividends and is more aligned with the long-term nature of insurance businesses.Fundamental research mattersFundamental research is crucial for developing a deep understanding of a company and the broader industry. We tend to follow the progress of companies for many years, and in the process uncover some of the most interesting developments. One example is Midea Group, which manufactures electrical appliances such as refrigerators and air conditioners. Our analyst team began researching the company and its products in the early 2000s. Since then, the Chinese firm has undergone the process of disintermediation to sell products directly to consumers. Midea’s automation technology also allows it to transform its business model to made-to-order production and become less working-capital intensive. This resulted in significant free cash flow generation, allowing Midea to redistribute cash for growth and pay shareholders in the form of dividends and share buybacks.Meanwhile, Japanese companies are sitting on large cash piles that can account for a significant percentage of their market capitalization. On a positive note, their dividend payout ratios have been on the rise. We hope to see further improvements through our ongoing discussions with Japanese industrials companies about returning cash to shareholders and improving their capital efficiency.Management is keyWe build long-term relationships with generations of management teams and strive for regular and strong engagements to assess their abilities as part of our qualitative analysis. Some of the positive management changes I have witnessed involved new leadership at the top. These are critical and can open new possibilities.In reality, changing a management team’s view is hard as they have their set ways of thinking. But over the years, we have found successes in some companies and seen the development of steady and progressive dividend policies. All of these take time and devotion. But it will be well worth it, because the eventual success of a company very much depends on its management.Investment implicationsAll in all, dividend growers — stocks that pay and consistently grow a dividend — are key to long-term return generation. Capital Group’s analysis shows they have typically been higher quality firms with solid fundamentals. We believe dividend-focused strategies could provide a more resilient outcome across portfolios, including multi-asset and standalone equity funds.",Dividends
AI: What it means for investors,2023-04-13T09:13:00,"Artificial intelligence (AI) is having an iPhone moment with the launch of ChatGPT, a chatbot technology that can simulate human-like understanding and produce well-crafted, conversational responses.Racing to a million users in five days — and 100 million by January 2023 — ChatGPT has already been used to write short stories and academic papers as well as to create music and videos. Since the release of the chatbot, developed by OpenAI with a more than US$10 billion investment from Microsoft, every day seems to bring news of incremental advances in natural language models, along with occasional apocalyptic warnings about the rise of robot overlords.“As was true with the mainframe era in the 1950s, PCs in the 1980s and '90s and most recently the mobile and cloud era, AI has the potential to be the next technology platform that drives major productivity gains and changes the world,” says equity investment analyst Drew Macklis, who covers semiconductors, autos and mobility technology. “Each of these eras created investment opportunities, but it’s critical for investors to separate the reality from the hype and be sharp on where value can accrue in the chain.”For starters, ChatGPT does not yet possess human logic per se, but can be better thought of as hyper-scale pattern recognition. Such chatbots built on large language models are one example of how AI is already being applied across the economy. The key question for investors is: Has AI finally reached a commercial tipping point?AI applications across industries and business functionsSources: Capital Group, McKinsey, Stanford Institute for Human-Centered Artificial Intelligence (HAI). Figures reflect the percentage of firms that report utilizing artificial intelligence (AI) for the specific business functions listed above. Figures as of December 2022, as published in ""Artificial Intelligence Index Report 2023.""”I believe AI can be one of the most profound investment trends of the next decade,” Macklis adds. “Years of deep AI research, breakthroughs in areas like transformer models and now a groundswell of interest in ChatGPT have set the stage for adoption to accelerate rapidly over the next five years.”Here, Macklis and equity portfolio managers Mark Casey and Rich Wolf  share their views on how artificial intelligence is transforming industries and driving opportunity for companies and investors.1. Robots are already here — and getting smarterMark Casey, 22 years of investment industry experienceAs interesting as I find large language models like ChatGPT, it is possible AI-powered robots will have a bigger economic impact in the next handful of years. Consider these four examples.Amazon has been deploying a robot called Sparrow, which picks up items and puts them in shipping boxes. In 2015, when Amazon held a competition to design a picking robot, the winner picked up 10 of 12 items at a rate of two minutes per successful pick. Seven years later, Sparrow can pick out roughly two-thirds of the more than 100 million items in an Amazon warehouse at a rate of just seconds per pick. Today, more than a million people work in Amazon fulfilment centers. This is obviously not great news for warehouse workers, but it might help Amazon address its current high operating costs.Second, self-driving cars and trucks have been gaining real-world traction. Waymo One and Waymo Driver, the driverless car services of Google parent Alphabet and General Motors’ Cruise, are robo-taxiing passengers — without safety drivers — in Phoenix and San Francisco. Both companies have disclosed plans to launch taxis in more cities, including Austin and Los Angeles, as well as to add thousands of self-driving vehicles to their operations over the next several quarters.A third example is the use of drones to make deliveries. Alphabet’s Wing has delivered more than 300,000 packages in test markets in Australia, Finland, Ireland and Texas. Amazon has also been testing drones in Texas and California. It is still early, but the company hopes to deliver 500 million packages annually utilizing the technology by the end of the decade.Fourth, to see how robots for use at home are evolving, go online and watch a video of RT-1, a project Google recently disclosed. This one-armed robot has been trained on the same sorts of large language models powering ChatGPT and is able to perform more than 700 tasks with a high success rate.Although it is too early to determine which companies will emerge as market leaders, one thing appears clear to me: The wider use of robots, along with the massive computing power required for broader uses of AI, will likely be a major tailwind for the semiconductor industry and cloud services. If you ask ChatGPT a question, it checks billions of data points to produce the desired content.In fact, during its March earnings call semiconductor maker Broadcom reported that demand for some of its advanced chips surged in recent months as tech giants seek to integrate generative AI models like ChatGPT into their search platforms and other offerings. And chip maker Nvidia announced an initiative featuring its own AI tools.2. AI in health care is helping doctors make better diagnosesRichmond Wolf, 26 years of investment industry experienceOften we think about innovation within health care in terms of drug discovery. But tech and health care are coming together in interesting ways. AI is playing a growing role in helping medical professionals generate new treatments and better patient outcomes.The simplest examples are within the use of AI-powered software to analyze X-rays, MRIs or CT scans to help radiologists improve the accuracy rate of their diagnoses.German industrial conglomerate Siemens, a global leader in AI-related patents, has developed tools for its imaging machines that essentially apply inference modeling to better identify irregularities in a scan. While not replacing human radiologists, this enhances their ability to do their jobs.Tech and non-tech companies are racing to develop AI applicationsSources: Capital Group, LexisNexis. As of June 2022Such AI-assisted analysis is also being integrated into the field of pathology, where significant advances are possible. Today, pathologists diagnose cancer by looking at tissue under a microscope, a time-consuming process that often requires consultation with other pathologists. Pathologists, with the help of AI-powered pattern recognition, can now improve their productivity and benefit from a larger knowledge base.AI can also augment the ability to detect cancer by assisting researchers with genomic analysis. It has the potential to become a standard of care in many of these applications within the next decade.Companies across the technology and health care sectors are also using AI to help develop drugs. For example, a team at Meta, parent company of Facebook, recently developed an AI algorithm that looks at amino acid sequence information and predicts how proteins will fold with a surprising degree of accuracy.Why is that important? Going back to 10th grade biology classes, DNA is transcribed by RNA which translates the code and tells the body to produce a certain protein. Well, there are roughly 20,000 genes in the human genome, which translates to hundreds of thousands of proteins because an individual protein sequence can fold many different ways and have a great variety of combinations.Misfolded proteins can lead to disease. So, researchers at Meta, using AI tools, created a database of more than 600 million protein combinations. This database can potentially help health care professionals better understand certain diseases and develop lifesaving treatments for them — and likely get the treatments to patients faster and cheaper. Other companies are now taking what Meta did to the next level. AI engines should drive faster drug discovery, which could lead to getting medicines to market faster to treat disease.3. AI can drive productivity and disruption across industriesDrew Macklis, six years of investment industry experienceOne of the most striking developments has been the pace of progress in the AI ecosystem since the release of ChatGPT. As with prior tech platforms, the tipping point often comes when a broad base of developers starts building useful tools on top of the underlying technology.For the iPhone, this was the Apple app store, which is now home to millions of applications. ChatGPT seems to have sparked a similar explosion on top of AI foundation models, with developers now building a wide range of tools that unlock creative new use cases for AI — from drafting PowerPoint presentations, to booking travel, to ordering groceries, to online shopping.Microsoft, which has already issued a limited test release of its Bing search engine that harnesses ChatGPT, has also disclosed plans to include the technology in its widely used Office software suite, its Teams platform and its GitHub code development service.Moreover, while text-based models like ChatGPT have captured public interest, large advances are also being made in other areas, such as image-based AI models like Midjourney or coding models like Codex and AlphaCode. These further broaden the use cases of AI to larger swaths of the economy and over time can drive what can be thought of as a new version of Moore’s law for knowledge work.As part of Capital Group’s investment research into AI, I recently organized meetings with 15 chief technology officers from leading companies across industries including banking, energy, telecom, consumer goods and others. These discussions helped us form early views on how AI tools might transform parts of the economy and set expectations for adoption curves over the coming years.AI has the potential to be a transformative productivity toolSources: Capital Group, GitHub. GitHub Copilot is an artificial intelligence-powered developer tool that helps programmers by autocompleting comments and code. Figures reflect the results from a September 2022 GitHub study.While it’s clear the impacts will take time, there are long-term opportunities for improved efficiency, new products and services, and business models — all with important implications for how we might invest over the long term.What does the future of AI look like?In a publication titled, “The Age of AI has begun,” Microsoft founder Bill Gates wrote: “The development of AI is as fundamental as the creation of the microprocessor, the personal computer, the Internet and the mobile phone.” As with any leap in technological advancement, investors are prone to overestimate what is likely to happen over the next three to five years and underestimate what could happen over the next decade. But the recent developments in AI suggest we may be at the start of a cycle that could transform the technology landscape as well as the broader economy.Because of the massive amounts of data required to train AI foundation models, cloud platform giants and makers of advanced semiconductors used in data centers may see demand for their offerings rise dramatically as businesses across the entire economic landscape develop new applications for AI.Beyond obvious tech and ”knowledge” sectors, areas of potential AI application include supply chain management, insurance, oil and gas, utilities (for grid and load management) and autonomous farming. AI strategy may therefore become an increasingly important part of company analysis. What’s more, AI will also have implications for national security and the defence industry as defence companies develop autonomous planes and ships.Of course, the technology presents risks. Cybersecurity will become more challenging when artificial intelligence can mimic a human voice, for example. Chatbots thus far have been prone to hallucination, providing irrational or incorrect answers. And in a world where prediction models can create novels, poems, photos and videos, questions of ownership issues will be challenging.Just to be clear: This article was written by humans.",Artificial Intelligence
Technology investing: 3 views of tomorrow,2023-03-31T10:33:00,"High tech, high reward?It was anything but in 2022, no question about that. The crucial question for technology investors today is: Where do we go from here?“Last year investors recognized that historically low interest rates produced many excesses, including high-flying stocks without the earnings to support them,” says Carl Kawaja, portfolio manager for Capital Group Global Equity Fund™ (Canada).“That said, the fundamental tenet of buying companies whose return is going to come from generating superior growth over time still makes sense for long-term investors. You just need to be more selective today.”Indeed, many well-known technology companies have been repriced to account for a more expensive cost of capital. Going forward, proven earnings growth will likely be a bigger driver of returns, Kawaja says. The good news is that technology companies with growth potential will probably come from a broader range of industries and regions — not just the U.S.Markets are moving from narrow to broader leadershipSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor’s. As of 12/31/22. Indexed to 100 as of 1/1/05.“We're moving from what had been a very binary world — you invested in one sector and avoided others, you invested in the U.S. and avoided non-U.S. — to a more balanced environment with a broader sense of opportunity,” explains Martin Romo, portfolio manager for Capital Group U.S. Equity Fund™ (Canada).Here — Romo, Kawaja and Cheryl Frank — share their views on how technology investing is evolving, where they are looking for opportunity and how they are preparing for the next bull market.1. The AI inflection point is hereMartin Romo, portfolio manager, Capital Group U.S. Equity Fund (Canada), 31 years of investment experienceTech stocks have been punished, and in many cases that was warranted. But in some cases, I think the market is throwing out the baby with the bathwater. When nearly everyone says that the world has changed and what was true over the last 10 years can’t be true going forward — I think that is a mistake. The market may be overlooking continued strength in some well-positioned companies.What’s more, the pace of innovation around the world is picking up. Several colleagues and I recently spent a few weeks in Silicon Valley meeting with public companies and venture capital firms, and I came away believing we are at an inflection point with artificial intelligence (AI). Innovative uses of AI are happening all around.The speed of adoption for new technologies is picking upSource: Statista. As of 12/31/22. Kickstarter refers to number of backers. Airbnb refers to number of nights booked. Foursquare and Instagram refer to number of downloads.Companies like Microsoft are using AI technology to help differentiate their offerings and deliver enhanced productivity to customers. Microsoft has already issued a limited test release of its Bing search engine that harnesses ChatGPT, a chatbot developed in partnership with OpenAI. Microsoft has also disclosed plans to include the technology in its widely used Office software suite, its Teams platform and its GitHub code-development service.Wider adoption of AI technology will require massive computing power, providing tailwinds for cloud services and the semiconductor industry. Nvidia, which develops semiconductors and computing hardware, already uses AI to improve the speed of its own product development and recently disclosed an AI distribution partnership with Microsoft. Semiconductor maker Broadcom, which helped develop AI chips for Google in 2016, has since introduced more advanced AI chips.The key takeaway for me is that we are very early in the development of this technology. It feels like the early days of mobile and cloud as they entered an era of hyper-charged growth. Right now, there’s a lot of hype surrounding AI and questions about the accuracy of chatbots. Despite a challenging environment, I remain very excited about the long-term investment opportunities on the horizon.2. ‘Picks and shovels’ across industriesCheryl Frank, portfolio manager, 24 years of investment experienceOne lesson I’ve learned in my career is to closely track capital floods and droughts. When capital floods into a sector, it usually drives increased investment that can lead to opportunities for suppliers in that industry. These are what I call pick-and-shovel companies. Investors sometimes overlook these businesses, but they often have more stable cash flows and lower risk profiles compared to the companies they service.Consider how much money has flowed into health care research and development (R&D). This has been going on for a few years, but it was turbocharged during the pandemic. Pharmaceutical companies that successfully developed COVID vaccines and anti-viral treatments, such as Pfizer and Moderna, piled up cash. Much of this capital will be funneled into more R&D.Pick-and-shovel companies like Danaher and Thermo Fisher Scientific, which provide drugmakers with testing equipment, reagents and diagnostics, could see demand for their services rise as R&D investment grows.By contrast, in the energy sector we saw a years-long capital drought as energy prices touched levels near zero. Then, as soon as supplies got tight and prices rose, capital flooded back in. Record-breaking cash flow over the last 12 months has left oil producers with some of the strongest balance sheets in history.Even though energy does not belong in the technology sector, I believe there are opportunities in it. When energy companies profit, they typically expand exploration and production, which requires more machinery and services. This could be a source of growth for companies that provide technology, products and services to the industry.3. Global champions get stronger as the dollar weakensCarl Kawaja, portfolio manager, Capital Group Global Equity Fund (Canada), 36 years of investment experienceLast year, for the first time in almost a decade, U.S. stocks trailed markets in other major regions of the world. The odds that this trend can continue are reasonably good, in my view, simply because we've been in a long upcycle for U.S. stocks and the U.S. dollar.For companies outside the U.S., dollar strength tends to be a headwind. At some point, I believe the U.S. Federal Reserve will have to cut rates. And when that happens, I think we may see further dollar weakness. So I’m optimistic about the prospects for international investing.Regardless of whether economies in Europe or Asia do well, there will be great companies in those regions with solid business prospects. I often use a basketball analogy to help describe this dynamic. I’m struck by how international the National Basketball Association (NBA) has become. In a sport that was first championed in the U.S. and Canada, the NBA now features something like 120 international players from 40 countries, including some of the biggest superstars in the game.Today I think there are select companies outside the U.S. that have been waking up to their opportunity globally. They are refocusing on generating value for shareholders during a time that is much more beneficial for their currency. In other words, like basketball, the world catches up, and some of the superstar companies are based in other countries.Consider ASML, the world’s leading provider of manufacturing equipment for the most advanced semiconductors. It just happens to be based in the Netherlands. ASML has developed unique technology for making advanced chips. As its market share grew, it aggressively invested in developing its technological advantage. Right now, many chip stocks are down and the industry is struggling with oversupply. But taking a multi-year view, I think the industry is well-positioned for a strong cyclical recovery.Another example is in drug discovery. We are in the middle of a golden age of health care innovation. Many of the recent advances in treatments for cancer and pathogens like the COVID virus have been developed by U.S. companies. But there is also a Danish pharmaceutical company, Novo Nordisk, that has developed therapies to treat diabetes and obesity. Again, interest in this company has less to do with whether European markets can outpace U.S. markets and more to do with a worldwide increase in diabetes and obesity and the potential to improve patients’ lives.Why experience matters during volatile marketsAll three of these seasoned investors believe the keys to navigating volatile markets are patience, experience and a long-term perspective. “There are lots of questions today about inflation, the Fed and recession,” Romo says, “But if we look over the horizon and focus on durable investment themes over the next few years, then I see lots of opportunity ahead.Seeking to invest in companies with superior long-term prospects is as relevant today as ever.Equally or perhaps more relevant, is choosing a style-agnostic investment vehicle that has the scope of mandate and flexibility to capture tomorrow’s potential technology winners around the world.It’s also worth noting that sector-specific funds such as those that invest in technology and/or health care may — whether passive or active funds — may disappoint due to their single focus if U.S. interest rates continue to climb or, in the case of energy pick-and-shovel companies, miss opportunities altogether. Further, due to the fast-moving nature of technology itself it may prove beneficial to choose active mandates with advanced investment research capabilities as portfolio managers can increase and/or decrease exposures to certain technology industries and companies based on current and future market outlooks.",Technology & Innovation
Multinational companies can thrive in tough times,2023-03-02T01:35:00,"As an equity portfolio manager at Capital Group, I invest in many large, multinational companies. The most common question I get these days is whether I am worried about the impact of de-globalization. The risks are clear: rising U.S.-China tensions, the war in Ukraine, increasing trade barriers, broken supply chains, a painful bear market and a slowing global economy.Given the turbulence, aren’t multinational companies the most vulnerable of all?I believe the opposite is true. Simply put, multinationals are in many ways best positioned to navigate an uncertain environment and develop effective solutions to disruptions. That includes an increasingly “multi-local” approach to business, putting them closer to consumers around the world.Here are four reasons I remain optimistic that multinationals can thrive in tough times:1. Multinationals can adapt to U.S.-China tensionsWhen I first discussed this subject a few years ago, the U.S.-China trade war was just beginning to command headlines. Since then, we’ve seen many twists and turns.The two biggest economies in the world have hit each other with onerous tariffs and other trade restrictions. China has initiated more trade with Russia, despite international sanctions imposed by the U.S. and European Union following the invasion of Ukraine last year. And just a few weeks ago, the U.S. military shot down what it believed to be a spy balloon sent by China to get a glimpse of U.S. defence installations — further stressing U.S.-China relations.Beyond those immediate issues, we still have a long way to go before the U.S. and China can resolve more entrenched disputes over intellectual property theft and heavy subsidies for China’s state-owned enterprises. Those prickly issues may take years or even decades to resolve — if they get resolved at all.In the meantime, companies that conduct business all over the world are doing what they do best: finding ways to adapt and succeed regardless of growing headwinds.For example, in the computer chip industry, Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC) and chip equipment maker ASML are both expanding their operations around the world. TSMC is, rather remarkably, building new manufacturing plants in Arizona and Japan, while Netherlands-based ASML is more quietly investing to bolster its operations in Germany, Connecticut and California. As new facilities are built, Caterpillar, the world’s largest manufacturer of construction equipment, could see increased demand for its heavy duty products.These are examples of the types of companies I like to call “global champions.” As a group, they often do well in almost any environment. They can certainly weather tough times, but then they can also reposition themselves to succeed when things begin to turn around.Multinational companies have outpaced the marketSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream. The FTSE Multinationals Index comprises companies which derive more than 30% of their revenue from outside their domestic region. Data as of 1/31/23. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods. Returns are in USD.2. Experienced management teams can handle challengesWhat’s the rationale for my high level of confidence? There is a reason multinational companies have come to dominate the global economy and financial markets. For the most part, they are run by managers who are smart, tough and experienced. This isn’t their first rodeo. They have seen all types of trade environments, favourable and unfavourable. In my view, these battle-tested companies are favourably positioned to survive and even thrive in a hostile landscape.Nestlé provides a good example of how a multinational can tap into high-tech solutions to streamline its supply chain operations. In recent years, the food giant has increasingly used the blockchain — best known as the foundation of bitcoin-related technology — to enable faster, transparent and more cost-effective delivery of products. The publicly available blockchain data not only allows the company to track its supply chain sourcing in a more efficient way, it also shares the exact origin of the products customers are looking to purchase. If you want to know where those coffee beans are from, just scan a barcode and you’ll have the answer.For investors, it’s important to avoid focusing too much on the noise surrounding trade, protectionism and geopolitical conflict. It’s easy to get lost in the political rhetoric over steel or semiconductors or whatever product is targeted next. There are conflicting data points released nearly every day, and many of them are inconsequential. To the extent that these types of conflicts cause investors to shy away from multinational companies, paying too much attention to the rhetoric is detrimental to successful long-term investing.Global companies scour the world for customersSources: Capital Group, FactSet. Revenue by region is estimated by FactSet based on most recently reported figures. As of 2/24/22.3. Reshoring supply chains is likely to benefit some companiesMany global companies are establishing successful operations in local markets, rather than retreating in the face of trade barriers. More and more it is becoming crucial for multinationals to produce where they sell. To succeed, they must be able to move swiftly and respond efficiently to local competition.Most important, many global companies are moving away from single-source supply chains. Reliability and robustness are of greater importance than cost and efficiency. That means bringing some manufacturing back home, or “reshoring,” and moving some to other countries, such as India, Vietnam and Mexico.Sports apparel giant Nike optimizes this approach with its hyper-local sales initiatives. For instance, Nike has launched data-driven retail stores that stock shoes according to online buying trends in surrounding ZIP codes. It doesn’t get much more local than that. In Europe, Nike has established a speedy supply chain initiative that allows it to tailor colours and materials based on individual customer preferences in each city it operates.Visa and Mastercard are following much the same approach when it comes to electronic payment processing, which must be tailored not just to the preferences of local customers but to the strict financial regulations of governments around the world. As a result, both have grown at a healthy pace while evolving and adapting to a changing set of competitors in the fintech industry.The companies that successfully navigated the COVID crisis were able to quickly expand their online offerings, localize their supply sourcing, produce closer to where they sell and tap into multiple suppliers all over the world. This unpredictable environment played to the strength of multinational companies with the expertise, the resources and the money to adapt at a moment’s notice.A new breed of multinational companies has arrived4. Global champions thrive in emerging marketsIn many ways, a multi-local strategy is crucial for companies based in the U.S., Europe and Japan that are looking to stay relevant or expand into faster growing emerging markets. Many of those countries — China, India, Brazil, etc. — are nurturing their own multinational giants, as well as smaller, single-country-focused competitors and not waiting for the traditional global players to catch up.For example, Mercado Libre — often referred to as “the Amazon.com of Latin America” — has done a remarkable job of defending its territory from the exact company it is so often compared to. One of Mercado Libre’s chief advantages is a more aggressive use of third-party sellers, many of which are based in Latin America, giving local customers greater access to locally sourced goods though a fast, efficient online platform.A significant risk for some large multinationals is that they could be “leapfrogged” by smaller competitors who are more in touch with local markets. In my view, that dynamic is a bigger threat than any geopolitical or trade-related issue.Emerging markets consumers are looking for brands they can trust and companies that know the local marketplace. Large multinationals that can break themselves down, think locally, act nimbly and launch products quickly are more likely to succeed in the long run.In the meantime, this shifting global landscape is good news for stock pickers with a penchant for fundamental research. Not every company will get it right, and it’s our job to separate the ones that can from those that cannot.If you are willing to embrace short-term discomfort for long-term benefit, it’s a great time to be an active investor.",Global Equities
5 trends driving energy markets in 2023,2023-02-15T10:30:00,"Is there more fuel in the tank for energy stocks?That’s the question on many investors’ minds as the energy sector solidly outpaced all others over the past two years. Historically, the trajectory of oil prices has been a good gauge of prospects for the sector, as the price directly impacts many companies’ bottom lines. But thus far in 2023, there appear to be some deviations from this tried-and-true correlation. In fact, oil prices took a tumultuous ride last year, recently returning to near where they started in 2022. In contrast, energy stocks continue to mostly hold onto their gains.1.  Will the bull run for oil equities continue?We believe we’re in the early stages of a multiyear bull run for oil stocks. That does not mean the energy sector — led by oil stocks — will move in a straight line. Amid long uptrends, there are also mini-cycles, some lasting months to a year or more, in which short-term factors outweigh longer term supply-demand trends. Nevertheless, we see investment opportunities over the next three to five years.China’s reopening and lifting of COVID-19 restrictions is likely to push oil demand to new highs, with the International Energy Agency (IEA) forecasting an increase of nearly 2 million barrels per day. Meanwhile, there is a structural supply shortage due to many years of underinvestment in new capacity by oil companies, production cuts from the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC+) with output undershooting supply targets, and declining U.S. shale inventories. It will take a number of years before we see supply catch up with demand. Together these factors should be supportive of oil prices above US$70 per barrel.Analysis of prior energy equity bull markets (we show Canada, as an example, in the chart below) suggests we may still be in the early innings of a positive rerating for the sector. Supported by higher energy prices, companies in the sector generated a record-breaking estimated US$1.4 trillion of free cash flow (FCF) in 2022. Valuations remain attractive across a number of metrics including price-to-earnings and price-to-book ratios. And the resilience of oil stocks in the face of falling oil prices over the last three months suggests investors are looking past any near-term weakness in the underlying commodity price.Energy equity bull markets have often shown staying powerSources: Bloomberg, Peters & Co. Limited, S&P/TSX (Canada) Composite Index performance. Data as of January 25, 2023.2.  What are top spending priorities for oil companies?The industry business model has largely pivoted from a focus on high growth and reinvestment in production to a focus on higher dividend payouts and more capital discipline. This has been one of the most pronounced changes we’ve seen in our lifetime. And this trend looks set to continue. Record-breaking cash flow over the last 12 months has left oil producers with some of the strongest balance sheets in history. Nearly 40% of executives from the top 100 oil and gas companies in the U.S. indicated debt reduction and shareholder returns as their top capital allocation priorities, according to a 2022 study by Deloitte.The shortening and steepening of the cost curve is benefiting oil producersSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg, Goldman Sachs. Data as of April 2022.The cost curve indicates how much oil would be produced for a given price — a function of determining profitability for producers above the breakeven cost of drilling a new oil well. Short and steep cost curves generally enable producers to generate higher profits. Kboe/d = thousand barrels of oil equivalent per dayThis renewed focus on shareholder returns has emerged because investors are demanding capital discipline. Investors who are willing to engage now are pressing for dividends and share buybacks rather than reinvestment at higher prices. It is likely going to be another 12 to 18 months before we see producers start to reinvest in their businesses while still maintaining a sharp focus on capital discipline and return on investment.Supply-demand dynamics also support a higher oil price. It will take years for supply to catch up with demand as illustrated by widening OPEC+ production deficits and forecasted dwindling global spare capacity. Of the major oil-producing countries, Saudi Arabia could increase capacity by a million barrels per day and the United Arab Emirates by another million. But it would take years to build out that capacity, and U.S. production is slowing quite quickly. Taken together, there’s just not enough oil to bolster global supply.Moreover, exploration costs are going up. Higher quality oil reserves have been used up, and further exploration is getting more expensive and requires greater expertise as drilling goes further afield. U.S. exploration and production companies lack the expertise for advanced exploration and will likely have to acquire companies that know how to tap into these oil fields to bring new supply to market. Additionally, oil services costs have risen with inflation. The higher cost structure is impacting the entire industry but will most acutely affect smaller companies with fewer resourcing options.Taking demand and supply dynamics into consideration, in our view, US$70 per barrel of oil is a floor that should hold under most scenarios, and our analysis shows this would allow the major oil companies to maintain profitability, even when factoring in inflation and higher costs of production.3.  What is the impact of the U.S. Inflation Reduction Act on energy companies?The Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 is a landmark piece of U.S. legislation. The bill directs US$369 billion in federal funding to clean energy tax incentives, loans, and consumer and commercial subsidies that have the potential to make the return profile more compelling for investments in areas such as carbon sequestration and the build-out of clean hydrogen infrastructure.Over the next decade, the legislation could help to unleash a wave of capital expenditure. Oil and gas companies alongside chemicals and auto manufacturers are just a few potential beneficiaries. Only a handful of the U.S. supermajors have scalable low-carbon projects underway, but the subsidies in the Inflation Reduction Act are likely to move others off the sidelines.Amid the optimism, it’s fair to say that some firms are proceeding cautiously, mindful that policy priorities could adjust with changes in the balance of political power. The Biden administration is supportive of investment in renewables; however, if there is a change in administration in the next election or if energy prices become too high, priorities could easily shift back in favor of fossil fuels to help lower costs.4.  How do European and U.S. companies differ in their approaches to decarbonization?Oil and gas companies, regardless of region, are seeking new ways to reduce emissions in their operations. One of the key drivers of this change in behaviour has been the proliferation of net-zero targets, where the amount of human-produced greenhouse gas emissions is balanced by an equal reduction.European oil and gas companies are proactively seeking replacements for their fossil fuel businesses, while U.S. companies are primarily focused on how to remove carbon from their existing businesses. They are leveraging tactics such as carbon sequestration — in which carbon dioxide is removed from the atmosphere and held in solid or liquid form — rather than looking to diversify their energy mix.European supermajors are investing more capital into low-carbon investmentsSource: InfluenceMap. Data as of September 2022.Capital expenditure figures are taken from information disclosed directly by the company. It is noted that investments dedicated to transitioning away from fossil fuels are likely lower, as several companies include fossil gas-related activities in their “low-carbon” capex.Like their U.S. counterparts, European firms are incentivized by new legislation. The REPowerEU plan, adopted by the European Commission in March 2022, directs nearly €210 billion in new investments toward clean energy in the European Union. The bill finances new energy partnerships with renewable and low-carbon gas suppliers, as well as clean hydrogen projects and solar and wind build-outs.Failure to invest now in renewable infrastructure results in the risk of companies being disrupted later on. And it’s not just a matter of environmental, social and governance concerns. There’s a risk of market share loss as overall demand for renewables increases.5.  Where do you see areas of relative value?There’s a fairly widespread view that production costs in the Canadian oil sands, located in the Alberta region, are high. But the facts on the ground are changing. The cost of oil production there has declined over the last two decades. The long-life, low-decline nature of these assets means the capital intensity required to maintain operations is comparatively low versus U.S. peers, and it enables high free cash flow generation, which is cash flow in excess of the company’s operating and capital expenses. In addition, the Canadian oil sands stocks often trade at valuation discounts to the U.S. exploration and production peer group, and that is due in part to environmental concerns and the high carbon intensity of production per barrel.Lower capital intensity for the Canadian oil sands supports high free cash flow conversionSources: Company filings and Capital Group analysis. Free cash flow conversion is a ratio that indicates how much cash is available to a company after covering its operating and capital expenses, an indication of its capital intensity. Defined here as free cash flow divided by cash flow from operations.Companies highlighted: Canadian oils sands (IMO = Imperial Oil; CNQ = Canadian Natural Resources Limited; CVE = Cenovus Energy; SU = Suncor Energy). S&P 500 exploration and production (OXY = Occidental Petroleum Corporation; COP = ConocoPhillips; DVN = Devon Energy Corporation; CTRA = Coterra Energy; MRO = Marathon Oil Corporation; APA = APA Corporation; FANG = Diamondback Energy; PXD = Pioneer Natural Resources Company; EOG = EOG Resources; EQT = EQT Corporation; HES = Hess Corporation).The management teams of select U.S. and European oil giants are operating with the strongest capital discipline seen in decades, and dividends offer some cushion for investors even if oil prices soften from here. The supermajors may benefit from higher-for-longer oil and gas prices supporting upstream exploration and production companies — in addition to record high downstream refining margins that purely upstream companies do not have exposure to. On a valuation basis, the European supermajors trade at a wider-than-usual discount versus their U.S. peers on price-to-earnings multiples, despite very similar business characteristics.European supermajors trade at a significant discount to their American rivalsSource: Bloomberg. Data as of January 25, 2023.",Energy
"Global energy: Upcycles, mini-cycles and opportunities",2023-02-03T10:42:00,"Is there more fuel in the tank for energy stocks?That’s the question on many investors’ minds after the energy sector solidly outpaced all others over the past two years. Historically, the trajectory of oil prices has been a good rule of thumb to gauge the prospects of the sector as the price of the commodity directly impacts many companies’ bottom lines. But last year some cracks appeared in this tried-and-true correlation. In fact, oil prices were on a wild ride throughout 2022 with end-of-year prices near where they started. In contrast, energy stocks continued to hold on to much of the gains.What’s more, the gains were not confined to North America or Europe. The energy sector did, in fact, lead all sectors, across all regions around the world except emerging markets.Energy surgeOne-year global energy sector returns as of December 31, 2022 (local currency)Source: Capital Group.Can the up cycle continue?“I believe we’re in the early stages of a multi-year bull run for oil,” says energy analyst Craig Beacock, who recently returned from Saudi Arabia and Dubai to meet with energy companies and government officials.Energy bull markets have displayed staying powerEnergy sector performance through prior upcyclesSource: Bloomberg, Peters & Co. Limited.The chart above highlights four previous energy up cycles, which have historically lasted many years, with the current, potential one starting in March 2020.That does not mean the energy sector — led by oil stocks — will move up in a straight line. Beacock anticipates periods when the energy sector loses steam and heads downward or simply moves sideways.“Amid long, uptrends there are also mini-cycles — some lasting monthss or even or a year or more — when short-term supply/demand trends outweigh longer-term supply/demand trends,” he says. An example of a short-term supply/demand trend may be upon us, he continues, if the U.S. and/or global economy enters recession in 2023. There are other uncertainties as well: a price cap on Russian oil imposed by Western countries and energy windfall taxes imposed by the U.K. and other European countries. The European Union is the latest to tax oil groups with a new levy taking effect December 31 of last year although it’s being challenged in court. Depending on the outcomes of these uncertainties, Beacock says the global energy sector, or certain companies within it, may be challenged in the short term.Long time horizonsNevertheless, he sees ample opportunity in the sector for investors with long time horizons of three-to-five years. Beacock’s bullishness stems from a range of factors but the war in Ukraine is not one of them. Evidence of a lack of impact stemming from the war can be found in two places. The first is the price of oil, which roughly sits where it started prior to Russia’s invasion, and the second is the uninterrupted flow of oil out of the country.“Russian oil supply has not changed materially since Ukraine was invaded,” he says.What has changed is more structural in nature. Structural in the sense that global spare capacity has not increased to the degree required to meet future needs. That will, anticipates Beacock, impact oil supply in the coming years as illustrated by widening OPEC+ production deficits and dwindling forecasted global spare capacity. Of the major producing oil countries, Beacock estimates Saudi Arabia could increase capacity by a million barrels per day and the United Arab Emirates by another million barrels a day. But it would take years to build-out the capacity and U.S. production is slowing quite quickly. Taken together, there’s just not that much oil to bolster global supply in the days ahead.Shortfall between production and OPEC+ targets have grownThe left chart shows widening gaps between OPEC+ targets and production rates. Source: International Energy Authority. Data as of September 2022. The right chart shows dwindling global spare capacity. Source: U.S. Energy Administration, Refinitiv. Data as of November 2022.One of the root causes is the fall off in re-investment and total industry capital expenditures over the last 10 years. During the last upcycle (1999-2009) there was a tremendous amount of spending on exploration, site development and ultimately new production. These investments were not, however, rewarded in the marketplace primarily due to the advent of fracking south of the border. The new technology quickly stabilized the supply/demand imbalance through much of the last decade.“There was a tremendous amount of capital destruction last time around, so investors are pressing companies to return this money to them via increased dividends and share buybacks rather than funding new capital expenditures (capex),” says Beacock. Total industry capex used to be measured at about a trillion U.S. dollars annually. “Now we’re down to about US$350 to US$400 billion.ESG pressuresIn addition to the lack of new capex, environmental, social and governance factors have also played a role. There is, according to Beacock, pressure to invest less in fossil fuel businesses and more in lower carbon energy sources. The movement is particularly strong in Europe versus Canada and the U.S., which may or may not prove to be an advantage for overseas companies in the years to come.European supermajors investing more capital into low carbonSource: InfluenceMap. Percentage of projected ""Low Carbon"" investments in 2022 CAPEX per company.ESG aside, oil consumption remains below pre-COVID levels primarily due to the still recovering international travel sector and the unwinding of lockdown effects in China, which closed the country for almost three years. In fact, S&P estimates Chinese energy demand will grow 3.3 million barrels of oil equivalent per day upon full opening after virtually no growth in 2022. The road back to China’s previous consumption levels may, however, be bumpy as infections and hospitalizations are on rise as the country dismantles its zero-COVID policy. Nevertheless, it stands to reason that when both China and travel return to historical rates of consumption, oil markets may further tighten.Higher oil prices are not expected to have much of an impact on capacity either as demonstrated in the inelasticity of supply to price, certainly over more recent periods. Oil supply is, in other words, unlikely to dramatically increase even at high prices, which is illustrated in the cost-curves below. Longer, flatter lines show little economic profit for producers while short, steep cost curves enable producers to generate higher profits.The shorter, steeper cost curve will continue to benefit producersSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg, Goldman Sachs. Data as of April 2022. kboe/d = thousand barrels of oil equivalent per day. Short and steep cost curves generally enable producers to generate higher profits.Low sector valuationsDemand/supply dynamics aside, there are other fundamental reasons to be optimistic on oil says Beacock. He cites historically low, single-digit valuations in the energy companies themselves and their relatively small weight on global benchmarks such as the S&P 500. From a high of about 18% of the S&P 500 market cap during the last upcycle to a low of about 2% when oil fell to near zero a barrel, the current weight has rebounded to approximately 5%.Energy weight in the S&P 500 remains near multi-decade lowsSource: Capital Group, Standard & Poor’s. As of October 2022.OpportunitiesAgainst this backdrop, Beacock has favourable outlooks on select energy companies around the world with various Canadian oil producers ranking high. Fundamentally, he sees attractive valuations, strong balance sheets, record free cash flow and a focus on shareholder returns. Canadian oil producers are also largely insulated from Russian oil price caps and/or windfall taxes which removes two uncertainties, he adds. Regarding the oil sands themselves, Beacock says they’re long duration assets with low depletion rates that can continue to produce for decades unlike many shale companies that have much shorter reserve lives and face depletion challenges.He’s also positive on some energy companies south of the border where there’s a larger investment eco-system. In general, U.S. companies would include oil and natural gas producers. There may also be opportunities in equipment and service suppliers to the energy complex in both traditional “picks and shovels” companies and others supporting energy transition.  Energy transition is clearly underway, accelerated most recently by the U.S. Inflation Reduction Act of 2022. The act is designed to help drive clean energy transition through incentivizing private investment and has allocated US$369 billion in clean energy spending according to U.S. Congress figures. As this transition takes shape, investment opportunities may be found in both traditional energy sources (for example to support base load electricity production) as well as in the build out of renewables.In Europe, the short-term outlook is somewhat murkier due to outside forces (price caps and windfall taxes), but the EU is also making substantial investments in energy transition with an estimated 210 billion euros earmarked for clean energy. Also noteworthy is the EU’s commitment to end its dependence on Russian fossil fuels by 2030, which points to the growing potential of European oil supermajors due to energy security.Investment implicationsAmid the fluid geopolitical and economic environment, an active approach relying on deeply researched, company-by-company analysis may serve investors well.“Global energy investing is not nearly as straightforward or simple as it used to be,” says investment specialist Kathrin Forrest. An investment mandate that has the flexibility to invest globally and look at implications across related sectors and industries may be advantageous, she says. It not only enables portfolio managers to take advantage of opportunities around the world but also adds greater diversification benefits to an overall portfolio.“There are also investment opportunities in companies related to energy that may be overlooked in sector-specific investment vehicles,” she says.As of December 31, 2022, the energy sector was well-represented in select Capital Group Canada mandates. At year-end 2022 energy holdings were the second-largest weight in Capital Group Canadian Focused Equity FundTM(Canada) and the sixth in Capital Group Global Equity FundTM(Canada).",Energy
China: What could drive its markets in 2023,2023-01-31T12:07:00,"As nearly three years of lockdowns come to an end in China, will 2023 be a turning point for equity investors?Without a doubt, China’s equity risk premium is higher than other markets. As investment professionals with more than 25 years of experience investing in China, we believe the higher premium is due to the government’s repeated intervention and influence in the economy and markets, as well as geopolitical uncertainty. We also recognize that China’s economic recovery could be uneven and trade-related tensions with the U.S. will likely persist.However, China’s equities markets have been rallying this year on the country’s abrupt departure from strict COVID policies. Some sectors have been buoyed by more supportive measures for the property market and encouraging regulatory developments for technology companies. We’ve learned from experience that volatility can mask buying opportunities in China. We believe this could be one of those times, particularly for select companies well-positioned for an economic rebound, but also for those that remain aligned with the Common Prosperity goals of the administration.Here are a few themes to consider for investing in China and why we are constructive:1. Reopening could be a positive catalyst for valuationsChina’s departure from its zero-COVID policy removes a headwind to stocks and could be a catalyst for a positive rerating of Chinese equities. The MSCI China Index has already surged more than 50% (as of January 23) after reaching a multiyear low October 31, 2022, and we believe it has more room to run. Valuations for almost all sectors are still trading below their 10-year average on a consensus price-to-earnings (P/E) basis for the next 12 months. We don’t anticipate the market will rally indefinitely, but we sense downside risks have lessened, given that sentiment had become so dire since 2021.The ability for people to move more freely should trigger a change in consumer behaviour and lead to a recovery in domestic consumption. Beneficiaries of this shift will likely be hotel companies, online travel firms, airport operators and luxury goods makers. Airports are busy again as people seek to travel inside and outside the country. There’s been a surge in hotel bookings in China’s larger cities, and consumers are flocking back to shopping malls.Many sectors trade at steep discountsSources: MSCI, RIMES. Forward price-to-earnings ratio reflects the current share price relative to the consensus estimate for earnings per share on a forward 12-month basis. Data as of November 30, 2022.Increased mobility may also benefit certain financial services providers whose sales agents rely on face-to-face meetings to drive new business. Casino operators in Macau, where travel is opening up after heavy restrictions, could benefit too.We think a cyclical recovery could boost the outlook for China’s larger banks, which on a P/E basis currently trade for three or four times consensus earnings expectations for the next 12 months. Valuations for Chinese banks have been depressed for many years. But they compressed further in 2022 on China’s weak growth and liquidity crunch in the property market.2. Government is committed to stabilizing the property marketAs part of its message that “housing is for living, not for speculation,” Beijing has sought to contain the rapid appreciation in residential property prices and reduce excess leverage. However, its various policy decisions have not always had the intended outcome. Many property developers are struggling financially, some have defaulted on debt payments, and homebuyers have become more cautious.Recent actions have made it clear that the government recognizes it has to fix the property sector, which represents about 25% of GDP and roughly 60% of household balance sheets. Authorities have provided hundreds of billions of dollars to help complete unfinished projects, loosened down-payment requirements and lowered mortgage rates. These measures, among others, should help restore consumer confidence and minimize bankruptcies. We think government leaders have little choice but to keep introducing new polices to bolster the property market until they can rectify the situation.Homebuying in China has slumpedSource: Capital Group, National Bureau of Statistics of China, Refinitiv Datastream. China home sales above are represented by the quarterly sales volume of commercial residential buildings in current prices. As of December 31, 2022.After what is likely to be wave of consolidation and limitations on development, the property market will likely become a smaller part of the economy longer term. It should also be operated more sensibly and far less on speculation. Volume growth will likely be more measured and selling prices more constrained to make housing more affordable. This could be an opportunity for higher quality developers who have maintained stronger balance sheets to gain market share and consolidate their leadership positions.3. Regulatory fog is clearing over China’s tech sectorThe most stringent policy measures to curb overreach in China’s technology sector may be behind us. These were aimed at controlling excesses in the private economy and curbing monopolistic behaviour. Moving forward, it’s clear growth for technology companies will be more constrained due to regulation but also because the industry has matured.Valuations for internet-related companies remain depressed by historical standards. The downside seems more limited now assuming conservative earnings growth. But we do not expect a significant rerating for these companies, because revenue growth rates probably won’t reach 30% to 40% again.On the upside, the regulatory environment appears to be improving. For example, Tencent and NetEase have received long-awaited approvals for new video game licenses. Ant Group, whose high-profile initial public offering was halted in 2020, was recently allowed to start raising capital from new investors.Government regulators reportedly plan to take special 1% equity stakes (known as “golden shares”) in units of Tencent and Alibaba, similar to those taken at TikTok owner ByteDance and Weibo, China’s version of Twitter. We think this signals that Beijing’s rectification process is nearing an end.How much risk is priced in? Tech valuations have compressedMSCI, RIMES. Forward price-to-earnings ratio reflects the current share price relative to the consensus estimate for earnings per share on a forward 12-month basis. Data as of November 30, 2022.China’s internet giants have narrowed their business focus and adjusted their cost structures by exiting business lines and laying off employees. They’ve also made a massive shift in expansion and growth strategies. Instead of seeking out large-scale acquisitions, they have divested from equity stakes in other tech firms and used excess cash to buy back shares or pay special dividends to shareholders.We believe that innovation will also continue to drive growth. China’s video game platforms, payment systems and e-commerce have been areas of tremendous innovation over the past decade, and this should continue to drive growth. As many companies find a new rhythm in the evolved regulatory regime, we expect new technologies to be new sources of revenues and earnings.4. Beijing needs more growth to support policy agendaIt’s our belief that China wants a growing and dynamic economy characterized by a significant degree of innovation. We believe Communist Party leaders know this cannot be accomplished by state-owned businesses alone and that private enterprise is needed to achieve long-term economic goals.China’s equity risk premium (an excess return that investing in stocks can provide over a risk-free rate typically represented by Treasuries) is higher than other markets, but there are reasons to consider investing: China is a large domestic market. Its population is getting older and wealthier, creating the need for a better health care system and a wide range of consumer and financial services. Swings in market sentiment have not changed these realities in our view.China’s biopharmaceutical industry, which is closely aligned with the government’s domestic policy agenda, is a longer term potential opportunity with a long runway for growth. Several well-capitalized companies are developing innovative drugs that have the potential to be sold around the world. Multinationals have also partnered with Chinese firms such as BeiGene and Innovent to develop new drugs and sell them in China’s large market.China also wants to bolster its manufacturing prowess and retain dominance in certain areas of the global supply chain, such as electric vehicles (EVs). China has become a global leader in battery development, a key supplier of other materials and a large EV manufacturer in its own right.Stock picking in China has been crucial over the past decadeMSCI, RIMES. Data reflects price level on net basis. As of December 31, 2022.5. A reset in U.S-China relationsThere have been steps in the right direction to help reset relations between the U.S. and China, which could help alleviate pressure on Chinese assets.Presidents Joe Biden and Xi Jinping held constructive talks at November’s G-20 meeting. U.S. audit regulators were granted deeper access to inspect the books of Chinese companies that trade on U.S. stock exchanges, helping ease concerns that the companies could be delisted. Chinese biopharmaceutical companies were also removed from the U.S. Commerce Department’s unverified list regarding access to facility inspections.Of course, China’s strategy and approach to Taiwan remain the biggest unknown and risk.Overall direction looking more positiveWe think we are past the point of peak pessimism on China. The reopening of the economy will be a catalyst to stimulate domestic consumption, which should provide a boost to many other areas, even though the overall nominal GDP growth rate may remain muted. From our experience investing in China, the bull phase is not as strong as investor enthusiasm, and the bottom is not as deep as investors fear.No doubt there will be ongoing geopolitical and economic uncertainties, but as the world’s second largest economy reopens, we also see many investment opportunities. Companies tapping into travel, entertainment, higher quality goods, better health care, technology innovation and renewable energy could be long-term beneficiaries. Current valuations provide good entry points for many of them. But in China as much as in any market, fundamental research and a deep knowledge of companies are a must for successful investing and determining the appropriate level of exposure.",China
4 trends could power an industrial renaissance,2023-01-19T11:37:00,"Weighing in at 1.37 million pounds and with tires twice the height of a grown man, Caterpillar’s 797 trucks are a sight to behold.On a recent research trip, members of Capital Group’s investment team watched firsthand as a 797 hauled tons of material from an oil sand field in northern Alberta, Canada, to be processed into oil.You won’t likely glimpse one of these massive vehicles on the road. But many more such trucks may soon be rolling off the assembly line amid rising demand for new sources of energy and rare minerals to produce batteries for electric vehicles and power storage operations.The race to find new energy sources is one of four major trends reshaping the world’s economies and markets: Energy transition in the U.S., energy security in Europe, reshoring supply chains and rising defence spending. These multi-year trends are setting the stage for a capital investment super-cycle that could drive opportunity for a wide range of industrial companies, lower U.S. energy costs and help revive American manufacturing.“Well-positioned industrial companies — from capital equipment suppliers to aerospace and defense companies — are enablers of these trends, and leading companies across many of these industries may be poised for a period of sustained growth,” says equity investment analyst Gigi Pardasani, who covers U.S. large-cap industrials.Here, Pardasani, equity portfolio manager Andrew Suzman and equity analyst Dominic Phillips share their perspective on the potential for a coming industrial renaissance.1. Powering the U.S. energy transitionGrowth in renewable energy has been an investment theme for at least a decade, thanks to the declining cost of renewable power. Last year renewable energy surpassed coal power in the U.S., with wind, solar and hydropower generating 22% of the country’s electricity.With the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 and the Infrastructure and Investment Jobs Act enacted in 2021, the U.S. federal government has dedicated hundreds of billions of dollars in tax and fiscal incentives for infrastructure and expansion of a U.S. renewable energy industry.“We think about renewable energy a lot in terms of the electric car, but power consumption in factories and businesses is a huge piece of that transition,” says Phillips, an equity investment analyst who covers U.S. technology systems, utilities and renewables. “Today, the transition to renewables makes economic sense for energy companies, consumers and the broader U.S. economy. And these incentives provide investors long-term visibility into a declining cost curve and capital expenditure (capex) spending growth.”The U.S. has committed billions for infrastructure and renewable energySources: Capital Group, Congressional Budget Office (CBO). Figures above reflect total estimated federal outlays from the CBO as compiled by Capital Group. Totals may not add up due to rounding. CBO estimates for both bills are as of August 2022.These laws provide funding to modernize the power grid, build high voltage transmission lines and mine the rare minerals needed to manufacture batteries for storing variable energy sources like wind and solar. “Collectively these steps will generate potential demand for a range of electrical equipment makers, as well as industrial conglomerates that offer a wide range of services and developers of advanced battery energy storage systems,” says Pardasani.What is still underappreciated, though, is just how transformative this ultimately could be for U.S. manufacturing and the broader economy.Unlike coal or natural gas, renewables like wind and solar power have essentially zero variable costs. “Once you build out the infrastructure, there's only some small maintenance costs attached to it,” explains Phillips. “This could effectively collapse the price of power in the U.S. and provide a major competitive advantage to a wide range of manufacturers from steel to textiles to consumer goods to chemicals.”This in turn could have a positive impact on U.S. GDP growth. The potential collapse in power prices represents a huge productivity jump, according to Pardasani. “That’s because power is the number one fixed-cost input to a manufacturer, to oil and gas extraction, and to metals and mining,” she says. “Paying potentially 90% lower power costs will enable massive productivity and margin gains that can be recycled into higher wages and more capital investments. I can see ‘Made in the USA’ becoming a byword for growth again.”2. Seeking energy security in EuropeEurope has been ahead of the U.S. in transitioning to renewable energy, but now faces the challenge of securing its supply amid the war in Ukraine, as Russia has effectively cut off oil and gas to Europe. “Today, we are in a global energy crisis, and it is most acutely felt in Europe,” says Phillips.The result has been a renewed focus on energy security. Countries in Europe are seeking to rely less on unstable regimes and seek out other sources.Liquid natural gas producers could be clear beneficiaries of this sea change — particularly U.S.-based liquefied natural gas (LNG) companies, which are among the lowest cost producers in the world.Cheniere Energy, for example, recently announced it will spend US$8 billion over the next three years to expand its massive LNG facility in Corpus Christi, Texas. More than 70% of Cheniere’s supplies are now headed for Europe, up from roughly 40% a year ago. “Many countries have come to realize that their national security depends on stable energy streams,” says equity portfolio manager Andrew Suzman, “It’s going to have a lot of implications for the energy sector as well as the industrial companies needed to build the infrastructure.”For example, Caterpillar makes pipelayers and other materials used to help transport natural gas from its source to a facility and ultimately offshore. “The company offers machinery and vehicles that can help with both energy security needs and the energy transition,” says Pardasani.3. Reshoring supply chainsJust as many countries are seeking greater security in their energy supply, many companies are improving the security of their supply chains by rebuilding them closer to home and end markets.Decades of globalization to maximize efficiency and minimize cost left many companies exposed to broken supply chains caused by COVID lockdowns and rising geopolitical tensions between the U.S. and China.Companies across a range of industrial sectors could participate in aninfrastructure build-outSources: Capital Group, The Global Industry Classification Standard (GICS), MSCI. Company examples reflect some of the largest constituents (ranked by descending market value) within the MSCI All Country World Index that fall into GICS sub-industries that supply products and/or services aligned with the factors expected to contribute to capital expenditures listed above. As of 1/17/23.The pandemic served as a wake-up call, as government shutdowns resulted in snarled supply chains that lasted well beyond the reopening of economies. Companies began to recognize the importance of more local suppliers as well as the wisdom of sacrificing maximum efficiency in favor of some redundancy in case of future breakdowns.“Manufacturers realized that they needed more resilience, which is to say visibility into their supply chain, the flexibility to change over the types of production and remote monitoring,” Pardasani says. “Resilience also means backup plans in case something happens to the facility, a supplier or employees.”In January, Korean solar panel company Hanwha Q CELLS disclosed plans to construct a US$2.5 billion manufacturing complex in Georgia. And last December Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC) disclosed plans to spend US$12 billion to build a second chip factory in Arizona, scheduled to be in operation in 2024. TSMC is also building a semiconductor plant in Japan and has plans to make infrastructure investments in EuropeIntel is building a research facility near Plateau de Saclay, France. The company had disclosed that France will become its European headquarters for high performance computing and artificial intelligence design. And Europe itself has recently opened LNG terminals on Germany’s north coast to receive imports from the U.S. and elsewhere.As companies build new factories, they seek to offset some of those costs by adopting the latest and most efficient technology. For example, Japanese industrial company Keyence develops automation sensors, vision systems and measuring instruments for a range of manufacturing operations, and SMC produces pneumatic and electric automation equipment.In the U.S., Rockwell Automation provides controls, software and automation equipment for a wide range of factories, including many automakers. “Rockwell has a particular presence in solar energy,” Pardasani says. “So they’re seeking to do for solar what they’ve already done for the auto industry.”4. Rising defence spendingIn addition to driving the need for reshoring supply chains, geopolitical tensions are fueling an increase in defence spending around the world. The war in Ukraine underscores a trend that has been growing for years. Several major developed nations, including Germany, Japan and others, have disclosed plans to significantly increase defence budgets.The U.S. continues to take steps to help its allies in Europe and Asia defend themselves. The Biden administration recently asked Congress for approval to sell US$20 billion in F-16 fighter jets to Turkey and sought approval for a similar deal to sell F-35 fighters to Greece. In December, Raytheon Technologies began supplying Ukraine and other European nations with defence equipment.“We are living in a world with heightened geopolitical tensions,” says Suzman. “While this is unfortunate, it presents opportunity for well-managed defence contractors. I believe we will see defence budgets rise from here.”Of course, not all defence companies are equal, nor will all necessarily benefit — the key is to understand which have the most effective innovations, are best positioned to execute on their business plans and overcome challenges like supply chain issues.Defence spending is on the rise amid growing global tensionsSources: Capital Group, Stockholm International Peace Research Institute (SIPRI). Worldwide defence spending estimates are from SIPRI and are expressed in constant U.S. dollars, indexed to 2020. As of December 31, 2021.Bottom line: a rising capex tide could lift many ships“In stark contrast to a lot of the gloom in news headlines, I view this as a time for optimism and excitement for industrials, even if there is a recession,” says Pardasani.Arguably, industrials have already been through recession. “While the digital and service sectors thrived post pandemic, companies that produce hard assets have been in crisis with lockdowns, trouble retaining employees, skyrocketing costs and supply chain woes,” adds Pardasani. “Today, many of the best-positioned companies are attractively valued and stand to benefit from a period of strong growth.”Rising capital spending could spark an industrial renaissanceSources: Capital Group, FactSet, MSCI. In current U.S. dollars. All figures represent estimates from FactSet, including projected figures for 2023–2024, as of January 10, 2023. ""Other sectors"" above include combined estimated capital expenditures across consumer staples, health care, real estate and financials.The potential long-term benefits reach beyond the industrials sector. Nimble companies across power generation, metals and mining, energy and manufacturing that make the right investments could enjoy a sustained growth cycle.“For more than a decade, as investors focused on technology and digital consumer businesses, companies often viewed major capital investment initiatives as a negative, but you can’t build the new economy without old industries,” stresses Pardasani. “Many people may be underestimating the potential of large-scale capital expenditures today to drive profit growth for years to come.”",Global Equities
Dividends: Building resilience in a new market reality,2022-11-01T10:25:00,"The market pivot away from growth stocks over the past year has brought the dividend component of  total stock returns back into focus. Dividend-payers in the S&P 500 Index have outpaced the broader market by a significant margin over the past 12 months. With the U.S. Federal Reserve intent on tightening monetary policy to contain inflation, investors will likely continue to be less willing to pay up for high-multiple stocks and dividends should remain in focus.We asked two of our portfolio managers to share their thoughts. Alan Berro and Will Robbins have experience managing strategies with a focus on dividends and preservation of capital, and they discuss here how they are navigating the current investing environment and offer their medium-term outlook.1. Looking for near-term visibility of cash flow and earningsFor now, we prefer companies where there is greater visibility on near-term cash flows and earnings, and sufficient pricing power to help blunt the impact of inflation. We see opportunities across industries within energy, industrials and health care.So long as the cash flows and earnings are visible and can easily support the dividend, we prefer to continue to hold them in these portfolios. Johnson & Johnson is an example of a company that has spanned the value and growth spectrum. It has continued to deliver on its three business lines: pharmaceuticals, medical devices and consumer products. Its acquisition strategy has expanded its portfolio of innovative products, and it’s been a consistent dividend payer.Dividends can be an important component of total returnSource: Standard and Poor’s. Data as of September 30, 2022. Returns are in USD.The repricing that we are seeing in many traditional areas of growth — such as software, social media, digital payments and semiconductors — could create select opportunities for us, though valuations and fundamentals may not be there yet. We will need to see business models adjust to the new reality of higher interest rates, scarcer availability of capital, re-adjustment of supply chains and higher labour costs.The sustainability of the dividend matters to us. In the past decade of a growth-led market, corporate management teams juggled between share buybacks and paying a dividend as a way to allocate excess cash. Where appropriate, we are encouraging companies to maintain or grow the dividend.Once established, managements are reluctant to cut the dividend. Therefore, we find that dividends impose a level of discipline on management teams in how they manage their capital structure. Many investors know this, but it’s worth restating that over the past 96 years, about 38% of the total return in USD for the S&P 500 Index has come from dividends.We are not dogmatic about the growth-value divide. Many well-known companies have swung between value and growth over the past two decades. Home Depot and UnitedHealth Group are two examples. Over the years, we have invested in select companies with lower price-to-earnings multiples and have held them in our dividend-oriented strategies even as valuation multiples expanded, if the combination of business fundamentals and the dividend continued to provide an attractive total return proposition.Stocks can shift between value and growth classificationsSources: Capital Group, FactSet. Graphic shows examples of companies that have been classified as either 100% growth or value at certain times in the Russell 1000 Index over past 20 years. Companies were in the top 20 in terms of weighting in the benchmark. Data as of June 30, 2022.2. Cyclicals are investible even in a recessionary economyThe traditional view that cyclicals should be avoided in a recessionary economy doesn’t hold up as well today. Company managements have become more sophisticated in how they manage their inventory, supply chains and productivity, as well as their capital structure, to avoid boom-bust cycles. As a result, many of these companies — think energy, industrials and autos — could be better positioned to remain profitable even at the bottom of an economic cycle.The energy sector in the S&P 500 has had the best returns for the 12-month period ended October 31. And we could see energy stocks continue to hold up even as the economy weakens. Even as the energy transition continues, it’s going to take a long time to switch over the nation’s vehicle fleet. Oil companies are not expanding capital expenditures aggressively, and in fact are reclutant to explore for new oil sources despite higher prices. Hence, supply is not increasing and energy resources are not being replenished.In any case, many of these oil giants can remain profitable even if oil retreats to around US$50 a barrel. And oil multinationals, such as ExxonMobil and Chevron, are likely to maintain their substantial dividends, given their large income-oriented investor base.Exploration and production (E&P) companies have become savvy at balancing capital-intensive business needs while paying a more sustainable dividend. Historically, E&P companies had not been high dividend payers, choosing instead to reinvest in the business to pursue more growth in production. In addition to their regular dividends, ConocoPhillips, Pioneer Natural Resources and EOG Resources are now supplementing with variable or special dividends, depending on commodities prices and the strength of cash flows.Oil-related companies offer above-average dividend yieldsSource: FactSet. Data as of October 31, 2022.In the industrials sector, we are finding less-cyclical businesses. One example is waste companies that haul and recycle trash for residential and commercial customers. They can be a good hedge against inflation since many municipal waste contracts in the United States are indexed to the U.S. consumer price index (CPI), which was at a 40-year high of 8.2% at the end of September. These companies, which benefit from limited competition, are also fairly recession-resistant: Trash needs to be collected, no matter what kind of shape the economy is in.Defence company revenues are influenced more by government budgetary cycles and less by the traditional economic cycle. Industry stalwarts, such as Northrop Grumman and Lockheed Martin, have been known for their steady dividends and cash flow strength.Defence budgets are going up amid rising geopolitical tensions. In addition, both the U.S. and governments in European countries have been taking actions to bring supply chains closer to home on national security grounds after decades of globalization.3. Opportunities in sweet spot of dividend universeWe find many more opportunities in the middle of the dividend yield stack. As is well-known, very high dividend yields can be a sign of risk. They can be a result of a price sell-off, implying doubt in the sustainability of the dividend. At the other end of the spectrum, a low yield is often typical for higher growth stocks and may not provide sufficient cushion for stock price volatility.In the past decade, we saw many companies with low dividend yields and middling growth rates offer a very small dividend to keep investors interested. That paradigm may not hold anymore with 10-year U.S. Treasury rates currently in the 4% range.Today, we find the greatest opportunity in dividend stocks yielding between 2% and 5%. In addition to industrials and energy stocks, health care and financials are other sectors in this yield bucket.Greatest opportunities lies in sweet spot of yield universeSource: FactSet. Data as of September 30, 2022.Health care is an area that has grown to become a viable source of dividends and total return. The sector is becoming more diverse, drug discovery trends are accelerating and productivity of research and development spending is improving. Plus, companies have demonstrated a focus on sustaining their dividends.While gene cell therapy and obesity drugs are well-known areas of growth, innovation is accelerating broadly in many areas after a decade of drugmaker reliance on making modifications to patented drugs. We are at the start of what we think will be a decade of innovation. Valuations for large-cap pharmaceutical companies in the S&P 500 still look reasonable at an aggregate price-to-earnings multiple of 14 times forward earnings, even after strong relative share prices the past year as we believe they have long runways ahead to grow earnings and dividends.Many large pharmaceutical companies are also well-capitalized, with plenty of cash on their balance sheets to pay dividends or fund their own growth through acquisitions. This could help in a higher rate world where raising debt capital will be more expensive. There are also other areas of health care — including the healthcare service providers and the insurance companies — where we are seeing an improvement in fundamentals and earnings.Cash buffers are rising for pharmaceutical companiesSources: Capital Group, FactSet, MSCI, Refinitiv Datastream, Refinitiv Eikon. Figures above represent the aggregated value in U.S. dollars of cash and short-term investments across constituents of the MSCI World Pharmaceuticals, Biotechnology and Life Sciences Index. Data as of June 30, 2022.Among the financials, we are targeting banks and other companies that can simultaneously expand their margins in a period of higher rates, without being overly exposed to consumer credit risk should we enter in a prolonged recession.Large commercial insurance brokers could thrive in an environment of higher interest rates and inflation. These are highly cash-generative businesses that are less exposed to underwriting risks. They also generate a substantial amount of recurring revenue, which makes them more defensive than commercial banks. Lastly, the industry is highly consolidated, leading to attractive pricing opportunities.4. It’s no longer the world of consumer staples, utilities and telecomsDividends were often associated with these “steady Eddies.” But these areas are not the primary focus of our attention today. Consumer staples have historically held up well in market downturns. Now, many of these companies face headwinds from continued cost inflation and potential difficulty in passing along price increases. A stronger U.S. dollar is also pressuring top-line growth. Procter & Gamble, for instance, has forecast that unfavourable currency movements are likely to depress its revenue growth by 6% this fiscal year.Many consumer staples companies — including General Mills, Kellogg’s and Procter & Gamble — also may see their ability to raise prices in a slowing economy blunted by big-box stores like Walmart, one of their largest customers.Investors traditionally bought utilities for their high yield, even though their businesses were lower growth. Today, many utilities are yielding 2% to 3% and are relatively less attractive to shorter term U.S. Treasury bills that offer investors a new source of potential income. Since utilities continue to trade at a premium to the S&P 500, we continue to be highly selective in this area.Dividend contribution by sector over past two decadesSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor’s. Data as of August 31, 2022. Returns are in USD.5. Finding resilience in volatile marketsDividend growth has rebounded from the depths of the COVID-19 pandemic, when many companies were forced to substantially cut or eliminate their payments. We do not expect a rash of dividend cuts in a global economic slowdown, but we do anticipate that dividends will grow at a more measured pace.Many companies are taking a more deliberate approach to management of their capital structure, balancing business needs, capital expenditure plans and their dividend policies. Management teams today want to maintain a steady and sustainable dividend policy that they can support for extended periods, and we think that’s a positive development.Even in the midst of a very challenging economic and market environment, we are finding attractive opportunities In an equity market where growth is slowing and fears of a global recession are mounting, we believe it is important to focus on companies with stronger balance sheets and cash flows. Sustainable dividends don’t lie, and dividends could become a much bigger part of the total return equation compared to the past 20 years.Dividend growers have offered stronger returns, lower volatility over past 30 yearsSources: Capital Group, FactSet, Compustat, Worldscope, MSCI. Data reflects December 31, 1989, through December 31, 2021. Results are based on the weighted average of total returns in USD (with gross dividends reinvested) of a global universe of companies. The global universe consists of the 1,000 largest companies for North America (50% weight), Europe (25%) and Japan (10%), and the 500 largest companies for Emerging Markets (10%) and Pacific ex. Japan (5%), in the S&P Global Broad Market Index (BMI) series from December 1989 to December 2004, and in the MSCI Investable Market Indexes (IMI) at the same regional weighting thereafter. Data going back to December 1989 for the MSCI IMI is not available and, as a result, part of the analysis relies on the S&P Global BMI. These indices were used to provide a full sampling of stocks in the small-, mid- and large-capitalization universes. The universe constituents were balanced quarterly. All companies in the global universe are split into dividend payers and non-dividend payers. A company was classified as a ""dividend payer"" if it currently pays a dividend. A company was classified as a ""dividend grower"" (a subset of payers) if its trailing 12-month dividend per share increased relative to one year earlier. Annualized standard deviation (based on monthly returns) is a common measure of absolute volatility that tells how returns over time have varied from the mean. A lower number signifies lower volatility.",Dividends
Can international equities overcome a strong dollar?,2022-10-26T10:40:00,"There’s no denying that the relentless rise of the U.S. dollar has been challenging for investors in international equities. The currency translation effect (that is, losses and gains resulting from the conversion of non-U.S. investment returns into U.S. dollars) has dented international and global equity portfolio results.There are two ways currency movements can affect investors. In addition to translation effects at the portfolio level, companies within a portfolio may experience business impacts. However, a strong U.S. dollar is not always bad news for non-U.S. companies.Specific companies with solid fundamentals can disproportionately benefit from foreign exchange swings. Exchange-rate volatility can have a big impact on corporate profitability, depending on where a company generates revenue or incurs costs. Companies with significant costs in euros or yen and a lot of revenue in U.S. dollars, for example, could be poised to benefit. In this environment, research is crucial to understanding how exchange-rate volatility can affect profitability. Ultimately, underlying company fundamentals should drive investment decisions rather than near-term currency fluctuations.How strong is the U.S. dollar?Sources: Capital Group, ICE Data Services, MSCI, RIMES. As of August 19, 2022.Strong USD can cut both waysIn today’s global economy, it is common for multinational companies to have geographically diverse income sources, and manufacturing hubs and suppliers located across the world. For example, as of September 14, 2022, companies in the S&P 500 Index derive about 40% of their revenue from outside the United States. When the dollar is strong, this dynamic can put pressure on these companies’ profits, as the money coming in from abroad is not worth as much as it is when the dollar is weak.The inverse can be true for non-U.S. companies, too. Multiple sectors within the MSCI Europe Index, for example, pull in significant U.S.-dollar-based revenue. Industries that might typically benefit from wide dispersion between the U.S. dollar and other currencies include autos, electronics, shipbuilders, machinery, aerospace and defence, and luxury goods.Many non-U.S. companies have substantial U.S.- dollar-based revenueSources: Capital Group, FactSet, Refinitiv Datastream. Revenue exposure above reflects the weighted average of the percentage of revenue generated in the United States across each index's respective constituents. Constituent lists are current as of August 23, 2022; company-level revenue exposure is estimated by FactSet and is current as of January 2022.There are several competing factors that can drive profits beyond currency moves, and many companies hedge their currency exposures to help protect their balance sheets from unexpected swings. However, there are numerous examples of non-U.S. companies citing the strong dollar as being beneficial to their bottom line this year.One is United Kingdom–based aerospace company BAE, which brings in about 47% of its revenue in dollars. On BAE’s most recent earnings call, executives explained that, “Should the current dollar (exchange) rate persist for the year, there will be a significant tailwind to reported results.” If the pound were to weaken another 10 cents against the dollar, the company estimates its underlying earnings before interest and taxes (EBIT) guidance could be retranslated upward by as much as 10%.French consumer discretionary giant LVMH, which owns luxury goods maker Louis Vuitton, provides another compelling illustration of the positive impact a U.S. strong dollar can have on non-U.S. companies. In a recent shareholder presentation, LVMH (which counts about 27% of its revenue in dollars) noted that currency effects have boosted its profits by more than 400 million euros through the first half of 2022. Currency impact alone accounted for about 19% of its improvement in operating profit on a year-over-year basis.Currency translation can boost earnings growth for select companiesSources: Capital Group, company filings. Periods above refer to the six-month fiscal periods ending June 30, 2021, and June 30, 2022, respectively.French drugmaker Sanofi has also been a beneficiary of the strong dollar. It reported that currency effects boosted its sales by nearly 1 billion euros in the first half of 2022 and pushed its earnings per share up by 0.19 euros.Dollar poised to stay strongThese factors are likely to be relevant for some time. According to Capital Group currency analyst Jens Sondergaard, the dollar is rising for good reason and may not yet be at its peak. As he explains, the U.S. economy is stronger than that of other major countries, and the U.S. Federal Reserve is aggressively tightening to blunt the impact of inflationary pressures.In most other parts of the world, it’s a very different story. Outside the U.S., there has been lacklustre growth, inflation that’s mostly driven by energy prices and severe compression of real wages. As a result, central banks are being forced into what Sondergaard characterizes as “bad” rate hikes.The dollar’s ascent appears set to continueSources: Capital Group, ICE Data Services, Refinitiv Datastream. Data as of July 29, 2022.Hedging equities can be challengingComing to the currency translation effect, investors seeking to mitigate exchange-rate volatility can, of course, choose to implement a hedging strategy (which would typically use forward currency contracts). Hedging can be appropriate when investors have a view that a given currency is either under- or overvalued, or to reduce currency risk.But many studies have shown that hedging equities may not be worth the cost. These currency strategies have tended to have a relatively small impact on a stock portfolio’s longer-term volatility and return. This is different from bond portfolios, where currencies can be a more significant source of risk and return. In fixed income, currency hedging can be effective based on an investor’s views of currencies in specific markets.At Capital Group, generally, each portfolio manager can choose to implement a hedging strategy for the equity assets they manage within a strategy or mutual fund. Over the past five years, Capital Group’s international and global equity portfolios have typically had less than 5% of their assets hedged.Bottom lineActive management can help discern which companies could benefit from a strong U.S. dollar. This year’s massive currency moves are creating tailwinds for certain companies, and the repercussions of an appreciating dollar can vary widely. In our view, research is key to assessing the likely effects of currencies on a specific company's prospects and its stock’s return potential.",Global Equities
Investing ideas from the Farnborough International Airshow,2022-10-06T10:25:00,"Witnessing an F-35 jet fighter take off vertically as it rapidly achieves speeds beyond the sound barrier and then swiftly returns to earth in a vertical descent is a stunning experience, according to equity portfolio manager Jason Smith.“I have seen an F-35 take flight a few times,” says Smith, who attended a demonstration in July at the Farnborough International Airshow outside London. “It’s hard not to be awestruck every time.”Smith, who is a portfolio manager on Capital Group Canadian Focused Equity FundTM(Canada) and who also covers European industrials, airlines, aerospace and defence companies as an analyst, didn’t attend the event simply for the spectacle. He and eight colleagues went to see the latest advancements in commercial aviation, meet with management teams and gain insights into the industry overall.“Getting out on the road to kick the tires and meeting face-to-face with management are cornerstones of our research process,” says Lara Pellini, an equity portfolio manager based in London who accompanied Smith.“During the pandemic we managed with virtual meetings, but Farnborough was a great opportunity to harvest and replenish relationships, and take the temperature of the commercial aircraft market,” she explains.Here, Smith and Pellini identify six key insights from their trip to Farnborough.1. There’s no substitute for being thereThe aerospace and defence industry hosts shows all over the world, but the two most important are held in Farnborough and Paris in alternating years. At these events leading companies gather to meet with customers and investors, announce major business deals and showcase the latest technological advances. The 2022 event featured Airbus and Boeing, engine makers Safran and Rolls Royce, and defence companies Lockheed Martin, Rheinmetall and BAE Systems — among others.While much can be learned by reading industry research, constructing models and learning about addressable markets, it is hard to fully understand whether a plane or helicopter lives up to the hype by watching a video on YouTube.“There really is no substitute for being there,” says Pellini. “I may already have a point of view but traveling with our investment analysts to see the companies we might invest in, visiting their operations and interacting with management helps crystalize my thinking and provides a better frame of reference going forward.”During the show, the portfolio managers and analysts boarded several aircraft, including an Airbus A400M military transport plane. They sat in the cockpit and toured the crew’s sleeping quarters in an A350-900 wide-body jet and had every feature of a H145 helicopter explained in detail.Day three featured the F-35 demonstration. “When the jet took off, it blasted noise limits,” says Smith. “Before we departed, we also observed the amazing maneuverability of Boeing’s double rotor Chinook helicopter, which performed a series of twists, turns and steep climbs.”Hands-on experiences can help investors get a better grasp of concepts like fuel efficiency, for example, and track the impact of innovation and disruption over time.“Simply boarding the plane and witnessing how the cabin is optimized to keep it compact can give you a sense of how fuel efficient a plane might be,” Pellini says. “I also was struck by how much these companies have picked up from the gaming industry. In some new simulation machines, the pilot wears a helmet with a headset and sees only what is in the helmet, much like a virtual reality gaming system.”2. Air travel is taking off againIn the case of this trip, the simple act of getting there offered anecdotal evidence about the health of global travel. Smith, who is based in New York, said his flight to London was full, the airport was packed and security delays were long. “Anyone who has been in a plane the last few months — and recent data suggests many have been — can appreciate that airfares have probably never been higher.”This bodes well for the aerospace industry as well as the airlines. After two years of mostly empty skies and a COVID-related freeze on plane orders, the airlines are now scrambling to get planes delivered and replace others with newer, more fuel-efficient models. In fact, the world’s two major aircraft makers, Airbus and Boeing, have order backlogs totaling more than 10.5 years of production.A long runway for commercial aircraft productionSources: Capital Group, company reports. Boeing's last reported order backlog is over 4,200, while Airbus has an order backlog of 7,046 planes. As of June 30, 2022.These numbers were supported by conversations and announcements at the air show. To be sure, the overall tone was somewhat subdued compared to pre-pandemic shows, says Pellini. At times temperatures reached 120 degrees Fahrenheit on the tarmac. Attendance was down and companies hosted fewer meetings. And while the announced orders were lighter than pre-COVID events, a few were significant.Another key takeaway: “Many people told us they were surprised at how quickly corporate travel has rebounded,” says Smith. “With working from home more accepted or simply necessary, there were fears that we'd be down 20% or 30%. In some markets it’s returned to 2019 levels and in others it’s down only 10% to 15%. That suggests that Zoom fatigue has set in. People want to get out and travel.”3. Certain companies may benefit from a defence “super-cycle”One consistent insight that came out of nearly every conversation is that geopolitical tensions are growing, not just in Europe but across the globe. This, of course, has been in news headlines for some time. Indeed, Germany recently disclosed plans to spend 100 billion euros in the next four years on defence, its biggest shift in foreign policy since World War II. Japan indicated it would double its budget.“Whether in the Pacific, or Eastern Europe, a common theme is that the divide between the East and the West has resurfaced and is widening,” Pellini says. “The world is less safe. This is unfortunate, but it does present opportunity for defence contractors. With security now top of mind for politicians, voters and even some investors, I believe we may be at the start of a super cycle for defence.”But not all defence companies will benefit, says Pellini. The key is to understand which specific companies have the most useful innovations, are well-positioned to execute on their business plan and can overcome challenges like supply chain disruptions.The world is becoming more dangerousSources: Capital Group; Caldara, Dario and Matteo Iacoviello (2022), “Measuring Geopolitical Risk,” American Economic Review, April, 112(4), pp.1194-1225. The Geopolitical Risk Index is a measure of adverse geopolitical events and associated risks based upon the tally of newspaper articles covering geopolitical tensions, using a sample of 10 newspapers going back to 1985. Index level values reflect a six-month smoothed average of monthly data. As of August 2022.4. Face-to-face meetings sharpen the pictureRising demand for air travel and higher defence spending are well known. What’s not as clear, though, are which companies are best positioned to take advantage of these secular trends. That’s why research trips like this one to Farnborough are so important to build a better understanding of business models, assess company operations and products, and determine whether a management team can execute.According to Pellini CEOs and CFOs are more willing to share information, and offer opinions about competitors when they are speaking directly with you. “It’s easier to ask tough questions and pick up nuances in their tone of voice, as well as non-verbal cues.”“Once a manager is more relaxed, they often become more engaged and willing to be open about what keeps them up at night or what they’re excited about,” Smith adds.“There were a number of candid conversations that we came away from with more certainty about the sincerity of a manager’s upbeat forecast or their reports about strengthening demand. This is something you can’t get from a Zoom encounter, and these conversations were very useful in confirming our investment theses.”While meetings with CEOs and CFOs are important, sometimes the most compelling or useful insights can be gleaned in conversations with line managers and other executives. For example, during a Farnborough meeting, the executive vice president of an engine maker explained how key industry participants are aligning to achieve carbon neutrality by 2050.“He really knew his stuff and presented it so well,” said Smith. The executive, whose background is in space and hydrogen, identified three levers his company can use to achieve new emissions standards: burn less fuel, burn better fuel and make everything lighter.“We spent a lot of time talking about the innovation timelines required to make their target,” adds Smith. “The most fascinating part of the conversation was how this executive was able to explain the complexities of developing hydrogen into a safe, reliable and green fuel source to a layman like me.”5. The lightbulbs shine in the meeting after the meetingThe bus ride to and from Farnborough and the hotel in London took as much as 90 minutes to two hours depending on traffic. That often was when the light bulbs shined the brightest.When nine people share a confined space for that much time, they can strategize for upcoming meetings. They might decide what key information they want to get from a particular meeting, key questions to be asked and who should do the asking.“We used the bus ride back to the hotel as a debriefing period, where we discussed what we liked and didn't like,” says Smith. “The group shared differing perspectives on what they thought were the crucial takeaways. And between the nine of us, we came away with a broad spectrum of answers, views and concerns. So it really is a useful process — and one we've used for years.”6. Research trips can lead to better investment decisionsOverall, the group came away from Farnborough feeling constructive about several companies in the aerospace and defence industry, even if major economies were to slip into recession in the coming year.“The pandemic prompted the worst recession in the history of the commercial aircraft industry,” Pellini says. “Today the industry is recovering — and a number of tailwinds are supporting the recovery.”Before COVID, passenger growth had been resilient to external shocks. In fact, over the last 50 years, the industry has been growing at a compounded annual growth rate of 5%. Airbus, for example, has at least 17 years of consistent aircraft deliveries. After delaying plane deliveries for two years, many airlines today are ordering planes five years out.“I would argue that the pent-up demand for planes has never been stronger,” Pellini adds.To be fair, consistent deliveries in past downturns did not prevent share prices from meaningfully falling. The industry faces other challenges, including supply chain constraints and a U.S. labour shortage that's hurting engine manufacturers, which in turn is impacting both Airbus and Boeing.“Nevertheless, despite the muted tone at the air show, there was also a generally relaxed feeling,” Smith concludes. “Passengers are flying again, airlines are placing orders, and as long as supply chains can improve and companies can continue to meet demand, the outlook for the next three to five years appears positive.”",Aerospace
Braving bear markets: 5 lessons from seasoned investors,2022-09-27T03:31:00,"This article was originally published July 14, 2022, and has been updated to reflect market conditions.Stock markets around the world have entered bear territory. In the U.S., the S&P 500 Index has plummeted more than 23%, year to date, as of September 26, 2022. Today, many investors are focused on the likelihood of recession, rising rates and more pain ahead.“No one knows when this decline will end, but I am confident it will end, so I encourage you not to get caught up in pessimism,” says equity portfolio manager Don O’Neal, a portfolio manager on Capital Group U.S. Equity FundTM(Canada) who has 36 years of investment experience and has navigated several bear markets. “Declines create opportunities for investors who remain calm. If we make good decisions in times of stress, we can potentially set up the next several years for strong returns.”The importance of experienceSource: Capital Group. As of 12/31/21. Reflects the global organization.In unnerving times like these, it’s helpful to hear from veterans like O’Neal who have survived numerous bear markets. At Capital Group, 31% of portfolio managers have more than 30 years of investment experience while 84% have 20 or more.We asked O’Neal and four of his colleagues, each of whom has been investing for more than three decades and 171 years collectively, to share lessons learned from past bear markets and how they are applying those lessons today.1. Avoid the winners of the last cycleLisa Thompson, portfolio manager, 33 years of investment experienceMy experience has taught me that markets have long cycles. I believe the pandemic marked the end of the post-global financial crisis cycle — a cycle dominated by deleveraging, demand shocks and expanding globalization. These conditions led to looser monetary and fiscal policy, low cost of capital and stock price inflation.Today we are at the beginning of a new cycle, one that I expect will be marked by deglobalization, a shrinking labour supply and decarbonization — conditions that will lead to a shift from asset price inflation to goods inflation. Profit margins and highly valued stocks will face continued pressure. Because I expect generally higher inflation during this period, I want to steer clear of many of the fast-growing primarily U.S. companies that were the winners of previous cycle.Market leadership often changes after a bear marketSources: Capital Group, MSCI, Refinitiv Datastream. Returns shown are from the MSCI USA Index and are absolute total returns in U.S. dollars. For the tech bubble the dates represented are December 31, 1996, to March 31, 2000 (before bear market), and September 30, 2002, to December 30, 2005 (after bear market). For the global financial crisis the dates represented are December 31, 2003, to September 28, 2007 (before bear market), and March 31, 2009, to December 31, 2013 (after bear market).When cycles shift, market leadership changes. So, in today’s rising rate environment, I am focused on opportunities to invest in lower priced companies that generate strong cash flow. I think of this theme as the Revenge of the Nerds. I am generally staying away from the cool kids of the last decade — glitzy tech and media companies — and looking for opportunities among the unpopular kids in those industries hurt by the low cost of capital, poor capital allocation and adverse regulations. Some examples here might include leading telecom companies in markets like Europe, Mexico and Japan.In fact, I am focusing largely on companies outside the U.S. In my view, many U.S. companies have benefited more from globalization and the low cost of capital than similar companies in other markets.Given recent fears of deglobalization and rising inflation, I am looking at companies in Europe and Japan, as well as emerging markets that I have covered for decades. This might include, for example, commercial banks and consumer staples in China, but also in Italy, France, Japan and Latin America.2. Separate the wheat from the chaffDon O’Neal, portfolio manager on Capital Group U.S. Equity FundTM(Canada), 36 years of investment experienceFirst, it’s important to recognize that things have changed. What used to work for stock picking won’t work in the same way, possibly for years. Holding the best companies with the best growth stories seemed to be a good approach over the past 10 years.But I believe the last decade was too easy. Whenever retail investors get hyped up and day traders abound via Robinhood, that is a sign.Going forward it will likely be harder to generate good returns, and the factors that drive returns most likely will change. For example, you can no longer buy and hold the fastest growers without regard to profits. I see this as a welcome return to fundamentals.You may hear the current decline described as a correction of high multiple growth stocks. While this is generally true, it is incomplete. The stocks that have fallen the most all had fundamentals that disappointed versus expectations. Stocks with continued good fundamentals have held up better.A lot of stocks have plummeted, but that doesn’t mean they are all bad investments. Consider this example: In the 2000 bear market, both Amazon and Pets.com declined more than 80%. Pets.com went on to become a poster child for irrational exuberance as its stock went to zero. Meanwhile Amazon went on to become ... Amazon.Bear markets can inflict pain indiscriminatelySource: FactSet. Full chart shows monthly returns from 1/31/00–6/30/22. Smaller chart shows daily returns from 1/3/00–12/31/00. Returns are in USD.For me, it’s time to get out a clean sheet of paper, focus on the fundamentals and concentrate your portfolio. Ruthlessly throw out the pretenders and hold only the highest conviction investments. Separate the wheat from the chaff.For the next few years, the best strategy is not likely to be focused simply on finding growth. Instead, the balance of good fundamentals at a good price should prevail. Look for a diversified mix of companies. This could include companies in the semiconductor, cloud services or search areas, for example. But it could also lead to more value-oriented companies like defence contractors, insurers or energy companies.3. Trade the intangible for the tangibleCarl Kawaja, portfolio manager on Capital Group Global Equity FundTM(Canada), 35 years of experienceFor the last 10 years the stock market placed a lot of value on companies that offer intangible things like software. But we've recently seen it demonstrate a greater embrace of companies that make tangible things. We all know and appreciate how rapidly electric vehicles are growing, but I think people may have underappreciated how much nickel and copper are needed to build their batteries.That’s why demand for some commodities, like nickel, is benefiting from secular tailwinds, and markets are starting to recognize this. Of course, to succeed in a commodity investment, you need to identify a company that has an enduring resource or a cost-effective means of finding and producing more of it.Consider iron ore, a key ingredient in steel. One of the reasons it has been important since the Iron Age — that’s a long time — is that we haven't really found another material that replaces it in terms of strength, cost, weight, flexibility and ability to be molded and transported. This substance underpins so much of the world’s progress. Skyscrapers are not made of brick or wood or some New Age material. They are built of steel. There's also a lot of steel in the computer I use. And most people probably drive to work in a car built with steel.Iron ore can be found throughout the world, so in theory a lot of people could produce steel. But there really are only two places where it can be mined economically — Brazil and Australia — because it needs to be mined in pure quantities.Brazil is home to a unique source of high-quality iron. When iron is mined it is often dropped directly into containers that are covered with blankets because it's so fine it can blow away in the wind, like baby powder. This makes Brazilian iron ore particularly good for blending with other grades because it lowers the cost of producing the ore in a blast furnace to make steel. It also increases the strength of the steel, so that high-quality iron ore generates a premium.You can't invent that somewhere else. I’m not worried about Silicon Valley disrupting iron ore or some brilliant scientists in Switzerland discovering a different way to produce it. The market moves in cycles, so it will fall in and out of favour, but I feel reasonably confident that 50 years from now, production of iron ore will remain important.4. Ride supertankers, limit moonshotsJody Jonsson, equity portfolio manager, 33 years of experienceOne observation over my career is that when there are regime shifts in the market, the stocks that represent the former leadership can take a long time to recover. Rotation away from the dominant companies can go on much longer than you think it can or should.In the late 1990s-early 2000s period, some of the largest tech stocks went down 80% or more and stayed down for five to 10 years. And these were the strong companies that survived; many others went to zero. You needed a very strong stomach to hold on through this period. It took almost a decade for tech to regain market leadership again. Financial stocks behaved similarly after the financial crisis in 2008 — out of favour for another decade. In periods like these, you must consider that something has changed beyond just the valuation for these former leaders. Usually, the valuation corrects first and the fundamentals follow.So how am I thinking about investing in today’s environment? I believe that we are experiencing “climate change” in the market, not just a passing storm. We need to avoid anchoring on past growth rates, profit margins or stock prices. Given the high level of uncertainty, I focus primarily on “supertankers” — dominant companies in their industries that generate solid cash flow, have strong competitive moats and can fund their own growth. I am investing more sparingly in what I would call “moon shots” — higher risk, higher reward companies that are more volatile — because in a rising interest rate environment, investors are less forgiving on valuations for more speculative companies.I try to hold companies with reasonable, understandable valuations on near-term earnings and cash flows. Some examples include leading managed care providers or device makers in the health care sector, or nonbank financials such as insurers and exchanges that can benefit from rising interest rates and elevated trading volumes and are not overly sensitive to the economy.5. Bear markets can be your friendSteve Watson, equity portfolio manager on Capital Group Capital Income BuilderTM(Canada) and Capital Group Monthly Income PortfolioTM(Canada), 34 years of investment experienceOver my career I have experienced 21 market shocks, including the collapse of the Soviet Union, the bursting of the technology bubble, the global financial crisis and now COVID-19. I mention these events only to highlight the fact that market disruptions are a fact of life. It’s just a matter of time before the train goes off the rails. My list suggests it happens every 18 months or so.Market disturbances are a fact of life for investorsSources: MSCI, RIMES. As of 6/30/22. Data is indexed to 100 on 1/1/87, based on the MSCI World Index from 1/1/87–12/31/87, the MSCI ACWI with gross returns from 1/1/88–12/31/00, and the MSCI ACWI with net returns thereafter. Shown on a logarithmic scale. Returns are in USD.As long as I’ve been in this business, I’ve seen the market swing from excessive enthusiasm to extreme pessimism. An investor with a reasonable degree of objectivity can benefit from selling the former and buying the latter. It’s an approach that frequently causes pain and tends to pay off mostly during the early stages of market upturns, as pessimism gives way to optimism. Warren Buffett said it best: Be fearful when others are greedy and greedy when others are fearful. Put another way, bear markets are an investor’s friend, provided they remain calm, patient and focus on the long term.I like to purchase shares when they are down and out, but I also like to hang on long enough to let the market catch up with what I think is the true value of the company in question. Despite my value bent, I remain a strong believer in the resilience of the tech sector. Entry point is important to me. Therefore, I will look to invest in some select tech companies when their shares are beaten down.What’s more, I have long placed an emphasis on dividends as the primary way that a company transfers value to its investors. In my view, the potential for dividend payers to provide relative stability during market turbulence is more important than ever. And I continue to hold several high dividend payers, as well as dividend growers. The shares I invest in, like my own children, should pay rent to live with me.Bottom lineToday, there are thoughtful, experienced economists and professional investors who can give you well-reasoned arguments why this bear market is different, why the economic problems are different and why this time things may get worse. But while some others might tell you, “This time is different,” our message to you is, “we’ve seen this before.”“I don’t know if the current decline will fit into the pantheon of bear markets past,” O’Neal says. “But what I do know is that every bear period has eventually ended, and the market started back up again.”Over time, and in time, the financial markets have demonstrated a remarkable ability to anticipate a better tomorrow even when today’s news feels so bad. While no one can predict the future and no two market declines are the same, we have been here before, and we’ve learned how to survive and prosper when markets begin to recover.",Market Volatility
Supply chain shifts signal reglobalization,2022-08-23T10:39:00,"The fragility of global supply chains exposed during the COVID-19 pandemic remains one of the top economic challenges facing the world. In one respect, globalization has long been characterized by developed market countries offshoring production to lower cost locations. But now, companies are recognizing the need to build redundancies into their supply lines, which will have varied impacts on countries, companies and industries.While some have argued this could lead to a less globalized world or “deglobalization,” this could be the start of an era of “reglobalization,"" in which supply chains are reorganized and more countries are brought into global trade networks.“I would expect most companies with a significant percentage of their manufacturing base in Greater China (including Taiwan) to diversify to other countries,” says Noriko Chen, equity portfolio manager.   “The reinvestment in some countries is likely to be positive. But it will also come at a cost to profitability for some companies. However, this should lead to new investing opportunities for those who can identify companies that will benefit from changes in global trade patterns.”Global trade has slowed but is still growingSources: International Monetary Fund, Refinitiv Datastream. As of December 31, 2021.Supply chains are shifting but not deglobalizingMany companies are shifting their areas of manufacturing operations to multiple centres across the globe to disperse risk. That does not necessarily mean this could result in less economic integration. Consider Taiwan-based TSMC, the world’s dominant manufacturer of cutting-edge semiconductors. After having concentrated the bulk of its capacity in Taiwan — a focal point of geopolitical tensions — TSMC is building its first manufacturing hub in the United States. It’s also constructing a new semiconductor plant in Japan.Multinationals with a significant presence in China are also looking for that next big opportunity to reach consumers outside of China. Apple, which has arguably built the most impressive supply chain of any multinational in China, moved some iPhone production to India, which is forecast to have an estimated 1 billion smartphone users by 2026.There are also Chinese companies seeking to forge closer trade links with their customers outside of China. Chinese electric vehicle (EV) battery maker CATL (Contemporary Amperex Technology Co.) recently received approval to build a battery cell plant in Germany, where it works with the top German automakers.Diversification from China will take timeFor those companies reducing their dependence on China, the diversification from China’s supply chain will take time. China is likely to remain significant due to lack of viable alternatives and because more goods made in China will increasingly target Chinese consumers in the future.“A common phrase I hear from companies is ‘China Plus,’” says Ben Lin, an investment analyst at Capital Group. “This means manufacturers will retain their existing China factory, but will gradually add production capacities outside of China and slowly build up the domestic supply chain in those countries. This could take at least several years or even a decade before they can replace Chinese suppliers.”China's export sector dwarfs Southeast Asian rivalsCapital Group, Refinitiv Datastream. As of December 31, 2021. Values are not adjusted for inflation.For now, China remains one of the world’s top destinations for foreign direct investment flows, which reflect companies buying, building or reinvesting in operations abroad. In 2021, China ranked second behind the U.S., with US$334 billion of flows, according to data from the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD).Multinationals still see value in tapping into China’s large and skilled workforce. A case in point is Tesla. China has become a key production hub for the dominant EV maker. Tesla opened its Shanghai gigafactory in 2019 to help boost its annual car production and increase its global market share by selling to the world’s top consumer of EVs.Another area is health care. Pharmaceutical giants such as AstraZeneca and Pfizer have built strong relationships with domestic Chinese biopharmaceutical companies to help develop and test new drugs. Clinical trials account for approximately 90% of the cost of developing a drug for global use, and labour costs for clinical trials are cheaper in China compared with the U.S., Germany and Switzerland, according to Capital Group analysts who cover the health care sector.China has moved up the manufacturing value chainSource: Capital Group, based on reports from Euromonitor, SNE Research and company filings. Data as of May 2021 and reflect approximate figures.Building security and redundancy in supply chainsThe global supply chain has been under unprecedented stress, from the U.S.-China trade war to the COVID-19 pandemic to the war in Ukraine. If any industry has felt the brunt of the supply chain snarls, it’s been the auto business.General Motors, Ford, Stellantis and other global automakers have faced steep production cuts, resulting in a scarcity of vehicles on dealer lots and a sharp increase in the prices of new and used cars. This is leading to structural changes within the auto industry, which has had to entirely rethink its supply chains. One outcome has been a move away from receiving “just-in-time” inventory to holding “just-in-case” inventory when it comes to semiconductors.Building redundancies in supply chains will come with opportunities and challenges. Certain industries will be beneficiaries, ranging from those supplying semiconductor equipment and industrial components to automation tools and physical metals.“I anticipate reshoring to be a major growth driver for select industrial companies over the next five to 10 years,” says equity investment analyst Gigi Pardasani. “Many U.S. industrials are investing at levels we have not seen since the early 2000s to better position themselves to meet this demand.”In the near term, there will be financial costs and potential ramifications of supply chain shifts, such as:Greater levels of corporate spending and higher operating costs.For Western companies moving production back to their home markets, or for Asian companies expanding their footprint into the West, the costs will be higher than running factories solely in China or other Asian countries. Companies are likely to either pay for more expensive automation equipment or higher wages for workers.Higher costs for consumers.Inflation is already running at a 40-year high in the U.S. as higher prices ripple through global supply chains. Higher costs for companies to build more inventories or reshore manufacturing is likely to translate into higher prices for consumers. Companies will absorb some, but not all, of the costs, which could weigh on consumer demand for their products.Higher working capital needs and operating margin pressuredue to costs associated with building redundancy and flexibility in supply chains. These factors could weigh on future margins and valuations for companies. Lower returns on invested capital may be here to stay as a result of a change in the geopolitical landscape and central banks’ rate policies.“Companies and businesses with pricing power or economies of scale may benefit from this environment, but those without these advantages may face profit margin and earnings pressure and potentially lower valuation multiples,” says equity investment director Kent Chan.However, he adds, there’s the possibility that “those companies that are able to diversify sourcing and build greater security and resilience in their supply chain may be rewarded with a higher valuation longer term, in spite of the costs.”Opportunities from global shifts in productionLooking at modern history, this is not the first time the global supply chain has been realigned.In the early 1990s, Hong Kong was a hub for textiles, and Taiwan was a large manufacturer of sneakers. That gradually changed when China set up special economic zones, luring manufacturers with a more affordable option.“Not only did these shifts in the supply chain not harm the economies of Hong Kong and Taiwan, but rather created room for the evolution of their respective economies,” recalls Chan, who worked in Hong Kong in the 1990s. “Over time, Hong Kong overtook Tokyo to become Asia’s leading financial services hub, and Taiwan moved up the value curve to become the world’s dominant manufacturer of semiconductors.”This is a reminder that, despite worries around supply shortages, fears of deglobalization and the expected shift in global supply chains, new opportunities could emerge in the regions where production is shifting, as well as in those countries where production is leaving.",Trade
4 reasons health care could lead the next bull market,2022-08-17T03:02:00,"Amid the storm of market volatility in the first half of 2022, health care was among the few areas that offered investors some shelter.That may not be surprising, considering that demand for services in the sector tend to hold up regardless of market volatility or the economic cycle. In fact, the sector has outpaced the broader global stock market in each of the past eight market declines of 15% or more.Indeed, prospects for select companies appear to be brightening, and some have the potential to remain compelling investment opportunities for years to come, according to equity analyst Christopher Lee, who covers U.S. pharmaceuticals and biotechnology companies.“Health care has been a good place to invest since the start of the pandemic for a variety of reasons,” says Lee, who holds a medical degree from Columbia University. “First you had biopharma companies developing vaccines and treatments for COVID. Now you have other companies benefiting from their defensive nature in a time of uncertainty in the markets.”Health care is among the sectors that have done well in down marketsSources: Capital Group, FactSet, MSCI. Includes total returns for MSCI ACWI sectors for the last eight periods in which the S&P 500 declined by more than 15% on a total return basis, based in USD. The 2022 bear market is considered current as of June 30, 2022, and is included in this analysis. The periods included in the analysis above are July 17, 1998–August 31, 1998; March 24, 2000–October 9, 2002; October 9, 2007–March 9, 2009; April 23, 2010–July 2, 2010; April 29, 2011–October 3, 2011; October 3, 2018–December 24, 2018; February 19, 2020–March 23, 2020; and January 3, 2022–June 30, 2022.“But that’s not the whole story,” Lee adds. “Innovation across drug development, genetic sequencing, data collection and health care service delivery is accelerating. That’s driving growth for nimble companies and generating opportunity for long-term investors.”This all begs the question: Could the 2020s be the decade when global health care takes a leading role in markets?“New market leadership has often emerged at the end of a bear market,” says equity portfolio manager Diana Wagner. “I don’t know for certain that the health care sector will lead the next bull market. But what I do know is that many leading health care companies have paid relatively high dividends, have growth potential with accelerating innovation and still offer what I believe to be compelling valuations. I do believe the best managed of these companies could emerge as new market leaders.”Wagner and Lee identify four reasons why we may be entering a golden age of health care and the potential implications for investors.1. We are in a golden age of drug discoveryChristopher LeeWe are in the early days of a third major wave of innovation in biotech and drug discovery. In the first wave, old-line chemical companies recognized they could use chemistry to treat disease. The second wave was the emergence of protein-based therapeutics that were more targeted, harnessing the immune system to treat disease.I would call this third wave the genetic age of medicine. We have the insights from genetic sequencing done in recent years and a wealth of data we can now process at rapid speeds, as well as new therapeutic interventions and technologies that can more specifically intervene in the disease process. It's an incredibly exciting time.The number of drugs gaining approval in the U.S. has expanded in recent yearsSource: U.S. Food and Drug Administration. As of 12/31/21.There are several major diseases that we are now starting to tackle. Consider obesity, arguably the world’s leading health risk, afflicting more than 650 million adults worldwide as of 2016, according to the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development.Life-threatening health problems linked to obesity include cardiovascular disease, diabetes and kidney failure, to name a few. It also puts individuals at higher risk for adverse outcomes from infectious diseases like COVID.For decades obesity was unfairly stigmatized as simply a reflection of poor lifestyle choices, but today it is widely recognized as a more complicated health problem.The good news is leading pharmaceutical companies have developed a new generation of drugs that can reduce a patient’s body weight by as much as 20% to 25% — a level of weight loss on par with the impact of bariatric surgery. These drugs work by mimicking naturally occurring hormones that help people feel full after eating.Novo Nordisk and Eli Lilly have already introduced these agents for the treatment of Type 2 diabetes, and they are developing versions of these drugs that are exhibiting a level of weight loss that is significant for most patients. I don’t like to throw the term “miracle drug” around, but these are incredibly effective medicines that not only reduce weight but also help bring a prediabetic patient’s sugars under control and offer other potential benefits. I think this is something that will transform the entire landscape of metabolic diseases in the U.S. and around the world.Obesity is no longer just a U.S. problemSources: Capital Group, World Health Organization. Latest data as of 2016.2. Genetic medicine leads to faster breakthroughsInvestors poured an incredible amount of capital into the biotech and pharmaceutical industries over the last several years. And that drove innovations that resulted in the creation of intellectual property and know-how that we will likely be building on for years to come.One key advancement is the development of technologies that allow intervention in disease pathways at the level of the genetic sequence or “blueprint,"" further upstream than many conventional medicines. Through sequencing and data processing, drug developers can apply highly specific and precise interventions like gene therapy, where we transplant normal genes in place of missing or defective ones to address the disease.To formulate a COVID vaccine with such speed, scientists sequenced the virus within days or weeks of identifying it and then translated that sequence to various vaccines and mRNA. It's an example of how targeting a pathogen genetically can create an effective medicine very quickly compared to the prior way of identifying therapies through extensive experimentation.COVID became an accelerant for innovation, condensing into two years of work what the industry might have previously needed 10 years to accomplish. This new approach to drug development is likely to lead to a higher success rate and greater number of drugs coming to market at a faster pace.Another emerging technology is RNAi therapeutics. RNAi is a natural biological process that regulates gene expression by interfering with messenger RNA (mRNA), which carries DNA’s instructions for making new proteins. This will be important for a wide range of diseases.There's potentially an explosion of new therapeutic opportunities coming over the next decade with these advances. When you find a company that can do it, it may turn out to be a special investment over time.You've discovered one of Capital Group's 10 investment themes for 2022See the rest3. New managed care models in the U.S. improve outcomes and lower costsDiana WagnerI agree with Chris that we are seeing a major wave of innovation across drug development, but I am also seeing a new age of innovation on the services side of health care in the U.S. If you look at how most doctors practice today, particularly primary care doctors, they operate in the traditional fee-for-service model, where they get paid for volume. So essentially the sicker you are, the more services they provide and more money they make.But today, companies like UnitedHealth Group and Humana — as well as emerging ones like Agilon — are developing models that reward doctors for keeping patients healthy and out of the hospital. This elevates the primary care physician from essentially the bottom of the health care totem pole to the top.I see these models as an important step toward achieving what's often described as the holy grail or quadruple aim in health care: better health outcomes, higher patient satisfaction, higher doctor satisfaction and lower costs per capita.We're already starting to see a proliferation of these types of business models. And I suspect in the next five to 10 years they will come to a physician practice near you, where you'll also be able to get your obesity drugs to help drive better long-term health outcomes at a lower cost for the system.Health care companies are undervalued relative to the broader marketSources: Capital Group, MSCI, Refinitiv Datastream. Relative valuation is the ratio between the forward 12-month price-to-earnings ratio of the health care sector and the MSCI USA Index. A value below the average (0.5%) indicates that health care is relatively undervalued. As of 7/29/22.4. Well-capitalized companies can fund their own growthPeriods of accelerating innovation can produce opportunities for good long-term investments. Innovation has often driven earnings and investment returns over many years. What’s more, many large pharmaceutical companies are well capitalized with a lot of cash on their balance sheets, providing them an opportunity to fund their own growth through acquisitions and other strategies.Global pharma companies stand ready for mergers and acquisitionsSources: Capital Group, FactSet, MSCI, Refinitiv Datastream, Refinitiv Eikon. Figures above represent the aggregated value in U.S. dollars of cash and short-term investments across MSCI World Pharmaceuticals constituents. As of June 30, 2022.An incredible amount of capital was invested in biotech over the last several years, and that provided the resources to develop tangible intellectual property that will likely continue to bear fruit. Having cash on the balance sheet is important in a period when rates are rising and the cost of capital is going up.Ultimately what drives long-term value creation in health care is innovation. Of course, not every innovation will succeed. Some drugs will fail to meet approval or gain market acceptance. But if you identify an innovative product or service that's special, it has the potential to drive an investment thesis for years. This gets me excited because it can result in real earnings and real cash flows. I think several health care companies have the potential to emerge as leaders of the next bull market.",Health Care
Air travel is taking off again,2022-05-11T10:33:00,"After two years of relatively empty skies, Ryanair CEO Michael O'Leary is an eyewitness to the incredible resurgence of demand for air travel. Faced with long security delays at Dublin Airport, he implored the Irish government to call up the army last month to help process eager travelers flooding the terminals.As the global economy gradually emerges from the pandemic, airports around the world are dealing with a crush of passengers looking to make up for lost time. Fueled by pent-up demand, many are flying for the first time since the COVID-19 virus crippled the travel industry. For the airlines, the turnaround in demand has been fast and furious, surpassing even the most optimistic expectations.“Demand is turning back on almost as quickly as it turned off,” says Capital Group equity analyst Todd Saligman, who covers the aerospace industry in the U.S. and Europe. “Many U.S. airlines have reported that March was the strongest booking month in history, and we are seeing similar strength in Europe.”U.S. air travel is rebounding from a sharp pandemic-era downturnSources: Capital Group, U.S. Transportation Security Administration. Data reflects number of travelers going through TSA airport checkpoints. As of 4/30/22.Heading into the summer vacation season, air travel is likely to exceed pre-COVID levels in much of the Western world. That’s despite several headwinds facing the airlines today, including sharply higher fuel costs, a pilot shortage and fewer available flights as the industry ramps up to full strength. A resurgence of the virus is holding back China’s reopening, leaving Asian air travel lagging the U.S. and Europe at the moment.“We’re not back to pre-COVID levels yet, but it’s just a matter of time,” Saligman notes. “Travel is a secular growth industry in a lot of countries. Only about 20% of the world’s population has ever been on an airplane. So there is huge room for growth, especially in emerging markets such as China and India, where the middle class is growing and air travel is still in its infancy.”Volatility is in the airMake no mistake, airline stocks are volatile. As a group, U.S. airline stocks fell 31% in 2020 as government-imposed lockdowns and bans on international travel brought air traffic to a virtual standstill. They fell another 2% in 2021, even as a reawakening economy lifted other sectors. It’s been a mixed bag so far this year, with the sector up nearly 10%, despite a pullback after Russia’s February 24 invasion of Ukraine.The war has contributed to a meteoric rise in the price of jet fuel, which has increased 110% this year, surpassing the rise in oil prices by a wide margin. Fuel is generally the second largest expense for airlines, after labour.Jet fuel costs are rising even faster than oil pricesSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream. Jet fuel prices in USD represented by the U.S. Gulf Coast Kerosene-Type Jet Spot Price; brent crude prices represented by the Europe Brent Spot Price. As of 4/30/2022.In normal times, such a dramatic increase in jet fuel prices would hurt the highly competitive aviation industry. But these aren’t normal times. “Airlines have largely been able to pass these costs along in the form of higher airfares,” Saligman explains. “These stocks will likely continue to be volatile, but I think the next six to 12 months could be a very strong period for the airlines, as well as cruise lines and other travel-related companies.”Indeed, two of the largest U.S. carriers — American Airlines and Delta Airlines — are both forecasting record-high revenues in the current quarter ending June 30. In recent earnings calls, airline executives said they expect sales to soar during the summer travel season. “Demand is stronger than I’ve ever seen in my career,” said United CEO Scott Kirby, “and that’s even before business travel fully recovers.”Airline industry poised for rapid growth in a post-pandemic worldSources: Capital Group, MSCI, Refinitiv Datastream, RIMES. As of 4/30/22.Come fly with meOptimism for the airline industry comes with a few caveats. The recovery should proceed if energy prices don’t continue to skyrocket, the Russia-Ukraine conflict doesn’t spread and severe COVID restrictions aren’t once again imposed. Those are some big assumptions that may or may not play out according to plan. But over the long term, the outlook is favourable, says portfolio manager Steve Watson.“I think COVID will go away, and people will want to fly again — it’s that simple,” says Watson, a portfolio manager on Capital Group Capital Income BuilderTM(Canada) and Capital Group Monthly Income PortfolioTM(Canada). “Investors should focus less on the timing and more on what cash flows and earnings will look like in the months and years ahead.”What about the fear that Zoom or Webex video calls will replace the need for in-person business meetings? That’s nonsense, Watson says.“Years ago, conference calls were supposed to kill business travel and that never really happened either,” he notes. “People who generate revenue face-to-face will be traveling.”Long runway for “reopening” themeAs one of the few industries that has not fully participated in the COVID recovery period, many airlines are attractive from a valuation perspective, says portfolio manager Chris Thomsen.Airlines have experienced a delayed recovery, largely due to the emergence of the COVID-19 omicron variant last December. With omicron fading in many parts of the world, airlines and other travel-related companies are well positioned to participate in the comeback that has lifted other sectors hard hit by the 2020 downturn.Thomsen saw evidence of that on a recent trip from London to Los Angeles.“The airports were crowded, restaurants were bustling and flights were full,” he says. “I think we are in a post-COVID world now. People want to get out and do all the things they couldn’t over the past two years. That’s going to benefit the travel industry for the next few years at least.”",Aerospace
"When volatility is rising, boring is beautiful",2022-04-28T10:22:00,"Fast-growing digital and tech companies generated a lot of investor excitement over the past decade, not to mention an outsized share of market returns.Since the start of 2022, however, many of these market darlings have taken a beating. Amid slowing economic growth, soaring inflation and the fear of rising interest rates, investors may be taking a second look at the high valuations many digital platform and software stocks command.“This is one of the most complex environments for investing we have seen in years,” says equity portfolio manager Jonathan Knowles. “With questions lingering over the persistence of inflation and shifts in the geopolitical landscape, I am looking to invest in an ‘all weather portfolio’ with the potential to withstand a variety of potential risks.”That’s why boring is beautiful according to Knowles. “I'm looking to invest in dull and dependable companies with the potential to generate solid cash flows and continue growing regardless of the direction of the economic cycle or macroeconomic developments.”Here are some investment themes that cautious investors may want to consider.Railroads are riding a commodities boomYou can’t build the new economy without old industries.Long-term shifts toward a digital future, the rollout of electric vehicles and the transition to clean energy will likely continue to drive opportunity for innovators in those areas. But these trends are also providing tailwinds for old industries like mining and railroads.Nickel, for example, is a key component in electric vehicle batteries. So is copper, which is necessary for updating the electric grid. And while software is becoming an increasingly essential player in the production of modern cars, steel remains a required component. Indeed, prices for select commodities have skyrocketed in recent months, a trend amplified by the war between Russia and Ukraine — major producers of nickel, copper and grains.“People have underappreciated how much copper is needed to rewire and modernize the electric grid as demand rises,” says equity portfolio manager Andrew Suzman. “Businesses like Canadian metals and mining company First Quantum Minerals, which focuses on copper, and Brazil’s Vale, a producer of iron ore, could benefit.”Rising demand for commodities and energy could also boost demand for North America’s railroads, which are the most cost-effective way to transport heavy materials. Railroads have pricing power potential as well, which is important in today’s inflationary environment. They typically base their pricing on the cost of the underlying commodities they are hauling, so revenues rise with commodity prices.Rising fuel costs also prove beneficial, as the difference between the cost of trucking and rails is at its widest gap in years. “A railroad like Canadian Pacific, which has the only tri-coastal Canada-U.S.-Mexico network, could do well under a variety of economic circumstances,” Suzman adds.Railroads have room to increase pricing amid a commodities boomSource: Capital Group, Association of American Railroads, U.S. Bureau of Transportation. Data shown from January 1990 through December 2018. The rail category refers to Class 1 rail, or carriers earning more than $505 million in annual revenue. Pricing per ton-mile refers to the pricing charged for transporting one ton of freight across one mile. Values are in USDIndustrials help power an energy-efficient futureThe global push to reduce carbon emissions and improve energy efficiency is often associated with electric vehicles or utilities harnessing solar and wind power. At first blush, traditional industrial companies making machinery, chemicals and other construction materials might be construed as part of the problem, not the solution.But HVAC companies like Carrier and Daikin are developing air conditioning and heating systems that could help reduce global greenhouse gas emissions. Regulations in Europe and elsewhere that require the replacement of older systems with more energy-efficient products could drive long-term opportunity for both companies.Tighter carbon emissions regulations and infrastructure spending across major economies could also provide tailwinds for Swiss specialty chemical maker Sika, Knowles says. “The company makes cement additives that can reduce carbon emissions and increase durability,” Knowles says. “This may sound like a boring business, but its growth potential is pretty compelling as global emissions standards tighten.”Tightening emissions regulations are generating opportunity for select industrialsSources: Capital Group, company reports, Refinitiv Datastream. Company market capitalizations are in USD as of 3/31/22.Bargain hunters find “treasure” at dollar storesWhen economic conditions become challenging, consumers may naturally become more careful about spending. Many shoppers shift their spending to discount merchants known as treasure hunt retailers. These stores offer clothing, personal care items and household products at relatively low prices, as well as some higher quality products at bargain prices.“In a slowing economic environment, many people will be trading down to dollar stores,” says portfolio manager Diana Wagner. “Such stores have held up well in past recessions.”Treasure hunt retailers have outpaced the market in recessionsSource: Capital Group, National Bureau of Economic Research, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor’s. Reference periods for recessions are March 2001 to October 2001, December 2007 to May 2009, and February 2020 to March 2020. Consumer discretionary category refers to the S&P 500 Consumer Discretionary Index. Returns are in USD.What might be less intuitive is that well-run treasure hunt retailers often have pricing power potential when inflation is rising.For example, Dollar Tree, which offers a wide variety of items for US$1, recently launched their “breaking the buck” strategy. The company initially offered a US$5 category of goods, followed by a category for US$1.25. “This same approach has helped other treasure hunt retailers generate multiple years of strong same-store sales growth and margin expansion,” Wagner says.A change in senior management at the company could prove to be another tailwind. “Dollar Tree has been undermanaged relative to its competitor Dollar General,” Wagner observes. “But recently Rick Dreiling, the former CEO of Dollar General, was named chairman of Dollar Tree. I think this could be an important turning point for the company.“In today’s environment, I look for companies that can improve their businesses and make their own growth happen regardless of what the economy does,” Wagner explains. “Dollar Tree could be one of those self-help stories.”The bottom lineInvestors may be wondering if the digital transformation has run its course. “Not at all,” Knowles says. “Leading digital platform companies, cloud software and autonomous vehicle technology continue to reshape the way we work, live and shop. But many of these companies may have gotten ahead of themselves.”With inflation rising and the earnings potential for many of these companies still years away, valuations may be extended. “Leading technology companies continue to look promising over the long term,” Knowles says. “But in this environment, I am shifting my focus a bit toward companies that actually make stuff and tend to hold their ground during all types of market weather.”",Global Equities
EV market: the path to a sustainable world,2022-04-08T11:20:00,"What has driven the recent acceleration in electric vehicle sales?Jason Zhang:The acceleration has been largely driven by regulations and incentives in Europe and China. In Europe, for example, 2020 was the first year when automakers faced stringent emissions regulations, which incentivized them to increase EV production and sales. Additionally, multiple European governments have introduced larger purchasing subsidies on EVs as part of broader stimulus packages to rescue their economies from the pandemic. EV penetration in Europe more than quadrupled from 2019 to 2021, surging from 4% to 20% in 2021, while in China it tripled from 5% to 15%. While the U.S. continues to lag with a penetration level of about 5%, regulations are coming. By 2030, EV penetration levels are expected to be around 60% to 70% in Europe and China, respectively, and roughly 50% in the U.S.Danny Jacobs:In Europe, the premium segment has largely driven sales. Early adopters have been those who can afford the higher upfront cost of an EV and often have access to another car. However, the buyer base is broadening as prices come down, the charging infrastructure improves, and choice expands, particularly in popular segments like SUVs. The key to cracking mass market adoption of EV is for the industry to create an EV that is as cheap and convenient to own and operate as traditional ICE (internal combustion engine) vehicles. While the industry is getting there, it has yet to fully meet this challenge.Are we nearing the point where EVs are as cheap as traditional vehicles?Jason Zhang:The cost of batteries is the reason that EVs continue to be more expensive than ICE cars. There has been good progress on reducing battery costs, which have fallen over the last decade, although rising raw material prices have limited progress more recently. Nevertheless, by 2025, we could reach a level where a compact EV will be on a cost parity with a comparative ICE vehicle. Mini EVs with small battery packs are already becoming economical. In China, for example, the best-selling EV is the Wuling Hongguang MINI, which sold around 400,000 units in 2021.1While it has a battery pack of only 10 kilowatt hours (kWh) compared to the Tesla Model 3’s 60 kWh, the overall cost of the battery is only about US$1,500. This means the car can retail for about US$5,000 plus subsidies, which is already cheaper than the comparable ICE car.Piyada Phanaphat:Rising raw material costs have slowed down the pace of reduction in battery costs as lithium, cobalt and nickel prices have surged. However, innovation could help to offset these higher costs. China has diversified from using only NCM (nickel cobalt manganese) batteries, reverting back to LFP (lithium iron phosphate) batteries that now command more than half of the market due to their lower costs. While LFP batteries have inferior range, their cost advantage has allowed for a new entry-level battery.Reducing battery costs should make EVs more affordableLithium-ion battery pack costs (per kilowatt hour, USD)Forecasts shown for illustrative purposes only.Sources: Bloomberg New Energy Finance, Statista. 2023 and 2030 are forecasts as of December 31, 2020.Danny Jacobs:There are concerns that the recent shortage in semiconductors may prove to be the first in a series of bottlenecks as EV makers ramp up production. Automakers have responded to the chip shortage by trying to vertically integrate or secure supply via partnerships. Management of the supply chain and ensuring access to the resources needed will be crucial for car companies in the coming years.Will the availability of charging networks become a limiting factor?Julie Dickson:The demand for EV charging points is likely to outstrip supply as an increasing number of people own EVs. Additionally, we also need to consider the impact of that additional demand on the electrical supply and the grant capacity. Governments need to work closely with utilities and auto manufacturers to create a charging network that is fit for purpose. Tesla, for example, has a fully integrated process where they offer both supply and charging points alongside actual EVs. Utilities need to develop a strategic plan to allow and enable greater electricity supply and distribution, as well as the ability for cars to be charged in different places. We need slower charging points in or near home or during the day at work and faster charging points on the road network. We also need to educate EV owners on the best times to charge vehicles to avoid exacerbating demand at peak times for electrical supply.Demand growth for EVs may outstrip supply of charging stationsEurope’s projected EV charging demand over the next decadeForecasts shown for illustrative purposes only.Source: BCG EV forecast, 2021; BCG analysis. *Public slow chargers are under 22kW, while public fast chargers are between 22kW and 149kW; public high-power chargers are more than 149kW. CAGR: compound annual growth rate. TWh: terawatt hourEVs can play an important role in decarbonizing the world. What are the key ESG factors you consider when analyzing the industry?Jason Zhang:EVs are automatically seen as being environmentally friendly, but that’s not always the case. Much depends on where the electricity comes from. In China, around 60% of electricity is generated from coal.2Also, the production of batteries is both material- and power-intensive. Sweden’s Northvolt has committed to using 100% locally sourced renewable energy in the production of its batteries and has promised that, by 2030, half of the materials used to produce new batteries will be sourced from recycling old batteries.3Raw material sourcing is also important. BMW has made a point to focus on sustainable and ethical mining to ensure workers have safe working conditions and are fairly compensated. Finally, there’s the social aspect of the transition from ICEs to EVs to consider. Many large auto manufacturers are huge employers but EV production is far less labour-intensive, so companies need to have a strategy to retrain workers as they transition to a smaller workforce.Danny Jacobs:Another factor that could grow in prominence in the coming years is the safe deployment of autonomous driving software. We’ve already seen some differentiation in the approach being taken, and I expect this to become a more prominent ESG factor in the coming years.How are traditional auto companies managing the transition to EVs?Jason Zhang:The internal combustion engine is extremely complex: engines have different numbers of cylinders, different displacements that get mated with various types of transmissions and speeds. In contrast, EVs are simple mechanically with just a battery, electric motor, inverter and a one-speed transmission. This means the fixed cost for producing an EV is much lower than an ICE, making it easier to scale. However, EVs do require investment in software and electronic architecture. Traditional auto manufacturers are having to spend a lot of money on building their software expertise. While they have the advantage of the profits and cash flows that are generated from their ICE business, over time that may become more of a disadvantage due to the complexity of having to invest in both ICEs and EVs.Danny Jacobs:Equity markets want auto companies to capture as much EV market share as they can. In contrast, credit markets are focusing on the need to maintain profitability and cash flows from existing ICE divisions during the transition to EVs to help maintain credit ratings. This situation is leading to some tension in the equity and credit component of auto companies.What are your thoughts on Tesla?Julie Dickson:Tesla has a first mover advantage and has been both nimble and successful in entering the high-end EV market. Its market cap of US$940 billion makes it the sixth largest company in the world,4giving it access to low cost of capital to allow it to build its operations. Another advantage is its connectivity: its software and battery operations management system allow its EVs to run efficiently and stay on the road longer. Moreover, Tesla does not just build cars; it is also involved in renewable energy, energy supply, battery manufacturing and energy storage. This integrated approach gives it a distinct advantage and helps it command a valuation premium. Whether it can sustain its significant market share as new entrants come in and traditional manufacturers transition into EVs will need watching. Profit margin growth will be key to valuations.Danny Jacobs:One interesting observation is that Tesla only has four models, of which two are the cheaper versions of the others. The traditional auto sector suggests it is optimal to have a greater number of models, particularly in popular categories like SUVs. Take Volkswagen, for example. It produces the same skateboard EV architecture and then puts different bodies on top of it, which may play more to consumer preferences. It will be interesting to see if the limited number of models in Tesla’s lineup will limit its ability to sell to different areas of the market. Tesla’s current valuations imply that it will either achieve a market share we’ve never seen before or that making and selling electric cars will be a meaningfully more profitable and attractive proposition than the traditional car businesses.Jason Zhang:Tesla currently has a meaningful lead in all areas of EVs. While traditional carmakers do have the ability to close the gap in terms of things like battery technology and electric drivetrain, Tesla’s leading software is more sustaining. Tesla pioneered a vertically integrated in-house approach to software and electronics. It’s one of the only automakers that designs its computing chips in-house. Instead of integrating software and ECUs (electronic control units) from different suppliers, which is what traditional automakers do, Tesla runs a centralized software stack that controls everything from infotainment and battery management to autonomous driving. This centralized computing model reduces complexity, increases functionality and allows Tesla to undertake over-the-air updates. It means a Tesla is a far more advanced, connected and innovative EV. While major traditional automakers are starting to switch to this model and are building their in-house software expertise, I am skeptical that they can do so until the middle of this decade. That’s the major reason I think Tesla’s tech and software advantages are sustainable.Do you think tech companies will start to produce EVs?Danny Jacobs:It looks like a number of companies, like Apple, Alphabet and Sony, may well soon enter the market. They could be looking to provide the software that underpins EVs; they aren’t likely building the vehicles themselves. However, given the number of car companies, both for ICE and EV, this is an industry structure that’s both suboptimal and unlikely to change. Therefore, these tech companies, many of which are used to dominating the industry in which they operate, may find the auto industry less appealing than their core markets.Julie Dickson:I certainly think there’s an opportunity for tech companies to partner with manufacturers where quality software will become a differentiating factor. EVs that can offer a really good experience in a connected vehicle could be a very strong monetization hub for manufacturers.Can you elaborate on the Chinese EV ecosystem?Jason Zhang:China is the biggest auto market globally, both for ICEs and EVs.5Last year, more than three million EVs were sold in China, which was around half of all EV units sold globally.6While China has been trying to become a successful ICE manufacturer for decades, foreign brands make up a large portion of the Chinese market today. In contrast, Chinese brands have more than 80% of the EV market share,7driven by companies like BYD and Shanghai Auto as well as start-ups like NIO. Tesla is the only meaningful foreign EV brand in China; despite starting production in the country in 2019, it sold half a million units in 2021.8Software connectivity is becoming increasingly important in the EV space in China, ensuring that the car always feels fresh with updated features. In my view, these attributes will also become more important to Western consumers.Piyada Phanaphat:China encouraged the entire battery supply chain to be in China, from lithium to battery material to cell makers to equipment makers. As they shunned foreign competitors, the domestic ecosystem had time to mature. This has helped Chinese companies such as CATL, which is now the largest battery maker in the world. China is one of the earliest markets to be successful at entry-level EVs, city cars with relatively small ranges. Rapid innovation is set to continue and a new business model, based on battery pack change, means EV manufacturers can address consumer concerns about needing to find charging stations.Rapid innovation is set to continueInnovation can drive lower costs, improve EVs and overcome challenges around raw materials.",ESG
My investment lessons from 40 years in China,2022-04-07T04:40:00,"Steve Watson was a young student when he and his wife, Barbara, first arrived in Wuhan, China, to spend the summer of 1981 studying Chinese.“The China we encountered on that first visit would be unrecognizable to a traveler today,” recalls Watson, a portfolio manager on Capital Group Capital Income BuilderTM(Canada) and Capital Group Monthly Income PortfolioTM(Canada).  “We traveled on unairconditioned trains powered by coal-fired locomotives belching smoke that burned your eyes and blackened your clothes.”There were no private automobiles; bicycles and buses were the primary means of transportation. The city had no subway system. Telephones and air conditioners were out of reach for most people — Wuhan University had only one air-conditioned room at the time — and refrigeration was scarce. The city, a central trading hub in China, had a single bridge spanning the Yangtze River.Steve Watson and his wife Barbara visiting the Great Wall of China in 1981Today the city of more than 12 million boasts 11 bridges crossing the Yangtze and a subway with nine lines and 228 stations. Air conditioners, TVs and cars are in abundance.“Even after decades of closely following China, I am often surprised by its capacity for change and willingness to adapt,” says Watson, who has lived and worked in Hong Kong since 2000.Watson recently marked the 40th anniversary of that first trip to China. Here he shares how his perceptions of the country changed over the years, lessons learned as a professional investor there and how he is thinking about the investment environment today.40 years of explosive growthSources: Capital Group, CEIC Data, IMF, The World Bank. *Data for number of private enterprises as of 1988 and 2018. RMB represents Chinese renminbi.China produces great entrepreneursAt Capital Group, we have always believed that the quality of a company’s management is critical to the success or failure of the business. So we place a great deal of emphasis on investing with great business leaders, and China has produced some great entrepreneurs.One example is Wu Yajun, co-founder of Longfor Properties, whom I met on one of my first trips as the new Hong Kong property analyst in 2000 when the company was still nine years from its Hong Kong IPO. I was struck by Madame Wu’s integrity, determination and dedication to her customers and employees. That assessment proved to be accurate in my view, and Wu is among the property developers who transformed the face of China over decades of explosive growth.I also had the privilege of meeting the founders of what are now some of the country’s digital giants, though I didn’t always immediately recognize the extent to which some would become change agents.More than 21 years ago I met Pony Ma, founder of a startup Shenzhen-based tech firm called Tencent. The company primarily offered an instant messaging service. Its name was derived from the price of an individual message at the time: ten (yuan) cents.At the time Tencent consisted of Ma and a dozen or so young employees busily tapping away on keyboards in a dim basement. I was intrigued but didn’t have an adequate sense of what it might become.China’s manufacturing engine climbs the value chainSource: Capital Group, based on reports from Euromonitor, SNE Research and company filings. Data is as of May 2021 and reflects approximate figures.Identifying a great CEO is more art than science, and not every business has a strong leader. Years ago I invested in Sino-Forest, a Toronto-listed Chinese company that purported to acquire and manage forest lands and sell them to other investors. In reality, management misled investors by inventing phony transactions, among other things. In 2017, a Canadian regulator ruled that CEO Allen Chan and several other directors had committed fraud.While this situation was not unique, there are nevertheless many Chinese companies that recognize the importance of transparency and are taking steps to align with the standards of other countries.I'm on the council of theAsian Corporate Governance Association, a Hong Kong-based organization which meets with many Chinese companies interested in becoming members and learning about corporate best practices in very practical areas.In any country we must be sure that what we are hearing is the truth. We need to keep the lines of communication open with company management. We also need to be skeptical and thorough in our research.China is vast, with many risks and opportunitiesFor years pundits have predicted China’s imminent economic demise. As early as 2001, in his book, The Coming Collapse of China, author Gordon Chang described how the grip of the Communist Party, bad debt in the banking system, capital misallocation, corruption and property bubbles would conspire to end the Chinese economic miracle.Contrary to the expectations of Chang and many others, the country resisted collapse. While many of these problems are real, in my experience its leaders were — and remain — focused on avoiding decline. We can watch with concern the danger zones, especially debt buildup and the misallocation of capital, but we should remember that China’s policymakers focus on those same issues.Indeed, China’s stratospheric growth has often confounded close observers expecting collapse or stagnation. Consider China’s property market, which early in my career I covered as an analyst. The fear of an imminent property collapse has been with us at least since the early 2000s. In 2003, a colleague of mine, reflecting on a trip to Shanghai wrote that he had witnessed mile after mile of new apartments, offices and factories, many of which appeared unoccupied. “I think I am witnessing a bubble of major proportions,” he wrote at the time.Chinese property prices instead rose dramatically over the years, stubbornly refusing to collapse. It was difficult for many to comprehend the transformative effect of urbanization, alongside a general need for upgrades to the national property stock. Arguably, the country remains under-urbanized today.Urbanization is on the rise in China’s workforce and marketsSources: Capital Group, The World Bank. Most recent population employment data is as of 2019.The vast size of China’s market presents significant opportunity, but it is important to remember that China is no monolith that thinks and acts with a single voice. In fact, with a population of 1.4 billion (as of 2020) spread across 23 provinces, five autonomous regions, four municipalities under direct control of the central government and two special administrative regions, China is a complex and often opaque entity that doesn’t necessarily head in one direction without internal conflict along the way. And the result of that heterogeneity can be outcomes that confound expectations.Investing in China requires firsthand knowledgeLiving in Hong Kong for more than 22 years helps me appreciate China’s many complexities. Our office there opened in 1983 and was located in the apartment of the company’s first employee, Sin-Ming Shaw. That same year, former chairman Jon B. Lovelace spoke before the State Council of the People’s Republic of China in Beijing. Capital made its first equity investments in China in 1994 and formed our China Group in 2001.Watson with members of Capital’s China group on a visit to Shanghai in 2015Today we have eight China industry specialists. I consider them essential to our understanding of the investment risks and opportunities the country provides.For example, recent research into the electric vehicle battery supply chain, in which China is a leader, helped some of my colleagues make informed decisions on the manufacturers there.Our Shanghai industry specialists, working with colleagues in other offices, are currently interviewing hundreds of individuals who live in the largest, most-developed cities as well as the smaller cities to gain deeper insight into China’s property market. Respondents reply to questions about their financial situation, buying attitudes, real estate portfolios, property concerns and financing ability, among others.Watson and a colleague visiting a steel plant in Tangshan in 2016China’s government wields significant power in marketsWhen investing in China it’s wise to remember that the government is a powerful actor whose influence cannot be underestimated. Recently, Chinese authorities imposed tight regulations on internet platform companies they felt were out of line with the government’s common prosperity agenda. In some cases these businesses were deemed too profitable or conducting business at odds with the public interest.The shifts in government policy surprised many, including me, and shares of the platform companies tumbled. The government also intervenes in other areas of the private sector like education and gaming.As investors, we must pay close attention to these changes and fully understand the implications of China’s common prosperity agenda. Without a doubt, political risk is higher than in other markets, but China wants a growing and dynamic economy, characterized by a significant degree of innovation. I believe its leaders know this cannot be accomplished solely by state-owned enterprises.Today many companies are nervous about appearing too profitable — and showing too much growth. But I think they will reach an equilibrium in which business leaders figure out how they can thrive and be appreciated by the government and the government can determine how best to use private enterprise to achieve its long-term economic goals.Swift growth has reshaped China’s marketSources: Capital Group, MSCI, RIMES. Sector composition as of March 24, 2022. Top companies as of December 31, 2021. The telecom and utilities category includes telecommunications services sector prior to 2018, at which point it was reclassified as communication services and its composition was materially changed. The consumer and tech category includes consumer discretionary, consumer staples, information technology and communication services. The commodity-related category includes industrials, materials and energy. Colour legend reflects sector classification as of the end of each respective year.Contrarian investing in China todayI am a contrarian investor by nature and today, when shares of many Chinese companies have dropped significantly and investors are increasingly worried, I think it’s good to remain open-minded to investing in China. Lately I have been looking at a variety of industries, including consumer goods, corporate services and even internet platforms. But I caution: It is not an easy market to understand. Deep fundamental research by experienced industry specialists locally is essential.Investors in China can look for the same things they seek in other markets, such as companies with strong management teams willing to reward shareholders, good products, attention to quality, a focus on profitability, an understanding of balance-sheet efficiency and, of course, skill in navigating government relations.",China
How to think about investing in China today,2022-04-06T02:45:00,"It’s important to state up front that we don’t believe China is “un-investible” as some have posited following the government’s recent intervention into several areas of the private-sector economy. It’s also not a geopolitical pariah like Russia, which is a tiny constituent of the global indices and economy.China’s key attraction is its enormous domestic market. But as the world’s second-largest economy, China is deeply interconnected with the global economy in manufacturing supply chains and is increasingly a large portion of multinational corporate revenues. Understanding and navigating the complexities of China has important implications for both domestic and international investing in understanding the development of its capital markets longer term.The framework for investing in China has changed significantly over the past year due to micro, macro, regulatory and geopolitical factors. China is still investible, but at the right price in the right sectors. And the kinds of companies that might be future potential sources of solid returns could be quite different than in the past decade.With that backdrop in mind, here is how we are thinking about investing in China today.The risk premium is higherWe’ve been significantly reassessing the risk premium applied to China, given slower economic growth the rising demographic headwinds and the potential for further regulatory measures. The country is going through a structural change during a cyclical downturn, and it could take some time to fully understand the impact of the government’s common prosperity agenda for the economy and President Xi Jinping’s priorities if he secures a third term.So, what do we know? From our perspective, China’s problems are fairly apparent: among them, an aging population, significant debt at state-owned enterprises and local governments, pollution, wealth disparity and inefficient allocation of capital. The property sector and its current downturn are of particular concern.Xi is trying to fix many of these critical problems with reforms and regulations. And since China’s two-term limit on the presidency was removed in 2018, Xi is widely expected to be elected for a third term at the 20th Party Congress in late 2022, giving him more time to implement his agenda and shape China for decades to come.Explosive growth has transformed China over 40 yearsSources: Capital Group, CEIC Data, IMF Data, the World Bank. *Data for number of private enterprises as of 1988 and 2018. (RMB is the abbreviation for China's currency, the renminbi.)For now, it means companies with excessively high profit margins may come under scrutiny, similar to what happened in the for-profit education and technology-related sectors. It also means incorporating a much more layered and complex analysis of equity securities from a fundamental perspective and through a policy lens to see where it fits in Beijing’s development agenda. An example would be companies that are beneficiaries aligned with Xi’s mandate to source locally and develop internal domestic supply chains.It further means applying a higher risk premium to Chinese equities with comparable businesses to listed stocks in other countries that don’t have the same political risks. Emerging internet platform companies in Southeast Asia and Latin America are an example.Over the past 18 months, we’ve become more selective and have narrowed exposure in China. Holdings have become increasingly concentrated in fewer larger positions and in companies run by private entrepreneurs, where there remains potential for secular growth with some political tailwinds.And we’ve become more valuation sensitive and focused on capital allocation. This has meant a reduction in technology holdings and China exposure overall. As the chart shows, China’s technology companies have tumbled since early 2021, not long after China’s regulators abruptly postponed the initial public offering of Alibaba affiliate Ant Financial.Value of China’s technology giants has diminished on regulatory uncertaintiesSources: Capital Group, MSCI, RIMES. The five companies included represent the five largest Chinese technology companies (Tencent, Alibaba, JD.com, Baidu and NetEase) by market value as of February 28, 2022, that were also publicly listed in 2015. All stocks, except Tencent, reflect their American Depository Receipts.A focus on domestic companies with less political riskFinding areas to invest alongside the priorities of China’s government has taken on even greater importance. The government seems determined to not let private companies have a disproportionate influence on any single area of the economy or to reap high profits at the expense of consumers, although they want them to remain innovative and source materials domestically.It seems the playbooks for the large internet platform companies has changed and their days of exponential growth will be more measured. To some degree, this is now reflected in their stock prices. It’s become clear the government wants to prevent the large technology companies from aggressively expanding horizontally into multiple lines of business. It also seems clear the government wants to protect their smaller competitors and to force a more equitable distribution of wealth.On top of this, several key areas, like e-commerce, may be maturing in terms of penetration and have become increasingly competitive. Based on reports of layoffs and bonus cuts in China’s internet sector, it appears these companies are preparing for a different future.In our view, political investment risk may be reduced by focusing on domestic-oriented companies in China that are aligned with Xi’s policy priorities (i.e., automation, local technology and content, environment, electric vehicles (EVs), health care) and serve to improve people’s lives at reasonable prices and margins.Over the years, we’ve met many smart entrepreneurs in China who have scaled up their businesses very quickly and believe such investment opportunities remain in the country’s large addressable markets, in areas like consumer products, health care, IT services, semiconductors and clean energy. So, from our perspective, it is possible to enjoy a long tailwind of growth if you pick the right place to invest.China seeks to become self-sufficient in key industriesSources: U.S. Chamber of Commerce and the Center for Security and Emerging Technology, based on estimated data as of 2017.Potential areas of growth alongside the government’s agendaOne area of interest is auto dealerships, which are building their brands within China. It’s a basic business but still largely fragmented across China with room to grow, especially in after-sales service. EVs and urban natural gas networks that replace coal are attractive areas that are aligned with the government’s agenda. And, given the aging population, automation and health care remain areas with long-term tailwinds. Other areas of potential growth are national consumer brands in the alcohol and dairy space, which are gaining share and have pricing power.Given the sheer size of the population, domestic consumer brands don’t necessarily have to target consumers outside China to become successful. Many Chinese consumers are buying their first homes, refrigerators and other household appliances to improve their living standards, and the middle class continues to grow and remains aspirational. This approach also helps shield some investments from getting swept up in U.S.–China trade frictions.Expect a slower rate of growth in China’s economyThere is a risk of a prolonged slump in China’s economy. China is dealing with another round of rolling COVID-19 lockdowns (which are more stringent than those in 2020), and this could further constrain already weak consumer spending and a broader reopening of China’s economy. This also may continue to impact global supply chains and increase global inflationary pressures.The property market, which is a significant contributor to the country’s gross domestic product (GDP), is in a significant downturn with many heavily indebted real estate developers. Land and home sales have been weak, and there does not seem to be much incentive for buyers to fork over down payments on projects that might not get finished.Our Capital Group economist colleague Stephen Green is concerned about the prospects for China’s economy over the next 12 months. He anticipates marginal growth and does not expect any significant loosening of policy that would forestall the current slowdown. He believes Beijing, which has guided to 5.5% GDP growth in 2022, has not done enough fast enough to turn around the economy.There are likely to be a few interest rate cuts and tax cuts for small businesses, but no big bang measures like those that pulled China out of its 2015–16 slump. At best, in Green’s estimation, Beijing will slowly turn up the stimulus dial each month.Valuations for leading domestic consumer companies have been less affectedSource: Refinitiv Datastream. Data as of February 28, 2022.Historically, volatility in China has been a buying opportunity: The problem appears, growth slows, the government comes up with clever tweaks to regulation and policy with more stimulus, the economy stabilizes and the market rebounds. But it seems the playbook has changed, and many of us are waiting to see if more significant stimulus measures happen after the 20th Party Congress.The energy shortages that rippled through China in the fall of 2021 and temporarily shut down manufacturing facilities were telling about Xi’s resolve to restructure the economy. Why would Xi allow this when the economy was weak, the property market was rapidly decelerating, there was a trade war with the United States and COVID was impacting global export markets?The message is clear, in our view: GDP growth is no longer a top priority for China’s Communist Party. We are bracing for more volatility and plan to be more selective about gauging the risk premium for industries and companies. But we continue to look for longer term opportunities amid this market selloff.",China
Running dry: How water risk can threaten companies’ bottom line,2022-03-21T11:40:00,"Climate change is forcing investors to evaluate two new types of risk: transition risk, the cost of companies transitioning to low-carbon operations; and physical risk, the cost of increased drought, floods, severe weather and a rising sea level. Water stress is one of the most pronounced physical risks from climate change that investors must consider.Droughts and water scarcity are unpredictable events with a proven ability to stop or reduce production quickly, cause late-stage project cancellations and ultimately alter industry market share. Within water-intensive industries, understanding how companies manage their water supplies can be a key factor in anticipating their longer-term performance.The semiconductor industry provides a good case study: It is among the most water-intensive industries on a relative basis, and several “hubs” where chips are produced have been exposed to severe, long-term drought in the past. In response, several leading companies have found new approaches to water management, allowing them to recycle upward of 90% of water used and reinforcing long-term sustainability of operations.Water risk becomes material when companies operate in high-stress zonesSources: World Resource Institute Aqueduct, OpenStreetMap. Data accessed March 18, 2022. The chart shows projected water stress levels for 2030 in a ""business-as-usual"" climate change scenario, under which global greenhouse gas emissions continue growing at their current pace. The World Resource Institute defines water stress as the ratio of total water withdrawals to available renewable surface and groundwater supplies. Higher water stress levels indicate more competition among water users.In the past year, several large semiconductor companies announced new investments to build capacity in the United States, several of which will be in a growing manufacturing hub in Arizona. At the same time, the drought situation in Arizona is worsening. For the first time ever, in August 2021, the U.S. federal government declared a water shortage on the Colorado River that would trigger cutbacks starting in 2022. Arizona is set to lose 18% of its water allocation, or 63 million cubic meters. This amount represents the equivalent of total annual water consumption for the city of Phoenix, or Intel’s total annual water withdrawal.Yet despite anticipated water shortages, Intel, the largest producer in the region, is likely able to access the amount of water it needs. In a meeting with Capital Group, the company explained its processes to be able to recycle 80%–90% of water. The company now consumes a very small percentage of fresh water in the region because of its on-site water reclamation facilities, which recycle water back into its own processes or into the municipal water system.In addition to the reclamation facility, Intel’s water efficiency has significantly improved since it began operations at its Arizona manufacturing site. In the 1990s, Intel needed 7.6 litres of municipal water for every 3.8 litres of ultrapure fresh water used in its chipmaking process (50% efficiency). Today, Intel uses only 4.2 litres of municipal water per gallon of ultrapure water (90% efficiency).Other sectors face tough challengesThe success of semiconductor companies may show a path forward for other water-intensive sectors, but some specific industries, like utilities and food and beverage companies, are likely to struggle. Utilities, which are by a factor of 25 times the largest users of water in Capital Group’s investment universe, cannot currently scale up their water recycling programs to mitigate their risk.Utility companies’ water usage is off the chartsSource: Capital Group, Bloomberg. Average annual water withdrawal normalized to total revenue of companies within the MSCI World Index split by industry. Water withdrawal includes total water diverted from surface, ground and municipal water sources. The utilities industry data is not plotted to scale due to its much larger relative size. Data as of September 1, 2021.Utilities use water for two major purposes: 1. hydroelectric power, and 2. cooling thermoelectric and nuclear power. It’s intuitive that hydro-powered electricity requires water, but the scale of water needed for cooling thermal and nuclear power plants is also enormous relative to other industries’ water use. Three of the five largest water users in Capital Group’s universe do not have significant hydro-generation operations. And protecting against drought risk could require these companies to move their production sites or, if that’s not possible, switch away from hydro and thermal power altogether.The risks facing the sector were on display last year in Brazil, where extreme drought caused a spike in electricity prices. Brazil, which derives about 65% of its energy from hydro, had previously diversified into thermal electricity sources (cutting hydro down from 90% of its total power supply) following an extreme drought in 2001 and 2002 that caused electricity blackouts and energy shortages. However, with the severity of the 2021 drought, the country still experienced massive utility price increases. The largest financial impacts are expected to come from higher energy costs for companies that are asset-heavy and energy-intensive but not self-sufficient in producing electricity.Food and beverage companies face a different challenge. Because they withdraw and consume vast quantities of water — essentially reselling fresh water extracted near manufacturing plants for their products — these companies can face difficult community and regulatory relations in water-stressed regions. And while companies in other sectors have been able to navigate water cuts, shutdowns, regulatory hurdles and community protests by using a freshwater alternative — typically water treatment and recycling or desalination — this is not usually an option for food and beverage companies.Implications for investorsAs climate change continues to alter the planet, investors need additional approaches to understand essential risks and opportunities for resource-intensive sectors and companies. As part of our fundamental investment research process, we analyze how efficiently water-intensive companies manage their water usage.Our analytical framework includes six different factors, which we use to gauge a company’s exposure to water risk:Source: Capital GroupHow well companies score on these factors helps forecast their ability to operate effectively and deliver results — or not — in the future. Investors may also need to reexamine the near-term attractiveness of certain resource-intensive sectors to factor in the prospect that securing ample freshwater supplies may limit their growth ahead.By integrating these types of frameworks into our analytical processes, we seek to better identify companies that are successfully adapting to meet the new challenges, as well as those that are likely to struggle to keep delivering value as conditions change. This new type of fundamental analysis can provide a crucial filter to help separate likely winners and losers in the future, potentially leading to better outcomes for investors in the years ahead.Water risk: a global and local problemAccess to clean, fresh water is likely to be a growing concern in the decades ahead for some parts of the globe. A recent report by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) concluded that continued global warming is likely to increase extremes in the hydrological cycle — meaning longer droughts and more severe flooding. In a 1.5-degree Celsius warming scenario, which is approximately the equivalent of “net-zero emissions by 2050” and aligned with the Paris Agreement, heavy precipitation is forecast to be 1.5 times as likely and droughts 2 times as likely to occur. In the most extreme scenarios considered by the IPCC, heavy precipitation could be 3 times as likely and droughts 4 times as likely. The result of these changes is a likely deficit of fresh water. According to the United Nations, the world is expected to face a global freshwater deficit of up to 40% by 2030.Even though droughts can have global ramifications, water scarcity risk varies greatly by region and needs to be understood and managed locally. Water only becomes a material risk when companies operate (or attempt to expand into) severely water-stressed areas.Managing water stress: Innovation is providing long-term resilienceSectors with the greatest material exposure to water stress include utilities, energy, chemicals, food, beverage, hotels, containers and packaging, semiconductors, and construction materials. Companies in many of these sectors may be able to mitigate — and in some cases eliminate — water stress risk through selecting safer production sites, investing in recycling and establishing local freshwater alternatives.",ESG
Rotating into dividends in an inflationary world,2022-02-22T03:23:00,"The recent volatility in growth stocks has brought dividend equities back into focus. Dividend-paying stocks have outpaced their growth counterparts by a substantial margin year-to-date, as fears of rising interest rates and worries about the pace of economic growth in the United States and China have raised concerns over the elevated valuations of many previously high-flying growth stocks.We saw a similar market rotation in the first quarter of 2021, which fizzled out as growth stocks made a strong comeback. But this year the macro-economic backdrop is different. Inflation is at a multi-decade high, and the U.S. Federal Reserve plans to raise interest rates and wind down its quantitative easing program. Earnings reports from some of the larger growth companies, like Netflix and Meta, have disappointed versus expectations. And the value of the more distant cash flows of growth companies makes them more vulnerable to a rise in interest rates.Dividend stocks have reboundedSource: Bloomberg. Data as of February 15, 2022, and based on style factor strategies created by Bloomberg. Factor investing is an investment approach that involves targeting specific drivers of return across asset classes (including macroeconomic, fundamental and other statistical measures for building a strategy). Returns are in USD.Amid rising bond yields and higher inflation, the market rotation into dividend stocks may still be in the early stages. Along those lines, dividend-income investment could well play a more important role in the total return of a portfolio. Against this backdrop, we explore four emerging trends in the dividend universe.1. Positive correlation between dividend yields and bond yieldsFor most of the past 30 years, the relative returns of high dividend-yielding stocks and changes in U.S. Treasury yields had a negative relationship. That relationship reversed in the past two years and high-yielding stocks have exhibited a positive correlation to bond yields. If this trend continues, a rise in interest rates may not dampen prospects of dividend stocks as they have in the past.Partly, it’s because interest rates are rising, but from a very low base. Even as the Fed begins to raise policy rates, our fixed income rates team expects the 10-year U.S. Treasury yield to remain within a range of 2% to 3% with a further flattening of the yield curve led by a rise in short-term rates. Against this backdrop, dividend-paying stocks provide a combination of income and potential for capital appreciation, especially since the valuations of many of these companies appear reasonable following a long bull market for growth stocks. That said, it’s important to identify companies with heavy debt loads or excessive leverage on their balance sheets in a rising rate environment.Historical relationship between bond and dividend yields has turned positiveSources: Capital Group, MSCI, Datastream. Data as of December 31, 2021. Yield factors are constructed by ranking dividend yields within a region and then breaking them into terciles, rebalanced monthly.  The return reflects the average return of the high-yielding cohort minus the average return of the low-yielding cohort.  Returns are market cap weighted. The change in the 10-year U.S. Treasury is measured as the monthly basis points change in the 10-year U.S. Treasury yield.  The correlation is calculated over 24 months and rolled forward on a monthly basis.2. Dividends are making a comeback, but at a measured paceWe expect a steady increase in global dividends, but at a measured pace. Many companies are taking a more deliberate approach after their experience in the depths of the COVID-19 pandemic, when they were forced to substantially cut or eliminate their payouts. Now, amid a deceleration in global economic growth, some companies want to preserve cash in case of a greater-than-expected downturn.Some industries, such as travel, continue to face a high level of uncertainty. Boeing, one of the world’s largest makers of airplanes, and cruise line operator Carnival are still struggling with depressed travel and have not resumed dividend payouts. Overall, however, dividends continue to recover. Of the 242 companies that either suspended or cut their dividend in 2020, 98 have reinstated payments and only three companies cut their dividend in 2021, according to Wolfe Research data as of February 15.Companies with pricing power are likely to be better positioned to increase dividends. Household products giant Procter & Gamble, for example, has already raised prices across some of its product lines to help hedge itself against inflation. Consumer staples makers are often hurt when inflation begins to move higher and input costs go up. However, after a period of three to six months, these companies often seek to reprice contracts with retailers and grocers. This ultimately puts them in a better position to recoup those raw material costs, grow their earnings and potentially increase their dividend at a commensurate rate.Dividend acceleration is also anticipated in Europe, where governments have eased pressures on dividend payments. During the pandemic, governments and regulators had pressed some companies to refrain from making payments as part of a social solidarity movement.Global dividends are projected to riseSources: Capital Group, FactSet, MSCI, RIMES. Data for 2022–2024 are estimates by FactSet as of February 2, 2022. All estimates are in USD.3. Highly cyclical firms take innovative approach with variable dividendsSome companies, especially those in cyclical industries, are adopting innovative approaches to balance their business needs and a commitment to dividend payouts. Take the mining sector, which in 2021 witnessed a boom in dividend payouts. Over the past few years, many large mining companies, such as Rio Tinto and Vale, have switched from progressive dividend policies to a payout ratio. In these arrangements, dividend payouts are determined by a formula tied to certain operating metrics. This shift results in a variable dividend yield over time. But it also gives these companies an enhanced ability to manage their balance sheet and cash flows in a sustainable manner through multiple commodities cycles.In the past, miners often struggled to maintain a regular dividend during market downturns and would either cut the dividend or be forced to raise debt to cover the payout.Exploration and production (E&P) companies are also pivoting their dividend strategies. Historically, E&P companies have not been dividend payers, choosing instead to reinvest in the business to pursue more growth in production. But growth backfired at times when fluctuating energy prices hurt investment returns on projects and led to financial troubles.This is starting to change as firms have become more disciplined. Companies have begun to initiate a regular dividend at a low base, supplementing them with variable or special dividends depending on commodities prices and the strength of cash flows.For instance, Pioneer Natural Resources last November declared a quarterly cash variable dividend of US$3.02 per share, representing approximately US$740 million of capital returned to shareholders. EOG Resources has increased its dividend over the past five years and announced a special dividend last July.Companies hope this newer approach can lead investors to adopt a more benign valuation framework in which to view them and thus avoid excessive stock price volatility.4. Financials, energy and health care are areas of dividend opportunityFinancials, energy and health care represent a substantial chunk of the dividend-paying universe, and a confluence of factors appear to support the case of rising dividends from each of these areas.Financials:Rising rates should help the more rate-sensitive banks in the U.S. and Europe expand their net interest margins, which have been suppressed for many years by persistently low interest rates. This could result in stronger earnings, improved dividend streams and higher valuation multiples.Banks have been building up excess capital on their balance sheets since the Great Financial Crisis and most are now well-capitalized, having undergone a number of regulatory stress tests. And some banks in the U.S. and Europe are poised to redeploy surplus capital in the form of regular and catch-up dividends after facing regulatory limitations during the pandemic.For example, Dutch banking giant ING has committed to a minimum 50% dividend payout ratio (the proportion of earnings paid out as dividends to shareholders, typically expressed as a percentage) of earnings. CaixaBank, one of Spain’s largest banks, stated it would boost its payout ratio to as much as 60% from 50% previously. It’s possible that other European banks could follow a similar course of action as regulatory pressures ease, making this sector a potential source of more consistent dividend income.Energy:Large integrated oil companies have long been good sources of consistent dividends for income-oriented investors. They’ve also become more disciplined on supply, having curtailed investment in existing reserves and pursuing new sources of oil.U.S. oil giants Chevron and Exxon Mobil have demonstrated a steadfast commitment to paying dividends despite some dramatic swings in the price of oil over the past decade. Chevron recently increased its dividend for a 35th consecutive year.But dividend policies have diverged in the oil sector and calibrating the dividend streams of oil companies has become more challenging. Over the past couple of years, European oil majors BP and Royal Dutch Shell have cut their dividends amid their transition to investing in renewable energies that are capital intensive and where the return on invested capital is still uncertain. Having reset their dividends to lower payout ratios, the European oil majors have left sufficient room to increase dividends over time.Health care:Health care companies could be a source of both earnings and dividend growth in the current inflationary environment. Pharmaceutical companies historically have exhibited relatively strong pricing power. While the industry has faced political pressures on drug prices, the more innovative pharmaceutical companies will likely be positioned to raise prices at modest levels.Like the energy companies, the major pharmaceutical companies recognize that a sizeable portion of their value proposition with the investor base is the dividend payout. That, combined with the potentially robust pipeline over the next several years at several major pharmaceutical companies across all geographies, gives us confidence that this will be another area that can be a well-diversified source of equity income.Commodity companies offer some of the highest yieldsSources: MSCI, RIMES. Data as of January 31, 2022.Bottom lineOver the past decade, many growth companies have been rewarded in an environment of modest global economic growth, very little inflation and ultra-low interest rates. We appear to be in the beginning stages of an equity market that is starting to show some breadth after a heavy focus placed on the technology-related growth stocks, especially those in the United States.As market volatility increases due to monetary tightening and elevated levels of inflation, dividend-income investment could play a more important role in the total return of a portfolio. Investors are likely to pay greater attention to dividend payers as companies reinstate or continue to raise their dividends, albeit at a gradual pace. Furthermore, long-term investors have an opportunity to get in at the ground level amid this changing landscape; many companies currently trade at attractive valuations that may not be fully reflecting their upside potential as economies continue to normalize.Investment considerationsThe founding strategy of Capital Group Capital Income BuilderTM(Canada) was originally created to meet the needs of endowments. The mandate’s emphasis on companies that pay dividends helps to reduce risk if stock prices go down.Capital Group Monthly Income PortfolioTM(Canada) is a managed income solution with its underlying funds invested in a flexible mix of fixed-income, dividend-paying equities and growth-oriented equities on a global basis.  Dividend-oriented stocks add ballast to the portfolio.",Equity
The future of media: Game on!,2022-02-16T03:29:00,"During a span of just 21 days in January, the rapid pace of change in the media and entertainment industry inspired three blockbuster deals.Microsoft announced its intention to buy video game publisher Activision Blizzard for US$75 billion — a transaction that aims to bring the iconicCall of DutyandWorld of Warcraftfranchises under the tech giant’s umbrella. Take-Two Interactive unveiled its plan to shell out US$12.7 billion for mobile game maker Zynga, best known for theFarmVillefranchise. And Sony agreed to purchase Bungie, creator of the popularHaloandDestinygames, for US$3.6 billion.If all three deals close, that’s more than US$90 billion of M&A activity centered on video games, the fastest growing segment of the media sector. The Activision deal is Microsoft’s largest acquisition ever and could vault it to the top of the US$200 billion gaming industry, just behind China’s Tencent.Gaming’s global appeal fuels industry leaders in Asia and the U.S.Sources: Capital Group, Newzoo. Quarterly revenue figures are estimates by research firm Newzoo, as of September 30, 2021.Driven in part by a pandemic-era gaming boom, the fast-changing media landscape is fundamentally transforming the way people interact and entertain themselves in a world where traditional TV viewing and movie attendance are in serious decline. That dynamic makes interactive games even more valuable to the likes of Microsoft, Sony and others.“I think it’s a testament to how powerful and alluring video games have become,” says Martin Romo, portfolio manager on Capital Group U.S. Equity FundTM(Canada).“The global gaming industry provides compelling entertainment at a reasonable cost, and it’s already surpassed the movie industry in terms of annual gross revenue. Fundamentally, I think that growth is likely to continue and even accelerate in the years ahead.”Streaming and social media competition heat upThe disruption extends to other areas of the media world, as well.“Another big theme playing out here is that you have a lot of companies trying to get into each other’s business,” says equity portfolio manager Jody Jonsson“There was a time when they had these sandboxes all to themselves, but that’s changing. Everyone is looking at everyone else’s sandbox and trying to jump in.”For example, Netflix — the clear leader in streaming video — is encountering fierce competition from Amazon and Apple, as well as old guard media companies such as Disney. In less than three years, Disney’s streaming service, Disney+, has grown to 130 million subscribers worldwide.In the social media space, TikTok is challenging Facebook parent Meta Platforms, attracting hordes of young viewers thanks to the power of its short-form videos. Facebook has responded by launching its own short video offering, dubbed “Reels,” which is growing in popularity — just not as fast as TikTok, which was the most downloaded app of 2021.Other battles in the media business were lost years ago. For instance, a precipitous decline in traditional TV viewership — especially among young people — raises the possibility that once ubiquitous cable TV packages may no longer exist in a few years. If live sports and news programs ever move en masse to streaming services, that could spell the end of cable TV as we know it.Young people are increasingly shunning pay TVSources: Capital Group, Nielsen. Traditional TV includes live TV and recordings of live TV (for example, using a DVR).There’s no business like show businessThis type of momentous change and disruption may appear surprising to some, but it’s par for the course in the media and entertainment biz, explains Capital Group equity analyst Brad Barrett, who has covered the industry for two decades.“Media is always being roiled by technological change,” Barrett says. “It felt like a huge amount of change when the internet started disrupting traditional media outlets in the early 2000s. It felt huge when YouTube burst onto the scene. And then came social networking, smartphones and video streaming. They all caused a great deal of disruption and continue to do so.“Don’t get me wrong, there’s certainly a lot going on right now,” Barrett adds, “but change and disruption are staples of the media business.”One interesting new trend, Barrett notes, is the globalization of content production and consumption. Case in point: Three of Netflix’s most popular series —Squid Game, LupinandMoney Heist— are filmed in South Korea, France and Spain, respectively. And they come with English subtitles, which had previously been a deterrent for some anglophone viewers. Not so anymore.“Consumers around the world are watching content from all over the world in ways we’ve never seen before,” Barrett says. “It’s great to see English speakers embrace these non-English shows with such enthusiasm. I think it’s a very positive trend, and it’s a real breakthrough for global creativity.”Metaverse now?Looking ahead, what will be the next source of media disruption?Based on the rising number of sensationalist headlines, the metaverse is certainly one candidate. Depending on who you ask, the much-touted metaverse is either the future of the internet or a virtual reality pipe dream.As technologists have described it, the metaverse is an incredibly immersive and expansive digital world in which people can interact, transact, play games, attend concerts, watch movies, meet coworkers in a virtual office and engage in myriad other activities through user-created avatars.The idea is so powerful it prompted Facebook to change its name four months ago to Meta Platforms, promising to transform the social media giant into a “metaverse company.” Meta will have plenty of competition, however. Microsoft declared the Activision deal is, in part, driven by a desire to develop compelling content for the metaverse — a world where virtual reality headsets may become as common as smartphones.There are also many independent websites with a metaverse focus, including Sandbox, founded in 2012, and Decentraland, launched three years later. Users of these sites are already buying virtual land, virtual houses and virtual artwork, often with cryptocurrencies such as Bitcoin, Ethereum, Cardano and Solana.Bandwidth needs are expected to soar amid the growth of the metaverseSources: Capital Group, TeleGeography. Actual data through 2020. 2021 to 2023 are estimates.Neal Stephenson originally coined the term metaverse in his 1992 novelSnow Crash. Ernest Cline further popularized the concept in his 2011 sci-fi novelReady Player One, which subsequently became a movie. One oft-cited answer when people ask, “What is the metaverse?” is to readReady Player Oneor at least watch the movie.Clearly, the concept has been around a while and it’s not all hype, says equity portfolio manager Peter Eliot,“When I ask friends what they think of virtual reality, very few of them have tried it,” Eliot says. “That’s an excellent opportunity for us to leverage our long-term perspective and global research capability to try and understand and appreciate the metaverse now — in advance of what could be a substantial product cycle.""Though nascent, the metaverse is further along than some might think,"" he adds. ""For example, we’ve already experimented with meetings in VR — and we are thinking through scenarios for mass adoption and its broad investment implications.”",Technology & Innovation
Storm cloud: Look past turbulence in software stocks,2022-02-03T10:33:00,"Cloud software stocks — which soared to dizzying heights during the pandemic — have been in a painful downward spiral since November.For the three months ended January 31, 2022, the BVP NASDAQ Emerging Cloud Index, a measure of cloud-based software companies, plummeted 28.5% in USD terms. That compares with a decline of 2.0% for the Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index, which measures the broader U.S. stock market.Why have these companies fallen so suddenly out of favour? In part, it’s due to expectations that the U.S. Federal Reserve will soon hike interest rates. Such hikes tend to have a more adverse impact on fast-growing businesses like cloud software, also known as software as a service (SaaS), than on the broader market. Higher interest rates reduce the current value of the much higher earnings such businesses expect to generate further into the future. In addition, valuations have ballooned over the past decade, with many software stocks reaching all-time highs in 2021.Investors might also wonder if many of these companies have grown too fast. After a decade-long sprint supercharged by the pandemic, has cloud software run into a wall?“It’s been a great 10 years for software, but I think we’re far from done,” says equity investment analyst Julien Gaertner, who covers U.S. software companies. “In my view, we are still in the early innings of this transition. I continue to be positive about the long-term outlook for the software industry.”Fasten your seatbelts for software volatilityBouts of intense volatility are nothing new for software stocks. In recent years, software companies as a group have sustained steep declines of 20% to 35% about every 18 months, so investors must have strong stomachs and no small amount of patience.“My approach to these periods has been consistent,” Gaertner says. “I focus on long-term fundamentals and see if the market opens up opportunities to build positions at attractive prices. We may only see these prices for a short time or not at all, so the key is to be ready.”Frequent corrections have been the norm for software stocksSources: Capital Group, Morningstar Direct. Corrections are defined by a share price decline of 20% or greater. The reference period for number of corrections, average depth of correction and cumulative return calculations begins in 2010, or date of company IPO, whichever is earlier. As of December 31, 2021. Returns are in USD.Software’s potential underestimated by the marketMany industries experience periods of innovation and rapid growth, but the software industry is unique for sustaining unusually high rates of growth for long periods.“I cannot identify another industry that has the growth duration characteristics of the software industry. These companies have expanded scale and improved business models at a pace that is rare in any industry,” Gaertner says. “Over time, the market has tended to underestimate just how long these companies can grow at elevated rates.”Consider Workday, which offers HR management software as a subscription through the cloud. When the company went public in 2012, it was adding roughly US$100 million of recurring revenue a year. Today, best-in-class software companies can potentially add about US$100 million in recurring revenue per quarter, Gaertner says. “And I expect that potential growth rate to double again over the next few years,” he adds.Further adjustments to cloud software business models could drive further acceleration. “Today companies like Snowflake are using consumption-based business models, which could potentially quicken growth even more,” Gaertner says.The duration of growth for leading cloud software makers has outpaced expectationsSources: Capital Group, Refinitiv Datastream. Prior estimates are based on consensus analyst estimates as of one year prior to actual sales results.Cybersecurity and the next wave of growthOne trend driving software opportunity is the rapidly growing need for more and better cybersecurity. Shifting the world’s data and workloads to the cloud has expanded the potential for security threats. This trend was amplified by the pandemic rush to a digital future.In 2021 alone, major cyberattacks included the REvil ransomware attack by Russian hackers in April and a breach of Colonial Pipeline’s systems in May, while in December a serious vulnerability in Log4j software reportedly exposed more than 89% of the world’s IT environments.“It’s crazy what is happening today,” Gaertner says. “Major new threats seem to arise every couple of months. I believe we are all underestimating just how much cybersecurity will change the world over the next 10 years.”The transition to the cloud has precipitated a shift toward a new approach to cybersecurity called zero trust architecture. This requires user authentication and management for each service and all information accessed.“The legacy security providers have been slow to adapt to the zero trust model,” Gaertner explains. “And several innovative, smaller software companies have emerged to fill the void.”For example, Zscaler, a cloud-based enterprise network security company founded in 2007, provides secure entry to both locally hosted and externally hosted applications. Okta, an identity and access management company, offers a system that allows a user to access several systems using a single sign-on process.The need for cybersecurity expected to soar as the cloud expandsSources: Capital Group, Statista. ""CAGR"" represents the compound annual growth rate. As of August 2021.Taking aim at the database GoliathsLess visible than cybersecurity but no less ripe for disruption is the database software market. This is an enormous market opportunity, according to U.S. software analyst David Penner. “Every application created needs an underlying database on which to run,” Penner says. “So as the world of software expands, the database market expands.”Customers tend to remain with a database provider for years, or even decades, because once the databases are integrated into business processes, they are hard to change. The database market is “sticky” — but also somewhat sleepy.Legacy database providers have been slow to adapt, making them targets for new competitors. “The world has been running on Oracle databases for decades,” Penner explains, “but new providers like MongoDB are beginning to challenge Oracle and other database giants.” Founded in 2007, the cloud-oriented database provider achieved growth of 50% for its most recently reported quarter, higher than the 44% growth in the prior quarter. “This is a company that appears to be emerging as a next generation leader.”Cloud transition is going globalThe rise of start-up cloud software makers doesn't always come at the expense of legacy giants. Microsoft, for example, has made the transformation to cloud with its Office software and its cloud infrastructure service Azure.“Microsoft is unique in that they built their franchise during the PC revolution, then went through the desert for a while,” Penner says. The company was regarded as an aging dinosaur until Satya Nadella was named CEO in 2014. “Nadella and CFO Amy Hood drove a change in culture and strategy. Today you have a company transitioning its legacy products to the cloud and subscription services. And it’s turning into the world’s largest SaaS company.”The cloud model is also expanding the software market into new territory: small businesses — a segment of the market that was historically uneconomical to serve. But now a new generation of companies are offering a broad range of services to small businesses. Examples include Shopify, the maker of e-commerce tools; HubSpot, a sales and marketing platform; and Paycom, a payroll and human resources provider.“Customers can go to these companies’ websites and, with the swipe of a credit card, start operating on the software the same day,” Penner says. “Self-service software vendors like these didn’t really exist before the transition to the cloud model.”Cloud adoption could gather steam as the world catches up with the U.S.Source: IDC,Worldwide Public Cloud Services Spending Guide. Data as of June 2021.The bottom line: Use pullbacks to build selective positionsWith valuations for many software companies driven to all-time highs in 2021, investing in the industry comes with no small amount of risk. Even after the recent sell-off, the industry overall continues to be relatively expensive.“Valuations are high when you look at average or index levels, and I wouldn’t be surprised to see valuations compress further,” Gaertner says. ”Software is an area that I believe will continue to grow rapidly thanks to the shift to the cloud. The key for investors is selectivity and patience.”Penner agrees. “The cloud has been the next new thing for 10 years, but I believe it is still the next new thing. Nothing goes on forever, but as long as computing keeps getting cheaper and software keeps getting smarter, I see no reason for it to end anytime soon.”",Technology & Innovation
Pricing power can help companies fight inflation,2021-11-05T04:52:00,"Back in 2011 Netflix raised prices in the U.S. by dividing its streaming subscriptions from its original DVD service. The announcement sparked an uproar that forced the company to issue an apology and hammered the stock price.Today the world is in a very different place — and so is Netflix: The company is now a dominant streaming service and a megahit-making machine with more than 213 million subscribers worldwide. Its latest breakout, “Squid Game” — a Korean drama about children’s games played with deadly consequences — captivated some 142 million households, making it the most viewed show in Netflix history.This rising popularity has empowered the company to boost its prices. It has increased subscription rates in the U.S. four times since 2014, a period of robust subscriber growth globally. This is an example of pricing power, the ability to increase prices without losing customers.Pricing power can be an antidote for inflationPricing power, always a positive for companies that can sustain it, may be a crucial competitive advantage in the year ahead. Inflation has surfaced in the economy, and there are signs that it could linger in the coming months. The annual inflation rate in the U.S., as measured by the consumer price index, rose to 5.4% in September, its highest level in 13 years. Rising costs can erode a company’s profit margins and, ultimately, investor returns. But companies with clear, sustainable pricing power can protect their profit margins by passing those costs along to customers.In some industries, there is greater potential for pricing powerSources: Capital Group, FactSet, MSCI. Reflects industries within MSCI World Index. Average and standard deviation of gross margins are calculated for the five-year period ended 9/30/21. Based in USD.With growth slowing and inflation pressures building, as an equity portfolio manager I think it is essential to understand how companies with pricing power can offset inflation. Here is my perspective on pricing power.Health care services: A prescription for inflation’s illsHigh medical costs are a perennial hot button issue in Washington, and for good reason. Over the last 20 years, health care costs in the U.S. have risen at about 2.5 times the rate of broad inflation, as measured by the PCE inflation rate followed by the U.S. Federal Reserve.Historically, U.S. health insurance companies have had pricing power and passed on rising health care costs to their customers through higher premiums. Today, companies like UnitedHealth Group are no longer mere toll collectors on the freeway of rising health care costs. They actually manage care.Consider UnitedHealth Group, which is focused on helping governments and health care providers reduce spending and improve outcomes for patients. The company has been investing in predictive analytics and care delivery to reduce inefficiencies in the U.S. health care system.They determined that the most powerful person in the care delivery ecosystem is the primary care doctor, who represents 3 cents of every dollar Americans spend on health care but determines where another 85 cents is spent. By getting primary care doctors involved earlier in decisions about care, UnitedHealth is seeking to keep members healthy and get more value for every dollar spent. By delivering more value, UnitedHealth can maintain its pricing power while helping to tackle a long-term problem in the United States.Semiconductors: Everywhere, in everythingThe story of pricing power in the semiconductor industry  is simple: Soaring demand meets limited supply. Today semiconductors can be found not only in mobile phones and laptops but also in everyday household products like refrigerators and ovens. New cars can require as many as 100 chips. Indeed, the auto industry has felt the brunt of the global shortage in semiconductor supply.The rollout of new technologies, like 5G, artificial intelligence and cloud computing have further fueled the world’s appetite for chips. In August, Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing disclosed that it would raise chip prices by as much as 20%.Consolidation in the semiconductor industry has transformed the competitive landscape, leaving a few dominant players with potential pricing power in specialized areas of the market. For example, companies with proprietary chip designs, like Broadcom, or Dutch chip-component manufacturer ASML, could raise their prices in an inflationary environment.Demand for semiconductors is soaring — along with pricing powerSources: Applied Materials, Capital Group. Figures for 2025 are estimated. All figures are in USD.Beverages: Thirsty for leading brandsThe ability to raise prices without serious backlash not only varies across industries but also within them. In the food and beverage industry, drink companies tend to pass along higher costs to consumers better than many food companies. That’s because the beverage industry is dominated by a few players with strong brand recognition.One example is Keurig Dr Pepper, the producer of sodas and single serving coffee pods. The company has a history of pricing power, particularly for its most popular soft drinks, which include Canada Dry, Snapple and, of course, Dr Pepper.Video games: Not just child’s playOnce considered a minor niche in the entertainment industry, video games have soared in popularity and now represent the fastest growing segment of the world’s media entertainment industry. The global gaming industry is expected to grow to US$225 billion in annual revenue by 2025.Manufacturers have recently been flexing their power to raise prices. With Microsoft and Sony introducing updates to their Xbox and PlayStation consoles, respectively, game makers have disclosed plans to raise prices on console games to help account for the cost of creating more sophisticated games.A prime example of pricing power potential in the industry is the annual revenue from free-to-play games like Apex Legends from Electronic Arts and Fortnite, published by Epic Games. Tencent has a 40% ownership stake in Epic. Activision owns King, the publisher of popular mobile game Candy Crush. Free-to-play games generate revenue through advertising, whose rates can be increased as costs go up and through in-game purchases.Believe it or not, players spend real money on virtual clothing, weapons and other supplies for their gaming characters. Essentially, industry leaders can set the price for such items as they please.Revenue from free-to-play games, an area of pricing flexibility, has soared since 2011Sources: Capital Group, IDC (reports #US40181316 and #US47267621). 2021 through 2025 are estimates from IDC and do not reflect adjustments for inflation. Free-to-play game category includes microtransaction purchases and ad revenue.The bottom line for investors: Focus on pricing powerI’m not ready to believe we are headed into a period of sustained inflation. But I do believe rising costs are likely to linger in the coming months, making it the biggest risk investors will face in 2022.That’s why I am so focused on uncovering companies with pricing power.I recently asked the investment analyst team that supports one of our U.S. mutual funds to find examples of pricing power in the industries they cover. They came up with dozens of ideas, ranging from companies in the defence industry to technology and the consumer staples sector.With slowing growth, rising inflation and other uncertainties on the horizon, 2022 may seem a daunting environment for investors. But I’m optimistic that an active portfolio of select companies with strong pricing power can help investors thrive in the years ahead.",Inflation
What I learned on a trip through China,2021-11-02T12:00:00,"Several colleagues and I made our first journey back to China in more than 15 months as we start to get back to on-the-ground research. Our trip in May took us to 16 cities and included close to 90 meetings and visits to 20 manufacturing plants. In our travels, we spoke with a large cross section of people, from corporate executives and private entrepreneurs to rural villagers and young urban dwellers.We made the trip just before regulatory uncertainties rapidly escalated and drove a sharp selloff in China’s equity markets in July. It seemed that management teams appreciated that we visited in person, especially after they learned we had quarantined. As a global portfolio manager, I believe these conversations have given me a long-term perspective that has been helpful during this volatility.Risks to investing in China have obviously risen over the course of this year. That said, there are longer term forces at work that could have global implications over this decade. I’ll address both here. Having invested in Chinese stocks for more than 20 years, let me start with some impressions from my trip. I’ll then share a few recent high-level observations on what’s happened since.We experimented with delivery apps during quarantineCOVID-19 seemed very much under control in China. We felt safe everywhere we went, from Shanghai to a Chaozhou village. The playbook — strict quarantine rules and large-scale, frequent testing — is the norm. COVID testing at the airport was efficient and thorough. We got our results in a couple of hours. Later in the trip, we met with KingMed Diagnostics, the company that enables these large-scale diagnostic tests.We did a two-week quarantine in Shanghai when we arrived, and it was strictly enforced. We tried to leave our rooms to deliver things to each other a couple of times and were warned! As part of our research, we experimented with Meituan’s 30-minute delivery app and ordered everything from US$4 takeout meals to gym equipment to air freshening diffusers. After passing quarantine, we obtained the valuable green QR health code on WeChat and never looked back. We had to show it to get into buildings, get on the high-speed rail and catch flights.Riding the high-speed railway.Digitization is happening at a rapid rateI was struck by how fast the country has been digitized since my last visit. It took me by surprise. COVID has accelerated the trend — we didn’t use cash at all. I must have taken out my wallet all of two times in the entire trip.We bought all of our high-speed rail tickets on an app. In Guangdong province, we only had to use our ID cards to get on the train. High-speed rail is the best and most efficient way to get around the country. A business-class seat cost US$50 for a three-hour journey. We took only two flights throughout a four-week trip. And our drivers zipped in and out of carparks without stopping; they were simply charged on their phone.Even though some foreign investors have become spooked by the government’s intervention in the private sector, entrepreneurial activity remains vibrant from what I could discern. There is still lots of interest from venture capitalists and private equity investors in China, and we met with several entrepreneurs and company founders in their late 20s and early 30s. There is also a sense of pride as it relates to comparing China’s achievement versus the rest of the world in the development of public infrastructure, digital payments and internet platforms.I detected a sense of meritocracy that is appreciated by the younger people: Hard work plus creativity can produce results, which could equate to a lot of wealth. And they did not seem to have too much sympathy for the tech billionaires caught in the government’s crosshairs. I also came away thinking that women feel very much empowered in China.China is not a monolithic economyAs an investor, I find it useful to not make broad generalizations about the world’s second-largest economy. China consists of many regional economies that are rapidly transforming.Shanghai is cosmopolitan and booming, with an incredible amount of wealth creation. To me, Shanghai now feels like Hong Kong in the 1980s. In the Yangtze River Delta region around Shanghai, large health care clusters are being developed in the cities of Suzhou and Wuxi. Farther inland, the cities of Hefei and Hangzhou are hubs for critical component manufacturing and the electric vehicle (EV) auto industry.Along the southeast coast in Guangdong province, Shenzhen (home to Tencent) remains the Silicon Valley of China but also is now a health care hub and the world’s largest vaping manufacturing centre. Dongguan has become the yester-year manufacturing powerhouse for developing communications and computer-related equipment. It is a sober reminder of how competitive the manufacturing sector is in China: reform or die! The rest of Guangdong province remains the bedrock of small merchant enterprises, traders and niche service providers empowered by the internet and digitalization.Overall, I found that local government leadership still matters a ton. KPIs (Key performance indicators) for local officials now include competitive advantage (instead of blind competition), as well as green and clean environment for the cities.A look at areas we visitedSource: Capital Group.China is experiencing a manufacturing renaissanceA manufacturing revival is being driven by demand for automation, renewables, energy storage and electric vehicles. Automation was a powerful and prevalent theme from our factory visits. It had been 15 months since we were last on the mainland, and the amount of new factory and process automation that we saw was staggering.The country continues to move up the value chain in manufacturing and exports. It started with apparel and footwear in the 1990s and moved into power tools, furniture, appliances and personal computers in the early 2000s. Over the past decade, China has been a global hub for smartphone manufacturing and assembly. Now, we are seeing a shift to the manufacturing of electric vehicle batteries, solar power systems and automation equipment.China has moved up the manufacturing value chainSource: Capital Group, based on reports from Euromonitor, SNE Research and company filings. Data as of May 2021 and reflects approximate figures.Rising labour costs and the government’s strategic decision to transition the economy to higher-value products are the primary reasons for the automation push. This is leading to some inflation. I suspect a decent base salary and better welfare coverage will eventually become the norm. The skilled and educated labour force is also enjoying lots of opportunities. Factories are more automated and hiring skilled technicians. From what we were told, R&D scientists and tech-sector coders have enjoyed annual pay raises of 15% to 20%. This has enticed many Chinese-born workers and their families to return from other jobs in the United States, Europe and the rest of the world.We also learned that entry-level wage inflation is particularly apparent in certain areas of the economy. For instance, companies that provide logistics and food delivery and those that sell insurance are all competing for workers who earn the equivalent of US$1,000 per month.We are beginning to see some food and goods inflation, driven by higher power prices due to the government’s drive to decarbonize. On the other hand, internet productivity and fierce competition remain powerful forces in keeping prices down, despite rising costs for raw materials and select component prices like semiconductors.Automation is sweeping through a range of industriesChina’s manufacturers and health care companies are embracing customized process automation for efficiency and cost-competitiveness. Scale is also an advantage. The most impressive automated plants we visited included a producer of battery separators for electric vehicles, a maker of industrial components and traction motors, a vaccine manufacturer and a developer of immuno-oncology drugs.Import substitution was another theme on full display during our company visits. This is the government’s push to build its own domestic supply chains and become self-reliant in technology and science. We saw this in medical equipment, industrial and automation components, EV batteries, battery separators, and nanoparticles for drug making.This will likely pose challenges to German, Japanese and Korean manufacturers over time.On the other hand, China lags the rest of the world when it comes to manufacturing advanced semiconductors, and can expect to be challenged in procuring leading-edge chip equipment from the world’s top semiconductor companies because of geopolitical tensions. We met with a state-owned enterprise, and its experience highlighted this trend. This company built its first 6-inch fab in 2003, endured losses in 8-inch for nine years and is now making money.China seems poised to dominate the electric vehicle supply chainChina wants to dominate the electric vehicle market and, by all accounts, it can get there. However, there may be some bumps in the road. I think industry development could be akin to what we saw in solar energy, which endured a period of brutal price cuts. There will probably be plenty of companies investing heavily to drive prices down, so we could possibly see many years of low returns.But in the long run, I believe China will dominate the global manufacturing supply chain related to EVs, from batteries to key components like separators. And these have the potential to be major export sectors for China. We’ve noticed that domestic EV makers are manufacturing hardware similar to that of Tesla but, in many cases, with better software that suits local consumer demands, especially in terms of infotainment screens and navigation systems. As China continues to push for EV, this may hurt foreign brands. For the older generation in China, owning a European or Japanese luxury car was a status symbol. The new generation may not see it the same way.Hands-free! Driving an autonomous electric vehicle of a Chinese manufacturer.Health care innovation is being powered by new talentHaving the right talent is key to achieving the next level of innovation. On that front, China’s biopharmaceutical industry seems to be heading down the right path. This sector is full of returnees from the U.S., including many who used to work at the likes of Regeneron, Genentech, Amgen and Biogen. We met with many leading scientists and researchers, among them those who had top R&D positions at leading U.S. universities.China’s government remains committed to providing drugs at very affordable prices for everyone. Over the past couple of years, generic drugmakers have been pressured by big price cuts, so I’ve been very selective in the types of health care companies I’ve invested in.An industry sweet spot is CDRMO, also known as contract development research and manufacturing organizations. These are companies that can help multinationals with drug development, testing and manufacturing, often at lower prices than in other parts of the world.In terms of medical equipment and lab testing tools, Chinese companies have made some progress, but they still lag in leading-edge equipment. So, this is an area where multinationals still dominate.Internet platform companies can get through the regulatory scrutinyWe also met with a few upstart internet services firms in China and representatives from multinational luxury goods companies. One fast-rising firm discussed the balance between brand building and purchase fulfillment, which is a big theme in e-commerce. Overall, the business model for e-commerce has been shifting as consumer behaviour on mobile devices evolves. Companies are developing content-like platforms focused on social entertainment or common interests. This has led to a proliferation of niche business verticals, more sophistication among Chinese consumers and more online sales.Internet platforms are likely to be more regulated. It’s become clear the government wants to prevent the large technology companies from aggressively expanding horizontally into multiple lines of business, partly to protect small businesses in China. Instead, they prefer for them to go deeper in their core areas of competence.Some internet companies have become systemically important and, as a result, may be subject to more regulation. Therefore, we may not see the exponential growth we have seen over the past few years — and the commensurate stock price appreciation — but I believe these companies can still make a good profit.That said, there will be gray areas when it comes to internet regulations. Companies just need to stay vigilant and sensitive. For investors, this also means that regulatory headline risk is probably here to stay until these new laws are tested and improved overtime. Separating the noise in media circles from the risks will also be important.Luxury demand has remained resilientLuxury demand has remained resilient during the pandemic. Online sales could become a larger part of total revenue for the multinationals, based on conversations we had with these companies. They are increasingly using other channels to drive traffic to their own website to fulfill orders and gain ownership of customer data.Chinese consumers have been spending at brand-name luxury stores inside China or online rather than in Paris or Milan. Government officials would like to keep that money inside the country, so they have been encouraging luxury goods makers to open duty-free shops. They’ve also encouraged luxury brands to increase their offerings at the lowest price points and to eliminate significant price gaps with the West.And here’s a fun fact we learned: The average age of Chanel’s consumers in China is 25 versus 50 for the rest of the world. It’s therefore not a surprise to me that the luxury companies continue to have a high focus on the Chinese consumer and will continue to adapt their strategy based on evolving consumer tastes as well as government policy. Sustainability has also become a theme in luxury.Investing in China is a mix of challenges and opportunitiesEven as I recount all the powerful, long-term trends I observed in China during my trip, I realize that the near-term reality on the ground continues to change, as a result of both what’s happening around the world and within China. There have been some policy mistakes, in my view. The crackdown on the education sector and the bankruptcy proceedings surrounding real estate developer Evergrande have dampened private-sector sentiment. Supply-chain bottlenecks and a near-term slowdown in the domestic economy have resulted in lower factory orders. Meanwhile, efforts to clean up the environment have resulted in power shortages in many provinces, which may affect prices paid for goods exported to the rest of the world. Investing in China will always be a mix of challenges and opportunities, and selective investment will remain key.",China
Green revolution will re-energize utility stocks,2021-10-06T11:30:00,"After three straight years of stellar performance, European renewable energy stocks have fallen back to earth in 2021. But the future is still bright for green power as the world’s transition to a low-carbon economy gathers steam.In the short term, investor concerns about rising bond yields and inflation have dragged down the utilities sector. And a flood of cash into environmentally friendly investments in recent years has spurred fears of a green bubble. However, in my view, the fundamentals of Europe’s largest clean energy companies remain strong.Clean energy is benefiting from three important secular tailwinds: falling renewable costs, new energy policies and economic stimulus. I call these factors the “Green Trifecta.” Moreover, the dominant companies, most of them based in Europe, have many advantages: a long runway of growth opportunities, strong development pipelines and development teams, significant scale benefits, robust balance sheets to fund investments and the benefit of vertical integration that many new entrants typically struggle to match. Although many investors continue to view these companies as bond proxies, there is potential for secular growth for many years.Falling renewable costsThe biggest reason I expect clean energy companies to do well is that renewable technology just keeps getting cheaper.Renewables are already economically competitive as it is. And the cost of building a megawatt of clean power generation — whether that's onshore wind, offshore wind or solar photovoltaic — is falling and should continue to do so.Every year, the average cost of production probably falls by between 10% and 15%. The same is true for the costs of battery storage or green hydrogen. I have yet to see any meaningful slowdown in the rate of cost reduction.Change in lifetime cost of energy from 2010 to 2018Sources: UN Environment Program; International Renewable Energy Agency.As new technology is developed and renewable companies scale up, costs should fall even further. Take offshore wind, for example. Machines are getting bigger. Technologies to install and to build turbines are changing rapidly and the supply chain is evolving.Denmark’s Orsted has established itself as a leader in this market by developing its own engineering, operation and maintenance skills. And there is scope to further industrialize the manufacturing process materially. Costs should continue to decline at pace.So-called “learning effects” are playing a substantial role here. This is still an immature industry, and companies are consistently learning how to operate more efficiently.Green hydrogen will be an important area to watch. It is seen by many experts as the key to decarbonizing industries like steel and shipping. Hydrogen gas is still expensive to produce without using fossil fuels, but this appears to be the next big energy transition technology.If I map the improvements that are coming on the cost of the technology used to create green hydrogen, plus where the cost of clean energy is headed, I can see a really significant reduction in costs. They could fall by as much as three-quarters over the next five to 10 years, which is very similar to what happened in solar and onshore wind over the last decade or so.There is a risk that Big Oil could muscle into the clean energy sector and threaten the dominance of today’s renewable majors, which include EDP, Enel, Engie, Iberdrola and Orsted. However, I believe the market is growing fast enough that there will be room for all. And while oil companies like BP and Shell have started to dip their toes into renewables as part of their net-zero plans, it will be hard to match the existing skills, scale and pipelines of the renewable majors.Investing in green energy has been fraught with misperceptions based on traditional views of the energy and utilities sectors. Below is my take on the most common of these views and how to consider green stocks through a more appropriate lens.New energy policiesThe second part of the Green Trifecta is the host of new policies being crafted by countries trying to curb their greenhouse gas emissions. Up to this point, little progress has been made on decarbonizing the global economy since the UN’s Paris Agreement went into effect in 2015. However, in recent months it has started looking like the world is kicking into gear.The U.S. and China, which have long been climate laggards, have made major commitments to cut emissions and embrace clean energy. Of course, it remains to be seen how they back up those commitments, but the direction of travel is clear.In August 2021, the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change released a landmark paper warning that global warming will reach 1.5 degrees Celsius by 2040, even in a best case scenario where the world acts swiftly to cut greenhouse gas emissions. UN Secretary-General António Guterres called this report a “code red for humanity.” The findings raise the stakes for November’s UN climate summit in Glasgow, known as COP26, where governments are expected to announce more ambitious plans to boost clean energy.Even the International Energy Agency (IEA), an organization that has historically significantly underestimated renewables growth, now appears to realize the scale of what is required to avert a climate disaster. The IEA put out a report earlier this year that flags the need for investment in renewables to increase by three times by 2030.Trillions in global investments expected for clean energyEnergy investment (USD billions)Source: International Energy Agency, Net Zero by 2050 (May 2021).The European Union, which is already a global leader in clean energy with roughly 20% renewables penetration, is primed for big growth. The EU plans to source half of its energy from renewables by 2030, and its long-awaited “Green Deal” framework is expected to push that even further, as the bloc seeks to cut greenhouse gas emissions to net zero by 2050.The EU Green Deal will require a huge amount of investment ― as much as €7 trillion by 2050 ― which will come from a mix of private investment, public grants and subsidized lending.Almost half of the investment is expected to go to renewables, electricity grids, battery storage and similar businesses, all of which are areas in which utilities are expected to invest heavily. For utility companies, this means growth. And that makes the sector more attractive than has historically been the case.Green infrastructure investment set for big growthInfrastructure investment (USD billions)Source: International Energy Agency, Net Zero by 2050 (May 2021).Post-pandemic economic stimulusGovernments around the world are also boosting clean energy as part of their plans to stimulate economies after the pandemic. In many countries, especially in Europe, much of the funding being made available for pandemic relief has strings attached that require it to be used in ways that will cut carbon.The European Commission intends to provide expanded financing from the European Investment Bank (EIB) to increase support for renewables projects that are close to financial completion. The EIB has also pledged to stop providing money to fund fossil fuel projects, including natural gas.I expect that European utilities that already have a large renewables footprint will continue to expand. Companies like Enel, Endesa, Iberdrola, EDP, Orsted and Engie have the biggest clean energy development teams, the ability to upsize their projects in construction and the deepest pipelines of new development projects.There is global potential beyond Europe, as well.The IEA estimates that clean energy investments (in renewables, networks and other areas) could reach $5 trillion per year by 2030, vs. $2 trillion currently. The IEA and International Monetary Fund jointly calculate that this investment could add nearly 0.5 percentage points per year to annual global gross domestic product growth. The IEA also noted that this could create around 10 million net new jobs per decade ― plus additional jobs in construction.The Asian Infrastructure Investment Bank (AIIB) has identified green infrastructure as a top theme for Asia’s post-pandemic recovery.In the U.S., President Joe Biden has embraced an energy plan that is ambitious and detailed. It falls far short of the so-called Green New Deal plan proposed by the Democratic Party’s progressive wing, but represents a sea change from the policies enacted by former President Donald Trump. In August, Biden signed an executive order aimed at boosting electric vehicle sales. He has also promised to back legislation that could spur significant government investment as he tries to fulfill his commitment to transition the U.S. to net-zero emissions by 2050.ConclusionAt the end of the day, even without government funding, I see very little that could derail the clean energy revolution. The sweet spot in renewables is centred around economics, driven by cost reductions that are set to continue. This industry doesn’t need subsidies, even at low energy prices.The momentum to decarbonize the world economy is powerful and enduring enough to change the historic playbook. That means it is time to stop thinking of utilities as staid, stodgy value investments that do not produce double-digit growth. These companies are not zero-growth bond proxies any longer, and in my view are poised to deliver strong investment results.",Energy
Beyond the FAANGs: Tech-savvy companies in non-tech sectors,2021-09-02T05:40:00,"Since long before COVID, leading tech companies have been the primary focus of market attention — for good reason. Market-leading tech giants are transforming the way we live, work and shop.This well-deserved attention has resulted in lofty valuations for some market leaders, especially the so-called FAANG (Facebook, Amazon, Apple, Netflix and Google) stocks. Their dominance has also drawn the attention of government regulators. Together these conditions may have some investors feeling uneasy and bracing for volatility in tech stocks.The good news is there are other places to look for technologically savvy companies outside the tech industry.Across industries as diverse as food service, luxury goods, heating and cooling and farming, companies that have been entrenched for generations are adopting new technology to improve their competitive positions, drive societal change and create opportunity for investors.“Today all companies are tech companies,” says equity portfolio manager Anne-Marie Peterson. “Established, sleepy industries and companies are using tech to transform their businesses in compelling ways, creating significant investment opportunity. And I don't think these opportunities are fully understood by the market yet.”In fact, global spending on digital transformation by companies is expected to rise from US$1.3 trillion in 2020 to US$2.4 trillion in 2024, according to Statista. Here is a look at some old-economy companies adopting new technology to transform their businesses through automation, online sales, machine learning and other processes.Companies around the world are investing heavily in a digital futureSource: Statista. Forecasts for 2020–2024 are as of November 2020. Digital transformation refers to the adoption of digital technology to transform business processes and services from non-digital to digital. This encompasses, for example, moving data to the cloud, using technological devices and tools for communication and collaboration, and automating processes.Industrials: Cooling carbon emissionsMention carbon emissions and the first thing most people think of is cars. But the largest contributor of greenhouse gas emissions is buildings. Building operation and construction worldwide account for more than a third of global carbon output. In part, that is because heating and cooling systems, known as HVAC, are inefficient.“Shifting energy priorities among governments and the public could provide a faster replacement cycle for heating and cooling systems” explains Peterson. This could be a tailwind for HVAC companies that can quickly develop and introduce cleaner systems.”Buildings, not cars, are the biggest source of carbon emissionsSource: Global Alliance for Buildings and Construction,2020 Global Status Report.Data includes all CO2 emissions in 2019.Consider Carrier Global, which was recently spun out of industrial conglomerate United Technologies. Founded in 1915 by U.S. engineer Willis Carrier — who is credited with inventing the modern air conditioner — the company might not be top of mind as a leading innovator. But Carrier has introduced a healthy buildings program to improve the efficiency, safety and health of indoor environments. The program includes an air filtration system that reduces the risk of bacteria and pathogens, a feature that has drawn attention during the COVID pandemic.“The company is developing a system to help optimize a building’s total energy usage,” says Peterson. The system will identify peak times and identify more efficient options.Heavy equipment manufacturing: Digging in on automation, clean energyConstruction and mining equipment maker Caterpillar is emerging as a potential leader in the global sustainability movement. “Caterpillar recently introduced a dynamic gas blending engine which is capable of mixing natural gas as well as hydrogen with diesel, helping its customers achieve carbon emissions goals more quickly,” says equity analyst Gigi Pardasani.Caterpillar has also introduced an e-motor for power generation applications, a hybrid land drilling system and software to help mining, construction, energy and transportation companies track their fleet of vehicles to gauge energy usage and identify areas for improvement.“One doesn’t often hear about Caterpillar being involved in the energy transition,” adds Pardasani, “but I came away from a recent demonstration of their latest technologies thinking that the inverse is true; the company appears to be a key facilitator in the energy transition globally.”Similarly, Deere & Co., whose iconic green tractors are ubiquitous in America’s heartland, is developing robotics, automation and machine learning to empower farmers to improve their efficiency. Some of Deere’s tractors and combines use advanced automation to prepare soil, plant seeds, care for plants as they grow and harvest crops. In August 2021, Deere said it would acquire a maker of robotics for tractors to accelerate its goal of offering a fully autonomous fleet of farming vehicles.The company’s machine learning analysis, for example, can help reduce the use of pesticides by identifying whether a growth is a weed or pest and target it with a minimal amount of pesticide. “With further steps into automation, digital solutions and sustainability, Deere is seeking to provide a ‘connected equipment’ approach to give farmers greater incentive to upgrade their machinery,” Pardasani says.Retail: Targeting an omnichannel futureRemember when Amazon’s rising dominance was universally accepted as the death blow for traditional retail? Well, those reports, to quote Mark Twain, are greatly exaggerated.Today leading retailers are recognizing that a key to survival is adopting an omnichannel approach — one that incorporates brick-and-mortar stores with an online presence and “clicks-to-bricks” model where customers buy online and pick up at the store. “The most successful retailers are offering a uniform customer experience across all platforms,” says equity portfolio manager Greg Wendt. “This is a major change in how retailers think, looking at the total customer experience across digital and physical channels.”Among traditional retailers, Williams-Sonoma, the maker of kitchenware and owner of Pottery Barn and West Elm, has focused on its online business for many years. So it is no surprise that during the pandemic the company has seen strong digital sales. But in March the company disclosed that in areas where it has reopened physical stores, store sales have surged while online sales have remained relatively strong.“My assumption was that a large portion of online sales gains in 2020 would transfer back to physical stores,” explains Wendt. “It is a big deal if omnichannel retailers can hang on to a large percentage of their online sales gains.”Omnichannel retailers enjoyed a jump in digital sales in 2020Sources: Capital Group, company financials. Target and Costco reflect fiscal year 2020 and 2019 sales. Home Depot reflects fourth quarter 2020 and fourth quarter 2019 sales.Back in 2013 Target was the poster child for tech troubles when it was the subject of a massive data breach of some 110 million customers’ personal and payment information. That was a lifetime ago in digital years.The company recognized it would have to focus on technology to survive. So it reorganized its software development effort, shifting from a staff primarily of contractors to a team of 4,000 mostly full-time IT employees. The team concentrated on improving Target’s e-commerce offering and developing its customer loyalty program. The company built a robust same-day delivery service for traditional online business as well as its buy online, pick up in store option, which became very popular during the COVID shutdowns.“The main change over the last few years was the emphasis on in-store pickup and the de-emphasis on home delivery,” says Peterson. “Today Target’s online business is quite profitable.” As business thrived during the pandemic, Target made investments in new technology and sort centres to help keep up with demand and drive down costs.Luxury goods: Taking online shopping up marketLike many other luxury goods makers, LVMH — whose 75 brands include leather goods maker Louis Vuitton, jeweler Tiffany & Co. and cosmetics maker Sephora — was slow to embrace e-commerce. LVMH executives were concerned that greater access to a broader market, the ability to track customer preferences and other advantages of a digital business could dilute its brands’ image of exclusivity.For LVMH the additional challenge was to develop a seamless omnichannel experience across brands ranging from fashion to hospitality to wine making, each with their own customs and culture. As a result the company hired its first chief digital officer in 2015, who soon after established the LVMH retail lab to support each brand in its digital transformation.The company adopted a digital tool to track goods through its supply chain to ensure authenticity and minimize the threat of theft. It also began using order management technology that enables consumers to track available stock in real time and opt for either a white glove same-day delivery or store pickup. Some of LVMH’s brands also adopted artificial intelligence to customize online experiences. For example, Sephora’s smart mirror lets customers try on makeup using augmented reality. “E-commerce was disruptive for a lot of retailers, but it turned out to be a positive for LVMH,” says equity portfolio manager Lara Pellini. “Even as the company has expanded its reach online, their brands have maintained their appeal worldwide.”Restaurants and food service: Cooking up a killer appFew industries, if any, suffered more during the pandemic than restaurants. Many failed or filed for bankruptcy protection. It is challenging to provide food service without human contact, and most restaurants took months to adapt to the disrupted environment.Not pizza delivery giant Domino’s. The company had already begun its contactless delivery and car-side services months before anyone ever heard of COVID. Indeed, Domino’s in a sense had been preparing for years. Through trial and error, the company innovated and improved its delivery approach. Rather than rely on technology from a range of suppliers, Domino’s expanded its technology staff and developed its own online ordering system across all digital platforms.A digital pioneer in food service has outpaced othersSource: Refinitiv Datastream. As of 7/31/21. Returns are total returns in USD.The company has an in-house “innovation garage” that has introduced GPS order tracking and, more recently, a “zero click ordering” feature on its app. With the economy reopening and carryout sales picking back up, the company has been maintaining its gains in delivery.The bottom line for investorsTechnological innovation goes far beyond the tech industry, surfacing across industries far afield of the tech sector. Of course, not every company that embarks on a digital transformation will emerge as a long-term winner. The key, says Wendt, is to fully understand a company’s digital strategy and its prospects for success.“When considering the potential winners in a new digital world, some investors may think exclusively about the consumer tech giants or fintech businesses or cloud-based software providers,” says Wendt, “but at Capital Group, we dig a little deeper across all industries to find companies under the radar with the potential to benefit from a digital transformation.”",Technology & Innovation
What does heightened China risk mean for investors?,2021-08-09T11:30:00,"In July 2021, China’s equity market suffered one of its worst monthly declines in a decade amid escalating regulatory pressures. The steep fall has raised concerns about the risks and outlook for investing in Chinese equities.The latest trigger event was a policy update setting out new restrictions on China’s private tutoring industry. In recent months, China’s regulators have also been issuing antitrust fines, disallowing M&A activities of technology firms and focusing on cybersecurity. A recently passed data security law will also take effect in September.We asked Noriko Chen, a portfolio manager and member of the Capital Group Management Committee, and portfolio manager Victor Kohn to share their perspectives on recent developments and potential investment implications. Noriko and Victor each has more than 25 years of experience investing in China and are portfolio managers on emerging markets-focused strategies.What should we make of the recent spate of regulations, particularly those aimed at the education and technology sectors?Looking at it in a broader socioeconomic context, China’s government wants social and economic stability. Everything related to people’s lives need to be affordable ― education, health care and property. Anything working against those efforts is likely to be tightly regulated. China’s other major goal is national security, which means control of data and great self-reliance in technology.China wants to do more to build up and strengthen the capabilities of its domestic economy. This has been previously articulated in its dual-circulation strategy; it took on greater urgency after the U.S. banned telecommunications giant Huawei and pressed other countries to do the same. We still think Communist Party officials want to help support domestic companies that can develop superior capabilities that rival global competitors in a number of areas such as technology and health care. At the same time, they want to make sure that when there are sensitive issues such as data privacy that companies follow government guidelines.Beijing is saying it wants greater control, but that does not necessarily mean the government wants to punish any company that makes too much money, or to sharply curtail the profitability of some of the country’s most successful companies.Let’s talk about a few areas that have been the focus of regulation. What about the internet platforms?For the internet platform operators, the likely aim is to curb monopolistic and oligopolistic power and behaviour, such as forcing merchants to sign exclusive contracts, and to limit predatory marketing practices. We believe the objective of this regulation is to foster greater competition and create an environment in which smaller businesses can thrive and consumers of those particular products pay lower prices, whether it be business to consumer or business to business.This may mean the dominant internet companies have to open their mobile-based internet platforms to competitors. We could also see greater scrutiny of potential acquisitions. In the long run, increased competition might be a healthy development, but in the near term, we could see greater earnings volatility.Some sectors of China’s equity market have seen rapid growth in market valueSources: RIMES, MSCI. Data reflects market capitalization of sectors in MSCI China IMI as of July 31, 2021. Values in USD.On the data front, the government has been more focused on cybersecurity and data privacy requirements since 2017, when the Cybersecurity Law went into effect. Since then, China has implemented and drafted additional laws that are increasingly strict in multiple areas, from national standards requiring localization of cloud infrastructure in China to expanding personal information security and protection where information needs to be stored onshore in China.Potential implications for companies may include changes similar to those recently enacted in the European Union regarding obtaining and using personal data and where data may be housed. This could result in more companies localizing infrastructure, ring-fencing data domestically (i.e., putting limits on data so it can only be used by particular persons or for a particular purpose), and even a preference for Chinese companies to list on the country’s domestic stock exchanges.What about online education? The after-school tutoring business has been largely shuttered. What other areas are vulnerable?China’s top administrative body, the State Council, ordered companies teaching school curricula in the $100 billion after-school tutoring sector to become nonprofit entities and banned them from pursuing initial public offerings or taking in foreign capital.These for-profit education companies were viewed as widening the economic gap as public schools were losing quality teachers to after-school private tutoring, where salaries were higher, and thus were perceived as hurting lower- and middle-income families. The after-school tutoring also led to very long school days.No doubt, what happened in online education may extend to other industries, such as video gaming and streaming services, where there reportedly is pressure to enact more rules. Restrictions already exist to reduce the time students and young adults spend on online gaming and streaming. For private sector companies, this may hurt average revenue per user, reduce profitability and increase compliance costs.The housing market is another area of regulatory focus. What impact do you see?Propertydevelopers continue to face increased regulation as the government seeks to curb excessive risk and debt in the country’s financial system. The government is focused on future economic growth, and excessively high property prices hurts housing affordability. This might lead some families to have fewer, not more, children, at a time when the government has removed its one-child policy due to the country’s aging population.Looking ahead, there could be tighter pricing restrictions in certain areas or cities. Developers may also become subject to certain financial requirements in terms of acquiring more land sites or developing projects. If this occurs, it could potentially lower a company’s long-term return on invested capital and impact its valuations. This would have the effect of transforming Chinese property developers into quasi-utilities with controls and regulations on their profitability.Do you expect to see further regulation?We anticipate more regulatory actions, and there could be further guidelines in areas such as consumer finance, online gaming and mobile apps.In some areas, such as cybersecurity and digital commerce, current rule-making and stricter enforcement parallel to a degree the efforts by policymakers in the U.S. and Europe to regulate the digital economy and protect consumers.China’s key economic priorities (2021-2025)Sources: Capital Group, U.S.-China Business Council, Congressional Research Service and media reports.As a result, we may continue to see increased volatility in China’s equity markets in the near term, and this may suppress valuations and elevate risk premiums. This current predicament reinforces the need for deep company-by-company research when it comes to investing in China.And amid this sharp selloff in Chinese equities, we are weighing potential opportunities to invest in unique companies with dominant market share positions whose absolute valuations are much more palatable at current levels.Which sectors could benefit from these recent policy pivots and regulatory actions?While certain companies and industries face heightened uncertainty, other business areas that are more aligned with the government’s priorities may present investment opportunities. Some examples are:Green energyis a priority, and companies helping to facilitate the transition toward cleaner energy in China could benefit from increased investment. Reducing carbon dioxide emissions is a global priority and China has been taking steps in this direction, including enacting policies aimed at curbing coal and increasing natural gas usage. The country has an aging population and pollution has led to falling fertility over the past decade, making clean air a higher priority.The electric vehicles (EVs) markethas been receiving forms of government support. China is already the world’s largest producer of batteries for EVs, which require a fraction of the parts used in ICEs. China has an advantage due to its low cost of capital, and may be able to play a far larger role in the global EV market as some Chinese EV manufacturers already make globally competitive models.Electric vehicles(EVs) are also linked to the desire for reduced emissions and pollution. EVs require far fewer parts than internal combustion engine vehicles, and their economics are more leveraged to battery costs in addition to manufacturing scale. Chinese EV makers have an advantage due to subsidies, their low cost of capital, the development of batteries and separators domestically, and their ability to manufacture at scale. As a result, China is the largest producer of EVs globally and is poised to play a much larger role in the global EV market.Pharmaceuticals and medical innovationhave been areas of focus since 2015, based on improving access to quality medical care in China and reducing reliance on foreign imports. Regulatory reforms have drastically improved the landscape for both foreign and domestic companies and have helped bring China closer to global standards. A large number of Chinese scientists who were educated and/or employed in the U.S. and Europe have been returning from overseas to help create world-class companies involved in drug development, testing and manufacturing. This has also attracted large sums of venture capital.Import substitutionsare key to China’s effort to reduce its reliance on foreign suppliers and reflect the government’s dual-circulation strategy. While import substitution spans a range of industries, the semiconductor industry is of strategic importance. China’s government is keen to bolster capabilities in semiconductor design and manufacturing, especially after the U.S. banned Huawei and pressed other countries to do the same.Software and information technology servicesare also areas of strategic investment for the government. These are underdeveloped industries and enterprise-focused companies could benefit from increased investment while avoiding regulatory pressure aimed at consumer-facing tech companies.Does China care about its equity markets and corporate profitability?From our experience investing in China, we think the government is sensitive to market concerns even though the objectives of party officials can be opaque. In this latest selloff, Vice Premier Lui He and representatives of China’s Securities Regulatory Commission actively reached out to global investment banks and other market participants in an attempt to calm market concerns. They reiterated their continued support for the stock market and private enterprise, including overseas listings. They also emphasized their commitment to further opening China’s financial markets to foreign investors.This latest bout of market turbulence underscores that investing in China involves greater risks. Since Capital Group began investing in China nearly three decades ago*, we’ve learned that it is possible to identify good investment opportunities through the ebbs of flows of regulation and economic downturns. It remains a classic stock picker’s market, with a growing number of high-quality companies and ongoing innovation, so we believe it’s important to invest on a company-by-company basis to gain an appropriate comfort level.*Reflects the Capital Group global organization.",China
5 investment lessons from the pandemic,2021-08-04T02:13:00,"As an investor with more than three decades of experience, the past 16 months stand out in my career as both intensely painful and incredibly instructive. On or about March 23, 2020, the Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index and MSCI All Country World Index hit bottom, establishing the fastest bear market in U.S. history as the COVID-19 pandemic spread across the globe.Last week, in stark contrast, U.S. equity markets hit new record highs, bringing us full circle from the depths of 2020 to the heights of 2021. Given these remarkable milestones, I thought this would be an opportune moment to share some of my learnings from this most unusual time in U.S. history.I’ll start with a brief summary of my mindset as we entered the plague year. In late 2019, I felt confident that the markets were well positioned for a period of strong returns. Inflation and interest rates were low and looked likely to remain so. Banks were eager to lend, and companies seemed willing to invest in productive capacity again — as opposed to share buybacks and questionable acquisitions.True to my beliefs, I entered 2020 invested as suggested above, with little cash and plenty of cyclicality reflected in my largest holdings. In less than three months, as the global economy came to a virtual standstill and fear gripped the markets, my pro-cyclical positioning looked problematic to say the least. But context is important. And to understand that, it helps to understand my investment style.U.S. investors move from courage to fearSource: The Leuthold Group. As of 6/30/21. The Courage/Fear Investor Ratio is developed by The Leuthold Group and shows the relative return of a ""Courage Portfolio"" over a ""Fear Portfolio."" The Courage Portfolio averages returns of the Russell 2000 Small Cap Index, MSCI Emerging Markets Index, CRB Raw Industrials Index and S&P 500 cyclical sectors. The Fear Portfolio averages returns for the U.S. Dollar Index, gold prices, S&P 500 Low Volatility Index and 10-year Treasury.Friends and colleagues sometimes say, “Steve is the kind of guy who runs into burning buildings.” I find that a bit extreme, but it’s true that I am a contrarian investor at heart. As long as I’ve been in this business, I have believed that the market swings from excessive enthusiasm to extreme pessimism. An investor with a reasonable degree of objectivity can benefit from selling the former and buying the latter.It’s an approach that has served me well for the past 30-plus years, but it also frequently causes pain and tends to pay off mostly during the early stages of market upturns, as pessimism gives way to optimism. Warren Buffett said it best: Be fearful when others are greedy and greedy when others are fearful.That’s me in a nutshell. Now, here are five lessons I learned or relearned in the pandemic that I’m using in my portfolios today:1. Market crises are inevitableThe advent of the pandemic-driven stock market crisis led me to think of past market traumas I have experienced. I counted 21, including the collapse of the Soviet Union, the bursting of the technology bubble, the global financial crisis and now COVID-19.I offer this list of events only to highlight the fact that market disruptions are a fact of life for investors. It’s just a matter of time before the train runs off the rails. My list suggests we get one of these events every 18 months or so.Market disturbances are a fact of life for investorsSources: MSCI, RIMES. As of 6/30/21. Data is indexed to 100 on 1/1/87, based on MSCI World Index from 1/1/87-12/31/87, MSCI ACWI gross returns from 1/1/88-12/31/00, and MSCI ACWI net returns thereafter. Shown on a logarithmic scale. Returns are in USD.No one could have predicted the pandemic but, in hindsight, it would have been wise to consider the chance that something would come along and disrupt the incredible bull market of the previous decade. If history is any indication, it would also be wise to believe that we’d get through it and emerge stronger on the other side. And, indeed, we have so far.2. Interpreting history isn’t an exact scienceThis relatively short list of events offers other important lessons, as well, including the fact that history does not necessarily repeat itself in ways you might expect. It’s easy to draw false parallels, and I did exactly that during the early months of the COVID crisis.For instance, I lived in Hong Kong through the dark days of the SARS (Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome) epidemic in 2003. I was quick to make overly simplistic comparisons between SARS and COVID. But while SARS was terribly frightening to live through, relatively speaking, it was a fairly minor event. Drawing conclusions about COVID from the SARS experience proved to be a mistake, leaving investors unprepared for the extent and duration of this pandemic.I will add that I was also similarly surprised by the swiftness and power of the U.S. governmental response — both fiscal and monetary — to the COVID crisis. That response arguably helped minimize some of the damage to my pro-cyclical positions during the early months of 2020.3. Growth or value? Both, at the right entry pointWhile I acknowledge some discomfort with the overly broad and vague labels“growth” and “value,”I’m going to use them here even as I agree that they lack nuance. The fact is, my fairly limited selection of growth-oriented stocks saved my skin during the worst days of 2020. These included some technology shares, particularly in the semiconductor industry, as well as some consumer-oriented internet and e-commerce companies.Despite my value bent, I remain a strong believer in the resilience of the tech sector. Entry point is important to me; therefore, many of my tech-related investments are long-term holdings initially added before the market recognized their potential. I like to purchase shares when they are down and out, but I also like to hang on long enough to let the market catch up with what I think is the true value of the company in question. As a result, some of my holdings today don’t look contrarian, but they likely did at one time.As these stocks rallied amid the pandemic, I gradually trimmed some of them to make room for more unloved areas of the market, including energy, financials and travel.4. Dividends help pay the rentSpeaking of unloved areas, I have long placed an emphasis on dividends as the principal mechanism for the transfer of value from a company to its investors. I’ve also maintained the expectation that dividends will continue to serve as a stabilizing factor during times of market turbulence.Sadly, the latter characteristic has been weakened over the last decade and seemed to fall away completely at times in 2020. But I’m not willing to say that yield is useless. Our current unprecedented monetary conditions, coupled with the market’s devotion to fast-growing, society-changing companies, have tossed aside lots of historical norms.That said, I do not think the value of the dividend as a wealth-transfer mechanism linking companies and investors has ended. In my view, it is more important than ever. And I continue to hold a number of high dividend payers, as well as dividend growers, in my portfolios.Simply put, I loved dividends before the pandemic and continue to love them now. The shares in my portfolios, like my own children, should pay rent to live with me.Dividend-paying companies are an important source of incomeSources: MSCI, Refinitiv Datastream, Standard & Poor's. As of 6/30/21.5. Dr. Copper delivers a healthy diagnosisMy outlook, as wrong as it was in the first quarter of 2020, hasn’t changed much today.Just as the markets have come full circle, I find myself feeling much like I did in late 2019: I am still fully invested and I expect global markets to be higher a year from now. My portfolios are still characterized by a pro-cyclical tint, meaning I favour companies that I believe will benefit from a reacceleration of global economic growth.I could be wrong, of course, but I feel heartened by the diagnosis of Dr. Copper. Copper, as you may have heard, is the commodity with a PhD in economics, given its keen ability to help predict the path of the global economy. Copper prices bottomed in late March. They are suggesting now that the economy is mounting a strong recovery and will likely continue to do so. Copper may also be warning about mounting inflationary pressures, but for the time being, I do not see inflation, or higher interest rates, as a threat to global equity markets.Copper prices indicate the economy is in good shapeSource: Refinitiv Datastream. As of 6/30/21.I am also finding more attractive opportunities outside the U.S. In my view, the rest of the world, particularly emerging markets, are currently far more attractive from a valuation perspective than the U.S., and my portfolios generally reflect that view.In short, we now have all the elements, once again, that I was so confidently wrong about in late 2019 and early 2020. A critic might say that I have trouble learning my own lessons. But I would respond that perhaps the plague year was an anomaly. And perhaps we can now live again with investment styles influenced by market history, and place a greater emphasis on the expectation of a return to historical norms.It’s possible even — dare I say it — that growth is ready to pass the baton back to value and non-U.S. markets are poised to outpace the U.S. in the years ahead.We shall see.",Global Equities
Dividend growth: The special sauce of long-term investing,2021-07-28T12:12:00,"Ever heard of the Yield Dogs? Neither had equity portfolio manager Joyce Gordon when, as a young investment analyst in 1990, she was asked by a mentor, portfolio manager George Miller, to help him solve a problem.“At the time, the analysts covering industries that paid good dividends each made their recommendations in a silo,” recalls Gordon, who was covering savings and loans companies. “He’d hear my idea to invest in a bank, then the utilities analyst’s ideas, then he’d listen to the phone analyst make another recommendation.”But Miller wanted to compare dividend paying companies across industries so he could identify the best opportunities for the retirees and other income seekers who invested in his fund.So the analysts compiled key metrics for each company and put them all on one page. They gathered in a conference room to debate the merits of each. Soon the group began meeting every two weeks and taking research trips together.Thus were born the Yield Dogs, a group of dividend-focused portfolio managers and analysts whose name stands for “Dividends Ought to Grow.” Through the decades, as dividends have come in and out of favour with investors, the Dogs have continued to meet regularly. Today the group has expanded to more than 25, covering companies across all sectors as well as markets outside the U.S.“Our mission has become more challenging,” says Gordon, now a portfolio manager on Capital Group Capital Income BuilderTM(Canada) and Capital Group U.S. Equity FundTM(Canada). “A great many of our investors need income from their investments, and we need many ideas to meet this challenge.”Dividends are making a comebackIn fact, the past 18 months have been extremely challenging for the Yield Dogs and any other income-focused investors. The pandemic and global shutdown walloped many areas of the market that pay dividends in 2020, including airlines, hotels, energy and financials. In a spirit of caution — or, in some cases, facing questions of survival —companies suspended or reduced their dividends at historic levels.In the U.S. alone, 242 companies cut or suspended dividends, nearly matching the total for the previous 11 years combined. In non-U.S. markets, particularly in Europe, government officials pressured or required some industries to suspend dividend payments during the crisis.But the picture is brightening. With the rollout of COVID-19 vaccines and the reopening of economies, companies have begun to resume payments. As of May 31, 2021, 76 American companies had reinstated dividends.After historic cuts, some U.S. companies are restoring dividendsSource: Wolfe Research, LLC. Copyright © Wolfe Research, LLC 2021. All rights reserved. Only companies with market cap of at least US$250 million included. Reinstated dividends statistic is through 5/31/21.“I am pleased to see that many dividends have been restored, and in many other cases, particularly in Europe, are at least under discussion,” says Gordon, “I expect many more companies will bring them back in the coming months.”Dividend growth: The special sauceFor many investors, the search for dividend income might naturally start with companies that pay the highest yields. These companies can be sound investments, but the high yield can also be a warning sign. “Companies that have very high dividends to start may not be able to sustain them,” Gordon notes. “The high yield may indicate a company is a melting ice cube, and their business is in decline and they're not reinvesting.”Instead, Gordon prefers to seek out dividend growers — strong companies that she believes are likely to be even stronger in five or 10 years. “I look for a company that can demonstrate the capacity and commitment to raise its dividends over time,” Gordon says. “I look for dividend growth that matches the underlying earnings growth of the company.”Dividend growers historically have tended to generate greater returns than other dividend strategies, while also keeping up relatively well with the broader market. People assume that growth companies far outpaced dividend-paying stocks over the past decade, and that’s true when you look at the highest yielding stocks. But dividend growers did nearly as well as the overall market.Dividend growers have outpaced other income strategiesSources: Jefferies, FactSet Alpha Tester. Results are cumulative total returns in USD (with gross dividends reinvested) of companies represented in the MSCI ACWI (All Country World Index) segmented by dividend policy for the period December 31, 2010, through June 30, 2021. Highest quintile dividend yield are the top 20% of companies by 12-month forward dividend yield. Bond proxies are those stocks that tend to have higher yields but lower growth. They include stocks in the telecom, utilities and consumer staples sectors as well as REITs, railroads and transportation infrastructure stocks. Dividend growers include stocks with consistent dividend growth over the previous five years. Past results are not predictive of results in future periods.In addition to providing a growing stream of income, dividend growth can be a sign of management’s more rigorous capital allocation process. “Because they are committed to setting aside some proportion of their earnings for investors, they tend to have better discipline and may be less likely to make some ill-advised acquisition,” Gordon says.Because it is reflective of growing earnings, dividend growth can also offer a measure of resilience against interest rate hikes, Gordon adds.Supersize me: The power of reinvested dividendsOne company that has consistently grown its dividends is McDonald’s. To get a sense of how regularly reinvesting dividend payments can compound over time, consider a hypothetical US$100,000 investment in the company for the 20 years from December 31, 2000, through December 31, 2020, with all dividends reinvested.Big Macs were probably not what Albert Einstein imagined when he called compound interest the “Eighth Wonder of the World.” But the power of compounding can be a wonder to behold.In this hypothetical example, the total return of the investment would have been impressive — from US$100,000 to US$1,057,057, a 957% gain.Reinvested dividends: Better than breakfast all daySources: Capital Group, FactSet. Growth rate calculations for value of shares from reinvested dividends and dividends paid use the first year's dividends payment ($676 USD) as a starting value. This information should not be considered a recommendation to purchase or sell a particular security and is provided for illustrative purposes only.Take a look at what happened with the dividends. The value of shares from reinvested dividends would have grown from US$676 in 2001 to US$425,940 in 2020, or enough to purchase 106,000 Big Macs last year.The special sauce of compounding in this example lies in the growth in share count from reinvested dividends. The number of shares purchased with the original investment would have been 2,941. By the end of the 20 years, the share count would have increased to 4,926, a 67% increase. For the length of the investment, dividend payments would have represented 40% of the total return.Yield Dogs remain vigilant in the hunt for incomeAlthough the search for dividend-paying stocks has expanded and become more challenging since the Yield Dogs took their first investment research trip to Cleveland some three decades ago, Gordon remains energized by the work.“We had virtual meetings recently with 15 companies,” Gordon says. “We spoke with the CEOs and CFOs to try to get a good sense of management's willingness to recommend raising the dividend to the company’s board of directors.”And as economies increasingly normalize, Gordon says she is finding a broader set of opportunities that she believes represent compelling value for investors. “I look for companies that are yielding around 2.5% to 3.0%, and that are growing their dividends and earnings around 10% or 12% a year. Today I am finding a number of companies that meet that criteria across a wide range of sectors and global markets.”That’s how the Yield Dogs continue to make a meal out of dividend investing.",Dividends
"Big Tech faces three regulatory risks: Privacy, content and antitrust",2021-07-14T11:30:00,"When it comes to America’s biggest technology companies, it seems like regulatory risk has never been higher. Most large technology platforms are facing pressure from U.S. and European authorities, while lawmakers in Washington D.C. seem more inclined to do something — rather than nothing.As an internet analyst, I am in perhaps the unusual position of having studied another intense regulatory cycle as a bank analyst: the Dodd-Frank legislative process in the wake of the global financial crisis. In 2010 the U.S. Congress passed the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act, marking one of the biggest shifts in financial regulation since the Depression. I spent many weeks on Capitol Hill meeting with key lobbyists and congressional staffers as part of my due diligence into the large U.S. banks.Living through that experience has helped me calibrate my thinking on three key risks faced by Big Tech, which primarily fall into the categories of privacy, content and antitrust. Before I dive into those issues, I’ll share how my experience as a bank analyst has influenced my views.Applying lessons from Dodd-Frank to this Big Tech regulatory cycle1. Trying to predict the exact nature of regulatory outcomes is an inexact science.In my experience, it can be very challenging to develop a research edge on predicting regulatory outcomes. In my view, investors tend to spend too much time on it. I believe it is better to spend more time trying to assess how willing and able companies are to adapt to regulatory change.2. Companies can survive, and even thrive, following intense regulatory cycles.The Dodd-Frank Act included almost 28,000 new rules and restrictions on banks! Revenue pools were curtailed, capital requirements doubled and compliance costs soared. At the time, some thought big banks just weren’t investable. But starting in 2013, a few large bank stocks went on to significantly beat the broader market over the rest of the decade.3. Regulatory adaptation is a powerful and often underestimated force that separates winners and losers.In the years following the passage of Dodd-Frank, banks adapted to regulation. They restructured, changed their business mix, became more efficient, learned to optimize capital and developed new competitive edges in areas of technology and marketing.4. Starting valuations matter a lot.A big reason that big bank stocks had such a great run after Dodd-Frank was their low starting valuations. In my view, among the large U.S. tech companies, Alphabet and Facebook are already pricing in a typical regulatory shock, based on past studies of other industries that faced such pressures. These tech giants also trade at cheaper valuations than Visa and Mastercard, both of which I consider to be high-quality companies with wide competitive moats and pricing power.Valuations reflect varying degrees of regulatory riskSources: FactSet, Standard & Poor's. Earnings estimates for calendar year 2022 as of May 25, 2021.5. Politics often prevails more than economic logic in policymaking.I believe there are many examples in banking regulation of irrational policies and unintended consequences. For example, regulators realized that the SLR (supplementary leverage ratio) rule for big banks did not quite work as intended, but it took more than a decade and the risk of a deep recession to recalibrate it. (The rule stipulated the amount of common equity capital banks must hold relative to their total leverage exposure.)Big Tech faces three regulatory risks: Privacy, content and antitrustWhen I look at the major regulatory risks faced by technology companies today, they fall in three broad categories: privacy and data protections, content monitoring and moderation, and antitrust action.I believe that concerns related to privacy or content may actually strengthen, rather than weaken, the moats of the largest platforms. These companies often boast well-established protocols and have more resources to tackle privacy and legal matters. I’ll briefly address each of them here.Privacy:This is a nuanced issue with lots of trade-offs, so legislation will be slow. Companies will do more to regulate each other and themselves, while regulation plays catch up.What’s often missed in the headlines is that the privacy and data transparency restrictions enacted by companies have the potential to be more disruptive to the industry than governmental regulation. IDFA (Identifier for Advertisers) is a recent example, with Apple making changes to its operating system. The ad-tech industry relies heavily on individual data in the form of IDFA user data from Apple and third-party cookies to serve targeted advertisements. Google also plans to phase out third-party cookies on its Chrome internet browser.Ultimately, competitive advantages will likely accrue to companies that have access to first-party data, or data collected on their proprietary platforms or ecosystems. Companies with capabilities in artificial intelligence and machine learning such as Google and Facebook might also be at an advantage.What’s more, the regulatory landscape will likely become increasingly complex as more governments institute data privacy regulations. Therefore, I think that recent laws in Europe and the U.S. may have the unintended consequence of supporting the largest companies in the industry over their smaller rivals.Content:There’s been plenty of debate about Section 230 in Washington, and I think it will most likely not be repealed but reformed.Section 230 was enacted in the U.S. as part of the Communications Decency Act of 1996. It provides limited federal immunity to providers and users of interactive computer services. To date, internet companies have largely been shielded from the content posted on their platforms.I anticipate bipartisan consensus will build around requiring internet platforms to increase transparency and reporting on content governance — and remove content within 24 hours if ordered by a court. This means compliance costs may rise and fines could be more frequent, but these rising costs will also widen the competitive moats for the biggest companies.Antitrust:Going back to my Big Bank analogy, one big difference between the two regulatory cycles is that antitrust is a much bigger focus for the internet companies. Perhaps anticompetition for the big internet platforms now is what “safety and soundness” was for the big banks ― it’s the most important systemic problem regulators see.Therefore, similar to the “too big to fail” framework for banks, we may see a framework implemented for internet platforms where differentiated anticompetition rules are applied based on size.I don’t see any significant breakups of companies, but I think future M&A in the U.S. will become much harder to do on a meaningful scale. The U.S. House investigations into the ”monopoly power” of Apple, Amazon, Google and Facebook exemplify closer scrutiny of future dealmaking.In one example of how difficult it can be to prosecute antitrust cases, a federal judge on June 28 dismissed antitrust lawsuits in the U.S. brought against Facebook by the Federal Trade Commission (FTC) and dozens of state attorneys general. The judge said the FTC's lawsuit did not support allegations that Facebook had gained monopoly status in the social media industry. It remains to be seen whether the FTC will amend its suit and refile.Tech companies have built profitable franchises since the dot-com bubbleSources: FactSet, Standard & Poor's. As of April 30, 2021.As with most governmental or regulatory actions, it is important to remember that the first report or first version of a bill is almost never the exact text of the final regulation or law. It is very likely that any changes to antitrust law will look very different from the proposed bills.Likewise, antitrust cases more often end in settlements or fines rather than the breakup of a company. The big companies may in the meantime work to mitigate any potential impact and self-regulate.It’s worth noting that past M&A activity has allowed many smaller companies to grow and mature under the umbrella of the big parent companies.For example, Facebook’s messaging service WhatsApp has more than two billion average monthly users in 180 countries yet provides only a fraction of the firm’s revenue. Alphabet derives the majority of its revenue and earnings from advertising; meanwhile, its autonomous driving unit Waymo and health sciences division Verily have essentially no revenues. But these technologies of the future might be worth billions of dollars to investors as stand-alone enterprises. This may make the companies attractive investments regardless of future regulatory actions, based on the secular growth of the industries in which they operate.ConclusionThe major technology and internet platforms face a number of challenges ranging from privacy issues and content moderation to antitrust and regulatory pressures. However, I believe that concerns related to privacy or content may actually strengthen, rather than weaken, the moats of the largest platforms since these companies often boast well-established protocols and deep resources pertaining to privacy and legal matters.Furthermore, regulatory outcomes are difficult to accurately predict and often less important to determining company success than factors related to the business itself, particularly adaptability of the management, ability to develop new innovative products and services, and current valuations. By focusing on these metrics and closely monitoring legal and regulatory developments, it is possible to find attractive investment opportunities in the companies facing these pressures.",Technology & Innovation
Medical miracle: Health care innovation saves the world,2021-06-07T11:26:00,"We just witnessed a modern medical miracle.Several drug developers brought COVID-19 vaccines from initial trials to people’s arms in less than a year. This lightning quick pace defied the expectations of health care professionals and saved countless lives. It was far faster than the development of any similar drug.Bringing a vaccine to patients is a complex process typically measured in years or decades. Consider this: It took nearly 50 years of research and trials before Dr. Jonas Salk’s polio vaccine was introduced in 1955. More recently, vaccines for chickenpox and Ebola were each developed in about 42 years.“It’s no exaggeration to call these COVID-19 vaccines one of the greatest scientific accomplishments in our lifetimes,” says health care analyst Laura Nelson Carney, who covers pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies in Europe and Asia and holds a doctorate in neuroscience. “What’s more, global manufacturing capacity is also larger than we would have thought possible a year ago: Thirteen billion doses of vaccine will be made this year.”COVID-19 vaccines were developed at breakneck speedSources: Capital Group, NIAID, Our World in Data. Date ranges represent the approximate time between the year the pathogenic agent was first linked to the disease and the year that its vaccine became licensed in the U.S.A truly global effortIn an age marked by global competition and rivalry, this historic achievement represented remarkable worldwide cooperation. Consider, for example, the vaccine introduced jointly by Pfizer and BioNTech, the first to receive U.S. approval for use.“It was developed by a Turkish couple leading a German company partnered with a U.S. multinational led by a Greek immigrant with a Scandinavian chief scientific officer. That is a great affirmation of the global nature of innovation today.”The broader effort also featured the cooperation of companies, governments and academia around the world. U.S. biotech firm Moderna partnered with a division of the U.S. National Institutes of Health (NIH) to develop a similar vaccine, and U.K. pharmaceutical giant AstraZeneca worked with Oxford University to make its version.“It was developed by a Turkish couple leading a German company partnered with a U.S. multinational led by a Greek immigrant with a Scandinavian chief scientific officer. That is a great affirmation of the global nature of innovation today.”Rich Wolf, portfolio manager/investment analystThe U.S. (through Operation Warp Speed) and the European Union provided a level of funding that only governments can muster. “Billions of dollars of upfront government funding allowed companies to do many steps in parallel that they would normally do in sequence,” explains Nelson Carney.Contributions from around the world pushed the pace of COVID-19 vaccine developmentSources: Capital Group, Time, Moderna, Pfizer, U.S. Food and Drug Administration, World Health Organization.These contributions, and others from around the world, proceeded at a breathless pace:January 5, 2020 —Zhang Yongzhen, a Chinese virologist in Shanghai, and his team complete a mapping of the virus’s genome after 40 hours of around-the-clock work.When the human genome was first sequencedabout two decades ago, it took a team of researchers at the NIH some 15 years at a cost of more than US$2.7 billion.January 11, 2020 —Edward Holmes, a professor at the University of Sydney, places a call to Zhang while he is sitting on a runway in a Shanghai airport. Holmes asks for permission to publicly release the virus’s genome sequencing. Just before taking off, Zhang agrees, and Holmes publishes the sequencing on Virological.org.January 13, 2020 —Using computer modeling, Cambridge, Massachusetts, biotech company Moderna, led by 35-year-old Hamilton Bennett, develops its first mRNA vaccine candidate. German biotech company BioNTech, led by Turkish researchers Ugur Sahin and Ozlem Tureci, model a vaccine in a similar time frame. Within a few months, BioNTech enters a partnership with Pfizer to develop, manufacture and distribute the vaccine.January 21, 2020 —The first U.S. case of COVID-19 is identified in Washington State. By this time, the Moderna vaccine was being shipped to the NIH for the beginning of its Phase I clinical trial.November 9, 2020 —The Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine is shown to be 94% effective against the virus. Pfizer applies for emergency use authorization of the vaccine in the U.S.Mid-December 2020 —The U.S. FDA issues emergency use authorization (EUA) for the Pfizer vaccine, and a week later, the Moderna vaccine.Will future drug development be this fast?For scientists and companies alike, the obvious question is whether this breakneck pace can be repeated. While we may not see the same level of government spending on drug development as on COVID-19 vaccines, the speed of science has taken a great leap forward.Advances in genetic analysis and the development of the world’s first mRNA vaccines are leading the way to a new era in medicine, says Wolf. These actions have the potential to be most disruptive in the area of immuno-oncology, or the treatment of various types of cancer.”We can sequence tumors, compare their mutations to the map of the human genome and identify and match therapies to specific mutations,” Wolf says. Indeed, therapies derived from genetic testing have the potential to extend lives and generate billions of dollars in revenue for the companies that successfully develop them.Advances in genetics and cell research are expanding the cancer drug pipelineSource: Cancer Research Institute. Data as of May 2020. Immunotherapy is the artificial stimulation of the immune system to treat cancer. The seven categories of immunotherapy are based on the mechanism of actions to treat cancer.Investment implications1. Drug discovery goes globalThe U.S. and Europe are not the only significant contributors to drug discovery. Chinese biotech company BeiGene recently got the first FDA approval for a blood cancer drug called Brukinsa, says Nelson Carney. Another company, HUTCHMED, will likely get an approval this year for its treatment targeting neuroendocrine tumors.The role that China plays in the global pharma industry, both as an end-user market and as a source of globally relevant innovation, is only going to increase in the future.2. The markets are potentially hugeFor some types of cancer and other common ailments, the potential addressable market size can be enormous. “The first Chinese PD-1 inhibitor — the same category as Merck’s drug Keytruda — filed for approval in the U.S. only a few weeks ago,” says Nelson Carney. “This is potentially a US$50 billion market. The consensus peak sales for Merck’s drug are between US$25 billion and US$30 billion for just this drug. The patent doesn’t expire until 2028, but there are four other companies hot on its heels, also planning to file in the U.S.”3. The 2020s will be the decade of health careIf the 2010s were the era for technology titans to lead markets and change the world, then the 2020s may well be the era when health care takes the lead. “There’s never been a more exciting time,” Wolf states. “It started with the sequencing of the human genome. We've developed and improved these tools over the last two decades, and now we’re using them not only to provide more accurate diagnostics, but to actually develop better therapies and to match therapies to those diagnostics.”",Health Care
"Value or growth? Both, says veteran portfolio manager",2021-05-17T01:35:00,"Value stocks, after seeming to spend an eternity wandering in the wilderness, have captured investor attention this year. For the three months ended March 31, 2021, the Russell 1000 Value Index recorded an 11.26% total return (in USD), far outpacing the 0.94% gain of the Russell 1000 Growth Index. Investors want to know: Will this rotation toward value-oriented shares prove to be a lasting one?“There can be growing companies that are cheap and cheap companies that grow, so value and growth are not in opposition,” says equity portfolio manager Martin Romo. “We are in a target rich environment, and there are opportunities to invest in fast growing companies as well as classic cyclical companies.""Romo is a portfolio manager on a mandate in the U.S. where he can take a flexible approach to growth, seeking opportunities with classic growth stocks, cyclical stocks and companies in turnaround situations with the potential to generate capital appreciation.Romo recently sat down with us to share how he is thinking about investing in today’s environment, the pandemic’s long-term impact on industries and what he believes are the most important innovations for the next decade.Turning point: A cyclical rotation may be underwaySources: RIMES, Standard & Poor’s. November 6, 2020, was the last business day before the COVID-19 vaccine was revealed to have more than 90% efficacy against the virus in global trials. Data is as of 4/23/21. Values in USD.Do you expect the recent rally in more cyclical areas of the market to continue?As a former chemical analyst, I've spent a lot of time thinking through the cyclical implications, and there are clearly some powerful ones. We've got fiscal and monetary policy that's incredibly supportive of the stock market. But as a former cyclical analyst, I'm also a bit cautious. The enthusiasm in the market today for a recovery and a return to normal is quite startling to me.I think there are some industries like commercial real estate and energy where COVID is a bit of an extinction event for their future fundamentals. To be clear, I don’t think these industries are going away, but the basis for making predictions about the fundamentals of their businesses has forever changed.Some scientists have long theorized that the extinction of dinosaurs was the result of a giant meteor crashing into earth about 65 million years ago. Whatever the catalyst, dinosaurs did not survive dramatic shifts in the climate, whereas warm-blooded mammals did. Some industries will adapt and thrive after COVID; others may be more like dinosaurs and go into decline.Do you view the COVID pandemic as an inflection point that will lead to major changes in the way we live and work?I have spent a lot of time with Capital’s investment analysts trying to figure out how the pandemic will permanently change people’s behaviour and how that might affect the long-term fundamentals of various industries.What we found is that select companies are using the pandemic as an opportunity to adapt — to be like mammals, not dinosaurs — by using data, technology and analytics that could lead them to a much stronger competitive position and help us address some of the biggest issues we face in the U.S. today.For example, health care is at a big inflection point and is changing for the better. Regulators have relaxed antiquated rules related to “in person” visits, and now doctors everywhere are doing virtual visits. We’re also seeing exciting innovation in wearable monitoring devices — including continuous glucose monitors, insulin pumps, implantable EKG loop recorders and connected sleep apnea devices — that are increasingly enabling physicians to monitor patients remotely.Wider use of wearable monitors could help improve health care deliverySources: Industry & government data, Kagan estimates, Standard & Poor’s. Data compiled June 2020. Values in USD.Can you share some of your thoughts on the most important innovations for the next 10 years?I viewsemiconductorsas the single most important innovation of our generation. This innovation stems from World War II, so it’s not new. But like the cotton gin, railroads, electricity, oil and petrochemicals, and mass production, it has the power to drive industrial development for decades. Semiconductors have become central to telecommunications, the internet, data analysis, artificial intelligence, cars and physical products of all kinds.Since about 1965, the computing power of semiconductors has doubled about once every 18 months to two years — so-calledMoore’s law. We're now into cosmic measurements. And that's why it's impacting almost everything we do. As World War II was a leap forward in mass production, COVID, I think, is a leap forward in the capabilities of the semiconductor.Recent chip shortages are a case in point. Companies can't get enough of them. Auto companies are struggling with their production costs, and countries are starting to say, “This is a strategic resource, and we've got to either develop our own domestic industry or find ways to capture production.”Take, for example, specialty retailer Williams-Sonoma, which recently said its online sales have surpassed their physical store sales. They are using that leverage to renegotiate lease agreements, changing the economics of their physical stores as their online traffic has increased. They flipped the world from physical to virtual in one year and aren't turning back.Companies like Mondelez, which spent billions of dollars and a great majority of their advertising budget on TV, are now getting a 25% greater return online and, in fact, 40% better than that if they think about Google and Facebook as their primary ad sources.And then, in streaming content services, Netflix became the largest content creator in the world at more than US$20 billion spend in 2020.Semiconductors have enabled this flywheel of innovation and efficiency. The collection of data, the analysis of that data to develop a better product that draws more consumers, whose use generates more data, becomes a virtuous cycle of improvement and wider adoption. It is driving the cost of engagement down and the effectiveness of all our activity higher. And I believe we are still early in this cycle.Chip suppliers fuel the power behind great productsSources: Capital Group, Bloomberg. Data represents semiconductor revenue in 2025, as forecast by Bloomberg, categorized by its end-use product. Estimates are the latest available as of 3/31/21.What are your thoughts about the growth potential for streaming content and video games?I remember hours and hours spent on my Atari 2600 when I was 10 or 11 years old. Today’s gamers enjoy unlimited use in an interactive format. Considering the relevance and potential adoption of this form of entertainment by the next generation of consumers, the potential return on the dollar is compelling.Total global spending on games was up 20% last year to US$180 billion. Keep in mind that the global movie industry peaked in 2019 at US$100 billion. So it's one of these quiet, overnight stories that really isn't overnight, and the thing that's fascinating is that games aren't just participatory. They're spectator sports that are going to take on Broadway and the NBA. Many of these online players collect multimillion-dollar annual contracts in addition to endorsement deals.Consider that Amazon Twitch, one avenue of spectating, has 1.9 billion hours per month in viewership. That compares to the NFL at 1.65 billion per month. That’s remarkable — and these games are only getting more immersive. There's a company called Roblox that represents a generation of kids — most of them under 15 — who not only are playing in this collective universe with their friends, but they're actually developing games for each other.The foundation for companies that can leverage these opportunities is profound. So I will watch gaming closely as it continues to encroach on other forms of entertainment.Streaming entertainment will take centre stageSource: Capital Group. Broadway show cost from Jefferies, as of July 2019. NBA ticket cost from Barrytickets for 2018–19 season. Console video game cost from Business Insider, as of October 2018. Video streaming cost is for a standard monthly Netflix subscription as of December 2020.When do you think life will get back to the “new normal?”We're in the business of figuring out the “what,” not the “when.” Most of our competitors are looking for the when. When will COVID be over? When will rates go up? Neil deGrasse Tyson is famous for talking about the difference between climate change and weather prediction. And he uses a great example where he's walking his dog on a leash on the beach. He's walking to a flag, and his dog is wiggling back and forth. And he says, ""I'm climate change, and the dog is weather prediction."" And we have the benefit at Capital Group of looking forward and looking at elements of climate change that are happening within a company, within an industry, but we also look back to learn lessons from history.You may be surprised at how much we talk about the principles of Capital Group's foundation in 1931, and how we still hold those commitments to research, a long-term focus and objective-based investing. We take the responsibility of being stewards of capital for our investors incredibly seriously. We've been here for 90 years, 13 market crashes, 15 recessions, 16 presidents, one world war and now a pandemic. But our principles haven't changed. It's a remarkable testament to the success of the model. To use my earlier metaphor, I like to think we’re more like mammals than dinosaurs, adapting to a changing world while staying true to our fundamental DNA.",U.S. Equities
Semiconductors could be the new oil: Here’s why,2021-05-03T12:33:00,"How persistent will the shortage in semiconductors be, and what does it bode for the future of the industry? In our view, the shortage is more cyclical in nature and more acute in a couple of industries like autos and PCs. If anything, we see semiconductors powering the next decade of global growth in an increasingly data-hungry world, much like oil fueled the rise of industrial economies in the last century.Importantly, the semiconductor industry has evolved from boom-and-bust cycles marked by excessive capital expenditures, poor inventory management and lack of pricing discipline. It is more disciplined and better positioned today, following years of consolidation that has resulted in a few dominant players along each specialized area of the global supply chain.On the demand side, as corporations, governments and industries transition to 5G technologies, artificial intelligence (AI) and cloud-based solutions, we believe the industry is prepared to benefit from these powerful tailwinds in the years ahead.By various estimates, including ours, global semiconductor sales might double from about US$450 billion in 2019 to nearly US$1 trillion by 2030.Capacity shortages are more COVID related than structuralA confluence of events has led to this global crunch, none of which we think are structural in nature or affect long-term demand. The automotive industry simply got caught flat-footed after canceling orders with manufacturers during the initial months of the pandemic. At the same time, the world went virtual, accelerating everything digital. This shift increased orders for chips used in personal computers, video game devices, home appliances and cloud-based applications.Personal computers are the most prominent example. While PCs still account for about a third of the overall semiconductor market, this had been an industry in slow decline over the past decade. This changed last year when the market grew at its highest rate in 10 years.So, when automakers replaced their orders with manufacturers last fall, there was no capacity for them. Fortunately, the auto sector is a small percentage of the overall semiconductor market, even though it’s a future area of potential growth with the anticipated rise in electric vehicle production. Since it takes about four months to manufacture auto chips, the situation is likely to correct itself by the end of this year.Semiconductors play integral role in global economySource: Bloomberg. Data represent the share of all semiconductor device applications in 2025, as forecast by Bloomberg. Values in USD.AI and machine learning are powerful industry growth driversAn increasing amount of data is being created every day. It started with social media and people posting pictures and videos of their children, food they ate at restaurants and places they visited. Then, in 2018, machines surpassed humans as the largest data creators. We believe this transformative shift will be a significant catalyst for the semiconductor industry.Going forward, the majority of data will likely be created by machines that require massive amounts of processing power. The challenge will be in increasing processing power and lowering power consumption.Enormous amounts of data won't reside in our phones, but in data centres. Today, data centres account for roughly 3% of global electricity consumption. If we do nothing to make them more efficient, they might account for 25% of electricity consumption in 10 years. Given this dilemma, the rule of thumb in semiconductor design is to try to reduce power consumption in these components by 30% every two years.In our view, this is likely to drive growth for more advanced and complex chips used in high-end smartphones and data centres, which will drive up their semiconductor dollar content over the next five years.A massive semiconductor spending cycle is comingThe world’s largest semiconductor companies are planning to spend billions of dollars on new manufacturing facilities to meet new demand, as well as to navigate geopolitical tensions with semiconductors being seen as a national security priority. The U.S. and Europe both seek to bring critical supply chains closer to home, given that Taiwan controls a majority of the high-end manufacturing production for semiconductors.Industry bellwether Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing (TSMC) plans to spend US$100 billion through 2023 for new chip fabrication facilities, including a large site planned for Arizona. TSMC holds close to 80% market share for leading-edge chip production, and its clients include Apple, Qualcomm and Broadcom.Semiconductor manufacturing has heavily consolidatedSource: Capital Group, Intel. Shows semiconductor companies capable of manufacturing the smallest chips available in each period. Data as of December 2020.Meanwhile, Intel plans to spend US$20 billion on two new plants in Arizona, and Samsung Electronics is eyeing construction of a new manufacturing facility in Texas worth US$17 billion. Spending comes after a long period of capital discipline and industry consolidation, which has left the business with two dominant players: TSMC and Samsung, with Intel a distant third.However, it’s unclear how these new foundries might benefit the industry longer term, and this is something we’ll be watching closely. Manufacturing processors in the U.S. will likely cost more than in Taiwan or Korea, where most of the current capacity lies. This could create market inefficiencies. It’s also unclear if U.S. semiconductor and technology companies, almost all of whom outsource the manufacturing of their chips to Asia, will want to bring it onshore.Industry has consolidated across segmentsFollowing several rounds of consolidation, each segment along the supply chain — the chip designers, chip equipment manufacturers, the foundries that make the chips and the companies that test the chips — is dominated by a few companies.With highly specialized expertise in each of these areas, competitive moats have expanded. Many of these companies are well-managed, with a stronger grasp of customer demand patterns. Pricing power remains high and margins are attractive.Semiconductor equipment makers:This market has heavily consolidated, with the top five companies controlling close to 75% market share, up from roughly 40% 15 years ago. These companies, including ASML in the Netherlands and Applied Materials and Lam Research in the U.S., have developed wide competitive moats, with each company developing its own specific niche within the semiconductor manufacturing and testing process.As a result, they’ve become difficult to supplant given the complexities of their machines. For example, an extreme ultraviolet lithography (EUV) machine, used to make advanced chips, is made of more than 100,000 parts, costs approximately US$120 million and is shipped in 40 freight containers. ASML is essentially the only manufacturer of this equipment.The equipment makers have further developed a servicing model with recurring revenue from machine maintenance. Operating margins have averaged 25% over the past five years and are on track to expand beyond 30% based on our estimates. In years past, they would dip into the single digits.Memory chips:The industry structure has evolved, and it's become more attractive. Memory used to be a cyclical, commodity-like business. It’s shrunk from around 15 companies globally to three, the biggest being Korea’s Samsung Electronics. In turn, the industry has become more disciplined and rational. And memory chips remain a critical component for computing processors used in a wide range of devices. Although Korea accounts for almost three-fourths of global memory chips manufacturing, the U.S. still dominates the global semiconductor market with about 47% share due to its dominance in fabless, equipment and intellectual design segments.U.S. semiconductor companies hold significant market shareSource: Semiconductor Industry Association, based on 2020 data.Strategic importance stirs geopolitical frictionsAs semiconductors have become strategically imperative, it has raised concerns among government officials in the U.S., China and Europe, who are all driven by their own motives.The U.S. worries that while its companies are global leaders in chip design, the country ceded leadership in manufacturing years ago to Taiwan, namely TSMC. Currently, U.S. market share for chip manufacturing is 12%, down from 37% in 1990.Meanwhile, Europe is concerned that it lacks any manufacturing capabilities for cutting-edge semiconductors. This became amplified during the recent chip shortage that hurt big German automakers.For China, its leaders want to reduce the country’s dependence on U.S. semiconductors. Given current U.S. trade sanctions, China has defined semiconductors as a strategic imperative in its most recent five-year plan. It will take time, but with the money and resources that China is devoting to the effort, it will develop some capabilities, just as it has in other industries.As semiconductor chips become integral to virtually every industry and are essentially the “brains” for most things we use, their importance will only grow. Whether the strategic imperatives that drive public policy chip away at some of the industry’s efficiency and execution prowess is a trend we will be closely watching.",Technology & Innovation
These 3 laws drive innovation and investment opportunity,2021-04-13T10:39:00,"You’ve probably heard of Moore’s Law, the observation that semiconductors would get meaningfully faster and cheaper over time, improving computing power. But what about Flatley’s Law and Wright’s Law?None of these observations of technological progress exactly qualifies as an immutable law of nature, like Newton’s theory of gravity, but they have helped paved the way for some of the most compelling advances of the last 50 years. And in doing so they have helped improve the lives of consumers and drive long-term opportunity for savvy companies and investors.1. Moore’s Law and the proliferation of semiconductorsIntel co-founder Gordon Moore, while working as a researcher in the 1960s, somewhat famously observed that the number of transistors that fit onto an integrated circuit doubled roughly every 18 months to two years, effectively providing more processing power at the same cost. He further observed that there was no reason that progress couldn’t continue.This was not exactly a law of science, like Newton’s gravitational law, but rather an aspirational one, providing engineers with a goal. “It’s really a matter of how much money you invest in R&D to try to reduce the transistor size,” notes equity investment analyst Isaac Sudit, who has been covering semiconductors for more than two decades and met Gordon Moore as a young analyst. “Now companies invest for a reason — to get a return on their investment. It turns out that industry economics evolved in such a way that enough profits were generated to maintain that pace of innovation. So, it became a self-fulfilling prophecy.”Moore’s Law and Flatley’s Law are driving costs lower and innovation higherSource: National Human Genome Research Institute. Data as of August 31, 2020. Values shown on a logarithmic scale. Moore’s Law is the observation made in 1965 by Intel co-founder Gordon Moore that the number of transistors per square inch on integrated circuits double every two years while the costs are halved. Flatley’s Law is an analog to Moore’s Law, attributed to former Illumina Chairman Jay Flatley, that refers to the much more rapid advances and cost reductions in sequencing one human genome.This pace of progress helped fuel the personal computing revolution in the 1980s and 1990s and paved the way for mobile phones, self-driving cars and health care devices.As semiconductors become cheaper and more efficient, they will penetrate more aspects of our daily lives. By and large, they will continue to drive improvements in things we already use, like phones and tablets, cars, entertainment systems and appliances. “The costs are dropping to the extent that we can start creating new business models that allow companies to generate money, and that's what we're seeing,” Sudit adds.Semiconductors are infiltrating every corner of our livesSource: Bloomberg. Data represents the share of all semiconductor device applications in 2025, as forecast by Bloomberg.Two other dramatic advances have changed the landscape of the semiconductor industry: cloud computing and artificial intelligence. “Processing data in the cloud has transformed computing from a cost centre to a profit centre. Servers are now rented from companies like Amazon or Microsoft, which has further allowed for the creation of new business models,” Sudit says. In the case of artificial intelligence, virtual assistants like Alexa and Siri, and smart thermostats like Google’s Nest are already in use by consumers. “The poster child for advances in artificial intelligence, of course, is the self-driving car.”So what does all of this mean for investors? The expanding use of semiconductors is a bullish sign for the industry over the long-term.“The semiconductor industry is still relatively young — about 60 years old — so I had the chance to meet most of the founders who drove the initial phase of hypergrowth,” says Sudit, who has a PhD in physics and worked as a scientist in both academia and in the industry before becoming an investment analyst. “But I have also gotten to know the next generation of leaders, many of whom were outsiders with strong business skills.”Does Sudit’s background in physics provide him with a unique perspective as a professional investor? “Yes, but not for the reasons you might think,” he explains. “Being able to understand technology allows me to focus more time on execution, operations, finances and strategy. These competencies are more important than just technology to build sustainable competitive advantages.”2. Flatley’s Law and the power of gene sequencingWhen the human genome was first sequenced about two decades ago, it took a team of researchers at the National Institutes of Health (NIH) some 15 years at a cost of more than US$2.7 billion. A competing effort by medical technology firm Celera was completed a bit quicker for less money. However, it soon became clear that machines used for genetic sequencing would need to be faster and cheaper.Enter Jay Flatley, former chairman of medical technology company Illumina. He set his company not on a mission to discover some new innovation, but to maintain a laser focus on execution. Today, thanks to improvements driven largely by Illumina, a human genome can be sequenced in about a day for around US$500. The cost is expected to soon fall to US$100. Flatley’s Law, an analog to Moore’s, exemplified even quicker advances and greater cost reductions.“For a brief moment in the year 2000, we believed we had all the pieces to the genetic code to solve every disease,” recalls equity portfolio manager Richmond Wolf, who got to know Flatley while covering U.S. medical technology companies as an investment analyst. “It turned out to be an important first step, but it was much less useful than we thought it would be.”Subsequent breakthroughs in DNA analysis have ledto a new era in medicine.”Today we can sequence tumors and compare their mutations to the map of the human genome,” Wolf says. “We can then identify specific mutations and match therapies to them.” Indeed, testing and therapies derived from genetic testing have the potential to extend lives and generate billions of dollars in revenue for the companies that develop them.We are developing tools that are rapidly advancing the pace of drug development. “Exciting new modalities like gene therapies, immunotherapies and cell-based therapies which are now changing the trajectory of many cancers could not happen without DNA sequencing,” says Wolf. “Very often the companies that develop and supply the picks and shovels to an industry can make powerful investments. If it were not for DNA sequencing many of these new therapies would not be possible. Just as in the case of semiconductors, if it were not for advances in extreme ultraviolet lithography, Moore’s Law might have broken down years ago.”Advances in genetics and cell research are expanding the cancer drug pipelineSource: Cancer Research Institute. Data as of May 2020. Immunotherapy is the artificial stimulation of the immune system to treat cancer. The seven categories of immunotherapy are based on the mechanism of actions to treat cancer.Breakthroughs in diagnostics may lead to much earlier detection of illnesses, or in some cases treat disease before it progresses. “One of the most exciting things in health care today is something known as liquid biopsy, which uses a sample of your blood to identify cancer at its earliest stages when cells are shedding a tiny amount of mutated DNA,” Wolf says.More recently genomic research has been a key contributor in the fight against COVID. Not only has DNA sequencing identified and tracked variants, but U.S. biotech company Moderna was able to get a jump on developing its vaccine because a scientist had published the genetic code for the virus.Quick, accurate and cheap gene sequencing has the potential to put medical researchers on a path to developing personalized therapies for patients. “There’s never been a more exciting time in health care,” Wolf adds. “It started with the sequencing of the human genome. We've developed and improved these tools over the last two decades, and now we’re using them not only to provide more accurate diagnostics, but to actually develop better therapies and to match therapies to those diagnostics.”3. Wright’s Law and the coming dominance of electric vehiclesA third law related to declining production costs, Wright’s Law, predates Moore’s by a few decades and has broader application. Theodore Wright, an aeronautical engineer, observed in 1936 that when the production of airplanes doubled, costs declined by a fixed rate.Taking Wright’s observation and applying it to advances in lithium-ion batteries, those most commonly used inelectric cars,suggests prices should drop significantly for every doubling of production.Today electric vehicles (EVs) typically run on a 40-60 kilowatt lithium-ion battery pack, which accounts for about a third of the vehicle cost. Electric cars become cheaper than conventional cars when the battery cost drops under US$100 per kilowatt hour (kWh). Over the last decade, the average price has fallen from US$917 per kWh to about US$137, according to a Bloomberg analysis. In China, battery costs for some vehicles have already reached the $100 threshold, years ahead of previous estimates, according to some reports. And that number is likely to fall below US$60 by 2030.As a result, EV makers have recently been introducing models with lower prices, better performance and longer range. Typically, EV batteries can run 200 to 400 miles before they require recharging. Companies leading the race for cheaper, more efficient batteries include CATL in China, LG Chem and Samsung SDI in Korea, and Tesla in the U.S.Plunging battery costs will make EVs more affordableSources: Bloomberg New Energy Finance, Statista. Prices shown for 2023 and 2030 are forecasts as of December 2020.The International Energy Agency expects global EV sales to rise 28% a year over the next decade. But with emissions standards tightening worldwide and costs becoming increasingly attractive to consumers, those estimates may be too conservative, says equity investment analyst Kaitlyn Murphy.“New developments will potentially make EVs cost competitive not only with new gas-burning cars but with the entire fleet of cars on the road, including used cars,” says Murphy, whose covers U.S. automobile and components makers. “That’s about 270 or 280 million vehicles in the U.S. If you take a long-term view, that suggests there could be much stronger growth than the market expects.”Indeed, the emergence of battery-powered cars is changing the economics of the global auto industry. As companies build out their EV fleets, they are also building a base of potential service revenues — from managing your battery to providing updatable software that can improve consumer experience as well as car safety.“Whether they are legacy automakers or startups, companies that embrace structural change and introduce these advancements quickly have a better chance of winning over the long term,” Murphy adds.Furthermore, broader adoption of lithium-ion batteries in autos could trigger price reductions that ultimately make the batteries affordable for other uses, like energy storage for public utilities, for example.Investment implicationsMoore’s Law, Flatley’s Law and Wright’s Law should continue to push the pace of innovation across industries and help smart companies take advantage of new opportunities. The sheer speed of change means investors must remain alert as to which companies will be disruptors and which will be disrupted.Our research efforts help us track the advances leading the technology, health care and energy industries in new directions. Sudit and Wolf had the privilege of knowing these “lawmakers.” More importantly, their years of experience give them a broad perspective that’s hard to match.",Technology & Innovation
Dreams of 2030: Small caps and the next innovation wave,2021-04-08T03:48:00,"Nearly a decade ago, Greg Wendt recalls, Netflix had reached an early crossroads. The company, which began its life renting DVDs through the mail, decided to split its video streaming business from its DVD rental business, a decision that was panned by the market.The company’s shares plummeted, reducing its market capitalization to the point that it became a small-cap company. “CEO Reed Hastings had a vision he was driving for,” recalls Wendt, an equity portfolio manager with 32 years of investment industry experience. “The way he put it, ‘The name of the company is Netflix, not Discs in the Mail.’” The company ultimately canceled the split, recovered and grew into a streaming media giant with more than 182 million subscribers worldwide. No longer a small company, as of July 30, Netflix had a market capitalization of more than US$200 billion.“Smaller companies are often willed to life by dreamers,” says Wendt. “And a key to successful investing in small companies is understanding their dreams, what their potential might be and maintaining patience as the business hits bumps along the road.”Kids in the candy shopSince he began his career as a retailing analyst, Greg has naturally gravitated toward small-cap companies defined at Capital Group as businesses with market capitalizations of US$6 billion or less. “I felt that following small companies gave me an opportunity to really add value by pulling apart the mouse trap and truly getting to understand a business, its leaders and their vision,” he says.“Many people understand the investment case for the largest companies with household names, like Amazon or Microsoft,” says equity portfolio Brad Freer, a like-minded investor who has been following small companies for 27 years. “But with small companies I feel like a kid in a candy shop looking for new ideas.”Growth and risk potentialSome small companies are among the world’s most innovative and fastest growing businesses, many of which can be found among the technology, health care and consumer sectors. But they also tend to involve more risk than their large-company counterparts. While many small companies have evolved into household names, like Netflix, Tesla or biotech company Gilead Sciences, many more stagnate or fail.As a result, small caps tend to be more volatile than their larger counterparts. During the first quarter of 2020, for example, the MSCI ACWI Small Cap Index, a broad measure of the global universe of small companies, slid more than 30%, compared with a decline of about 21.4% for the MSCI ACWI Index, a broad measure of the global large-cap universe. But in the second quarter, small caps rebounded strongly, soaring 24.8% compared with a gain of 19.2% for large companies.It’s the digital divide, not growth versus valueWith the coronavirus pandemic and government stay-at-home orders accelerating demand for certain e-commerce, video content, social media and cloud businesses, many of the disruptive growth companies that led the market in the last expansion have continued to lead. “I think it is a bit artificial to describe what we have seen as growth vs. value,” notes Wendt. “We have seen business accelerate for companies on the right side of the digital divide, and those on the wrong side have largely fallen behind. Today, it’s a stock picker’s market.”The most successful companies anticipate such shifts, says Wendt. “In many respects small companies are better able to do so because their size can allow them to be nimble and quickly adapt to changing circumstances and consumer preferences.”Thinking outside the digital boxConsider, for example, Peloton, the digital exercise equipment company launched in 2012. Peloton’s stationary bike allows users to participate remotely in spin classes streamed from its studio. “This company is providing a service few even dreamed about 10 years ago, and today its business model is widely regarded as the fitness company of the future and a threat to the gym industry,” explains Wendt. Not even a public company a year ago, Peloton has become relatively large. “The company has been thinking digitally since day one,” says Wendt.Indeed, the digital divide has stretched across industries, impacting business models far afield of the tech sector. “Some investors naturally think of cloud-based software providers, fintech businesses or e-retailers as the primary beneficiaries in a post-COVID world,” says Freer, “but at Capital we try to go a little deeper and seek to identify a broad range of companies with the potential to benefit from a digital-first approach.”Consider the global gaming industry, which Wendt continues to cover as an investment analyst. “In my view, the companies with the potential to transform the global gaming industry are not the big casino businesses but online gaming platforms like Draft Kings in the U.S. and Flutter in the U.K., which had a huge head start on the digital side of gaming,” says Wendt.Of course, not all fast-growing small companies have a digital focus. “Consider German battery maker Varta,” suggests Freer. “This company makes micro batteries, and the quality threshold for such batteries is high because they are used in hearing aids and other audio equipment.” As Varta’s hearing aid business grew, its technology became increasingly differentiated, explains Freer. More recently, the popularity of digital music players like the iPhone created a demand for earbuds, which also need these micro batteries. As demand grew, Varta’s business expanded rapidly. “Today it dominates the market for earbuds,” adds Freer.Tracking a world of opportunityWendt, Freer and the other managers who focus on small cap companies invest selectively, basing decisions on deep fundamental research. This is no small undertaking, given that the small-cap universe is vast and diverse, accounting for about two-thirds of companies worldwide.Serving this effort is a network of about 130 investment analysts and 20 portfolio managers. This research team strives to stay at the forefront of innovation and change, following thousands of small-cap companies across dozens of industries and geographies.“Our effort starts with a big funnel at the top, then we narrow our search so that we might discuss five or 10 new investment ideas in a given week,” says Freer. “We then narrow that universe by meeting with company managements, interviewing competitors and suppliers, and building financial models until we gain conviction to invest.”Sometimes Capital’s analysts and managers will meet with companies when they're still private and track their progress, checking in on management teams to evaluate how they are executing on their plan as they grow. “It's one thing to have a great idea, but quite another to execute on it,” Freer adds.From acorns to oaksWendt, Freer and their fellow portfolio managers, of course, invest in smaller companies with the hope that they may one day grow into large companies.“We recently went back and looked at every investment made in our small-cap funds in the U.S. over a 16-year period to try to identify common trends among successful investments and learn from our mistakes,” says Freer. “Some of the most successful investments achieved what legendary investor Peter Lynch referred to as multi-baggers. This is an investment that grows two, three, or more times than the original investment. Of the 3,900 investments made by the fund over the 16 years, 172 achieved triple-bagger status, or a 300% profit over our cost base.”Not all investments have worked outMost investments never achieve that level of success of course, and in some cases they fail. “One thing that makes this asset class so complicated and difficult is that you need to recognize that you're going to make mistakes,” says Freer.Wendt recalls investing in American Classic Voyages, a venture seeking to disrupt the maritime industry, which was protected by federal regulations. The company planned to build cruise ships in the United States and sought to capitalize on demand for cruises to Hawaii. “They raised the capital, hired a dream management team, but the shipyard was unable to successfully build the cruise ship,” says Wendt. Ultimately the company failed. The lesson? “If something's never been done before, don't assume it can be done.”Patience has been a virtue“Whenever I make an investment, step one is to make sure I understand why I'm buying a stock and how I think it will be successful,” says Wendt. “And as long as that thesis doesn't change, I will tend to stick with the investment for years. If the thesis changes, or if a stock goes up too fast, I'll sell it. But otherwise I'm pretty stubborn. I try to be patient with growth companies.“At Capital Group, we have the luxury of truly thinking long term,” says Wendt. “Portfolio manager compensation is largely based on an eight-year time frame, which is unique in our industry and allows us to be patient investors. This long-term perspective enables us to look ahead to 2030 and invest in some of these small-cap dreamers that could eventually lead the next wave of global innovation.”",Equity
China: 3 views on what’s next for its economy and stocks,2021-04-05T02:01:00,"China was the first country to shut down its economy to blunt the spread of COVID-19, and the first to emerge. As the world’s second-largest economy and a key cog in supply chains and consumer markets, China’s economic progress over the next 12 months will play a vital role in restarting the worldwide economy.Since the outset of the pandemic, China’s policymakers have been far more restrained in terms of stimulus compared with the U.S. and European Union. They have sought to stabilize the economy rather than flood it with too much credit like in prior economic downturns. While tensions with the U.S. continue to weigh on its economy, China has developed a powerful domestic demand engine, and government leaders are focused on increasing domestic spending and unlocking the significant savings of the country’s populace, which are much greater than those of Western countries.So far, China equities have fared relatively well as measured by the returns of the benchmark MSCI China Investable Market Index. And China’s economy rebounded in the second quarter. But bouts of volatility are likely amid a tepid rebound in consumer activity, supply chain concerns and differing opinions about the strength of China’s economy. This could offer investors with a bottom-up, long-term approach selective opportunities to take advantage of periods of market weakness, especially given the persistent and potentially increasing geopolitical tensions.We asked two longtime Capital Group portfolio managers with years of experience living and working in Asia for their views on China’s getting back to work and what kinds of companies might benefit. We’ll begin with a macro-level perspective from our chief China economist.Recovery likely gradual and stimulus unlike past downturnsStephen Green, Capital Group economist in Hong KongOverall, China’s industrial economy is largely operating back at normal levels, and leading activity indicators such as trucking volumes, electricity production and weekly cement shipments are mostly back to 2019 levels or higher. However, I believe the return of growth will be slow and gradual.Industrial profits remain weak, and China’s exports could decline as much as 20% to 30% on a year-over-year basis; though so far, exports are holding up surprisingly well. Consumption is generally lagging due to elevated unemployment levels and fears of possible pay cuts. The majority of households report in surveys that their incomes are down year-on-year. People still seem to be reticent to leave their homes, and some of this is reflected in data for travel and dining, which are well below 2019 levels.Gross domestic product:Our research suggests that China’s economy contracted far more in the first quarter than the government’s official 6.8% decline. While China reported year-over-year second-quarter growth of 3.2% on an annualized basis, I anticipate China’s economy will see no growth for all of 2020, which contrasts with the sell-side consensus forecast for modest GDP growth.Stimulus package:As the scale of the growth shock becomes clearer, Beijing is launching a mini-fiscal stimulus package. Don’t expect the stimulus to be of the same magnitude as in the global financial crisis. It could amount to five percentage points of gross domestic product, compared with 10 percentage points following the 2008–2009 global credit shock. This could be enough to stabilize China’s economy in the second half of 2020 and provide some support to growth in 2021; it usually takes 12 to 18 months for credit to work its way through the economy.New infrastructure:Much of the stimulus will go toward infrastructure — things like upgrading the electricity grid and building metro and suburban rail networks, as well as improving the environment. But Beijing also wants some of the funds to go into “new infrastructure” spending that would pave the way for the development of 5G telecommunications networks and data centres.Local champions begin to emerge in technology and health careChris Thomsen, Capital Group portfolio manager in LondonWhile the success of Tencent and Alibaba is well-documented, the coronavirus outbreak underscored the capabilities of some companies that may emerge as the next set of domestic champions within China’s technology and health care–related sectors.I believe the more innovative domestic companies may continue to benefit from an emerging trend of localization, or the procuring of goods and services from within China, that has partly come about given the dislocation in some supply chains and structural trade issues. To some degree, we have begun to see some of this activity in the fields of enterprise software and semiconductors. Meanwhile, the health care sector has been a natural beneficiary of COVID-19, and the pandemic should further accelerate the development of this industry within China.Cloud computing:China has lagged the U.S. in adopting cloud-based technology. Startups and internet companies have been among those utilizing it, but traditional Chinese businesses have been particularly slow. Working from home changed the dynamic significantly, and companies unable to operate during the lockdown were forced to look for cloud-based solutions. An emerging participant is Kingdee International Software Group, which competes against Germany’s SAP and U.S.-based Oracle.Semiconductors:China wants to strengthen its capabilities in the semiconductor field as part of a broad plan to become more self-sufficient in key areas of technology. Silergy Corporation, which designs and manufactures a broad range of high-performance analog integrated circuits and is gaining share in China’s chip market, may benefit as the market is projected to grow substantially with demand for 5G and cloud-computing applications. In the first quarter, company sales rose 42% to US$95 million versus the same period in 2019.Biotechnology:Through their internet-based platforms, Tencent and Alibaba have seen a massive surge in activity for their health care services, with people connecting to doctors on their mobile devices. There are also Chinese biotechnology companies on the front lines of developing vaccines for COVID-19. Overall, China’s aging population and demand for higher quality services from private sector hospitals could present intriguing opportunities for investment in the years ahead.Travel: Short-term turbulence, long-term runwayChina’s middle class has developed a love of travel. They were frequently in search of new overseas experiences before the pandemic brought travel to a halt. Before the shutdown, the number of international flights from China had grown an average of 16% per year since 2000, boosting tourism and travel-related stocks. The current trajectory of that growth remains unclear, and I’m not certain when air traffic will return to pre-coronavirus levels.After the SARS pandemic in 2003 and 2004, tourism and travel across Asia eventually rebounded as governments put standards in place and the public gained confidence that those measures were effective.Despite recent setbacks, there is a long growth runway for travel-related services in China. Possible beneficiaries could be Shanghai Airport and Guangzhou Baiyun International Airport. Both are geographically positioned in desirable regions within China.Consumers — A tale of two income groupsWinnie Kwan, Capital Group portfolio manager in Hong KongCOVID-19 has changed consumption patterns in China. The migration to digital services has accelerated — from cooked food and fresh grocery delivery, to online medical and education services. Meituan-Dianping, China’s largest food and services delivery platform, has replaced Baidu as the third-largest internet business after Tencent and Alibaba.There is also an increasing focus on health and wellness, with a greater share of the consumer’s wallet dedicated to food safety, exercise and private health care. As a result, I anticipate growth in protection-based insurance products to have a long runway.Affluent consumers in Tier 1 and Tier 2 cities (larger GDPs) are still confident, while consumers in Tier 3 and 4 cities (smaller GDPs) have become even more price sensitive. Based on our research, premium brands and trading up are still relevant themes in more affluent Tier 1 and 2 cities. Meanwhile, national mass market brands have found it difficult to maintain pricing power.Luxury goods, premium cosmetics and skin care have experienced strong recovery since China’s economy reopened in March. This has benefited multinationals that have a significant presence in China with portfolios of aspirational brands. European luxury brands face less competition from domestic Chinese companies.Outside the larger cities such as Beijing, Shanghai and Shenzhen, people are increasingly price wary due to employment concerns. Millions of migrant workers have yet to return to their jobs, and a large number of college graduates are trying to find jobs. Internet-based platform Pinduoduo has enabled cost-conscious consumers to compare prices and buy goods in bulk. During the first quarter, the company saw its average monthly users increase 68% to 487 million year over year.Over the next 12 to 24 months, travel patterns should temporarily shift from international to domestic destinations due to restrictions and some degree of scaling back by price-sensitive consumers.The quality of companies varies significantlyIt can be easy to lose sight of long-term trends and potential investment opportunities amid a barrage of political rhetoric and heightened geopolitical tensions. Capital Group has been visiting Chinese companies and investing in them for several decades now. China is home to many innovative companies with large addressable markets, offering the potential for sizable long-term growth in market value.More than ever in this rapidly changing and uncertain global business environment, stock selection is key, since the quality of companies in China varies significantly and sectors are at different stages of maturity.",China
The world in 2030: Investing for the next decade,2021-03-26T06:00:00,"The world in 2030 may seem a long way off, but at Capital Group we spend a lot of time thinking about the distant future.“Imagining life in 2030 is not a hypothetical for me,” notes Capital Group vice chairman Rob Lovelace, a sentiment echoed by many of his colleagues. “In the portfolios that I manage, my average holding period is about eight years, so I’m living that approach to investing.”We asked our investment team to look in their crystal balls to envision how life may change by the end of the decade. Here are seven portfolio managers’ perspectives on the world in 2030, and how these shifting trends influence their investment decisions.1. COVID could be this generation’s Pearl Harbor2. Cash is an endangered species3. A cure for cancer may be around the corner4. Health care innovation reaches warp speed5. Renewable energy powers the world6. Electric and autonomous vehicles hit the fast lane7. What’s not changing? Successful investing1. COVID could be this generation’s Pearl Harbor — Martin RomoTen years from now I think we will look back on COVID as our generation’s “Pearl Harbor moment” — a period when extreme adversity spurs innovation and behavioural changes to help address some of the era’s biggest problems. When Pearl Harbor happened, the U.S. artillery was 75% horse drawn. Let me say that again: In 1941, three quarters of our artillery depended on horses. Yet by the end of the war we had entered the atomic age. That incredible transformation sparked a period of innovation and growth in the U.S. economy that lasted for decades.COVID could be the trigger that spurs us to tackle critical issues over the next decade, such as the cost of health care, education and housing. We’ve already seen an almost magically rapid development of COVID vaccines at a speed few thought possible. And we’re doing things in our daily lives we never imagined would happen this quickly.In 2030 we may be living, working, studying and playing in a radically new world. Our lives could be better, richer, healthier, cheaper and profoundly more digital, virtual and data centric. Many of the technologies already exist, but I believe there's still so much untapped potential for innovative companies to think bigger and use them in ways that solve societal problems.2. Cash is an endangered species — Jody JonssonA decade from now I think digital payments will be the norm, and people will give you odd looks if you try to pay with cash.This is one area where emerging markets are ahead of the U.S. We’ve seen this trend for several years in developing countries — where many consumers had no bank accounts but did have mobile phones and adopted mobile payment technology quickly. The pandemic accelerated use of digital payments around the world, including places where it hadn’t previously been ingrained in daily life. Once this crisis is over, I think a lot more people will be comfortable making digital payments, and they probably won’t feel the need to use cash as much as they did before.As consumers become increasingly comfortable with the technology,companies with large global footprintssuch as Mastercard and PayPal are poised to benefit. We’ve also seen strong growth in smaller companies outside the U.S., such as Brazil’s PagSeguro and StoneCo, which offer mobile payment platforms for merchants.3. A cure for cancer may be around the corner — Cheryl FrankA cure for cancer may be closer than you think. In fact, I believe some cancers will be functionally cured with cell therapy between now and 2030. New, reliable tests should enable very early detection of cancer formation and location. Beyond that, cancer could largely be eradicated as a major cause of death through early diagnosis.Vastly reduced costs and scientific developments have contributed to phenomenal growth in medical research. We're in a renaissance period for R&D, and companies are investing aggressively to find unique ways to battle cancer and other illnesses. Genomics research and therapies derived from genetic testing have the potential to extend lives and generate billions of dollars in revenue for companies that develop them.I wouldn’t be surprised to see increasing amounts of pharmaceutical innovation come from outside the U.S. In fact, I expect to see many blockbuster drugs from China by 2030. The country has the biggest population of cancer patients in the world, and it’s significantly easier to enroll those patients in clinical trials. I expect they will begin to produce novel drugs within five to 10 years and sell them at one-tenth the cost in the U.S.4. Health care innovation reaches warp speed — Rich WolfStar Trek, the classic sci-fi TV series, depicted a far-off future where space explorers traveled the galaxies equipped with cutting edge technology such as the tricorder, a hand-held medical device that scanned a person’s vital signs, issued a diagnosis and prescribed treatment in minutes. While I don’t think there is going to be a single tricorder that does everything, I suspect that by 2030 many of us will have devices like it that will analyze blood, do cardiology monitoring and even remotely check our breathing while we sleep, some of which are available today.We are already experiencing a massive wave ofinnovation and disruption across the health care sectorthat has the potential to drive new opportunity for companies, reduce overall costs and, most importantly, improve outcomes for patients. Breakthroughs in diagnostics will help lead to earlier detection of illnesses, which can help make drugs more effective — or in some cases treat disease before it progresses. One of the most exciting things today is something known as liquid biopsy, whereby a sample of your blood can identify a tumor at its earliest stages.A broad range of traditional technology and medical technology companies have been working to develop home diagnostics for some time, and patients are now benefitting from their innovation. These are cost-effective devices that can collect all kinds of health-related metrics that not only help coach us to improve our own health, but can be immediately sent to our doctor for further consultation. We’re still in the early stages of development, but by 2030 it should be a routine part of our daily lives.5. Renewable energy powers the world — Noriko ChenI believe we’ll see a dramatic shift toward renewable energy over the next decade. We are in the early stages of the transition to an electrification of the grid and green energy, and there are strong tailwinds that could drive growth through 2030 and beyond. Automation and artificial intelligence are setting the stage for a golden age in renewables — pushing costs down while boosting productivity and efficiency.Renewable energy has historically been perceived as expensive, impractical and unprofitable — but all that is quickly changing. Some traditional utilities are already generating more than 30% of their business from renewables and are reaching an inflection point where they are being recognized more as growth companies rather than just staid, old-economy power generators and grid operators. The move toward renewables is most pronounced in European utilities, including Enel in Italy, E.ON in Germany and Denmark’s Ørsted. Their governments have set high decarbonization targets and created incentives for further investment — not only in electricity grids and infrastructure, but also in battery storage and other technologies that could accelerate demand.6. Electric and autonomous vehicles hit the fast lane — Chris BuchbinderI think in 2030 we will have widely deployed fleets of autonomous electric vehicles operating in most major and many secondary cities around the world. Ownership of a personal vehicle will go from being a necessity to a luxury. Many people will still have vehicles — just like people ride horses or bicycles for fun. But personal vehicles will no longer be necessary as the primary form of transportation for most people in major cities.This is an area that I believe the market hasn’t fully appreciated yet. Right now, the market leaders are embedded in other companies — such as Alphabet’s Waymo, Amazon’s Zoox or the Cruise division of GM — so investors can’t buy a pure-play autonomous driving company. But as these fleets roll out more publicly, the market should start to reevaluate these companies and realize this is a real business, not a science project.I also think 2030 is when we're likely to see hybrid electric engines and hydrogen engines introduced into commercial aircrafts, with widespread deployment over the following 5–10 years. The impact on global emissions could be significant if we transition to a world where we've got huge fleets of autonomous electric vehicles on the road and aircraft transportation shifting from oil-based fuel to a mixture of oil, electricity and hydrogen.7. What’s not changing? Successful investing — Andrew SuzmanMy colleagues may be able to look at the future and imagine new products and trends, but I’d like to predict one thing that won’t be different in 2030. Despite all the change going on in the world, I believe the nature of my job and focus as a portfolio manager will be exactly the same.In 2030 — just as we did in 2020 and 2010, and every year before that — we will come upon companies that do interesting things. We'll try to buy them at reasonable prices and hold them so that any returns we get may be better than if we were to buy all companies. That is my true north. Some companies will get it right and some will get it wrong. Our job is to find the companies most likely to get it right and create wealth over time so that our investors may benefit. Not that we’ll be perfect, but I'm optimistic that we can get more companies right than wrong and continue to add value for our clients.",Long-Term Investing
Beyond Tesla: Electric cars shift into the fast lane,2021-03-18T07:44:00,"Ladies and gentlemen, start your batteries.Sure, we’ve been hearing about the advent of the electric car for a long time. But evidence is mounting that it has already arrived — ahead of schedule.Consider this: General Motors announced in January 2021 that it will stop manufacturing gas-powered cars by 2035, a dramatic shift underscored by a comical Super Bowl ad featuring Will Ferrell. This after Volkswagen, Europe’s largest automaker, disclosed plans to invest US$86 billion to develop electric vehicles, digital factories and self-driving cars over the next five years.Furthermore, in 2020, investor enthusiasm for electric vehicles (EVs) briefly sent Tesla’s market value soaring from US$100 billion to US$800 billion, making it more valuable than the nine largest traditional automakers combined. Tesla, which sold just under 500,000 cars last year, expects sales growth of 50% a year.The International Energy Agency expects global EV sales to rise 28% a year over the next decade. But with emissions standards tightening worldwide and EV costs becoming increasingly attractive to consumers, those estimates may be too conservative, says equity investment analyst Kaitlyn Murphy.“New developments will potentially make EVs cost competitive not only with new gas-burning cars but with the entire fleet of cars on the road, including used cars,” says Murphy, whose research responsibilities include U.S. automobile and components makers. “That’s about 270 or 280 million vehicles in the U.S. If you take a long-term view, that suggests there could be much stronger growth than the market expects.”Electric vehicle adoption reaches for higher gearSource: IEA, Electric vehicle stock in the EV30@30 scenario, 2018–2030; IEA Paris. Data for 2020–2030 are forecasts provided by the IEA.Indeed, the emergence of battery-powered cars is changing the economics of the global auto industry, Murphy says. As companies build out their EV fleets, they are also building a base of potential service revenues — for managing your battery or providing updatable software that can improve consumer experience and the safety of the car.“Whether they are legacy automakers or startups, the companies that can embrace structural change and introduce these advancements quickly have a better chance of winning over the long term,” Murphy adds.The global race is onEstimates vary widely on how quickly electric cars will dominate the roads, but there is wide agreement that the days of gas-powered engines are numbered.Shifting public opinion on fossil fuel, government policy and rapid innovation have given new urgency to the rollout of EVs. The adoption curve has steepened in the last five years thanks in large part to government incentives and tighter emissions standards for gas-burning cars.China and Europe have been particularly aggressive in providing subsidies and setting tight restrictions on fossil fuel emissions. As a result, these regions have been leaders in EV production, a trend that’s likely to continue for the next decade.Asia, Europe likely to maintain dominance in EV production through 2030Source: Sources: IHS Markitt, Statista. Figures are forecasts as of September 2018.There are reasons to believe the U.S. and other markets could catch up faster than expected.Today, EVs are approaching a tipping point where they will become cheaper to buy than traditional cars even without government subsidies. “It’s undeniable that EVs are becoming more affordable and more popular,” says Wenjie Ge, an equity investment analyst who covers Asian automakers. “And the biggest driver of that change is rapidly falling battery costs.”Better, cheaper batteries supercharge EV adoptionToday EV’s typically run on a 40-60 kilowatt lithium-ion battery pack, which accounts for about a third of the vehicle cost. Electric cars become cheaper than conventional cars when the battery cost drops under US$100 per kilowatt hour (kWh). Over the last decade, the average price has fallen from US$917 per kWh to about US$137, according to a Bloomberg analysis.“In China — already a leader in battery production — battery costs for some vehicles have already reached the US$100 threshold, years ahead of previous estimates,” Ge says. “And they are expected to fall under US$60 by 2030.”As a result, EV makers have recently been introducing models with lower prices, better performance and longer range. Typically, EV batteries can provide 200 to 400 miles before needing to be recharged. Among the companies leading the charge for cheaper, better batteries are CATL in China, LG Chem and Samsung SDI in Korea, and Tesla in the U.S.Plunging battery costs will make EVs more affordableSource: Sources: Bloomberg New Energy Finance, Statista. 2023 and 2030 are forecasts as of December 2020.Lower cost of ownershipFor the consumer, it’s not just a lower sticker price that will make EVs more compelling. “You're thinking about what an EV can be from a total cost of ownership versus the internal combustion engine,” Murphy notes. For example, typical battery-powered cars will have far lower maintenance and running costs than cars that burn fossil fuels.Gasoline is an acidic, corrosive liquid that tends to wear down engines, so regular maintenance is required. The U.S. Department of Transportation has estimated that the average American driver spends about 12 cents a mile on gasoline and 9 cents (based on USD) on maintenance.“And electricity is generally cheaper than gasoline, so running costs are lower over the life of the car,” Ge adds.Rolling softwareAnother important innovation that will not only drive cost considerations, but also transform the total customer experience is the introduction of software-defined EVs. The software can receive over-the-air updates to improve functionality and safety while also providing entertainment.Of course, these over-the-air updates aren't going to solve all challenges associated with cars, but more innovative manufacturers will be able to make vehicles that can learn and improve, become safer and introduce more services over time, Murphy says.“With that approach, an EV maker can reverse some of the severe depreciation associated with older cars,” she notes.Murphy says she is seeking to identify the companies with the potential to not only make money selling the cars but also roll out subscription packages that include managing your battery, providing in-vehicle entertainment, improved safety and self-driving technology.“It’s important to identify who can build this out the fastest,” she says. “Another question I ask myself is how much better is this product going to be, through the software updates, in five years than it is today?”Just down the road: Driverless carsPerhaps the most important software update for some models will be the potential for autonomous driving. It seems like we’ve been hearing that driverless cars are only five years away for about 10 years, but as essayist and writer William Gibson once quipped, “The future is already here. It’s just not very evenly distributed.”Waymo, Google’s driverless car division, has been testing vehicles in the Phoenix area since early 2017. Cruise, its counterpart at General Motors, is testing fully driverless cars in San Francisco, while Chinese startup AutoX has deployed an autonomous fleet in Shenzhen without backup human drivers.“Over the next few years, they'll begin to launch in more markets, and investors will begin to understand this is a real business, not a science project,” says equity portfolio manager Chris Buchbinder. “By 2030, I believe we will havewidely deployed fleets of autonomous electric vehiclesoperating in most major and many secondary cities around the world. Many people will still have vehicles — just like people ride horses or bicycles for fun — but ownership of personal vehicles will go from being a necessity to a luxury.”Identifying winners and losersIndeed, advances in electric and driverless vehicles represent transformational change that is likely to redefine the industry in the coming years. Although EVs are on the threshold of profitability, some models will get there sooner than others. “As investors in companies, not industries, our job is to identify those likeliest to produce cars that can generate earnings over the long term,” Ge says.In 2020, the clear leader was Tesla, a pioneer in battery technology and vehicle software initiatives. Other front-runners included Volkswagen, which has invested heavily in EV production, and BYD in China. Going forward, those companies quick to embrace structural change and rapidly adapt have a better chance of success over the long term, whether they are auto industry titans or startups.Tesla and Volkswagen were the leaders in global EV sales in 2020Source: Statista. Includes all sales from 1/1/20 to 6/30/20.“There’s a widely held assumption that, with change this disruptive and with startups already competing for market share, it will be hard for incumbents to survive,” Murphy says. “Incumbent automakers must contend with writing off old manufacturing facilities, managing relationships with suppliers and shrinking profit margins. However, they also have vast resources and global manufacturing capabilities. Startups don’t have the associated cost burdens but could struggle to ramp up manufacturing.”But don’t count the incumbents out just yet. Look at GM, where CEO Mary Bara is disrupting the company from within. In addition to going all-electric by 2035, GM has been investing heavily in Cruise, its self-driving unit.“This is not an opportunity of the moment, but for incumbents and startups alike it has the potential to become a powerful software and intellectual property business model that has compelling economics to the consumer and to society in terms of safety,” Buchbinder says.Broader economic implicationsThe transformation of the global auto industry will have sweeping implications for other industries, including energy, utilities, manufacturing, mining and insurance, to name a few.“With wider adoption of electric vehicles, we could see peak oil consumption in a few years,” Ge says. Of course, much of the world’s electricity still comes from burning oil, coal and natural gas. What will be needed: more charging stations, more power generation and ultimately cleaner power generation. “In Germany, for example, half the electricity generated from the grid comes from renewable sources. In other countries it is 20%.”Over time, utilities will need to generate more electricity, eventually from a greater mix of clean sources. In other areas of the economy, demand could soar for raw materials like nickel, cobalt and lithium that are used in batteries.“This could have geopolitical implications as governments and companies compete for access to these materials,” adds Ge.Even insurance providers and media companies will be part of the story. “Electric vehicle makers aren’t just building infrastructure around share of miles. They are also looking to take share of wallet from insurance companies, utilities, media and more,” Murphy concludes.With massive disruption across this global industry, we’re likely to see extraordinary changes in the years ahead that will require professional investors like Murphy, Buchbinder and Ge to keep their eyes on the road. Buckle up for an electrifying ride.",Global Equities
In the money: Financial exchanges hit the sweet spot,2021-03-18T07:26:00,"Financial sector headlines are often dominated by banks and insurers. But there is one area that has emerged as a steady grower and dividend payer: financial exchanges. And it’s not just a U.S. phenomenon. In fact, some financial exchanges outside the U.S. are experiencing more rapid and sustained growth.Exchanges’ gains contrast against steep declines in the broader financials sector, where traditional banks in particular have grappled with ultra-low rates and a slowing global economy. Over the past several years, both U.S.- and non-U.S.-listed exchange operators have seen strong share price rises, including Nasdaq, the London Stock Exchange Group and Hong Kong Exchanges and Clearing.Exchanges offer a number of attractive characteristics for both growth- and income-oriented portfolios. These businesses typically have high barriers to entry, high margins, low capital spending needs and strong free cash flows. They have returned plenty of capital to shareholders, and shares of most companies provide some yield. And compared to banks, exchanges have required less operating capital and have provided greater returns on invested capital.Financial exchanges have outpaced the broader marketThree growth pillarsThe global exchange industry has undergone a major transformation over the past 20 years.Some exchanges went from being public utilities to publicly traded commercial enterprises. Trading shifted from crowded pits on exchange floors to high-speed online networks. Several rounds of consolidation swept the industry. There’s also been a data boom from algorithmic and quant trading. At the same time, the investing class has grown around the world, and exchanges have seen rising trading volume from both retail and institutional investors.Going forward, we believe three industry growth pillars are:1. TradingTrading is a high-margin business, with EBIT (earnings before interest and taxes) margins averaging 60% for the industry. Futures are the largest and most attractive asset class, while cash equities are mature with stable pricing. These high margins require low levels of capital and yield healthy amounts of free cash flow.In terms of trading, CME Group, parent of Chicago Mercantile Exchange, dominates futures trading for example and its shares have offered an attractive yield.The operator of the Hong Kong Stock Exchange, Hong Kong Exchanges and Clearing, is another example of a company that relies heavily on trading for its overall revenue. The exchange has played an important role in facilitating Chinese corporate access to foreign capital, and it’s not easy to replace it with the Shanghai or Shenzhen exchanges, making it unique among global exchanges and giving it a monopoly-like stature. Trading volumes are likely to increase through the addition of more Chinese technology companies such as recently listed Alibaba and Meituan Dianping, as well as a trading link that connects the Hong Kong Stock Exchange with institutional investors in mainland China.2. ServicesExchanges are not just trading venues ― they are Market Infrastructure Providers (MIP) that provide mission-critical services across the trading life cycle to buy-side and sell-side firms.The MIP industry, which includes data vendors, custodians, infrastructure and financial technology providers, has a revenue pool six to seven times larger than trading. There’s been strong organic growth fueled by demand for data, automation and outsourcing. And exchanges have been leveraging their dominant position in trading to expand to adjacent MIP industries.3. Mergers and acquisitionsExchanges are well-positioned to do M&A given their strong balance sheets, high free cash flow conversion rate and a monopoly position in their trading businesses.Mergers have transformed the global exchange space. All of the major exchange companies are the result of multiple mergers. Overall, the economic rationale for M&A is significant: an exchange can largely retain revenues and cut a third of the costs of the acquired business.There is a long runway for consolidation in the large and fragmented MIP industry, where companies provide an array of products and services including trading, clearing, custodian, indexing and data. Recent examples include the London Stock Exchange Group buying out data powerhouse Refinitiv; Deutsche Bourse buying Axioma, a deal creating a leading index business; and Nasdaq acquiring Verafin, a cloud-based platform to help detect and report money laundering and financial fraud.Fixed income is another area to watch. Electronic fixed income trading has lagged equity markets because of liquidity and structural differences, but electronification is inevitable due to clear cost efficiency and more transparency around pricing and liquidity. U.S.-based MarketAxess may find opportunities to build on its leadership position in this space.Industry revenue has been diversifying and less dependent on tradingValuations: Placing a premium on pivots and M&AAll exchanges are conglomerates with assets in trading, data and technology. We’ve found in our research that the business mix is a key determinant of valuation. In particular, exchanges that are well-positioned to pivot and have demonstrated a strong M&A track record deserve to trade at a premium valuation.Pivot premiumIn the exchange business, successful business transformations are more common than other sectors for two reasons: exchanges have strong cash flows to do strategic pivot acquisitions, and they are well-placed to leverage their dominant positions in capital markets to expand into adjacent industries such as data and software.London Stock Exchange Group (LSEG) is an example of a company that has significantly re-rated, recently trading at around 30 times forward earnings versus 10 times in 2008. Through a series of acquisitions over the past decade, LSEG has transformed from being a regional equities exchange to a global financial data provider with products that rival Bloomberg. Along those lines, data analytics is now LSEG’s primary revenue driver, with trading revenue accounting for approximately 42% of the company’s total revenue, down from 80% in 2008.M&A premiumM&A has been — and is expected to continue to be — a major driver of growth. The scalability of exchange business models encourages M&A, and deals in the sector have created a lot of value for shareholders. In our view, exchange groups with strong M&A track records deserve to trade at a premium. Nasdaq, Intercontinental Exchange (which bought the New York Stock Exchange) and London Stock Exchange Group have been those leading the consolidation charge.Financial exchanges: invest for yield or for growth?Traditionally, the large money centre banks were viewed as steady sources of dividend income. That changed with the financial crisis of 2008, and banks have never quite regained their status as steady yield providers. The ultra-low interest rate environment makes it even more challenging for banks to pay out dividends. Their dividends have even come under regulatory pressure. For instance, European governments that had backstopped bank balance sheets with large aid packages in 2020 had stipulated that dividends be halted; that restriction was recently lifted.The financial exchanges provide contrast to this. Trading volumes can spike in periods of rising markets and falling markets. Meanwhile, recurring revenues from ancillary services provide a cushion that can enable the exchanges to maintain or grow dividends.Organic growth rates for the industry could slow as the shift to electronic trading has largely been completed. That said, earnings quality is likely to improve as a result of more diversified revenue sources and reduced competition from further consolidation. Diversification and consistent free cash flow growth could provide a greater valuation premium. In Asia, exchanges are at the centre of public financial markets that are expanding, providing a tailwind of secular growth. As such, financial exchanges have found a place in both growth portfolios and income-oriented equity portfolios at Capital Group.",Global Equities
Is Big Tech in big trouble?,2021-03-09T05:43:00,"Is there such a thing as being too successful, too influential and just too big? We may find out in the months and years ahead as the world’s largest technology and consumer tech companies come under increasingly aggressive antitrust and regulatory scrutiny.Government efforts to rein in Big Tech have been underway for years, but 2021 is likely to be a watershed moment due to a number of growing pressures. Political, societal and market-based forces are combining to put these companies — Alphabet, Amazon, Apple, Facebook, Microsoft and others — under the microscope.“The sheer size of these companies means they're going to get a lot of scrutiny from every part of society, including government and regulatory agencies,” explains Mark Casey, a Capital Group portfolio manager who has covered the tech industry for more than 20 years.The rise of Big Tech: FAANG stocks have dramatically outpaced the S&P 500 Index“Some of these companies have also played key roles in the past two U.S. presidential elections,” says Casey. “When you bring politics into the mix, that helps explain why these regulatory discussions are very prominent right now.”In addition, the COVID-19 pandemic has accelerated the growth of many tech companies, increasing their power and influence during a severe global economic downturn. Of the top 10 U.S. companies by market capitalization, five are technology or digital businesses and their total market value exceeds USD$7 trillion — a figure that has grown by 54% over the past year alone.Landmark litigation is underwayWith that territory comes major league antitrust and regulatory risk:In October 2020, the U.S. Department of Justice filed an antitrust lawsuit against Google, alleging the internet search giant stifles competition. It’s the biggest antitrust case since the government targeted Microsoft in 1998.In December 2020, the Federal Trade Commission sued Facebook on similar claims that the social media network engaged in anticompetitive practices with its acquisitions of Instagram and WhatsApp.Many U.S. states have joined these two landmark legal actions while, at the same time, countless legislative efforts are underway at the state and federal levels.A bill introduced in the U.S. Senate in early February 2021 could make it more difficult for large companies to acquire competitors. In Florida, state lawmakers are considering legislation that would fine social media companies for de-platforming political candidates.“Part of what makes this so complicated,” Casey notes, “is that Democrats have a whole set of issues with these companies — largely based on antitrust, privacy and hate speech concerns — while Republicans have another set of issues, particularly when it comes to the perceived censorship of conservative viewpoints. So there’s really no easy scenario where these companies can just make a few changes and everybody’s happy.”Another element accelerating the regulatory push is the recent episode involving a group of retail investors who organized themselves on an internet chat board to drive up the stock prices of GameStop, AMC Entertainment and other struggling companies. When brokerage firms and trading apps imposed trading limits, some of those retail investors lost big. In a rare bipartisan move, Republicans and Democrats have called for Congressional hearings, which are expected to begin this month.European influenceU.S. politicians and regulators seeking to limit the power of Big Tech can look to Europe for inspiration. European authorities have been far more aggressive in their regulatory efforts, including the threat of huge fines for violating data protection rules and engaging in anticompetitive behaviour.The European Union was the first to enact major online privacy laws in the form of the General Data Protection Regulation, adopted in 2018. EU officials have since followed that up with a series of proposed regulations designed to block certain acquisitions, curb hate speech and provide more information to consumers about how their data may be used for targeted advertising.“Many of these provisions are already being implemented by U.S.-based internet platforms because of the European regulations,” says Brad Barrett, a Capital Group analyst who covers ad supported internet companies. “Europe doesn’t have many of its own national champions in the social media industry, so it’s perhaps easier for the EU to be more aggressive in this area and for the U.S. to follow when it makes sense.”So far, Barrett notes, the EU rules haven’t had a major impact on technology companies from a profit or revenue perspective.FAANGs have proven to be unique while revolutionizing different industriesRegulators face uphill battleAssessing the regulatory risks of large tech companies is a complex task, Barrett explains, given that they operate in different industries with vastly different competitive profiles — everything from retail to advertising to television. That said, in his assessment, the antitrust cases against Google and Facebook aren’t strong and likely won’t result in any forced breakups.The government is facing “an uphill battle” to win these cases, Barrett says, evidenced by the fact that some members of Congress are pushing hard for changes in antitrust law.“That by itself is an admission that it’s difficult to find antitrust violations based on case law going back 20 to 30 years,” he adds.Not to mention that many of the products provided by Google and Facebook are free, diminishing traditional antitrust arguments that rely on pricing power to help determine monopoly status.Is regulatory risk already priced in?How should investors evaluate the outlook for Big Tech, given the potential for some sort of government intervention in the years ahead? One important question to ask is: Do company valuations reflect the risk? In other words, are they “priced in” to the stocks?Looking at the FAANG stocks as a bellwether for regulatory risk, the two companies that are currently at the centre of high-profile lawsuits — Facebook and Alphabet — are trading at significantly lower price-to-earnings ratios than, for example, Amazon and Netflix. In fact, Facebook is trading just above the average P/E for the Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index despite its rapid growth rate and strong free cash flow.Valuations for some Big Tech companies don’t look excessiveLast week, Facebook reported a fourth-quarter profit of USD$11.2 billion, a 52% increase from the same period a year ago. Alphabet, which trades at a slightly higher P/E than Facebook, reported a quarterly profit of USD$15.7 billion, up 40% from a year ago.“These companies operate in large and growing markets, they have long revenue runways and they are very profitable,” explains Capital Group investment analyst Tracy Li, who covers internet companies. “If the regulatory risks were not present, in my view, they would be trading at higher multiples.”Unlike the dot-com bubble, tech company profits are more in line with pricesBreakup risk: The parts may be greater than the wholeIn the unlikely event that one or more of these companies is forced to break up, a reasonable argument could be made that some of the spinoffs could be worth more on their own, Li notes. Indeed, sometimes the parts can be worth more than the whole.WhatsApp, for instance, which was acquired by Facebook in 2014, currently does not make money. But as a stand-alone company, it would likely command a high valuation due to its user base of more than 2 billion people in 180 countries and the opportunity to monetize the service in the future. The same could be said for Instagram and Facebook Messenger.“The fact that all of these businesses are under one umbrella does tend to obscure the value of each business,” Li says. “As we’ve seen with past antitrust cases, such as the breakup of AT&T or Standard Oil, the results can be quite favourable to shareholders over the long run.”",U.S. Equities
Finding dividends where no one else is looking,2021-01-20T09:43:00,"For advisor use only. Not for use with investors.Hilda Applbaum, portfolio manager of the Capital Group Global Balanced FundTM(Canada), discuses “turning over rocks” to find dividend-paying companies.VIEW TRANSCRIPTHilda Applbaum: I tend to find the greatest opportunity where no one else is looking. The first question I always ask myself is what rock has not been turned over very recently? We're 10 years into a one-way market where momentum and growth stocks, low-yielding stocks and particularly U.S. stocks have out-returned non-U.S. stocks, higher dividend-yielding companies that one would call more value-oriented. So that's really been my hunting ground. And you know, I've been asked the question a lot: Well, maybe this is a paradigm shift, maybe this is forever after — growth is so scarce that it will always be accorded this higher multiple on a going-forward basis.And I'd like to remind people, and maybe to your point about having a mix of portfolio managers and analysts, the nice thing about Capital is we have such longevity in this business where I'm not even amongst the PMs with the longest, you know, experience set. There are people with years more experience than my own. But having seen various markets, I like to remind people that we have a 13-year period beginning in 1973 where value outperformed growth.And then we had a six-year period leading up to the tech telecom bubble crash, where growth materially outperformed value. And then the market crash — to our earlier question — and again, value and high dividend-yielding stocks outperformed. So I'd say I'm seeing opportunities where others aren't looking. And I won't tell you that that will turn on a dime and tomorrow all of a sudden value in high-yielding stocks are going to outperform, but I would say, over the course of the next three to five years, I have a great deal of confidence that that will provide the greatest area of outperformance.And then we always take advantage of the opportunities that the market gives us. So we had a five week period beginning in the middle of February ending the end of March, where both the U.S. and non-U.S. markets pulled back about 34%. And the market just handed over some beautiful opportunities where you got the trifecta of high-quality companies that all of a sudden pay generous dividends and lower valuations and they had been trading at three years.So if you take the likes of Honeywell or Norfolk Southern, which typically are not considered high dividend-paying stocks, all of a sudden those became eligible for some of our higher yielding funds. And I mentioned earlier that if you were in the leisure or entertainment space, it's not surprising that you have to eliminate or temporarily suspend your dividend.But again, bottom up, you know, we were meeting with, let's say, in the case of Darden, we were meeting with them regularly. And they were heartbroken that they had to suspend their dividend. They were on a trajectory of slow, steady increases to their dividends that they were really proud of. And they set out a path early on as to how and when they were going to return to being a dividend-paying stock, and what that trajectory would look like. And this morning as they announced their earnings, they also announced that they would begin paying a dividend again. Not in the full size that they were able to pay pre-COVID, but they’re going to, you know, start with a smaller dividend, and explained specifically how they were going to and what milestones would need to be met for them to continue to grow it.",Dividends
Brexit deal builds new barriers to U.K.-EU trade,2021-01-11T01:44:00,"Four and a half years after British voters narrowly backed a departure from the European Union, the two sides reached a trade agreement just days before the U.K.’s withdrawal from the EU’s single market and customs union on December 31, 2020. The deal avoids punishing tariffs and quotas on goods, but it still represents a significant rupture in the U.K-EU economic relationship.One of the most immediate effects will be new trade friction as border checks and customs declarations are introduced on January 1. The U.K. has said it will phase in border checks over the first six months of 2021, while the EU plans to impose full checks in January. These hurdles will cost U.K. companies an estimated £7 billion (USD$9.4 billion) a year. In the short term, the U.K. may struggle to avoid logjams at key border crossings, while many businesses remain unprepared for the red tape.This friction could depress U.K.-EU trade by around a third and reduce U.K. gross domestic product by about 5% to 7% over 10 to 15 years, relative to what it would have been had the country remained in the European Union, according to U.K. government estimates. The EU also faces an economic hit, especially in countries with deep trade ties to the U.K. Ireland, France, Germany, Italy, Spain, the Netherlands and Denmark are all likely to see a negative impact on their trade with the U.K.Deal will increase regulationThe free trade agreement is one of the most extensive that the EU has signed with a major trading partner. It avoids tariffs and quotas for all goods and aims to limit the regulatory burden in some key sectors, such as chemicals.Still, the U.K. will face significantly higher regulation overall. Goods will be subject to rules of origin, which specify the extent to which inputs from another country can be embedded in U.K. products exported to the EU. This will be particularly important for cars and manufactured food and beverages.The agreement only partially covers services, such as transportation, with little regarding financial and professional services. The EU has said it will consider equivalence for these sectors, which would allow more access to the single market. However, this is much less favourable than “passporting” rights, which allow financial services companies with regulatory authorization in one EU country to conduct business freely throughout the bloc.U.K. enjoys a trade surplus in servicesAfter Brexit, a chance to rebalance the U.K. economyThe U.K.’s departure from the EU could lead to a longer term restructuring and rebalancing of the U.K. economy, with less reliance on the financial sector, housing and consumer spending. The government is anxious to start its “levelling up” agenda by developing the industrial north. That, along with new investments in technology, pharmaceutical research and environmental remediation, could help offset the impact of Brexit. However, the government’s deteriorating fiscal position may compromise its ability to support this rebalancing. Britain is already running a large budget deficit as a result of the coronavirus pandemic, and the economy is likely to need more support as it adjusts to the new trade relationship with the EU. The government’s debt-to-GDP ratio may rise sharply over the next five to 10 years as the economy adapts to a lower growth rate.Over time, the U.K. could benefit from deeper ties with its global trading partners including China, India and the U.S., reducing its reliance on EU trade. However, countries that are geographically close and of similar income levels tend to trade more with each other. For instance, the U.K. currently conducts about three times the amount of trade with the Republic of Ireland, an island nation of about 5 million people, as it does with India, a nation of 1.4 billion that was once part of the British Empire. Any increase in U.K. trade with countries outside the EU is likely to be modest in comparison with the loss of trade with the EU.U.K. stocks and currency may see short-term strengthThe agreement should be a short-term positive for the British pound sterling and domestically exposed U.K. stocks, while exerting upward pressure on bond yields. Over the longer term, however, slower economic growth and any rebalancing are likely to weigh on U.K. stocks. Although many of the largest U.K.-based public companies are multinationals with limited exposure to the domestic economy, companies that derive more of their revenue in the U.K., such as retailers, banks, homebuilders and utilities, and those with significant export markets in the EU, are likely to be more exposed.At a sector level, agriculture and automotive manufacturing were among the most vulnerable to a no-deal Brexit. About three-quarters of the U.K.’s agricultural imports come from the EU. As a result, new tariffs would have imparted a significant shock to U.K. food prices, which the government wanted to avoid considering the economic distress already wrought by the coronavirus pandemic. Even with a deal, some food price inflation is expected owing to health certifications and other border costs that will affect imports of food, as well as agricultural inputs such as animal feed. That may benefit discount food retailers as price-sensitive consumers seek to manage their food expenditures.In autos, the U.K. is an important assembly hub for companies including Nissan, Honda and BMW, which sell finished vehicles into the EU market. The U.K. sent 51% of its vehicle exports to the EU in 2019, while the EU accounted for 81% of vehicles imported by the U.K. A no-deal Brexit would have placed significant stress on these supply chains, potentially leading some companies to relocate U.K.-based operations to the EU. While the deal avoids that scenario, automakers will have to abide by rules of origin requirements to maintain tariff-free access to the EU market.Goods trade outweighs servicesLandmark deal marks the end of the beginning of Brexit talksPolitical pragmatism always argued for a deal, allowing U.K. Prime Minister Boris Johnson to assert that he delivered on his promise to “get Brexit done.” Amid the backlash against the government’s handling of COVID-19, the last thing it needed was a hard landing on Brexit. This would have looked like a failure of government — a gift to the opposition Labour Party ahead of local elections next year and a boon for the Scottish National Party, which backs independence for Scotland.That said, the Christmas Eve deal did not mark the end of the Brexit process, but rather a milestone in a perpetual negotiation of the bilateral relationship. The current Conservative government has suggested it will try to exploit the potential for divergence from EU rules, although this could cause more tension with the EU, which insisted on a “level playing field” and an appropriate governance structure to handle disputes. A future Labour government may try to improve upon market access to the bloc.Either way, the U.K. and EU will continue to engage on issues that the deal left unaddressed, as well as disputes that are likely to emerge. The experience of other non-EU countries, such as Norway and Switzerland, suggests the relationship with the EU may remain challenging. Indeed, the deal sets up more than 30 new bilateral committees to manage the U.K.-EU relationship.Future U.K. governments will continue to wrestle with the question that has dominated the country’s relationship with the EU for decades: How much sovereignty is it willing to trade for access to the European single market? That was not resolved by the latest agreement. Thus, we may be living with Brexit uncertainty and a fractious U.K.-EU relationship for years to come.",Brexit
5 technology trends to watch in a post-COVID world,2020-11-30T11:28:00,"1) Subscription model is becoming the norm as cloud computing spreadsCloud computing has become increasingly widespread in recent years. One of the byproducts of the shift to the cloud is that software has matured from a one-size-fits-all product released in cycles, into a cloud-based, customized, continuously evolving set of solutions that companies monetize through subscription-based models. That has allowed developers to design products that are a better fit for clients, build a stable subscriber base, and increase efficiency and productivity. For the software providers, this translates into a recurring revenue stream that is more stable than the lumpiness of capital expenditure cycles that happened every few years.The fastest growing form of cloud computing is Infrastructure as a Service (IaaS), which refers to cloud-based resources that help establishments build and manage servers, networks, operating systems and data storage. The popularity of IaaS stems from organizations’ ability to administer their software requirements and infrastructure as they expand. Better yet, it allows companies to manage their hardware needs without hosting any of the infrastructure. The largest providers of cloud computing — Amazon’s Amazon Web Services (AWS), Microsoft’s Azure, and Google’s Cloud Platform — are well-known. Cloud computing was not the core business of any of these three firms, but their growth in this area has been hugely accretive to their stock price and is likely to remain a growth driver.The other rapidly growing area is Software as a Service (SaaS). SaaS denotes cloud-based software that is hosted online by a software provider, is available for purchase via a subscription-based model and delivered through the internet. SaaS is the most common cloud service and is often accessible through convenient online platforms that allow employees and companies easy access to productivity-enhancing tools.Meanwhile, Adobe, an industry leader in digital marketing solutions through its Creative Cloud, is another interesting case study on the evolution of Software as a Service. The company was able to reduce the cyclicality of its revenues (previously tied to volatile marketing budgets) by adopting a subscription/cloud model for its creative software services such as Photoshop and Illustrator. And what Adobe is for creative, Autodesk is for architecture, construction and industrial design firms. Autodesk’s transition to a subscription model could benefit the firm in the long term, as it continues to provide software solutions for the industries it serves.In the human resources and payroll space, Workday is changing how HR and human capital are managed within an enterprise through cloud-based software solutions for finances, payroll, time management and recruiting. Companies like RingCentral provide cloud-based communication services, allowing enterprises to move all their voice and video interactions onto one digital platform.Fintech and e-commerce are other areas ripe for cloud computing — a trend that has benefited Shopify. The company provides tools to create e-commerce stores with services for everything from website design, marketing and shipping, as well as payment processing and merchant solutions. This allows even the smallest of sellers to move their businesses online and possibly thrive in the era of physical distancing.2) Digitization of entertainment: Streaming and gaming lead the wayOnline entertainment, demand for which accelerated amid the global COVID-19 lockdowns, is expected to remain high as viewer habits become more permanent. Netflix added more than 26 million new subscribers in the first half of 2020, bringing the global total to over 193 million. The firm also spent more than US$15 billion on content in 2019, placing it third among studios/streaming providers. A projected growth rate of more than 10% in spending in 2020 (likely delayed due to COVID-19) means that the company may grow its lead over many streaming and traditional rivals in terms of original content.The adoption of online gaming also quickened during the lockdowns. Video game companies benefited from accelerated demand similar to what is usually seen during the holidays. Twitch, Amazon’s e-game livestreaming platform, saw 100% year-on-year growth in hours watched in April, to 1.65 billion. That compares favourably to the 2018 NFL season monthly average of 1.6 billion hours watched. Twitch also reached a record number of concurrent viewers (4.3 million).This strong performance was shared across other gaming platforms. China’s Tencent — the world’s largest gaming company by revenue — reached record daily spending and daily active users (DAU) for its games Honor of Kings and Peacekeeper Elite (approximately 200 million DAU combined) during Chinese New Year. Nintendo saw record Switch console sales in March, while Steam marked a record number of concurrent players (24 million).Looking at China as a guide to future trends, daily users specific to Tencent declined as people returned to work. Interestingly, however, time spent on gaming has remained higher than levels seen before COVID-19 struck. People who became more financially and emotionally invested in their gaming during the pandemic-related lockdown have continued playing even as physically experiential activities opened back up. There’s also a social element to the games, particularly on mobile devices, that has added to their lasting attractiveness — in and beyond the lockdown period.Gaming remains one of the least expensive forms of consumer entertainment, with significant potential to capture a greater share of discretionary spending. Moreover, several analysts anticipate that the shift to digital entertainment may improve content holder profitability. However, cloud gaming — which provides access to any game, anywhere, on any device — has emerged as the next major platform in video games, and we continually assess which firms might be the beneficiaries of this shift.3) Social distancing is accelerating the embrace of new technologies in service industriesSocial distancing is accelerating the adoption of new technologies, especially in the service industries. Those that were early adopters have been better positioned to weather the periods of lockdown that began in March. A good example is tech-savvy Domino’s Pizza. It was an early adopter of digitization technologies such as app-based ordering, online tracking, user profiles and voice ordering. The pizza maker’s digital business has grown rapidly and now accounts for about 65% of its orders. The system has been attracting new users that the company can convert into loyalty members. Even traditional fast food companies such as McDonald’s are using delivery platforms such as UberEats and transitioning to an at-home delivery model in addition to their traditional drive-through and restaurant services.Similarly, in grocery, a nearly US$700 billion-a-year industry in the United States, technology and e-commerce companies are changing the landscape through innovative product and service offerings. With Amazon’s purchase of Whole Foods in 2017 and subsequent expansion of grocery delivery to its massive installed base of more than 110 million U.S. Prime members, the e-commerce giant was better positioned for the surge in online grocery demand brought about by the pandemic. Amazon’s online grocery sales in the second quarter of 2020 tripled year over year. While the accelerated pace of the change is largely due to social distancing measures imposed in many cities and states earlier this year, the shift remains a positive trend for what has been one of the most stubbornly brick-and-mortar industries.Britain’s Ocado also exemplifies innovation in the grocery industry. Originally an online grocery delivery service, Ocado has expanded its expertise in online retail software, robotics, and warehouse management to global partnerships expanding the online and delivery presence for some of the largest global retailers. This involves building specialized customer fulfillment centres based on the company’s automated technology for partners including Kroger in the U.S., Casino in France, and Aeon in Japan, among others. Having invested in technology over the past few years, Ocado was poised to benefit as consumers sped up their adoption of online grocery shopping. The company posted a 40% increase in sales year over year as of the end of May. It also has a waiting list of customers for service in its U.K. home market.4) Low-tech industries are also expanding the use of new technologiesA good example of the expansion of technology in a traditionally low-tech industry is waste management. Route optimization software, automated trucks and robotics are being increasingly used to obtain greater operating and capital efficiencies. The waste industry was historically very low-tech — all you needed was a driver and a truck. Paper maps with routes drawn over them were commonly used. But in the last few years, technology has driven meaningful changes to firms’ operating models — lowering costs and increasing customer touchpoints as well as retaining and capturing incremental revenue.Some examples of this technology implementation include:Route optimization software: The first order impact is fleet, fuel and driver efficiency. Paired with an onboard camera, it has driven more powerful improvements to the business model: driver accountability, providing time stamps and photos to refute erroneous missed pickup claims, and more efficient swapping of relief drivers.Customer engagement tools and/or apps: By upgrading communication with customers and providing them with seamless billing, the waste sector has improved retention rates, reduced the need for call centres, and created an easier buying experience (similar to changes implemented by the airlines).5) Automation of factories and supply chains is on the riseChina has long been the predominant manufacturing base for the global economy. However, the combination of rising labour costs over the past decade, trade tensions with the U.S. and heightened travel restrictions due to the pandemic has led some multinationals to examine their supply chain concentration and seek ways to diversify.As companies build new factories and upgrade existing ones, automation is likely to gain momentum. Japanese automation companies such as Keyence and SMC could be key beneficiaries of this trend, as both have global footprints, strong industry positions and plenty of cash on their balance sheets to help weather a prolonged downturn. Additionally, Keyence has diverse product offerings from sensors, to machine vision, to 3D printing, all of which may help power automation across many different industries. SMC’s global footprint could be an advantage as its customers look to build new factories to diversify their supply chains.ConclusionOn a long-term basis, COVID-19 has widened the moat for many market leaders with scale, incumbent relationships and strong digital capabilities. But smaller specialized players (such as Zoom and Shopify) have gained prominence as demand for their services has increased. While the spread of COVID-19 has resulted in many companies putting the brakes on IT spending, it has also created a longer-term imperative for enterprises to accelerate their digital transformation efforts.These transformations are occurring both inside and outside the technology sector. The key trends that we expect to gain momentum even as we return to a more normal post-COVID world are: 1. The shift to cloud computing; 2. The digitization of entertainment and the expansion of online gaming; 3. Adoption of new technologies in service industries; 4. Low-tech industries turning to technology solutions for logistics; and 5. the automation of factories as manufacturing diversifies outside of China.",Technology & Innovation
How multinationals are faring in the COVID era,2020-11-20T11:46:00,"As a global equity manager at Capital Group, Jody Jonsson has witnessed the path of globalization while living and working in Geneva, San Francisco, Los Angeles and London. She’s seen a lot in 30-plus years on the job, but never one quite like 2020.Jonsson seeks out growth-oriented multinational companies that are benefiting from evolving global trade patterns. That may seem like a daunting task at a time when pandemic-induced lockdowns have brought the global economy to a near standstill.How are multinationals navigating such a tumultuous economic, market and trade environment? Jonsson shares her view in the following Q&A:Are you able to find compelling investment opportunities amid the unprecedented trade disruption we’ve seen this year?Absolutely. The key is to remember that global trade doesn’t just involve physical goods moving from one place to another. Today, cross-border trade increasingly takes place online through digital transactions and services that are, in many cases, not subject to border restrictions and not hindered by transportation challenges. I look for well-managed multinational companies that can benefit from changing patterns in world trade, not simply the growth of world trade.Data traffic is rapidly rising as digital trade growsIn the COVID era, a wide gap has emerged between companies with well-developed global e-commerce capabilities and those without the ability to rapidly conduct business online. While 2020 has certainly been the most difficult year I’ve ever seen in my investment career, it has also been one of the best years ever for large multinationals with efficient digital business models. In many cases, their growth has accelerated during the downturn.Amazon, Alphabet, Facebook and Netflix are the names most people think about as the digital leaders, but there are also online payment processors, cloud-computing providers such as Microsoft and chipmakers such as Taiwan Semiconductor that have shown incredible resilience during a time of extreme market and economic volatility. In particular, I think digital payment processors represent an exciting opportunity because we’ve seen a sharp increase in “contactless” transactions.“A decade from now, I think digital payments will be the norm and people will give you odd looks if you try to pay with cash.”Once this crisis is over, I think a lot more people will be comfortable making digital payments and they probably won’t feel the need to use cash as much as they did before. A decade from now, I think digital payments will be the norm and people will give you odd looks if you try to pay with cash.What is it about multinationals that makes them so resilient during uncertain times?A while back we published apublished a paperarguing that multinationals are often times best positioned to deal with severe economic downturns. In my view, that’s because — generally speaking — they are run by smart, tough, experienced managers who have navigated all types of trade environments, favourable and unfavourable.For the most part, these are large, well-capitalized, battle-tested companies that can find a path to success, regardless of the headwinds. There’s a reason that multinationals have come to dominate the world economy. Strong global companies, in my view, will emerge from the pandemic even stronger than before. They are simply better able to weather the storm. Nothing we’ve seen in the COVID era has changed my view on that.What other interesting investment themes have emerged during the pandemic?Health careis obviously an area that is getting a lot of attention. All eyes are on the drug companies working to develop a COVID vaccine. But what I find even more interesting are companies that provide medical equipment and supplies, such as industry leader Thermo Fisher. We may not know which drugmaker is going to be the first to develop a safe and effective vaccine, but we do know they will need to buy the specialized equipment and supplies provided by these lesser known companies in the health care sector.In the traditional retail sector, which has been hard hit over the past seven months, there is ample evidence that strong companies are getting stronger. I would point to Costco and Home Depot as examples. Retailers deemed “essential” and with the ability to meet skyrocketing demand have been able to increase market share. The longer the lockdowns continue, the more people get used to shopping at these places and likely will continue to do so when the economy fully reopens. Nike is another company that has done well by aggressively shifting more sales online. In essence, the COVID crisis has reinforced the strength of good business models.Are all the best multinationals in the United States?The U.S. certainly has a large number of them, but investors who focus solely on the U.S. would be doing themselves a disservice. European equities, for instance, may have lagged U.S. markets on an index basis, but there are specific companies outside the U.S. that are world-class leaders. Nestlé, for instance — the world’s largest food company. And LVMH — the world’s largest luxury goods company. I don’t think about multinationals as U.S. companies, or French companies, or British companies, I think of them as global companies within a global opportunity set.In emerging markets, it is much the same. Yes, there are fewer large multinationals, but their numbers and influence are growing. Over the past three decades, Taiwan Semiconductor has become the largest chip foundry in the world with an impressive list of customers, including Apple, Sony and Qualcomm. Many other countries, such as China, India and Brazil, are nurturing their own multinational giants that are providing serious competition for their U.S. and European counterparts.A new breed of multinational companies has arrivedWith trade wars, the spread of populist politics and concerns about the virus, do you think the process of globalization may be reversing?I don’t see it as a reversal, I see it as multinational companies adapting to a changing trade environment. In my view, companies will remain global in their production facilities and their customer bases, but they will increasingly build more local redundancy into their operations. I call it “multilocalization.” That includes bringing some parts of the supply chain back to the U.S., continuing to outsource other parts and establishing new production facilities in key areas around the world. This is another lesson we’ve learned from the COVID crisis — it’s critically important to have diversified supply chains.Investors are adapting to changing patterns in world tradeWhat’s your outlook for global equities in 2021 and beyond?We’re long-term investors at Capital Group, so I try not to think about my outlook in terms of one or two years. That said, I think 2021 is likely to be a difficult transition period as the major economies of the world attempt to fully reopen while keeping the virus under control. As our in-house economists say,“the virus is the economy,”and until we get a vaccine, the path to recovery remains highly uncertain. We also have a pivotal U.S. election that mayadd to the uncertaintyif the result remains unknown far beyond election night, as some political observers are predicting.From an investment point of view, events such as these have little to no impact on my portfolio positioning. I’m looking for companies with potentially long growth runways and the ability to increase market share regardless of changes in the macroeconomic or political environment. The types of companies I favour are generally not that sensitive to near-term events, so I don’t spend a lot of my time worrying about the latest headlines. In fact, I think paying too much attention to that can be detrimental to successful, long-term investing.Ten years down the road, how do you think some of your major investment themes will play out?Cloud computing is radically changing the way we do business and, 10 years from now, I think that will manifest itself in ways that we can’t yet imagine. I think health care will be far more personalized than it is today as we learn to pinpoint specific diseases, predict and even prevent them. I think we will all be commuting to work in autonomous cars — if we drive to work at all. I think many more of us will be working from home, perhaps even a majority of us. And I think it’s highly likely that most of us won’t have any “real” offices anymore, except the ones we’ve built at home.",Global Equities
The necessity of luxury: What makes this industry so resilient?,2020-11-19T08:24:00,"The personal luxury segment probably doesn’t come to mind when one thinks of resilient areas of the equity market. The industry has unquestionably faced significant near-term challenges amid the global pandemic. But the picture looks brighter for stronger brands. For example, when Hermès reopened its Guangzhou store in China this past April after months of lockdown, first-day sales hit a record high of US$2.7 million.There is also room for optimism more generally, as structural growth in the luxury industry has tended to offset bouts of setbacks and the associated re-rating of stocks. We explore seven themes that may help indicate how the industry will emerge from the economic downturn.1. Luxury has outpaced the broader marketAs economies around the world have become more consumption driven, personal spending has grown to be a greater portion of global GDP. The luxury goods segment, which represents a small subset of discretionary spending, has witnessed outsized growth relative to other consumer-related segments.The personal luxury goods market has grown at over 1.3 times the rate of global GDP since 19961and in that span, luxury goods stocks have produced attractive long-term returns with few difficult periods. Since 2005, the S&P Global Luxury Index has delivered a greater total return than the MSCI World and S&P 500 indexes.S&P Global Luxury Index has outpaced S&P 500 and MSCI World2. Asian consumers underpin long-term growthGiven the discretionary nature of consumer spending, sales of luxury goods are viewed as cyclical. The evolution of awealthy class in Chinaand other Asian economies over the past three decades has provided the industry an underpinning of sustained and structural growth. In addition to dominating the market, Chinese customers have become highly knowledgeable about luxury products in this relatively brief time, through frequent purchases and consumption of social media.Chinese consumers increasingly dominate spending on personal luxury goodsOver the long term, the industry’s sustained growth has tended to offset cyclicality. For instance, LVMH Moët Hennessy Louis Vuitton has compounded earnings at a 12% compound annual growth rate (CAGR) for over a decade, with earnings more than tripling over this period. Growth has been the main driver of the stock price, eclipsing shorter term changes in valuation multiples.3. Rising wealth among women is boosting demandPersonal luxury, anchored around handbags, leather goods, apparel, accessories and jewelry, skews heavily female — and female wealth is growing. In 2019, women accounted for 45% of high net worth individuals, up from just 24% in 20082This trend may position personal luxury to take share from areas of the broader luxury environment — namely, luxury cars, which is almost twice as large a market. It could also help fuel the expansion of trusted brands to other luxury categories (e.g., LVMH’s acquisition of the Belmond hospitality and leisure company).4. Brand equity is a key driver of successWhy have some luxury companies consistently achieved 10%+ sales growth, while others haven’t recovered from the slowdown in 2015 when demand from China weakened? One key factor can be hard to find in financial statements: brand equity. Brand equity can be understood as consumers’ willingness, sustained over decades, to pay well in excess of production costs for branded goods. Management teams that maintain brand equity and are able to convert it to pricing power — manifested in higher margins and sales growth — are often the ones that achieve long-term success.But long-term success often means growing “the hard way,” not simply opening more stores. Growing through geographical expansion can be relatively easy, but it increases penetration without necessarily increasing desirability, thus impairing pricing power. Companies that go this route often delay the moment of reckoning while diluting their brand. By contrast, companies such as LVMH that take a more disciplined approach to store expansion force their brands to increase desirability and thus pricing power.Whether it’s Louis Vuitton bags, Ferrari sports cars, Rolex watches, Steinway pianos or Château Latour wines, consumers who own these products have a bond of trust with the brand not to debase itself by flooding the market. Cheapening these brands comes at a very high cost, as the owners of past production are often the most important customers.Two global conglomerates serve as illustrations of industry leaders that have built brand equity over decades:LVMH Moët Hennessy Louis Vuitton SELVMH is a manufacturer of luxury products that includes iconic brands such asLouis Vuitton, Hennessy, Dior, Bulgari and Sephora. The company can be viewed as a bellwether for the luxury industry, with most higher income consumers having a touchpoint to one or more of the brands. As one of the premier luxury operators in the world, LVMH has several structural advantages, including a successful track record of growing and acquiring brands, effective advertising, premium store locations, top industry talent and robust customer data. It has also benefited from strict pricing discipline. While the company has seen short-term negative effects from the COVID-19 fallout, over a longer term its brands could experience sustainable growth spurred by an expanding middle class.KeringKering is a manufacturer and marketer of luxury products that includes brands such as Gucci, Bottega Veneta, Brioni, Saint Laurent and Balenciaga. The company has faced strategic challenges in the past, but it has achieved considerable success with Gucci and Saint Laurent, among others, and strengthened its business model organically and through divestitures. Additionally, Kering brands have established a track record for delivering designer-driven fashion hits. China’s middle class has demonstrated a demand for luxury status products like those from Kering, with some consumers even collecting them. With China emerging from the COVID-19 pandemic earlier than other markets, and its government implementing policies to stimulate consumer demand and relax duty-free regulations, the company may be better positioned through this difficult period.5. Creativity contributes to the winner-take-all trendTo maintain steady revenues in a cyclical market, the best and biggest companies have supplemented high-end, extreme luxury items with mass-market goods. The reverse — making luxury out of previously non-luxury products — has also helped brands expand their margins. Examples are numerous, from Hermès horse bridles to luxury sneakers from Lanvin and Balenciaga. Brands also boost the bottom line by extending horizontally to new categories — for example, Burberry broadening to cosmetics and Gucci to housewares.Such creativity, differentiation and novelty can drive brand loyalty, which in turn has helped turn luxury goods into a winner-take-all industry. For example, the top 20% of fashion brands accounted for 177% of the industry’s profitability in 2018.The fashion industry is a winner-take-all marketFashion companies’ contribution to industry economic profit by ranked quintile (%)Notably, many categories of personal wares today remain mostly unbranded, providing room for growth. Only 6% of total jewelry sales are categorized as branded fine jewelry, for example.6. The pivot to digital platforms has acceleratedIn part because consumers are wary of purchasing expensive products without experiencing them in person, the luxury industry relies heavily on in-store shopping, with online sales representing only a small portion of business. Tourist flows account for a hefty 40% of global luxury purchases (S&P Global Market Intelligence, 2020). From this standpoint, the near-term impacts from COVID-19 amount to the perfect storm.But the new environment is forcing even the most traditional and conservative brands to turn to e-commerce. Swiss watchmaker Patek Philippe reportedly began selling its products online for the first time in its history. Brands that had already embraced digital are expanding their strategies, finding new ways to connect with customers and cultivate sales — from live chats on their websites to virtual fashion shows and product launches on Instagram or Facebook.The shift to digital might seem to favour smaller brands that have struggled to reach customers. However, the increased price transparency that digital brings may also cut the other way. Large, established brands are better able to protect pricing, and therefore brand value, through their control over retail. In contrast, smaller brands may be debased when their products are discounted by distressed wholesalers eager to offload inventory. Brands that never discount also hold more of their value in the resale market, and that feeds into consumers’ willingness to pay full price in the primary market.7. Demand may be delayed or displacedAs the industry adapts to new ways of doing business, can it rebound from the drop in demand? Our analysts are finding that a lot of the demand has simply been delayed or displaced across borders. For instance, in China, consumers who once went on shopping sprees in Paris or Milan are now hitting high-end shopping districts in Beijing or Shanghai. Conversely, due to travel restrictions, luxury brand operators will have to rely largely on local customers for their European stores.While 2020 may turn out to be a lost year for luxury earnings, it’s not a lost year for brand building and engaging with customers who are bored of social distancing, eager to return to spending and haven’t lost much, if any, of their spending power. Looking at cash flows beyond the next 12 months will thus be crucial.1Capital Group estimate, based on data from Altagamma and World Bank, as of September 2020.2Source: Capgemini Global HNW Insights Survey 2019. HNW defined as having investable assets of at least $1 million USD.",Retail
Promises kept: Reflections on the founding of our Global Equity mandate,2020-11-17T11:34:00,"Portfolio manager Carl Kawaja discusses the two core principles for creating our Global Equity strategy, and looks forward to the future with confidence.VIEW TRANSCRIPTCarl Kawaja:I was involved at the inception of the fund, and I think we had two core principles. One was we thought the Canadian investors would be well-served by having access to markets outside the United States. And I love Canada, but Google‘s in California, Taiwan Semiconductor is in Taipei, Alibaba is in China, you know the list goes on in terms of available opportunities. I think in order to succeed investing over the course of the next 15 or 20 years, and in order to succeed as we perceived it over the next 15 years, it made sense to diversify a little bit outside of Canada. And at the time, we believed that Canadian investors were too insular and typically too invested just in Canadian equities or Canadian bonds, and they needed to look outside the country for investment opportunities in order to do well.And the second proposition is that we believed that we would do a good job of providing Canadian investors with access to those markets, because we have a lot of experience investing globally and we‘ve done it for a long time and we thought we could provide that experience for the Canadian investors.There‘s a lot that makes me optimistic about the future. I generally am an optimist, and I believe very fervently that the world gets better. I think often we kind of, you know, you can watch TV at night and watch the nightly news and feel like the world‘s getting worse. There‘s global warming, and there are politicians who folks don‘t like, and there‘s terrorism and global pollution and all of these other things that are worrisome. But in lots of ways, the world gets better every day. There‘s been remarkable, incredible innovation in the world that I have seen in my 26 years of investing.I‘m a Canadian, as you know, so I‘m very grateful to have been involved with this fund, and with the work that we‘ve done in Canada, and we have tried hard to be of service to Canadian investors, and I can promise you that everyone here is completely dedicated to continuing to do so.",Global Equities
Glimpses of 2030: Health care innovation reaches warp speed,2020-10-21T05:49:00,"Star Trek, the classic sci-fi TV series, depicted a far-off future where space explorers traveled the galaxies equipped with cutting edge technology such as a communicator, food replicator and the indispensable tricorder, a hand-held medical device that could scan a person’s vital signs, issue a diagnosis and prescribe treatment in minutes.Equity portfolio manager Rich Wolf expects that within the next 10 years such devices will be a reality. “For years I’ve been around bioengineers who have joked about having a tricorder,” says Wolf, who also covers U.S. medical technology companies as an investment analyst. “While I don’t think there is going to be a single tricorder that does everything, I suspect that by 2030 many of us will have devices like it that will analyze blood, do cardiology monitoring and even remotely check our breathing while we sleep.”We are in the midst of a massive wave of innovation and disruption across the health care sector that has the potential to drive new opportunity for companies, reduce overall medical costs and, most importantly, improve outcomes for patients.“ There’s never been a more exciting time in health care, says Wolf. “The last time we were close was about 20 years ago when the human genome was first sequenced. That was an important first step. Today we are seeing major advances that have resulted from that first step.”The COVID-19 pandemic and race to develop a vaccine highlights the important role drugs can play in improving people’s health and longevity, but the wave of innovation reaches far beyond the pharmaceutical and biotech industries. Not only are we hearing news of new drug therapies seemingly every day, but leaps in research tools, diagnostics and remote patient monitoring are converging to change the face of health care.Wolf and equity portfolio manager Cheryl Frank recently sat down to share their perspective on the health care trends they expect will transform the investing landscape over the next 10 years.Beam me up, genomeWhen the human genome was first sequenced about two decades ago, it took a team of researchers nearly eight years at a cost of more than US$100 million. Today, a human genome can be sequenced in a matter of days for about US$1,000. Subsequent breakthroughs in DNA analysis have led to a new era in the medicine. ”Today we can compare the map of the human genome to mutations that exist as a function of cancer,” Wolf says. “We can then identify specific mutations in the cancer and match therapies to them. We can do a much better job of treating patients as a function of understanding that code.”Indeed, genomics research and therapies derived from genetic testing have the potential to extend lives and generate billions of dollars in revenue for the companies that develop them. U.S. drugmaker Merck, the maker of blockbuster immunotherapy treatment Keytruda, biopharma companies like Gilead Sciences and others have invested millions of dollars to develop gene-based treatments for various cancers, including bladder cancer and melanoma.Vastly reduced costs and scientific developments have contributed to phenomenal growth in medical science research and development (R&D). “We're in a renaissance period for R&D, and companies are investing aggressively to find unique ways to battle cancer and other illnesses,” Frank says. “We're seeing unprecedented rates in terms of progression-free survival for many types of cancer.”A convergence of technological advances across the globeDrugmakers are not the only companies that can potentially benefit from these advances. A broad range of companies like genetic testing equipment maker Illumina and research and manufacturing company Thermo Fisher Scientific are providing services to a host of drug developers.Broader advances in technology, like greater connectivity and artificial intelligence, are helping to turbocharge the development of therapies, says Frank. “I think many types of cancer will be effectively cured by 2030,” she says. “We're already using sophisticated tools that predict the behaviour of molecules and reduce the need to create as many molecules. And I think we'll use data more effectively in the future to identify which patients will most benefit from developed therapies.”The U.S. remains a world leader in innovation for a number of reasons, but clearly America will not be the only source of pharmaceutical innovation going forward, says Frank, who has covered the health care industry for 18 years.“I expect to see many global blockbuster drugs from China by 2030. I anticipate they will begin to produce novel drugs for cancer within five to 10 years and sell them at one-tenth the cost in the U.S.,” she says.Galactic leaps in diagnostics can lead to early detectionBreakthroughs in diagnostics are helping to lead to earlier detection of illnesses, which can help make drugs more effective — or in some cases prevent disease before it ever happens. “One of the most exciting things in health care today is something known as liquid biopsy, whereby a sample of your blood can be used to identify a tumor at the very earliest stages,” notes Wolf.A patient could visit their physician for a yearly checkup, have blood work done and find out whether they have any cancer. “Early detection is key to curing cancer,” he adds.But ongoing innovation in diagnostics isn’t confined to the hospital or doctor’s office. Home diagnostics — including continuous glucose monitors, insulin pumps, implantable EKG loop recorders and connected sleep apnea devices — are increasingly enabling physicians to monitor patients remotely.A broad range of traditional tech and medtech companies have been working to develop home diagnostics for some time. “In the last five years we've seen a big move among great tech minds combining their expertise with great health care minds, and this is very important,” Wolf says. We are still in the early stages of the development of cost-efficient devices that can collect all kinds of health-related metrics that can not only help coach us to improve our own health, but can also be sent immediately to your doctor.”COVID shines a spotlight on telemedicineTelemedicine, or patient-doctor consultations online rather than in person, has been available for some time, but until early this year its adoption rate had been quite low, but that changed when the COVID-19 pandemic struck. What’s more, regulators and health care providers relaxed their rules to allow more digitalization.Today, many consumers have had their first telehealth experience. Frank believes this is atrend that is likely to endure. “I believe the combination of telehealth, at-home diagnostics and medicine delivery will enable almost everything to become treatable from home,” Frank says. “Personal devices will use this data to help us improve our health.”As an example, Frank cites a colleague who became pregnant during the pandemic. She ordered a Doppler machine, measuring tape and a blood pressure cuff on the internet and had several prenatal appointments online.Patients are taking the driver’s seatPerhaps the biggest change will be patients taking greater control of their health care thanks to the combination of technologies, Wolf says. Health care costs have been soaring for years and are projected to rise. But the rise in telehealth and vast improvements in the quality of information available to patients could drive a shift in the nature of care.“We are near a tipping point in health care expenses as a function of GDP, but I think something has changed in a big way for not only the delivery of care but the bending of the cost curve,” Wolf says.Price discovery in the health care field has been poor. “If you ask the average person what they paid for their TV or car, they can tell you within a few dollars, but not so with their recent medical treatments,” Wolf says. Today, a company like GoodRx can notify a patient if a drug is cheaper across town than at the local drugstore [in the U.S.]. “The fact that patients are becoming much more engaged in health care is driving an incredible paradigm shift in the way health care is consumed and delivered.”Not all innovators make great investmentsTo be sure, not all innovators turn out to be great investments. The good news/bad news is that innovators come in all shapes and sizes. Both small, nimble companies and health care giants have the potential to be winners in the next generation of health care delivery. But there will also be some spectacular failures among companies both small and large. While innovation is a key element for the success of companies in such a dynamic field, strong management and strong capital allocation are also important.Identifying the winners of the next decade will require deep research and the ability to look beyond the near term. “At Capital Group, we have the luxury of focusing on the long term,” Wolf says. “Much of the focus today is on the pandemic and vaccine development. These are very important, but we are also looking over the horizon, trying to determine how health care will be transformed over the next decade and how we can invest in those shifts.”",Health Care
Lessons from 5 decades of investing,2020-09-24T04:15:00,"One of Claudia Huntington’s most successful investment decisions hinged on a single question. She was meeting with Lotus Development Corp., a pioneer of spreadsheet software, while the company was struggling through a challenging product cycle. The beleaguered CEO was facing heavy criticism and less than thrilled about meeting with her.“My initial meeting was hard to get, but I was finally granted 15 minutes,” Huntington recalls. “When I entered the room I could see he was tense, bracing for the inevitable questions about the coming quarter.”But that wasn’t her question. “I told him, ‘Let’s not talk about the next few quarters. Can you talk about your vision for where you plan to take this company over the next five years?’” The executive’s body language immediately relaxed, and the conversation ended up running two hours. “He opened up about the risks and opportunities the company faced, his long-term strategy and how he planned to execute on that strategy,” says Huntington, who liked what she heard and decided to invest.That proved to be a good decision because the company turned around and the stock outpaced Wall Street expectations.Of course not all her investments have worked out as well as Lotus, but Huntington believes her focus on long-term results, a trait she shares with her Capital Group colleagues, offers a clear advantage when evaluating companies and their leaders. “Quarterly results are important too but taking a longer view can lead to rich dialogue with company leaders,” she says. “Our best investment decisions are made when we are on the same wavelength as the CEO. We gain a deeper understanding of their talents and the likelihood that they can successfully navigate risks and execute their strategy.”Huntington, who began her investing career in 1973 — a period of rapidly rising inflation and volatile markets — has decided to retire in 2020. The portfolio manager recently sat down to share insights and lessons learned over nearly half a century as a professional investor.What are the most important lessons you’ve learned?I’ve learned that this business is more art than science. Early in my career I thought it was primarily about math and perfecting my model. Sure, you need math, but the more you invest, the more you realize it’s about making judgments — about people and about the future. There are no facts about the future, so you have to try to look around corners.Perhaps the most important lesson I’ve learned is that a company’s management is essential to its ultimate success or failure. If you have a great company run by a poor CEO, the odds of that company turning into a good investment are low. On the other hand, if you have a mediocre company in a mediocre industry with a superb CEO, then it is much more likely that company will turn out to be a good investment. So, being able to calibrate CEOs and management teams is an important skill to develop.Can you share some examples of CEOs you’ve encountered who were difference makers?A recent example is Satya Nadella, Microsoft’s chief executive. He was not an obvious choice to run the company when he succeeded Steve Ballmer in 2014, but he has excelled for a number of reasons. One thing Satya does at the end of every meeting, regardless of whom he is meeting with, is ask, “What do you think?” The fact that he wants to encourage participation, to hear other voices, is such a demonstrable, cultural advantage.One of the most effective CEOs I’ve ever encountered was Mark Donegan of Precision Castparts, a maker of specialty metals for the aerospace and defense industries. Donegan is a detail-oriented leader with a laser focus on productivity and a great allocator of capital. But what is most special about Donegan is the culture he has fostered at his company. He created a real sense among his employees of working together to do the right thing.I often ask executives to describe the culture of their company. Some have great answers; others look at you like you came from the moon. The best companies are often the ones with a very strong culture.Identifying a strong CEO is no guarantee of long-term investment success. Years ago, I invested in a company called Silicon Graphics largely because I believed the CEO was first-rate, and I had faith in his strategy for the company — a maker of specialized computer systems for graphic applications. We identified the opportunity early, and the company experienced strong growth. The investment was a good one — until it wasn’t.The CEO eventually got interested in politics and essentially assigned running the company to a subordinate who made a series of bad decisions. I had established such trust and faith in the CEO that I didn't look more closely when changes were made. That was an important lesson for me.How has culture shaped you as a portfolio manager?At Capital, we are encouraged to focus on long-term results. In fact, under The Capital SystemTM, compensation paid to our investment professionals is heavily influenced by results over one-, three-, five- and eight-year periods. Increasing weight is placed on each successive measurement period to encourage a long-term investment approach. Our culture is also designed to encourage what I call the lonely idea. By definition, good investments are not something everyone knows about. It takes a great deal of courage to identify an opportunity early on that has the potential to be a great investment.One example of a lonely idea is Precision Castparts. On paper this company was not that interesting. It was in the industrials space, with a concentrated number of clients and limited supply sources, so there were risks. When I traveled to Portland to meet with CEO Mark Donegan, I found the headquarters on the third floor of a small unmarked industrial building next to a gravel parking lot down a dirt road. Clearly this was a cost-conscious company. I found it to be to be well-managed and operationally focused.When I presented this unlikely investment idea to our investment group, I was challenged by my colleagues. They were polite and respectful, but skeptical. “Why would you want to invest in a specialty metals company in this stage of the cycle?” But the beauty of The Capital System, is that I could act on my conviction to invest, and by doing so I convinced some colleagues to invest with me. Our system allows that bright spark of the lonely idea to shine through — rather than being dimmed by consensus.You began your career in a tumultuous time for markets and have seen your share of downturns. What advice do you give younger colleagues?I started my investing career near the beginning of one of the worst bear markets since World War II. My first job was at another asset manager that had three rounds of layoffs in my first six months. Capital ended up acquiring the firm’s assets, which is how I came here. This early experience taught me that this is a very volatile business. I also quickly recognized a stark difference between the way Capital and my former employer managed uncertainty. Capital has learned to manage through volatile periods and views down markets as opportunities.We try to reassure associates during periods of uncertainty and encourage them to focus on long-term opportunities that may arise. With the COVID-19 pandemic leading to a recession and bouts of volatility earlier this year, I shared with younger colleagues a list of 10 tips for weathering market downturns to provide some perspective from my own experiences. Among them are “don’t dwell on what the market did yesterday,” “pay attention to balance sheets,” and “keep talking to companies.” The easiest thing to do in a downturn is to just freeze, so many of my suggestions try to help colleagues manage emotions and take action.For a primarily U.S.-focused investor, you have spent much of your time traveling abroad. Why is that important?First and foremost, traveling gives me fresh perspective on the companies that I follow. So many companies today, whether they are in or outside the U.S., have global operations and customer bases. I can travel to India, for example, and visit a pharmaceutical business. That's going to give me perspective on all pharmaceuticals, wherever they are.I travel to get some notion of the competitive environment, but also a sense of where challenges could come from or new opportunities. To truly understand a company — or a market or an industry, for that matter — you really have to go see it with your own eyes. You can’t do this job from a Bloomberg terminal.As an investment analyst in 1982, you predicted the coming of the mobile phone. How do you think the world will be different in 10 years?I have witnessed remarkable change in my career, not only in terms of investing opportunities but also global opportunities.When I started, there were no cell phones, no internet, not even desktop computers. I am certain there will be comparably huge leaps in the coming years. Many will be in technology, but there will be leaps in other areas. With respect to energy, I expect there will be some fabulous storage technology and better battery technology. That’s going to have a tremendous impact on the kind of transportation people use. There will be major changes in agriculture, in the way farms operate.I think one of the most exciting areas is medicine, where I believe there will be great leaps not only in drug discovery, but also in virtual medicine. People will be monitored, diagnosed and treated remotely.What drew you to a career in investing?I would describe myself as someone who has always been interested in learning about the way things work. That’s what drew me to study economics in college and then to a career in investing.What’s more, Capital has a culture that encourages lifelong learning, which really has been a perfect fit for me. In fact, as we speak I am working on a project with several Capital analysts to quantify the role that management plays in a company’s stock returns. I can’t wait to see the results of this study, and I’ll be working on it until my last day in the office!",Long-Term Investing
Quality Growth: Resilient businesses in a low-rate world,2020-09-21T03:22:00,"Growth stocks have continued to outpace value in the market decline and subsequent recovery following the COVID-19 outbreak. In our view, growth will continue to command a higher premium relative to other investment opportunities for two reasons:True growth investment opportunities are fewer in a world of low economic growth rates.An ultra-low interest rate environment reduces the discount rate to evaluate stocks. This allows investors to extend time frames, which tend to favour growth opportunities.Since the 2008—2009 financial crisis, the premium placed on growth companies has been most pronounced in non-U.S. markets, but it has been a rising trend in the U.S. as well. That said, sources of economic growth are likely to change and, in some areas, be redefined over the next few years on the path to recovery. Capital Group’s fixed income specialists similarly see this era of low rates continuing for an extended period due to powerful deflationary forces such as technological advances and aging populations in developed countries.Key ingredients of Quality GrowthAs the economic environment has become more challenged, members of our investment team are finding that not all growth opportunities are on equal footing. Increasingly, many of our portfolio managers are focusing on a subset of growth companies that they view to be Quality Growth. While there is no perfect screen or set of rules that can embody all aspects of what we’re referring to, the following exhibit summarizes some key aspects that we believe define Quality, Growth and Quality Growth companies.Clearly, not all of these characteristics are exclusive to Quality Growth companies — strong balance sheets and high-quality, experienced management teams are traits that portfolio managers look for across all types of companies. But when these traits are found in companies that also have attractive business models or are tapping into secular growth opportunities with a long runway, they can potentially make for attractive investment opportunities.One example of a strong secular growth trend is subscription-based businesses. They have compounding characteristics that have been attractive in most market conditions, often gaining share even in periods of economic slowdowns as consumers and enterprises shift behavior.An emerging participant is ServiceNow, which creates workflow management software that helps enable efficiency. ServiceNow has seen a rise in the use of its tools by the customer service functions of many corporations, as the software can handle and sort phone, chat and email inquiries.A more familiar name is Microsoft. Its business has benefited from sticky subscriptions through the Windows Operating System, a ubiquitous suite of Office products and its Azure cloud service. Collectively, these features help create a durable business model.Another example is online payments, where significant and durable shifts in how consumers and merchants transact business are fueling growth. PayPal has been among the market leaders.Are these all-weather stocks?An interesting aspect of many Quality Growth companies is that they have shown greater resilience and quicker recoveries versus the broader market. This chart shows the MSCI ACWI Quality Index as a proxy of Quality Growth companies. The companies in this index are selected based on high return on equity, stable year-over-year earnings growth and low financial leverage.While Quality Growth companies, as a group, have often held up relatively well during market downturns, it is important to remember that their ability to do so has been largely predicated on their ability to continue growing, even when many other companies cannot.Therefore, the cause of the downturn is an important consideration, and some quality growth companies may fare better than others in some downturns. Moving forward, some potential beneficiaries in the aftermath of COVID-19 may be businesses who operate in areas of video streaming and gaming, grocery delivery, automation and biotech.",Global Equities
Greetings from 2030: Growth investing for the next decade,2020-07-20T01:22:00,"Companies, Anne-Marie Peterson observed early in her investing career, go through life cycle changes just like people do. Where individuals can experience childhood, college, raising children and having careers, companies might go through periods of rapid growth, maturation, shifts in their competitive landscape and sometimes stagnation.“Consider Home Depot, which you could say grew up too fast,” recalls Peterson, who got her start as an equity analyst covering U.S. retail companies. “They opened a lot of stores rapidly, without building the necessary back-end infrastructure, like supply chain management systems.” With the market saturated and growth stagnating, Home Depot continued to open stores. The company appeared to be reaching its breaking point.An outsider, Frank Blake, was hired as CEO. “He had no retail experience but was a great listener and had a knack for making the complicated simple,” says Peterson. “He identified the problem, halted new store openings and set about fixing the supply chain on the back-end. In other words, he stopped growth to ultimately resume growth.”Like many of her colleagues at Capital Group, Peterson’s early experiences as an analyst helped shape her approach as a portfolio manager. “Retail is a very idiosyncratic sector,” she explains. “What I learned covering retail is that people matter a lot, and growth can come in many forms.”Peterson recently sat down with us to share her perspective on growth investing over the next decade and offer some predictions for what the world might look like in 2030.What characteristics do you look for in a growth investment?My underlying investment framework is driven by three key principles:Principle 1:Revenue growth drives earnings, which in turn drive stock prices. My starting point is to look for above-average revenue growth as a path to long-term earnings growth potential. Take the cloud as an example. Last year Microsoft’s Azure and Amazon Web Services together generated about US$60 billion in revenue, which represents a fraction of the US$700 billion addressable market for corporate IT spending.Principle 2:People matter. When I invest in a stock, I tend to look at it as underwriting a management team or culture, so I find it important to feel comfortable with a company’s leadership. In fact, I spend as much time trying to understand the people as I do the business and financial statements. For example, when I was evaluating e-commerce company Shopify, I met several times with Tobi Lutke, the company’s CEO, to get to know him. This is a founder who is mission-driven and working hard to ensure Shopify is a 100-year company.Principle 3:Change is a key catalyst for growth. Sometimes a CEO change can be a major catalyst, as was the case with Frank Blake at Home Depot or Satya Nadella at Microsoft.During periods of significant change, industry structures can shift — for better or worse. Some companies get stronger, others grow weaker or fail. There's uncertainty, but also an opportunity to identify what the market might be missing about a company’s prospects. And there are few periods of change more significant than the one we are living through now.Are today’s coronavirus-related behavior shifts creating a fertile environment for growth investing?There are opportunities to find great long-term investments in any environment. The current period is no exception. Every market downturn is different. What’s interesting about the current period is that the disruptive tech and consumer companies that led during the expansion havecontinued to lead.Typically the market leaders going into a downturn haven’t led during or coming out of a downturn, but I think we are seeing a fundamental shift happening.As of June 30, the Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index was down 3.1% year-to-date, but that figure represents the sum of several individual companies. A look beneath the surface reveals a wide divergence of returns. On the one hand, there are those that have benefited from coronavirus-related demand, like e-commerce platforms Amazon (up 49%) and Shopify (up 138%), and streaming services like Netflix (up 41%). On the other, there have been a number of companies that have struggled, like United Airlines (down 61%), Royal Caribbean (down 62%) and Boeing (down 43%). So it's been a tale of the haves and have nots. And I think the key question for long-term investors is, which of these moves are enduring?Which trends today have that potential to endure?The headline is that COVID-19 accelerated the secular shift toward digitalization. As Shopify’s Tobi Lutke put it, “We are experiencing 2030 in 2020.” If the digitalization sailboat was cruising along with steady tailwinds before, the pandemic turned those tailwinds into strong gusts. And that sailboat turned into a speedboat and covered more ground.I believe this represents the acceleration of a structural change that will be long lasting. Traditional TV’s scheduled programming and advertising model is more challenged than ever. Bankruptcies among retailers have accelerated, surpassing the global financial crisis, and I think more are coming. And while these shifts have been happening for a long time, what's interesting is that they're still in the early innings. In the U.S., e-commerce is growing rapidly but still represents only a fraction of total U.S. retail sales, and trails adoption in China and other markets.Payments provide another example. During the pandemic, many of us have been forced to pay for things digitally. It can be difficult to change a habit, but once you do it can be sticky.Even with respect to the public sector, the digitization shift is picking up momentum. Many local government offices have fallen far behind the digitizing curve. But companies like Tyler Technologies, a software developer founded in the 1960s, have been helping government agencies move their systems to the cloud, helping digitize processes like the issuing of parking tickets and even operating courts virtually.What other sectors are experiencing these shifts?In health care, the adoption of telemedicine, or online patient-doctor visits, exploded in March, a trend that I think is going to endure. Patients have had access to these services for a long time, but the adoption rate had been low. As a result of COVID-19, regulators and health care providers relaxed their rules to allow more digitalization. At the same time, patients and doctors, partly out of necessity, got more comfortable with remote appointments.Jason Gorevic, the CEO of telemedicine provider Teladoc Health, recently said, ""What we thought would take years to happen happened in a matter of months. This isn't an inflection point. It's a shift in the demand curve."" This shift is also important news for patients. Where you see this digitalization happen, it's leading to better outcomes and lower costs.You said growth comes in many forms. Can you talk about the types of growth you look for?I try to look for companies whose products or services can make the world better, and a lot of the transformational change we are seeing today has that potential. I define growth more broadly than the traditional definition. I look for growth in three broad stages, depending on where a company is in its life cycle.Growth stage 1:The first group is what I would call early-stage growers. These tend to be innovators whose offerings have the potential to disrupt existing business models. They often have potentially large addressable markets and their products are early in the adoption curve. A recent example is Shopify, which provides small merchants with resources for payments, customer engagement, shipping and marketing. While Amazon’s focus is on the end consumer, Shopify’s is on the small business owner. Its services enable small businesses to run their stores and websites for hundreds of dollars a month and to access consumers globally. The founding CEO, Tobi Lutke, is a product guy — he developed his software originally to sell snowboards. He is on a mission to empower small merchants of the world.Another example in this category is the aforementioned Teladoc, which has seen demand for its offerings rise as patients and doctors have gotten more comfortable with remote appointments.Growth stage 2:A second type I look for are the durable franchises with long potential growth runways. Amazon could be considered an example. Platforms like an e-commerce site are strengthened by the number of participants. And sales beget more sales. As a result, they have more to invest in their technology. As I mentioned earlier, e-commerce today still only represents a fraction of total retail sales in the U.S.Growth stage 3:A third growth category is mature companies able to get more out of existing assets, whether it is through a turnaround or an existing approach. A decade ago, Home Depot would have fit this category. Examples today might potentially include medical device maker Boston Scientific and railroad operator CSX Transportation.When you first joined one of Capital Group’s largest U.S. mandates as a portfolio manager, how did you prepare for the role?One thing I did was look through Capital’s archives back to 1974 and read every annual report. I wanted to get a strong sense of the fund’s personality — what we're trying to accomplish for our shareholders — from the voices of my predecessors. I was struck by a write-up in the 1982 report that featured several investment professionals discussing fundamental change in the industries they covered. Claudia Huntington, who is still a portfolio manager at Capital and was covering technology at the time, mentioned this thing called a cell phone that would be available in the future. And our late chairman Jim Rothenberg, who was a mentor to me, predicted the development of the flat-screen TV. At the time it must have sounded like crazy, pie-in-the-sky stuff, but it came to be. We're still trying to identify change today.Can we ask you to share a couple predictions of your own? How do you think the world will be different in 2030?I think one of the most interesting things we could see in 2030 is a version of David and Goliath: the rise of the small business and the power of the individual over the large corporation. We are seeing a new wave of online software providers and e-commerce companies that are developing back-end infrastructure tools that have the potential to empower small- and medium-sized businesses. Historically, a big investment budget and big IT department would be needed to run a retail business.The tools being developed today lower the barriers of reaching customers and managing inventory. Someone will be able to start a business, selling T-shirts around the world for example, in 15 minutes. Whereas the benefits of the first wave of online services developed by Google and Facebook accrued to a few big companies, I think the next wave of advances can lead to the dispersion of economic power and opportunity to smaller companies.Similarly, in the health care sector, I think we will see the democratization of health care. Today most of us don’t have immediate access to fluctuations in our cholesterol or heart rates. I think we'll see more remote monitoring that can connect to smart delivery systems of medication and other therapies.We are seeing glimpses of it. Companies like Insulet and Dexcom are developing devices that enable remote monitoring and delivery of medication for diabetics. A decade from now this could be more broad-based and might include sending alerts to your doctor. With companies like Intuitive Surgical developing robotics for surgeries, these advances could converge to the point where remote medical devices and robotics will allow a specialist in Japan to perform a procedure on a patient in Nebraska. Anyone will have access to leading specialists, no matter where they live. The pieces are in place for this to happen, and all of this has the potential to improve outcomes and reduce costs.The bottom line is that we are living in an incredible time of change. Change drives opportunity for active investors like us.And at Capital, we have the luxury of thinking very long term. My bonus is mainly paid over an eight-year period, so I am truly paid to think about what 2030 will look like — or at least 2028. There are new emerging companies today that we may not hear about, but a decade from now will be household names providing value to their customers. Out of every crisis is born something good.",U.S. Equities
Navigating a new landscape for global dividends,2020-05-20T02:40:00,"With much of the world in quarantine, dividends are at a crossroads.As the global economy remains essentially shut down, many companies face tough choices when it comes to returning cash to shareholders. In Canada, some steady dividend payers -- such as energy companies -- have announced dividend cuts and the concern is that others may follow suit. Dividend cuts and suspensions have jumped to the highest level in more than a decade. But even in this environment, some companies have maintained payouts and even raised them.More than ever, this divergence in dividend commitment emphasizes the need for stock-specific research to help identify companies that can weather the storm. Interest rates also remain ultralow in developed markets, further underscoring the need to find companies that can generate sustainable income for investors who may be struggling tofind it in bonds.Dividends face challengesIn periods of economic duress, dividend cuts and suspensions are not unexpected. In the United States they have reached a level last seen during the Great Recession as sales have slowed and companies scramble to preserve cash. In Europe, dividends have come under immense political pressure as government regulators warn banks to preserve capital amid the coronavirus pandemic.Many investors may be surprised to learn the degree to which ethical and social considerations are influencing dividend policy in a wide range of industries. This is especially prevalent among companies in France, Spain and Germany.Many European companies have delayed annual meetings to reevaluate conditions later this year. Given that some companies in Europe pay dividends only once or twice a year, instead of quarterly, the monetary impact and uncertainty is significant.Amid plummeting oil prices, Royal Dutch Shell on April 30 reduced its dividend for the first time since 1945, cutting it by more than 60% to 16 cents a share.Rays of hopeDespite a severe global economic downturn, not all companies are following the same path. Many remain committed to sustaining and even increasing their dividends.For example, in Europe, Nestlé and Zurich Insurance accelerated plans to hold virtual annual meetings and committed to paying dividends as planned. German chemical giant BASF is sticking to its payout, and several utilities in the U.K. have expressed strong support for sustaining their dividends during this turbulent time.Among U.S. companies, Procter & Gamble and Johnson & Johnson have raised their disbursements, and Starbucks is maintaining its dividend. Even in the hard-hit oil sector, ExxonMobil said on April 29 it would maintain its quarterly dividend despite reporting a US$610 million first-quarter loss.Assessing dividend sustainabilityAs companies take different paths, our investment analysts are rigorously scrutinizing balance sheet strength, financial conditions and cash-flow outlooks on a company-by-company basis.Take the U.S. communications services industry. The business has consolidated in recent years, making several companies both providers and distributers of content. This consolidation has had financial ramifications.AT&T acquired DirecTV and, more recently, Time Warner. As a result, AT&T’s net debt rose to US$150 billion and its earnings became more economically sensitive due to the cyclical nature of the advertising business. On the other hand, Verizon Communications has roughly US$130 billion of net debt and less exposure to advertising. Verizon stock has yielded less than AT&T, but its dividend is perceived to be safer by the market.Our equity analysts collaborate with our fixed income team to evaluate the risk that a company may cut its dividend to avoid a credit rating downgrade. High levels of corporate debt could impact dividend sustainability.Our analysts and portfolio managers are also weighing subjective issues that could impact the dividend, such as:Acquisitions: Companies may prioritize acquisitions, buying smaller or weaker competitors for strategic reasons while valuations are distressed, and cutting dividends to accelerate debt repayment.C-suite changes: A recently appointed CEO or new chairperson of the board may not have the same level of commitment to past dividend policies.Board composition: Some board members may be executives of other companies who have cut dividends and may not have any qualms about doing it again.Consider upgrading your portfolioA new paradigm is emerging for dividend-paying stocks and, therefore, we believe it is important to upgrade income-oriented portfolios. In our view, an effective approach involves:Diversification: Generating a disproportionate amount of income from a given sector or region can increase the risk of a severe reduction of dividend income. Companies in many sectors outside of traditional areas, such as technology and health care, now pay dividends. A global approach, where appropriate, also expands the pool of dividend-paying companies, providing further diversification.Fundamental research: Financial and liquidity analysis can help assess the ability of a company to pay its dividend in a variety of scenarios through collaboration with equity and fixed income analysts.Holistic perspective: This involves assessing myriad qualitative and subjective factors including any recent management changes, the composition of the board and the company’s approach to M&A during a time of distress.",Dividends
Where do stock markets go from here?,2020-04-27T04:58:00,"Wild fluctuations in stock markets resulting from the coronavirus pandemic have tested the resolve of many investors.“We saw markets drop more than 30% in a month, the quickest decline of that magnitude on record,” says Jody Jonsson, a global equity portfolio manager at Capital Group. “This is a truly global downturn that has impacted virtually every sector. It can be very disorienting, and I think the market is having a hard time sizing the depth and duration of the recession that is coming.”With many areas of the global economy coming to an abrupt halt, markets have seesawed between gains and declines as investors weigh the potential impact of massive stimulus initiatives by governments and central banks.So, where are the world’s stock markets headed from here? In a recent call from their home offices, Jonsson and equity portfolio manager Joyce Gordon, both veterans of numerous bear markets, shared their perspective onweathering the recessionand positioning portfolios for the future.1) How long will this bear market last?Jonsson:The recovery may go the way the virus has gone: from east to west. In fact, we can see that China’s market has started to recover already — down about 10% in the first quarter. Once the coronavirus case count leveled out, the market began to recover. I believe that could be the case for the U.S. and Europe as well. When does the curve flatten? As an investor I want to anticipate when those numbers will flatten. The key is to do what we always do: maintain our focus on the long term. It can be very difficult in times like these to look past the next few days. To the extent you can stretch your time horizon to months or years, I think that helps put you in a position to capitalize on the best long-term investment opportunities.Gordon:I have experienced a lot of bear markets over my 39-year career. Each is different, but there are clear similarities: It always feels horrible when you're in the middle of it, but we have always come out the other end okay. It is very difficult to determine the precise timing of a recovery — sometimes the market bounces and recovers very quickly. That said, while I am hoping for a V-shaped recovery, I don't expect it. I expect a U-shaped recovery that will take some time and be highly dependent on the tapering off of new virus cases.2) Are you making changes to portfolios during this difficult period?Jonsson:I'm thinking about my portfolios in three buckets. The first includes companies I think will be largely unchanged or helped by current conditions. Examples could include certain medical device makers or tech stocks that are supporting the worldwide increase in internet use – a trend that is likely to remain even when the virus wanes. The second are stocks that were hit very hard initially, but that I do not believe will suffer long-term damage. Some of the larger payments companies might be in this category. In those cases, I will look for opportunities to add to my positions when the stock prices are sliding. The third bucket includes companies and industries that might be more structurally impaired if this goes on for a while – think some travel-related companies. With those, we want to try to determine how long they can sustain themselves with very low or zero revenue.Gordon:We've been more active than usual during this period, selling some securities that we feel will have a lot more downside and buying those that we believe have been unduly punished. I'm developing a list of what I consider excellent companies that we may have a rare opportunity to invest in at 3% or greater dividend yields. If markets decline further, I'll look for opportunities to put cash I’m holding to work. I'm looking for companies where the revenues will likely be okay going through this and that would include some food companies, for example, and some utilities look interesting. And I will focus on companies with relatively low leverage. I tend to be a defensive investor, so I plan to be very cautious until I see signs that we are through the brunt of this. At that point I will look to invest in companies with more exposure to a recovery. For example, some of the aerospace and defense contractors might be attractive on the other side of this.3) Given the global nature of this crisis, how may multinationals be affected?Jonsson:Multinational companies have faced serious challenges over the past year or so,starting with the trade war. A lot of investors expected these companies would be disadvantaged by their exposure to China, but we found that multinationals have tended to be resilient. Today many global companies have strong balance sheets and cash flows, as well as access to credit, which is particularly important in today’s environment. Smaller companies may find they don't have as much access to liquidity. Coming out of this, we may see some industries become more consolidated as the strong get even stronger because of their flexibility and better access to resources.I do expect companies to rethink their supply chains and dependence on China as they seek to become more resilient. When companies maximize their efficiency to boost margins, they often find they have thinner margins for error, which is a problem in this environment. I think we're going to see companies managing themselves with a bit more flexibility, a bit more redundancy, multiple suppliers and multiple locations.We may see an industrial renaissance in the U.S. as companies seek to become more resilient coming out of this. We've already seen the early stages of this trend in technology, with companies like Taiwan Semiconductor, for example. But now we're also starting to see it among pharmaceuticals, as many of the key compounds for therapies are made only in China.4) How are defensive areas of the market holding up?Gordon:Traditionally defensive investments have generally held up well, but there are exceptions. Energy, one of the higher yielding sectors, has been the hardest hit in this decline as it has faced both supply and demand shocks. We had an economic slowdown that's hurting demand for oil at a time when Saudi Arabia and Russia couldn't agree on production cuts and began flooding the market with oil. On the positive side, companies in consumer staples, health care and some defense contractors — those companies whose revenues tend to hold up better during recessions — have also stood up relative to the broader market.Within sectors, we are seeing that companies with strong balance sheets and low debt have been less impacted than companies with higher leverage, which we expected. Before the news of the coronavirus, I was already focused on dividend-paying companies with lower leverage and strong free cash flow. Companies with excessive leverage may be at risk of cutting dividends.We've seen many companies either cut, eliminate or suspend their dividends in today’s extreme environment. Some are doing this out of an abundance of caution to make sure they have ample cash to weather a difficult period. In other cases, they may face pressure from rating agencies or governments, as has been the case recently in France. We're likely to see more dividend cuts so we are working hard to try to anticipate them.5) What sectors are likely to lead us out of the downturn?Jonsson:Tech isn’t usually defensive, but in the current downturn some leading technology companies like Amazon have acted somewhat defensively because they are benefiting from physical distancing and stay-at-home policies. What's been particularly noteworthy to me is that it hasn't just been cheap stocks that have held up. For example, I own a European medical equipment maker that was recently trading at over 40 times earnings. Because the demand for its products is so steady and repeatable, the stock price has not moved much during this period. And so I am looking at the resilience of businesses rather than just what I'm paying for them as a guide to what might be defensive if this drags on. If we avoid a prolonged recession but enter a period of slower growth because there will be greater government debt, I think such growth companies may still do well in that environment.Gordon:Health care stocks have also held up relatively well. A lot of these companies have the opportunity to develop a drug that might combat the coronavirus, while others are gearing up to make much needed testing equipment. And, given the crisis that we're in, I expect less pressure from Congress on drug pricing. So I believe the drug companies may do well from here. Companies that make devices for knee or hip replacements, for example, will likely get temporarily cut back, as many of those surgeries will be postponed. But I don't think demand goes away; it just gets pushed off and they look better perhaps a year or 18 months from now.6) What can investors do to keep calm during this period?Gordon:Try not to look at the market every day. That can only amplify anxiety. Times like this can be unnerving, but remember that the stock price only matters when you buy and when you sell. Remember that while your clients may feel hopeless because they are doing nothing, there’s a lot happening behind the scenes as we look for opportunities to upgrade portfolios and test the resilience of the companies in which we are invested. We have a lot of resources, including a great team of investment analysts in markets around the world who have deep experience. For example, we have health care analysts who are MDs and I believe are the best in the industry.Jonsson:There is so much anxiety and fear in the market, and I think it is important to lean the other way when sentiment gets lopsided. With negativity so high, I'm trying to allow for the possibility of positive surprises. Maybe the current situation isn't quite as bad as it seems, or maybe we solve this. Maybe good old-fashioned scientific ingenuity comes up with some great solutions. But most importantly, don't lose sight of the long term and consider this downturn an opportunity to invest in some great companies at attractive prices.",Market Volatility
Why multinationals can survive trade conflicts,2020-02-13T02:48:00,"As a portfolio manager who invests in many large, multinational companies, the most common question I get these days is whether I am worried about the impact of a global trade war. At a time when tariffs and other restrictions are threatening to reverse decades of trade liberalization, are these companies the most vulnerable of all?The answer may surprise you: While I certainly follow political events, I am not overly concerned about the impact on well-managed multinationals. Simply put, they are the best-positioned companies to navigate an uncertain environment and devise effective solutions, including a multilocal approach to business that puts them closer to consumers around the world.A temporary trade truceWhen I first discussed this subject nearly two years ago, the U.S.-China trade war was just beginning to heat up. Since then, we’ve seen several twists and turns which ultimately led to a “phase one” trade deal adopted by Beijing and Washington on January 15.Clearly, this trade pact is a step in the right direction: China has agreed to buy more U.S. products while the U.S. reduces some tariffs on Chinese-made goods. However, we still have a long way to go before the world’s two largest economies address more thorny issues, such as intellectual property theft and heavy subsidies for Chinese state-owned enterprises. Those may take years, or even decades, to resolve.In the meantime, companies that conduct business all over the world are doing what they do best: navigating treacherous waters and finding ways to succeed regardless of the geopolitical headwinds.Turn down the noiseWhat’s the rationale for my high level of confidence? There is a reason why multinational companies have come to dominate the global economy and financial markets. For the most part, they are run by smart, tough, experienced managers. This isn’t their first rodeo. They have seen all types of trade environments, favourable and unfavourable. Therefore, in my view, these battle-tested companies are in the best position to survive and even thrive in a hostile landscape.For investors, it’s important to avoid focusing too much on the noise surrounding trade and protectionism. It’s easy to get lost in the rhetoric over steel or soybeans or whichever commodity is targeted next. There are conflicting data points every day and many of them are inconsequential. To the extent that trade conflicts cause investors to shy away from multinational companies, paying too much attention to the rhetoric is a detriment to successful, long-term investing.Rearranging the chess boardIf I’ve learned anything during my 31 years as a professional investor, it’s that smart companies will figure it out. Invest in strong, global companies with seasoned management teams and — more often than not — they will rise above the fray. The best-run companies in the world will find ways to win even when governments are trying to rearrange pieces on the chess board.For example, the multilocal business approach I referenced earlier is gaining traction. Many global companies are establishing successful operations in local markets, rather than retreating in the face of trade barriers. More and more, it is becoming crucial for multinationals to produce where they sell. In order to succeed, they must be able to move swiftly and respond effectively to local competition.Just do it, locallySports apparel giant Nike optimizes this approach with its hyper-local sales initiatives. For instance, Nike has launched a data-driven retail store in Los Angeles that stocks shoes according to online buying trends in surrounding ZIP codes. It doesn’t get much more local than that. In Europe, Nike has established a speedy supply-chain initiative that allows it to tailor colours and new materials based on individual customer preferences in each city where it operates.Visa and Mastercard are following much the same approach when it comes to electronic payment processing — which must be tailored not just to the preferences of local customers but also to the strict financial regulations of many different governments around the world. As a result, both are growing at a healthy pace while evolving and adapting to a changing set of competitors in the fintech industry.Meanwhile, a company you may have never heard of, Switzerland-based Temenos, is rapidly growing its highly local business of providing enterprise software programs for banks. Many of its customers are using old technology, and they require ultra-local solutions to comply with state and federal banking regulations. This low-profile company has grown fast in Europe and is now in the midst of an ambitious expansion into the United States.Emerging competitionIn many ways, this multilocal approach is crucial for companies based in the U.S., Europe and Japan that are looking to stay relevant or expand into faster growing emerging markets. Many of those countries — China, India, Brazil, etc. — are nurturing their own multinational giants, as well as smaller single-country-focused competitors, and they are not waiting for the traditional global players to catch up.Aside from all the trade worries, some large multinationals are being leapfrogged by smaller competitors who are more in touch with local markets. In my view, that is a bigger threat than any political issue.Emerging market consumersare looking for brands that they can trust and companies that know the local marketplace. So large multinationals that can break themselves down, think locally, act nimbly and launch products more quickly should be better positioned for success in the long run.Ultimately, I believe cooler heads will prevail and the trade disputes eventually will be resolved. But the challenge posed by fierce local competition will continue to be a very effective motivator in the global economy, as it always has been.",Trade
Defensive investing has paid dividends in down markets,2019-04-30T03:08:00,"The Cold War was raging, Jimmy Carter became the first candidate from the U.S. Deep South elected President since the Civil War, and Apple Computer was a newly established private company the year Joyce Gordon began her career at Capital Group. She started as an assistant at age 19 — the youngest employee ever hired at the firm at that time.It didn't take Gordon long to recognize that the investment analyst role was the job to have at Capital. ""For the first couple of years I was in a clerical role, but I decided pretty quickly that I wanted to work as an investment analyst,"" she recalls. ""Portfolio managers depend on the analysts to provide the information they need to make investment decisions. And I really liked the camaraderie and mutual respect among the investment professionals.""With Capital's backing, Gordon earned her degree and then an MBA at night. In 1987 she became an analyst, covering savings and loans.""Two years later, my responsibilities expanded to include the banking sector. That was in 1989, right before the commercial real estate crisis, when the average bank lost 67% of its value over 12 months,"" she says. ""It was about the only group of stocks that was declining because the crisis was centered around real estate. It was a lonely existence. I remember my research director saying, 'Joyce, you are so lucky. You’re getting five years' experience in one year.'""Today, Gordon is an equity portfolio manager onCapital Group Capital Income BuilderTM(Canada). The portfolio is designed to provide individuals with an endowment-like experience and produce asteady stream of growing income, and seeks to deliver a smoother contour of results. The mandate places an emphasis on companies that pay dividends. Dividend-oriented companies have lagged the broader market in recent years, behind a few fast-growing technology and consumer leaders. But with equity valuations elevated, market turbulence rising and the U.S. economy in late cycle, dividend-focused investing is worthy of more attention.We sat down with Gordon to get her perspective on the current environment and lessons learned about investing through volatile markets.The U.S. economy is firmly in late-cycle territory. How are you thinking about portfolio positioning today? Are you doing anything differently?Now that the U.S. Federal Reserve has halted its interest rate hikes and taken a more dovish stance, I expect the decade-long U.S. expansion can continue, even though we are in the late stages of the cycle. I also feel that markets can continue to offer appreciation.But equity markets tend to be more volatile during the late cycle. In part, that’s because order volumes start to come down — or at least level off — which increases the potential for companies to fall short of their earnings estimates. So I expect markets to be volatile going forward.In this environment I am looking to be more defensive, focusing on established companies with a track record of generating steady revenue regardless of what is happening in the economy.What type of companies are you looking at today that might have those qualities?Utilities such as American Electric Power, with long-term contracts and a stable rate base, have tended to hold up well in troubled economic times. Indeed, in 2018 the utilities sector of Standard & Poor’s 500 Composite Index posted a 0.46% gain while the broader S&P 500 declined 6.24% (results in U.S. dollars).I also look closely at defence contractors, food companies and health care companies such as AbbVie. Hormel, for example, has held up better than the market during past declines.These types of companies tend to have low debt levels; sometimes they are net cash. And many of them pay dividends. The longer this expansion continues, the more attention I pay to dividend sustainability. Should the company decide to cut its dividend, support for the stock price could collapse. That’s what happened with a lot of companies in the Great Recession of 2008 and 2009.Results in USD.What lessons did you draw from the 2008 recession and other down markets over the course of your career?One important lesson I learned is to avoid companies with a lot of debt. Companies with significant debt service are subject to a number of challenges. For example, they may feel pressure from credit rating agencies to cut their dividend so that they can maintain an investment-grade rating for their debt issuance.Another thing I learned is to pay close attention to what company executives and boards are doing. Take Washington Mutual, which failed during the financial crisis in 2008. Going into the crisis, the bank issued a proxy proposal that would change its management bonus structure, removing the impact of any loan losses. In other words, management was being incentivized by volume, not quality. Looking back, that should have been a telltale sign that something horrible was coming.I don't see a lot of those types of things going on today. But some companies are issuing debt to buy back shares and pay their dividends, rather than using free cash flow. It's tempting for companies to do this because rates are so low, but it can be a warning sign.I have also seen some companies that have typically increased their dividend every year that have yet to do so over the past year. And in many cases these have been the companies with a lot of leverage who are becoming concerned about paying down debt. We have seen that with some of the food companies. This suggests that sales growth is tougher in this late-cycle environment.Introduced in Canada on October 31, 2018, Capital Income Builder showed resilience during the last two months of 2018 when markets were declining. Why is that important for investors?I am always thinking about steps I can take to help protect on the downside. Capital Income Builder’s combination of dividend-paying companies, dividend-growing companies, plus an anchor of high-quality fixed income holdings, provided resilience during the last two months of 2018. Lower volatility can help investors stay true to their investment strategy over the long term.It comes down to doing the fundamental research on individual companies. Over time we have constructed a backdrop of what has typically happened during recessions and the types of companies that have fared better than the broader market.We go through all the scenarios and try to make sure that we are protecting on the downside while still participating in the market. The goal is to help our investors stay the course through difficult periods by reducing the amount of volatility in the fund.",Dividends
Keeping investors “on the train” during volatile periods,2018-12-10T09:18:00,"Portfolio managers Alan Wilson and Hilda Applbaum (manager on Global Balanced) discuss how Capital's focus on mitigating risk can help keep investors ""on the train.""VIEW TRANSCRIPTAlan Wilson:If you think about an investment journey, the most difficult thing is if you kind of get off the train is getting back on, right?I think what I would explain about the Capital journey, is it is designed to enable you to stay in for the longer term. It's designed so that you have a team of people so that if one person leaves it's not time to have to sell this because we've got to go find something else. It's designed to understand companies analytically so that you have a better chance of not having blowups and things that'll scare you out of things.It’s designed to have minimal downside capture, so when it's most likely time to become afraid, you'll feel a little bit better, because the dips aren't quite so deep. It's designed to have a place where the folks invested with you are invested alongside you.That's the premise. We believe that there is no getting rich quick, but you can accumulate wealth slowly. And to do that, you need to stay on the train, need to minimize the dips that'll scare you off, and find someone who'll be there for the duration and that's what we're built to do.Hilda Applbaum:It's important to keep investors invested. I invested through the '87 crisis, the 2000 crisis, and the 2008 crisis, and what made 2008 really different is I think we lost an entire generation of investors. People got so scared, the volatility was so great, the loss was so precipitous, that people took their chips off the table and said I'm going to preserve what I have left and that's it.Not only didn't they get to enjoy the revaluation back to the original level which happened in 2012, they missed out everything that's happened since 2012, so their life goals, their life aspirations, their plans have been deferred.So low volatility is important because we want to lose less, we don't want to lose any money for our investors, but we certainly want to mitigate their downside, but we really need to keep them invested.",Long-Term Investing
Investing With Common Sense and Courage,2016-12-08T05:33:00,"2016 Global Investing Forum Highlights: Portfolio manager Don O‘Neal reflects on the two traits that drive Capital Group‘s investment approach.VIEW TRANSCRIPTDon O‘Neal:If you invest with us, you get those kinds of things, what I would say is the antidote to that kind of fashionable and sometimes poor thinking in the investment world. What we bring you, that antidote is the following two things, commonsense and courage. When you hire and invest with us, you get commonsense and courage. Our approach is based on those things. We do our own fundamental research, we do it on a global basis, which means we‘re investing in good companies or we‘re investing in situations that are improving. That is, that is a good place to be. We‘re valuation sensitive, which means when we talk about those areas, you know, that got overvalued at certain times, when your valuation‘s sensitive, you‘re not investing in the overly popular stuff, because you have courage.When I think back on - Enron‘s a perfect example - I was part of a group that went and visited Enron back in the day. It was a super popular stock, everybody loved it, going to the moon. We went and visited them and then as we came out of the meeting we were sitting around going, well - this is at the elevator banks, leaving - “You know, I just spent the last three or four hours here and I still don‘t understand how they make money”. You know, and, “you know, I don‘t really get it either”.And so at the end of the day, we owned as many shares in Enron as a typical Animal House GPA; i.e., zero point zero. And that was the right decision, but that kind of thing takes courage, right? Because it was an $85 billion market cap, everybody loved it, and in those days 85 was particularly big. There weren‘t a lot of companies bigger than Enron. But we said, not for us.",Active Management
Searching for Google,2011-03-17T11:19:00,"From our video archives.Portfolio manager Don O’Neal discusses the depth of research involved in choosing to invest in an individual company’s stock.VIEW TRANSCRIPTDon O’Neal:The research here is so deep and so wide — there are all kinds of examples.I like to think, in one case, about our internet analyst. When he does his work, he has to decide what his recommendation’s going to be on Google, for example. So, as you might guess, he spends a lot of time talking to Google. Well, he also spends a lot of time talking to Yahoo!, their direct competitor, and you would expect that. But he also spends a lot of time talking to companies that aren’t public yet, in the private realm — to get a sense of what’s going on in the competitive environment — who might be coming up to try and nip at someone’s heels, those kinds of factors. And not many people do that.In addition, he will visit with Microsoft. He’ll go with our software analyst, because it’s not his specific responsibility, but Microsoft has Bing in the search business. They’re definitely a competitor, and so he gets that perspective.There’s another perspective: He also covers News Corp. They’re also big in the media and advertising business — that’s a direct responsibility of his. It’s not exactly Internet; it gives him another perspective. And then, on top of that, he’ll go to China and visit with Alibaba, with Taobao — with these major Internet companies in China — to get a perspective from there.So by the time he’s ready to make a decision, he really has collected a lot of different perspectives. Then he’ll come and talk internally with the portfolio counselors, who have their own perspectives on not only these companies but stock market trends. And so, at the end of the day, you get this very robust discussion of what to do about one individual stock that’s been built from so many different perspectives.",United States
